(lp1
S'Fred Hampton and Mark Clark were two Black Panthers shot to death in this city while they were asleep.'
p2
aS'Anthony Abbate (read: A BODY) violently beat the bartender Karolina Obrycka in this city after she refused to continue serving him.'
p3
aS'Jon Burge was convicted of perjury in this city in 2010, which he committed in the course of civil suits against him for the torture he ordered as Commander of the Area 2 violent crimes unit in the 1980s.'
p4
aS'In 1886, seven anarchists were sentenced to death in this city following an incident when a pipe bomb explosion caused a line of policemen to fire into a crowd of striking workers in Haymarket Square in this city.'
p5
aS'For ten points, what is this city notorious for police violence, particularly the violence ordered by Mayor Richard J. Daley during the 1968 Democratic National Convention'
p6
aS'During his reign he built a string of forts from Rhacotis to beyond El-Alamein, suggesting trouble on the western border.'
p7
aS'In the 34th year of his reign he married the daughter of Khattushilish; this peace stands in sharp contrast to a conflict begun in the fourth year of his reign when he had to defend his vassal state Amurru.'
p8
aS'To do so, he led a force across the Orontes river before he was ambushed by forces under Muwatalli II at the battle of Kadesh.'
p9
aS'Despite the inconclusive battle against the Hittites, grandstanding accounts of his exploits appear at Abydos, the Temple of Luxor, Karnak, and Abu Simbel alongside busts of his wife, Nefertiti.'
p10
aS'For 10 points, name this nineteenth century BC pharaoh of Egypt son of Seti I.'
p11
aS'One case arising from events in this state saw the Supreme Court rule that the execution of mentally retarded criminals was unconstitutional; that case was Atkins versus this state.'
p12
aS"Another case originating in this state resulted from the plaintiff's inheritance of land belonging to his uncle, Lord Fairfax, which this state seized; in that case, the Supreme Court, behind Joseph Story's opinion, held that Jay's Treaty superseded that laws of this state in accordance with the supremacy clause."
p13
aS'This state was also the defendant in a case which saw the unanimous affirmation of the Supreme Court as the arbiter of disputes between the states and the national government, pursuant to the 1789 Judiciary Act, but upheld the fining of the Cohen brothers for selling lottery tickets.'
p14
aS"The state from which the case of Martin v. Hunter's Lessee originated, for ten points, identify this state which lost a 14th Amendment challenge against its anti-miscegenation laws brought by Mildred Jeter and her husband Richard Loving."
p15
aS'After running Hong Kong, Frederick Lugard united the north and south halves of this country   under British rule.'
p16
aS'Its 1993 election probably was won by M. K. O. Abiola [ah-bee-OH-lah], but  Ernest Shonekan [SHOH-neh-kahn] gained control from Ibrahim Babangida until the military gave  control to Sani Abacha.'
p17
aS'Following the 1966 murder of Prime Minister Abubakar Tafawa Balewa, the  southeast region of this country temporarily seceded to become Biafra [bee-AH- frah].'
p18
aS'There have  been continuing conflicts between its northern region.'
p19
aS'containing many Hausa Muslims, and the  southern Igbo Christians.'
p20
aS'Name this country, part of which used to be Lagos Colony.'
p21
aS'A leader of this country limited the press with the Defamatory and Offensive Publications Decree and carried as a swagger stick a stuffed baby crocodile.'
p22
aS'Following a war in this country, its leader announced the Three Rs policy.'
p23
aS'The Africa Shrine and Kalakuta Republic were both run by a musician in this country named Fela Kuti.'
p24
aS'A government in this country was overthrown by a coup led by the "five majors," and an unsuccessful attempt to prevent a war in this country led to the Aburi Accord.'
p25
aS'In 1970, a ruler of this country used the phrase "no victor, no vanquished" to describe the result of this country\'s three year civil war with a state led by Odumegwu Ojukwu.'
p26
aS'For 10 points, name this country led by Yakubu Gowon during an Igbo attempt to secede to form Biafra.'
p27
aS'Fifteen Russian sailors are currently detained in this country after trying to smuggle arms into it.'
p28
aS'A June 2012 crash in the Ishaga neighborhood of this country led to a temporary shutdown of its Dana Air.'
p29
aS"This country's current president is a member of the People's Democratic Party, and took over from (*) Umaru Musa Yar'Adua."
p30
aS'Abubakar Shekau currently leads a terrorist group in this country founded by Mohammed Yusuf, the Islamist Boko Haram, and there is much oil in its Niger River delta.'
p31
aS'For ten points, identify this West African country whose President Goodluck Jonathan renamed the University of Lagos and lives in Abuja.'
p32
aS'A recent book discussing this nations Presidential election is You Must Set Forth at Dawn, which discusses the fraud at the heart of the administration of Umar Musa YarAdua.'
p33
aS'Recent troubles in this country have centered on a group partially led by Ateke Tom, which has been undertaking raids in its Rivers State near Port Harcourt, near a region from which Royal Dutch Shell employees have been kidnapped, the delta of its namesake river.'
p34
aS'For 10 points, name this oil-rich nation long ruled by Olusegun Obasanjo; a large nation of west central Africa.'
p35
aS"This leader's general Trebonius led a siege against the city of Massilia."
p36
aS"This leader's plan to besiege   an enemy against the sea was thwarted when two defectors told his enemy about the gaps in his walls,  leading to this leader's retreat from Dyrrhachium."
p37
aS"He used a hidden fourth regiment of infantry to   turn the enemy's left flank and win the Battle of Pharsalus, after which this leader fought Ptolemy  the Thirteenth alongside Cleopatra."
p38
aS'Name this Roman leader who began a civil war against Pompey  after crossing the Rubicon, and was eventually assassinated by Cassius and Brutus in 44 BCE on the  Ides of March.'
p39
aS'This leader crushed revolts led by Vercingetorix at the fortress of Alesia during his conquest of Gaul.'
p40
aS'This figure was appalled when pirates who had kidnapped him ransomed him for only twenty talents.'
p41
aS'During a civil war he started, this figure defeated Pompey, with whom he had formed the First Triumverate.'
p42
aS'This figure was stabbed in the Senate by his former allies, including Brutus, on the Ides of March.'
p43
aS'For 10 points, name this Roman general who changed the Roman Republic into the Roman Empire.'
p44
aS'This man won the Civic Crown for his service under Thermus during the siege of Mytilene.'
p45
aS'He demanded that his captors ransom him for fifty instead of twenty talents while in the captivity of Cilician pirates.'
p46
aS'This man recounted his victory at the Battle of Alesia, where he defeated Ambiorix and Vercingetorix, in his Commentaries on the Gallic War.'
p47
aS'He won the Battle of Pharsalus against a former fellow member of First Triumvirate, Pompey.'
p48
aS'For 10 points, name this man who crossed the Rubicon and became dictator of Rome, later assassinated by Brutus.'
p49
aS'The Byrd Amendment loosened the US embargo of this country to allow the importation of chromium.'
p50
aS'One leader of this country dismissed Peter Walls from his post as head of the army, and was elected over Joshua Nkomo.'
p51
aS', This nation intervened in support of Laurent Kabila during the Second Congo War, and the Lancaster House Agreement in 1979 led to the end of the government of Ian Smith here as well as white minority rule.'
p52
aS'The Movement for Democratic Change has emerged to challenge the ZANU-PF party in this nation.'
p53
aS'For 10 points, name this nation formerly known as Southern Rhodesia, led since independence by Robert Mugabe.'
p54
aS'Even though the voting in this nation occurred on March 29, the results have still not been provided, especially since a High Court hearing has officially requested a recount in a number of provinces.'
p55
aS'The election has been fraught with bad news for the incumbent, with a split ruling party divided through the rise of Simba Makoni and the rise in inflation far above 1,000%.'
p56
aS'Thus, Morgan Tsvangirais MDC party has been widely declared the winners both in the parliamentary and presidential struggle.'
p57
aS'FTP; name this nation who may soon see the unseating of their current ruler, Robert Mugabe.'
p58
aS'This president allowed the Wilson-Gorman Tariff to go into effect, though his critics often pointed to his dislike of protective tariffs.'
p59
aS"This president's Secretary of State Richard Olney insisted on arbitration to solve a border dispute between British Guiana and Venezuela."
p60
aS"He was against the annexation of Hawaii, but after the Morgan Report he gave up hope of reinstating Queen Lili'uokalani."
p61
aS'He also broke up the Pullman Strike and was in office during the Haymarket Riot.'
p62
aS'This only Democratic President between Andrew Johnson and Woodrow_Wilson was defeated in the Election of 1888 by Benjamin_Harrison.'
p63
aS'Name this only American president to serve nonconsecutive terms.'
p64
aS'John Evelyn and William Taswell discribe this event in their diaries, and an important role was played by the local militia or train-band.'
p65
aS"Sir Thomas Bloodworth's indecisiveness contributed much to its dramatic outcome, and panic broke out when the river fleet, considered unpassable, did not manage to hold."
p66
aS'After the second day, the duke of York was made responsible for the coordination of it.'
p67
aS'It led to violent outbursts against French and Dutch foreigners, as they were commonly held responsible for it, especially as the second Anglo-Dutch war was still ongoing.'
p68
aS'It is remembered by The Monument, a doric column designed in part by Robert Hooke, located near the intersection of Monument Street and Fish street hill.'
p69
aS'Charles Hubert was held responsible for it, and was hanged after having confessed to have started it in Pudding Street.'
p70
aS'Historically, the death count attributed to it was only eight, though it is thought the actual count was much higher.'
p71
aS"FTP, what 1666 catastrophe enabled Sir Christopher Wren to rebuild Saint Paul's cathedral"
p72
aS'The victors in this conflict divided their territorial gains via the Treaty of Partition.'
p73
aS'That side called a meeting at Soissons to appoint as its leader Boniface of Montferrat, and many of its troops were recruited by Fulk of Neuilly.'
p74
aS'This conflict began with the recapture of Zara, during which one side was asked to depose Alexius III.'
p75
aS'After this conflict, Baldwin of Flanders founded the (*) Latin Empire.'
p76
aS'It began when less than one-third of the promised thirty-three thousand troops showed up, prompting diversions to repay Venice.'
p77
aS'For 10 points, name this crusade that never quite reached the Holy Land, instead sacking Constantinople.'
p78
aS'King Emeric of Hungary was one of its targets.'
p79
aS'A meeting between Philip of Swabia and Boniface of Montferrat may have helped bring it about, as it has been argued that Philip intended to return a pretender from the Angelus family to the throne.'
p80
aS'Its beginnings could be found in a tournament at cry, where Fulk of Neuilly preached, and it is also suggested that the blinding of Enrico Dandolo and his subsequent vendetta may have inspired it.'
p81
aS'It is remembered mostly from the works of Nicetas Choniates and Geoffrey of Villehardouin [vee-hahrd-whan], who was one of the Franks involved in it.'
p82
aS'It began with an invasion of the Adriatic city of Zara, and ended with the establishment of the Latin Empire under Baldwin of Flanders.'
p83
aS'FTP name this crusade that saw the Venetians and Franks capture Constantinople.'
p84
aS'The Chronicle of Morea details the history of Greece following this event, and the Duchy of Athens was one of the states created in its wake.'
p85
aS'Foulques de Neuilly called for it, Thibaut of Champagne was its first leader, and Geoffroi de Villehardouin chronicled one of its acts, for which Pope John Paul II issued a formal apology in 2004.'
p86
aS"The Venetians' demand to be paid in advance for assembling the fleet may have contributed to the decision of the participants to violate Pope Innocent III's bar against attacks on other Christian states."
p87
aS'For 10 points, name this crusade launched in 1202, which sacked Zara and Constantinople and never reached the Holy Land.'
p88
aS"This man's daughter Theodosia mysteriously disappeared on the ship Patriot."
p89
aS'This man was criticized in a letter penned by Charles Cooper to Philip Schuyler.'
p90
aS'In one campaign, this man lost a governorship to Morgan Lewis, who received support from the head of a rival party.'
p91
aS'This man founded the Bank of the Manhattan Company and helped start the political machine of the Tammany Society.'
p92
aS'In the election of 1800, this man tied Thomas_Jefferson with 73 electoral votes, although the House of Representatives decided against him.'
p93
aS'This man was eventually betrayed by associate James Wilkinson and was arrested on charges of plotting to invade Spanish territories with a private army.'
p94
aS'For 10 points, name this Vice-President who killed Alexander_Hamilton in a duel.'
p95
aS'In 1802 he became embroiled in the Pamphlet War with James Cheetham when he defended the Adams administration.'
p96
aS'His maternal grandfather was the author of Freedom the Will, Original Sin, and Sinners in the Hands of an Angry God, Jonathan Edwards.'
p97
aS'During the Revolutionary War, he helped General Israel Putnam rescue trapped soldiers in Brooklyn Heights, and as a New York Senator after the war, he was strongly opposed to Jays Treaty.'
p98
aS'He consulted with General James Wilkinson over plans to flee to Mexico following his most famous altercation, but when that failed, he was paid $10,000 by Spain to protect Spanish America from Congress, an act many thought to be traitorous.'
p99
aS'FTP, name this Vice-President who was tried for treason and who killed Alexander_Hamilton in a duel.'
p100
aS'At the age of sixteen, he delivered a commencement speech to his graduating class at Princeton entitled Building Castles in the Air.'
p101
aS'He defeated Philip Schuyler for a Senate seat, though he left it to become a state legislator in New York, enjoying an alliance with William Mooney, the first Grand Sachem of Tammany_Hall.'
p102
aS'Later, he allied himself with the eccentric Irishman Harman Blennerhassett, on whose private island he raised an eighty-man army, but this was reported by the Spanish spy General Wilkinson, resulting in this mans trial for treason.'
p103
aS'Earlier, he had presided over the impeachment trail of Justice Samuel Chase while wanted for murder.'
p104
aS'For ten points, name this Vice-President who shot Alexander_Hamilton.'
p105
aS'This man largely retired from active duty after he developed heat stroke at Monmouth and he successfully engineered a retreat under Israel Putnam from Manhattan.'
p106
aS'William Peter Van Ness wrote a pamphlet defending this man, and Van Ness was an underling in a society he helped empower by giving them the right to form the Manhattan Company, the Tammany Society.'
p107
aS'He presided over the politically motivated impeachment trial of Samuel Chase, and was himself tried by John Marshall after being betrayed by James Wilkinson.'
p108
aS'He was the victor in an encounter with the son-in-law of Philip Schuyler in Weehawken, New Jersey in 1804.'
p109
aS'For 10 points, name this Vice President who was tried for treason for supposedly attempting to invade the Louisiana Territory and who fought a fatal duel with Alexander_Hamilton.'
p110
aS"This dynasty's original capital was at Harran and they defeated a force belonging to the Tang_Dynasty at the Battle of Talas."
p111
aS'One splinter group from this dynasty that ruled Transoxania descended from the Samanid general Alptigin and was known as the Ghaznavid Dynasty.'
p112
aS'This dynasty was established in a battle in which the forces of Marwan II lost to the army of as-Saffah called the Battle of the (*) Zab.'
p113
aS'Abd ar-Rahman III established a capital of Cordoba to rival this dynasty.'
p114
aS'Later, this dynasty was effectively destroyed when their capital was sacked by Hulagu Khan of the Mongol Empire.'
p115
aS'For 10 points, name this dynasty with its capital in Baghdad that in 750 overthrew the Umayyads.'
p116
aS'This dynasty won the Battle of Talas against a polity which employed Karluk mercenaries.'
p117
aS'The final leader of this dynasty was killed by being wrapped in a carpet and trampled with horses.'
p118
aS'The Barmakid family saw initial prominence during this dynasty, but eventually lost favor.'
p119
aS'It gained power after defeating a force led by Marwan II at the Battle of the Zab.'
p120
aS'Its capital city, which contained the House of Wisdom, was viciously sacked in 1258 by Hulagu Khan.'
p121
aS'This dynasty saw the pioneering of algebra and the medical work of Avicenna in a cultural golden age under the rule of leaders like Harun al-Rashid.'
p122
aS'For 10 points, name this third Islamic caliphate, which had a capital at Baghdad and overthrew the Umayyads.'
p123
aS'This man turned down the governorship of Oregon when the Taylor administration offered it.'
p124
aS'At the start of the Mexican-American war, he introduced the never debated Spot Resolutions and later established his anti-expansion views on slavery in his Cooper Union Speech.'
p125
aS'His opponent advocated the Freeport Doctrine in a series of debates taking place across Illinois.'
p126
aS'This politician would later suspend the writ of habeus corpus as president during the Civil War.'
p127
aS'For 10 points, name this president who freed the slaves with his Emancipation Proclamation.'
p128
aS'This man\'s "Lost Speech" was supposedly so good that reporters put their pencils down to listen.'
p129
aS'In another speech, this man notes that, unlike his addressees, he has sworn an oath to protect the Constitution, and that a "momentous issue" lies in their hands.'
p130
aS'In one of this man\'s speeches, he advocates binding up wounds "with malice towards none, with charity for all," and in another, he claims that the (*) "brave men who struggled here have consecrated" the ground on which he stood far better than he did with a speech which "the world will little note, nor long remember." For ten points, identify this President who said, "Four score and seven years ago" in his Gettysburg Address.'
p131
aS'debates with the man who advanced the Freeport Doctrine, Stephen Douglass.'
p132
aS'For 10 points, name this winner of the presidential election of 1860, who later issued the Emancipation Proclamation.'
p133
aS"Lord Auckland's Simla Manifesto of October 1, 1838 justified British intervention in the affairs of this mountainous country."
p134
aS'During the regime of Nur Mohammed Taraki, The United_States cut off aid to this country after the murder of Adolph Dubs, and Taraki overthrown and replaced by Babrak Karmal.'
p135
aS'The U.S, Pakistan, and several other nations backed the mujahideen when this country was invaded by the Soviet Union in 1979.'
p136
aS'FTP, Identify this Central Asian Country where a western power finally claimed a victory with the success of Operation Enduring Freedom, currently led by President Hamid Karzai.'
p137
aS'One war fought in this country included a battle fought in the Kurum Valley, and an earlier war included a battle between Sir John Keane and Hyder Khan at Ghuznee which was a disastrous attempt to put Shah Shuja on the throne.'
p138
aS'A coup was staged in this country to put the former prime minister Daud Khan in power, and he was killed in the Saur revolt.'
p139
aS'Ahmed Shah Durrani controlled it in the 18th century, and Zahir Shah was its last king.'
p140
aS'In this country, two so-called Arab journalists led a suicide attack on rebel leader Ahmed Shah Massoud, named the "Lion of the Panjshir," and that one-time warlord kept the north of this country independent of the one-eyed Mullah Omar.'
p141
aS'Subject of a Soviet invasion that led to mujahedeen forces fighting back in this country, it was later invaded during Operation Enduring Freedom after planes were used to destroy the World Trade Center.'
p142
aS'For 10 points, name this country were the Taliban and Osama Bin Laden live.'
p143
aS'This mans father died at the Battle of Coronea after distinguishing himself in the Battle of Artemisium.'
p144
aS'When he was wounded at Potidaea, his chum Socrates came to his aid.'
p145
aS'Later, while this man was assisting Thrasybulus at Phocaea, Antiochus disobeyed his command to not attack, leading to the destruction of his fleet at Notium by Lysander and this mans subsequent self-imposed exile to Thrace.'
p146
aS'He advocated prolonging the Peloponnesian War to Tissaphernes, a Persian satrap, and he argued against Nicias in favor of a war against Selinus in support of the Segestans.'
p147
aS'However, he was recalled from the Sicilian_Expedition to stand trial, but he escaped with his crew during the return voyage to Athens and instead joined the Spartan cause.'
p148
aS'FTP, name this Athenian general who switched allegiances a lot.'
p149
aS'This politician was blackmailed for sleeping with Maria Lewis, the wife of James Reynolds.'
p150
aS'He toured American factories and presented a report of his findings to Congress advocating protective tariffs.'
p151
aS'This author of the Report on Manufactures argued for the federal assumption of state debt in his 1790 Report on the Public Credit.'
p152
aS"He insulted a rival who was running for governor in New York, which led to this man's death in Weehawken after he was shot in a duel."
p153
aS'For 10 points, name the first Secretary of the Treasury who died at the hands of Aaron_Burr.'
p154
aS'Regarding one reform which he spearheaded, this ruler opined that "it is better if this takes place from above than from below."'
p155
aS'The Black Repartition and Land and Liberty societies both formed in opposition to this ruler, as did the narodniki among the middle class.'
p156
aS"This ruler's military put down the January Uprising in (*) Poland, and his war minister Dmitry Milyutin introduced conscription to the army."
p157
aS'The Church of the Savior on Spilled Blood was built in honor of this ruler at the site of his death.'
p158
aS'This ruler ascended to the throne shortly after his country lost the Crimean_War.'
p159
aS"Assassinated by the People's Will in 1881, for 10 points, name this Russian Tsar, the son of Nicholas I, who emancipated the serfs."
p160
aS'This czar gave Mikhail Muravyov considerable power in Poland, leading him to be known as ""the Hangman"" for his harsh sense of justice during the January Uprising.He established a more sophisticated system of local governments with his implementation of the zemstvo system, but his reforms were (*) cut short by his death at the hands of the People\'s Will.'
p161
aS'Succeeding Nicholas I at the close of the Crimean_War, for 10 points, name this Russian czar best known for emancipating the serfs.'
p162
aS'Alexander Soloviev attempted to kill this man, who was also the target of Dimitry Karakozov, while earlier in his life, hed been tutored by Vasily Zhukovsky.'
p163
aS'He appointed Loris-Melikov to head committees to suppress nationalistic movements, which outlawed Polish, Lithuanian, and Ukrainian.'
p164
aS'This man appointed Prince Gorchakov to lead the negotiations for peace after the fall of Sevastopol, while he gave a famous speech entitled No Dreams.'
p165
aS'This man established the Diet of Finland and morganatically married Catherine Dolgorukuv, in addition to marrying Marie of Hesse.'
p166
aS'This man is the son of Nicolas I and Charlotte of Prussia.'
p167
aS'For ten points, identify this nineteenth century Duke of Finland and Russian Czar who was murdered by the Peoples Will and had earlier emancipated the serfs.'
p168
aS'Dante Gabriel Rosetti described how this man "stayed the knout\'s red-ravening fangs.'
p169
aS'" His reign saw the introduction of the markka currency after he reestablished the Diet of Finland, and this man appointed Pyotr Shubalov as head of his secret police.'
p170
aS'In addition to establishing local assemblies called zemstvos, he passed an army statute implemented by Dmitry Milyutin which provided military training for all young men.'
p171
aS"He gave broad powers to his interior minister Mikhail Loris-Melikhov, whose namesake constitution was still being planned when the terrorist group People's Will assassinated this man."
p172
aS'FTP, name this Russian czar who emancipated the serfs.'
p173
aS'Because of a war this man pursued with the Ottoman_Empire, Bulgaria considers him one of their "founding fathers".'
p174
aS'In addition to the monument to him in Sofia, there is also one in Helsinki for his actions in regards to the Finnish language.'
p175
aS"He was forced to turn to Loris-Melikov, whose proposals designed to lessen the impact of him marrying his mistress just one month after his first wife's death were signed by him on the day of his death, although Nikolai Rysakov, a Polish revolutionary died in the act of killing him."
p176
aS'For 10 points, name this son of Nicholas I and tsar of Russia, assassinated on March 13, 1881.'
p177
aS"This man's death triggered the Lamian War."
p178
aS'This man, who built a causeway to end a siege at Tyre, defeated King Porus at the Battle of the Hydaspes.'
p179
aS'He was succeeded by a group of rival successors known as the Diadochi.'
p180
aS'One city he founded was the site of a World Wonder known as the Pharos.'
p181
aS"He commanded the left wing of his father's army while defeating the Sacred Band of Thebes at Chaeronea."
p182
aS'Aristotle tutored this son of Philip II who defeated Darius_III of Persia at the Battles of Gaugamela and Issus.'
p183
aS'For 10 points, name this "Great" Macedonian conqueror.'
p184
aS'One story about this man says that he once accidentally burned the griddle cakes of a peasant woman who was sheltering him.'
p185
aS"Before one of his military victories, he met with forces at Egbert's Stone."
p186
aS'He is not William I, but this subject of The Ballad of the White Horse unified various law codes into his namesake Doom Book.'
p187
aS'This man took an adopted son in the Treaty of Wedmore.'
p188
aS'To encourage education, he personally translated works from Boethius and Augustine into English.'
p189
aS"He is best known for winning the Battle of Ethandun against Guthrum, preserving this man's kingdom, the only one to resist Viking occupation."
p190
aS'For 10 points, identify this English king of Wessex who is known as "the Great."'
p191
aS"His biographer Asser records that he first came to prominence in the service of Burgred and married Burgred's niece Ealhswith (eels-with)."
p192
aS'His military success derived largely from a defense line of earth forts known as burhs and his decision to force citizens of adequate wealth to join the thegn (thain), a mounted infantry class.'
p193
aS"He defeated the Danes at Edington in 877 and translated religious works like St. Gregory's Pastoral Care and Boethius' Consolation of Philosophy."
p194
aS'For 10 points - name this Anglo-Saxon king who kept the Danes at bay and sponsored scholarly works like the Anglo-Saxon Chronicle.'
p195
aS'This man reformed the fyrd militia system so that it fought in shifts, allowing for the creation of a standing army without disrupting agriculture.'
p196
aS'In addition to establishing the burhs system of forts, this man built a secret military base on the swamp island of Athelney.'
p197
aS'This mans advisors included Bishop Asser, who wrote an early biography of him.'
p198
aS'This author of the so-called doom book won control of all territory west of Watling Street when he won the Battle of Edington against Guthrum the Old.'
p199
aS'Apart from translating many religious works into English, he is best known for ending the Danegeld.'
p200
aS'For ten points, name this King of Wessex, the only English monarch with the epithet the Great.'
p201
aS"One event during this man's administration was a crisis caused by the passage of the Tariff of Abominations over the issue of nullification."
p202
aS'Another event saw this man force the removal of many Cherokee natives from their homes in Georgia during the Trail of Tears.'
p203
aS'The Second Bank of the U.S. was abolished under him.'
p204
aS'For 10 points, name this man nicknamed ""Old Hickory,"" who succeeded John_Quincy_Adams as the seventh president.'
p205
aS"This President's supporters were inspired by an incident in Jefferson's presidency to give him a 1400 pound block of cheese."
p206
aS'During this man\'s presidency, Peggy Eaton\'s being snubbed in the Petticoat Affair resulted in the adoption of his ""Kitchen Cabinet.'
p207
aS'"" This man served as military governor of Florida after his success in the Seminole War.'
p208
aS'During the War_of_1812, he commanded the winning side at the Battle of New Orleans.'
p209
aS'For 10 points, name this seventh President of the United_States.'
p210
aS'This man ordered the execution of Robert Ambrister and Alexander Arbuthnot for spying during his military career.'
p211
aS'This president repeatedly advocated abolishing the Electoral College in his addresses to Congress, and he fired his entire cabinet after the(*) Peggy Eaton affair.'
p212
aS'His Vice President resigned during the Nullification crisis, to which this president responded with the Force Bill, and this president fought Nicholas Biddle over the existence of the Second Bank of the United_States.'
p213
aS'For 10 points, name this seventh President, nicknamed "Old Hickory."'
p214
aS'This man executed Robert Ambrister and Alexander Arbuthnot, two British citizens.'
p215
aS"In spite of John Ross' opposition, John Ridge and Elias Boudinot accepted this leader's policies in the Treaty of New Echota."
p216
aS'Chemical exposure from paint may have led Richard Lawrence to fire two pistols, both of which failed, at this man.'
p217
aS'He was passed up for power in the Corrupt Bargain of 1824 and feuded with Nicholas Biddle over the Second Bank of the United_States.'
p218
aS'For 10 points, name this Democratic president and winner at the Battle of New Orleans, nicknamed "Old Hickory."'
p219
aS'As president, this man shut down the Second Bank of the United_States.'
p220
aS'This president had a group of friends and advisers called the "kitchen cabinet." This victor at the Battle of New Orleans forced the removal of the Cherokee from their land by signing the Indian Removal Act.'
p221
aS'For 10 points, name this man nicknamed "Old Hickory," the seventh president.'
p222
aS'This man imprisoned Jos Mara Callava and then successfully defeated a writ of habeas corpus issued by Eligius Fromentin.'
p223
aS'This man asked the president to send him tacit support in a letter from John Rhea, and he sent Edmund P. Gaines to destroy the so-called Negro Fort.'
p224
aS'This man hung two British citizens in the Arbuthnot-Ambrister affair, and he was the victor at the Battle of Horseshoe Bend.'
p225
aS'Congress granted this man the right to use the army to ensure tariff collection with the Force Bill, and one of his programs was championed by Senator Thomas Hart Benton and by his Treasury Secretary, Levi Woodbury.'
p226
aS'For 10 points, name this president who issued the Specie_Circular and vetoed the attempted re-charter of the Second Bank of the United_States.'
p227
aS'The laws of this province were revised by Tiberius Julius Alexander.'
p228
aS"While in this province dealing with Lucius Domitius Domitianus, Diocletian's horse tripped, prompting the emperor not to level its largest city."
p229
aS'In 19 CE, Tiberius censured Germanicus for an unauthorized trip to this province.'
p230
aS'A ruler of this province named Petronius led a punitive expedition against a one-eyed queen named Candace.'
p231
aS'The first governor of this home province of Saint (*) Clement wrote poetry addressed to Lycoris before ultimately committing suicide; that man was named Gaius Cornelius Gallus.'
p232
aS'It effectively came under Roman control following a victory for Marcus Agrippa in 31 BCE.'
p233
aS'For 10 points, name this Roman province established after the Battle of Actium when Mark_Antony and Cleopatra were defeated.'
p234
aS'A very early text from this country concerns a government functionary who flees to Israel after hearing of a murder plot against the king.'
p235
aS'A later text tells of a brother, Bata, who is rewarded with a wife made out of clay by the god Khnum, although that wife later betrays him.'
p236
aS"An author from this country wrote a novel about a man who smokes hashish to forget his government's hypocrisy."
p237
aS'That man also wrote of Kamal, the son of Al-Sayyid Ahmad Abd al- Jawad, in a series that included Palace Walk, Palace of Desire, and Sugar Street.'
p238
aS"For 10 points, name this country, the setting of Naguib Mahfouz's Cairo Trilogy."
p239
aS'His lost works include On the Calendar, On Sphere Making, and Catoptrica, a book on optics.'
p240
aS'His extant works include Quadrature of the Parabola, which gives a formula for calculating the area of parabola segments; The Sand-Reckoner, which includes a system for expressing really big numbers; and On Spirals, which features the spiral now named for him.'
p241
aS'FTP, identify this Greek mathematician, whose other works include The Method, On Floating Bodies, and Measurement of the Circle, which gave pi its first exact value, who was killed in 212 B.C.'
p242
aS'during the capture of Syracuse when he was drawing a figure in the sand.'
p243
aS'One leader of this country led the Desert Campaign to end raids by the Mapuches and founded the Mazorca police force.'
p244
aS'That man was overthrown following the Battle of Caseros, after which this country was ruled by a man who would command coalition forces at the beginning of the War of the Triple Alliance, Bartolome Mitre.'
p245
aS'This country once ruled by Juan Manuel de Rosas underwent the National Organization Process, which included the arrest and torture of leftists following the overthrow of a man whose wives Eva and Isabel also ruled this country.'
p246
aS'For 10 points, name this home to the Dirty War once ruled by the Perons, which fought a war with Britain over the Falkland Islands.'
p247
aS'The early history of this country includes the Battle of Cepeda and constitutions written in the years 1819 and 1826, the second of which was overthrown along with Bernardino Rivadavia after he failed to obtain sufficient popular support.'
p248
aS'One of its dictators, who was toppled by forces led by Justo Jose de Urquiza at the Battle of Caseros, was Juan Manuel de (*) Rosas.'
p249
aS'After the Great Depression and World_War_II, this country\'s descamisados, or ""shirtless ones,"" helped usher in the rule of Juan Peron.'
p250
aS'For 10 points, name this country ruled from Buenos_Aires.'
p251
aS'One general from this country led a campaign called Conquest of the Desert, which resulted in a victory over the Mapuche people.'
p252
aS'Its presidents have included Bernardino Rivadavia and Leopoldo Galtieri, while one of its governors was Juan Manuel de Rosas.'
p253
aS'Jorge Videla became the leader of this country after overthrowing (*) Isabel, whose husband had led the descamisados and married Eva Duarte.'
p254
aS'This country experienced the Dirty War and invaded some South Atlantic islands in 1982, which sparked a war with the United Kingdom.'
p255
aS'For ten points, identify this country which fought the Falklands War and was once led by Juan Peron.'
p256
aS'One politician from this state suffered an awkward ten second pause during a debate before stating "we have did what was right" for this state.'
p257
aS"Terry Goddard lost the 2010 governor's race to that candidate, Jan Brewer."
p258
aS'One politician from this state drew flak for forgetting how many houses he owned during an interview.'
p259
aS'This state recently passed legislation requiring police to examine the papers of people who look like immigrants.'
p260
aS'For 10 points, name this home state of John McCain.'
p261
aS"This man lost one position shortly after Lord Melborune's insensitive response to the Captain Swing riots."
p262
aS'This leader was the namesake of a tune that would become "For He\'s a Jolly Good Fellow" after winning the Battle of Vittoria, from the same war where he built defensive fortifications for a reverse-siege at Torres Vedras.'
p263
aS'When this man was blackmailed by the publisher of the memoirs of his mistress Harriette Wilson, he retorted "Publish and be damned!" He won the Battle of Salamanca during the Peninsular Campaign, and won another battle with the aid of Gerhard von Blucher.'
p264
aS"For 10 points, name this British war hero who ended Napoleon's Hundred Days with his victory at Waterloo."
p265
aS'An uprising instigated by this polity saw its forces and those of its allies defeated in the Battle of Crannon, following the death of Alexander_the_Great.'
p266
aS'In the aftermath of the Lamian war, Antipater forced it to accept an oligarchy under Phocion.'
p267
aS'Its forces captured many hostages at the Battle of Sphacteria, one of its successes in the Archidamian War along with the engagement at Naupactus under its talented commander Phormio.'
p268
aS'Its later military commanders include Conon, who rebuilt the fortifications connecting it to its main port at Piraeus; those Long Walls were constructed at the instigation of Themistocles.'
p269
aS'For 10 points, name this Greek city-state which was ruled briefly by the Thirty Tyrants after losing the Peloponnesian War to Sparta.'
p270
aS'Two sisters from this city were turned into a swallow and a nightingale.'
p271
aS'One of those sisters had her tongue cut off and wove a tapestry to tell of her rape by Tereus.'
p272
aS'Another figure from this city received a casket from a Thracian woman who transformed into an almond tree, Phyllis.'
p273
aS'In addition to Procne, Philomela, and Demophon, this city is also home to a figure who buried his sandals, shield, and sword under a rock for his son to recover.'
p274
aS'Kings of this city include Aegeus and the lover of Ariadne and slayer of the Minotaur, Theseus.'
p275
aS'For 10 points, name this city that rejected a saltwater spring from Poseidon in favor of an olive tree from its namesake goddess of wisdom.'
p276
aS"This man received a ring from the Valentinian III's sister, Honoria, which prompted him to invade."
p277
aS'The Roman general Aetius and Visigothic emperor Theodoric I defeated this ruler in a battle whose location is believed to have been on the Catalaunian Plains or Chalons.'
p278
aS'This man may have died from a nosebleed eight years after he became the sole ruler of his empire following his murder of his older brother (*) Bleda.'
p279
aS'For 10 points, name this man who got the nickname "Scourge of God" for his incursions into Europe during the fifth century as a leader of the Huns.'
p280
aS'Much of what is known about this man comes from the diplomat Priscus, who described his death from a nosebleed on the night of his wedding to Ildoco.'
p281
aS'St. Genevieve allegedly diverted him from Paris through prayers.'
p282
aS'He replied to a letter from Honoria by demanding half of Rome as dowry.'
p283
aS'This brother of Bleda was defeated by the Visigoth Theodoric I and Flavius Aetius.'
p284
aS'Known as the (*) ""scourge of God,"" his invasion of Rome was defeated in 451 AD at the Catalaunian Plains in the Battle of Chalons.'
p285
aS'For 10 points, name this great leader of the Huns.'
p286
aS"This man's biggest defeat occurred days after his enemies arrived just in time to prevent Sangiban from turning traitor and opening the gates of Orlans to him."
p287
aS'In that battle, this man allied himself with Walamir and was opposed by Theodoric and Flavius Aetius.'
p288
aS'After the Battle of (*) Chalons, this leader was convinced to retreat after meeting at Mantua with Pope Leo I.'
p289
aS'On the night of his wedding to Ildico, he died of a nosebleed.'
p290
aS'For 10 points, name this ""Scourge of God"" and leader of the Huns.'
p291
aS'This man defeated Arnegisclus at the Battle of the Utus, and his successor Ellac was defeated at the Battle of Nedao by the Ostrogoths.'
p292
aS'The majority of knowledge about this man was compiled by the historian Priscus, and this man gained power after death of Rugila.'
p293
aS"He demanded half of Rome as dowry for Valentinian III's sister and that sister, Honoria, had earlier sent this man a ring which prompted his (*) invasion of Italy."
p294
aS'He killed his co-ruler and brother Bleda before losing at the Battle of Chalons, and he died from a nosebleed on the night of his wedding to Ildico.'
p295
aS'Pope Leo I managed to persuade this man not to sack Rome.'
p296
aS'For ten points, identify this "Scourge of God," the most famous leader of the Huns.'
p297
aS'This ruler was defeated by Aetius at Orleans, and also lost the Battle of the Catalunian Plains.'
p298
aS'He took Honoria as his wife and claimed vast amounts of land from Valentinian as her dowry.'
p299
aS'This ruler murdered his brother Bleda to take full control of his empire and was himself murdered by his bride Idico.'
p300
aS'After payment of gold was discontinued, this leader attacked the Byzantine empire and forced them to pay even more gold.'
p301
aS'His empire extended from the Danube River to the Baltic Sea, but he never sacked Rome.'
p302
aS'For 10 points each, name this military leader known as the "Scourge of God," the leader of the Huns.'
p303
aS'According to one legend this historical figure received a signet ring from Honoria, the sister of Valentinian III, which he assumed was a marriage proposal.'
p304
aS'The leader of forces assembled by his uncle Rua, he killed the Visigothic king Theodoric I at a 451 battle near the Marne river, though in the end his forces were defeated by Aetius.'
p305
aS'Said to have been convinced by Pope Leo I not to sack Rome the following year, FTP, name this loser at Chalons, the legendary king of the Huns usually referred to as the "Scourge of God.'
p306
aS'"'
aS'One colony in this present-day country was founded on the principle of "sufficient price" espoused by Edward Gibbon Wakefield.'
p307
aS'A government prize for crossing what is now this country prompted a fatal expedition led by Robert Burke and William Wills, and a later successful expedition led by John Stuart.'
p308
aS'Disturbances in what is now this country included one carried out by the gold prospectors of Ballarat under Peter Lalor.'
p309
aS'One resident of what is now this country was an outlaw who wore homemade armor.'
p310
aS'Lachlan Macquarie was made governor after the deposition of William Bligh in a rebellion here that was ostensibly about an alcoholic beverage.'
p311
aS'This country was home to the Eureka Stockade and the Rum_Rebellion, and James Cook landed in its Botany Bay.'
p312
aS'For 10 points, name this country that was home to bushrangers such as Ned Kelly.'
p313
aS'Since December 2012, this country has required plain packaging for tobacco, and in July, it switched from a carbon tax to a cap-and-trade system.'
p314
aS'This country is the home of the Wikileaks political party.'
p315
aS"A detention center on Manus Island was reestablished in 2012 for (*) asylum seekers to this country, who often aim for this country's Christmas Island in dangerously overfilled boats."
p316
aS"This country's Labor Party was previously headed by Julia Gillard until she was ousted for Kevin Rudd in an attempt to win fall elections against the Liberal Party."
p317
aS'Kevin Rudd nevertheless lost his spot as prime minister of, for 10 points, what Pacific island country now headed by Tony Abbott'
p318
aS'This country was headed by Kurt Waldheim after he was UN Secretary-General.'
p319
aS'Waldheim was controversial because after the Anschluss uniting this country with (*) Germany, he joined a group affiliated with the Nazis.'
p320
aS'It hosted the 1964 and 1976 Winter Olympics at Innsbruck, and it is on the eastern border of Liechtenstein.'
p321
aS'For 10 points, name this country whose capital is Vienna.'
p322
aS'Two early rulers of this polity bear the mysterious nickname "Jasomirgott", while another ruler of this polity forged the "Privilegium Maius", a document allegedly signed by Nero that gave rulers of this polity great power.'
p323
aS'The death of Duke Frederick the Quarrelsome of this polity led to the end of its Babenburg Dynasty, but a new dynasty came to power at the Battle of Marchfeld.'
p324
aS'This polity notably controls the Bergenland, and regions eventually merged into it include Styria and Carinthia.'
p325
aS'It shares the Tyrol with Italy and along with its Ugric-speaking eastern neighbor once formed a hyphenated duel monarchy.'
p326
aS'For ten points, name this German-speaking polity with capital at Vienna.'
p327
aS'By a referendum that may have been rigged, the residents of Sopron decided in 1921 not to join this country, which was later led by a priest named Ignaz Seipel.'
p328
aS'A plebiscite in 1920 allowed this country to retain its province of Carinthia; that vote had been required by the Treaty of Saint Germain.'
p329
aS'Its parliament was disbanded in 1933 by Engelbert Dollfuss, who was assassinated by Nazi agents in 1934 a few months after clashes fighting broke out in Linz.'
p330
aS'For 10 points, name this country that was annexed to Germany via the Anschluss.'
p331
aS'The people of this empire were divided into organizational units called calpulli.'
p332
aS'Farming in the capital city of this empire was performed on floating gardens called chinampas.'
p333
aS'This empire fought the Flower Wars to gain captives, and some of its aspects were chronicled in the Florentine Codex.'
p334
aS'This empire was formed from the unification of three cities into the Triple Alliance but collapsed shortly after the events of (*) La Noche Triste.'
p335
aS'According to legend, its Nahuatl-speaking founders saw an eagle eat a snake at Lake Texcoco, where they built their capital Tenochtitlan.'
p336
aS'For ten points, name this empire ruled by Montezuma II, which was conquered by Hernan Cortez.'
p337
aS"Slaves in this empire could obtain their freedom by running outside the city walls during a market day and stepping in human feces, because that would show their master's neglect."
p338
aS'One ruler of this empire bore a name that meant "a lord who shows anger and who shoots an arrow into the sky" and   weathered a four year drought and a snowstorm upon ascending to power.'
p339
aS"This empire's merchant  class, or (*) pochtecas, contained a special subclass designated for trader- spies."
p340
aS"Structured into multi-family units called calpulli, this empire's capital city used chinampas, or floating gardening beds, to increase its agricultural yield, because it was located on an island in Lake Texcoco."
p341
aS'It fought the ritualistic Flower Wars against its neighbors, including Tlaxcala, partially to obtain prisoners for human sacrifice.'
p342
aS'For 10 points, name this pre-Columbian empire ruled by two Montezumas that was conquered by  Hernan Cortes.'
p343
aS'In this culture, land was owned by a group of families known as the calpulli.'
p344
aS'Much of the history of this this civilization is collected in the Florentine Codex.'
p345
aS'One ruler of this empire targeted its neighbor during the Flower Wars.'
p346
aS"The Templo Mayor was at the center of this civilization's capital, where a group of soldiers escaped during La Noche Triste following the death of its ruler, Moctezuma II."
p347
aS'For 10 points, Hernan Cortes conquered what empire that governed from its capital of Tenochtitlan'
p348
aS'Under the ruler Water Mask, this polity suffered a severe defeat at the hands of the Tarascan empire, and a large portion of its agricultural production came from "floating gardens." It had a system of universal education with commoners sent to the telpohcalli (tel-poch-CAL-li), and nobility to the calmecac (cal-ME-cac), and it often used the murder of its pochteca (poch-TE-ca) merchants as an excuse for war.'
p349
aS'Described at length in the Florentine Codex of Bernardino de Sahagun., the ruler of one of its three ruling cities, Fasting Coyote, was famed as a poet in the Nahuatl (NA-wa-tl) language.'
p350
aS'A series of defeats let to the poisoning of Tizoc, and to regain credibility with his vassals, his successor Ahuitzotl (a-WI-tzo-tl) sacrificed 80,000 captives during the re-dedication of one of the main temples.'
p351
aS'For 10 points, identify this empire last ruled by Mocteuczoma (mo-tequ-SO-ma) Xocoyotl (sho-CO-yo-tl) from its capital at Tenochtitlan.'
p352
aS"Marriage ceremonies in this culture involved a matchmaker tying the groom's cape to the bride's blouse."
p353
aS'The city-state of Cholula allied with this empire in an attempt to defeat one army.'
p354
aS'Friar Bernardino compiled the Florentine Codex to describe the customs of these people, who fought the (*) Flower Wars to acquire sacrificial captives.'
p355
aS'Before defeating a force assisted by La Malinche during La Noche Triste, this civilization intentionally damaged the bridges leading to their capital Tenochtitlan.'
p356
aS'For ten points, identify this Meso-American empire, once led by Moctezuma and conquered by the Spanish under Cortes.'
p357
aS'The calmecac saw nobles of this culture educated in astronomy and religious duties.'
p358
aS"Orange-and-black Cholula polychrome pottery was imported to this civilization's capital."
p359
aS'Pochteca traders here also served as executive spies.'
p360
aS'These people traded in copper axes and cacao beans in Tlatelolco, their principal marketplace.'
p361
aS'The calpolli was the basic kinship unit of this culture, and they built twin pyramids and wide causeways in their island capital.'
p362
aS'These people grew crops on chinampas, or floating gardens.'
p363
aS'For 10 points, name this Mesoamerican culture that made their capital, Tenochtitlan, in the Valley of Mexico.'
p364
aS'His son was a member of the House of Representatives from California, and he himself served in the Air Force during World_War_II.'
p365
aS'His books include The Coming Breakpoint and With No Apologies.'
p366
aS'After coming to the senate, he gained notoriety by opposing arms-control negotiations, yet he received only one electoral vote as a vice-presidential candidate in 1960, the same year he wrote Conscience of a Conservative.'
p367
aS'His own vice presidential candidate was William Miller, who could not stop him from getting smoked by Lyndon Johnson.'
p368
aS'FTP, name this Republican candidate for president in 1964.'
p369
aS'This man co-sponsored a 1984 act with Bill Nichols which consolidated the military command structure, and sued Jimmy Carter for nullifying the Sino-American Mutual Defense Treaty.'
p370
aS'He began his senate career by defeating the incumbent majority leader Ernest McFarland, but he replaced Carl Hayland the next time he ran for senate.'
p371
aS'He chose William Miller as his vice-presidential candidate, and himself ran as vice-president in 1960, the year in which he wrote Conscience of a Conservative.'
p372
aS'FTP, name this conservative icon, who lost the landslide 1964 election to Lyndon Johnson, a Republican dude from Arizona.'
p373
aS"This battle it is described by Ammianus Marcellinus, whose surviving works don't go past the year of this battle."
p374
aS'The losing forces included such commanders as Richomeres and Bacurius the Iberian, and roces which engaged the Thervings and Greutungs without orders.'
p375
aS"It resulted after the losing leader rejected an armistice proposed by Fritigern and tried to conquer before Gratian's reinforcements arrived."
p376
aS'Theodosius I came to power after the death at this battle of the Eastern Emperor, who was abandoned by his guard and anonymously killed.'
p377
aS'For 10 points, name this disastrous battle for Valens that occurred in August 378 in present-day European Turkey.'
p378
aS"moving to Akka, Bah'u'llh lived in exile in this city for five years."
p379
aS'After winning at Versinikia, the Bulgarian emperor Krum began a siege of this city in 813.'
p380
aS'After a 1365 victory at this city, Murad I moved his capital from Bursa to it.'
p381
aS'Another battle here inspired Filippo Marinetti\'s poem "Zang Tumb Tumb" and was a major victory for Nikola Ivano, who sacked this city after several night attacks when it was named Edirne.'
p382
aS'A 1205 battle at this location saw Kaloyan, aided by the Cumans, destroy a Crusader army under Louis of Blois and Emperor Baldwin.'
p383
aS'Another battle at this location saw the cavalry of Fritigern arrive in time to blunt an attack on a wagon circle.'
p384
aS'For 10 points, identify this location where the army of Valens was destroyed by the invading Goths in 378 AD.'
p385
aS'In this battle, the Duke of Brabant arrived late from a christening and was killed because he hastily made an unrecognizable tabard from a flag.'
p386
aS'The winner ordered his men to lance their prisoners at the end of this battle, which was preceded by the siege of Harfleur.'
p387
aS"The losers managed to steal a crown from the baggage train of one of the victors before their commander, (*) Charles d'Albert, led them headlong into a line of pikes driven into the deep mud."
p388
aS"The superiority of the Welsh longbow was also critical to the success of Henry V. Fought in 1415 on St. Crispin's Day, for 10 points, name this turning point of the Hundred Years' War."
p389
aS"One story about this battle says that the baggage train of one side's rear force was attacked by a band of peasants led by three knights, who stole jewels and a crown, leading to a panic in which that side ordered the killing of all of its prisoners."
p390
aS'Casualties on one side included Michael de la Pole and Edward of Norwich, while the Duke of Barabant arrived late from a christening party.'
p391
aS"The losing side's vanguard was commanded by the Marshal Boucicaut, Jean le Maingre, and was notably decimated by longbowmen in this contest which saw the Constable Charles d'Albret defeated on St. Crispin's Day."
p392
aS'For 10 points, name this big victory for Henry V in 1415 during the Hundred Years War.'
p393
aS'The Duke of Gloucester was notable for his heroism in this battle.'
p394
aS'One side in this battle notably made a tactical mistake by choosing very small ground and thus forfeiting their considerable advantage of numbers, and it later proved to be more deadly as their heavily armored knights were fodder for lightly armed archers.'
p395
aS'Charles de lAlbert on the French side of this conflict was blamed for their tactical stupidity, and that side lost about 5,000 men.'
p396
aS'This battle came about after Henry V attempted to move his troops to Calais and was blocked by the French.'
p397
aS'For ten points, identify this decisive English victory over the French, a 1415 battle of the Hundred Years War.'
p398
aS"In this battle, John Pelham's guns on Nicodemus Hill fired on troops heading for the Dunker Church."
p399
aS'Following the Battle of South Mountain, this battle saw fighting in Miller\'s cornfield, and the Irish Brigade attacked a sunken road dubbed "Bloody Lane." After reinforcements arrived from Harpers Ferry, this battle ended with Stonewall Jackson\'s counterattack near Burnside Bridge.'
p400
aS'Although it was a tactical draw, Lincoln subsequently issued the Emancipation Proclamation.'
p401
aS"Before this battle, McClellan had found Lee's orders."
p402
aS"For 10 points, name this September 17, 1862 battle, fought near the town of Sharpsburg, Maryland, America's bloodiest one-day combat."
p403
aS'During this battle, Joseph Mansfield led his forces up near the Dunker Church.'
p404
aS"John Sedgwick's troops in this battle took heavy casualties after advancing from the West Woods."
p405
aS'William French moved his forces in this battle to a sunken road that became known afterwards as the ""Bloody Lane.'
p406
aS'"" This strategic victory for George McClellan ended Robert_E._Lee\'s attempt to bring the Civil War into the northern states through Maryland.'
p407
aS'For 10 points, name this 1862 battle that was the bloodiest single day of combat during the Civil War.'
p408
aS"This battle began at dawn when Joseph Hooker's corps mounted an assault on Lee's left flank."
p409
aS"Fighting continued across Miller's cornfield and around the Dunker Church until Union assaults against the Sunken Road pierced the Confederate center."
p410
aS"Late in the day, Burnside's corps crossed the battle's namesake creek and rolled the Confederate right until A.P."
p411
aS"Hill's division arrived from Harper's Ferry and saved the Confederate cause."
p412
aS'FTP, name this September 17, 1862 battle, fought in Maryland, which halted the Confederate advance on Washington following Second Manassas.'
p413
aS"This battle featured an embarrassing incident in which one commander wandered about for several hours around Rohrbach, which became known as Burnside's Bridge."
p414
aS'It began with a skirmish involving Stonewall Jackson in a cornfield near Hagerstown Pike and it took four hours for Union soldiers under Sumner to secure the sunken road, which became known as (*) Bloody Lane.'
p415
aS"Burnside was finally pushed back when A. P. Hill's forces arrived from Harper's Ferry, and Edwin Stanton opposed Lincoln's reappointment of the commander of the army of Potomac just prior to this battle, which was marked by a failure to pursue the confederates that led to criticism of George McClellan."
p416
aS'FTP, name this 1862 pyrrhic Union victory that kept the Confederates out of Maryland, took place near Sharpsburg, and also saw the greatest loss of American lives in battle in a single day.'
p417
aS"A battery at Nicodemus Hill bombarded one position during this battle where John Sedgwick's advance from the East Woods was repulsed."
p418
aS'A.P.'
p419
aS"Hill stopped Ambrose_Burnside's attack on a stone bridge at this battle, before which one side's plans were found(*) wrapped around cigars."
p420
aS"Intense fighting in this battle occurred at Miller's Cornfield and at a sunken road that was named for the carnage that occurred there, Bloody Lane."
p421
aS'Abraham_Lincoln announced the Emancipation Proclamation after, for 10 points, what battle in Maryland, the bloodiest single day of the Civil War'
p422
aS'One of the losing generals in this battle was drunk, and his withdrawal was strongly covered by Kienmayer until he too was forced to retreat.'
p423
aS"This battle was preceded by the capture of General Mack and his army, which provided the advantage the victor needed, and the actions of Bxhowden during it didn't help."
p424
aS'After a forced march that covered 80 miles in 50 hours, the III Corps under Davout arrived, allowing the IV Corps under Soult to take a position that the victor of this battle had feigned conceding, the Pratzen Heights.'
p425
aS'For 10 points, name this battle, in which Napoleon I decisively routed Alexander I and Francis II on December 2, 1805.'
p426
aS'Count von Cobenzl was fired as foreign minister after this battle.'
p427
aS"This battle resulted in a treaty signed in the Primate's Palace in Bratislava, the Treaty of Pressburg."
p428
aS'The winning commander at this battle defied convention by dividing his army against a numerically superior force and choosing to fight from the low ground.'
p429
aS'This battle ended with the taking of the Pratzen Heights, and saw the losers retreat over a frozen lake.'
p430
aS'For 10 points, name this greatest victory of Napoleon Bonaparte, where he routed the combined forces of Alexander I of Russia and Francis II of Austria, which led to its alternate name of "Battle of the Three Emperors.'
p431
aS'"'
aS"Dan Sickles's attack towards Catherine Furnace almost prevented the losing side's disaster in this battle."
p432
aS"John Sedgwick showed no such aggression: he was soundly beaten by Lafayette McLaws at Salem Church, even though his Sixth Corps had swept Jubal Early's outnumbered men off the old battlefield of Fredericksburg."
p433
aS'J. E. B. Stuart held off the rest of the Union army after his bloody frontal attack on the morning of May 3rd had swept the Army of the Potomac out of its positions at Hazel Grove and Fairview.'
p434
aS"A more subtle attack the previous evening had shattered Oliver O. Howard's Eleventh Corps, though the victors lost their commander to friendly fire in the dense forests of the Wilderness."
p435
aS'FTP, name this May 1863 defeat of Joseph Hooker by Robert_E._Lee, the last battle of Stonewall Jackson.'
p436
aS"One side's battle plan called for cavalry under George Stoneman to raid the opponent's supply and communication lines."
p437
aS"However, the inability of Howard's troops to speak English and the refusal of one side's commander to turn control over to Darius Couch after being injured led to failure."
p438
aS"Occurring at the intersection of the Orange Plank Road and Orange Turnpike, it saw Early man Marye's Heights to isolate Sedgwick."
p439
aS"During this battle, Lee's outnumbered Army of Northern Virginia outmaneuvered Hooker's Army of the Potomac after the Union forces crossed the Rappahannock River."
p440
aS'FTP, name this 1863 Civil War battle in Virginia in which friendly fire led to the death of Stonewall Jackson.'
p441
aS'Although the Union commander in this battle came up with a sophisticated plan, he uncharacteristically committed a costly hesitatation on May 1st, saying "for the first time, [he] lost confidence in" himself.'
p442
aS"Sedgewick's VI Corps was supposed to provide a diversion near Fredricksburg, but Jubal Early's division was able to hold them back from joining the attack."
p443
aS"The Union XI Corps bore the brunt of Stonewall Jackson's assault after he successfully marched around to the Union left, allowing Lee to escape the Wilderness with a victory despite being outnumbered two to one."
p444
aS"FTP, what is this April 30 to May 6, 1863 battle, in which Lee's victory came at a terrible cost, as Jackson was felled by friendly fire during the battle"
p445
aS"Kineiving asshattery on the part of the losing side in the month's before this battle included a series of failed cabals that led one man to demand the issuance of his General Order No."
p446
aS'8, and a jealous reaction to the appointment of Daniel Sickles, which led the biggest screwup at this battle to demand he replace Franz Sigel as commander of the unusually German XI Corps.'
p447
aS"Kelly's Ford and Ely's Ford were captured prior to this battle by a group discovered by Richard Anderson's scouting expedition, triggering tbe fortification of Zoan Church."
p448
aS'The losing side of this battle ultimately blamed (*) Oliver Howard for getting those XI corps ambushed and slaughtered, though the commanding officer invoked the third person in supposedly claiming it was "the only time he lost faith in" himself.'
p449
aS'The most important casualty in this battle was blamed on low light and a North_Carolina sentry.'
p450
aS'The Union under the newly appointed Joseph Hooker were ultimately defeated by the much smaller force under Robert_E._Lee in, for 10 points, this battle where Stonewall Jackson was killed by friendly fire, a costly Confederate victory near its namesake village in Spotsylvania, Virginia.'
p451
aS"During this battle, a salient led to bad positioning for David Birney at the Sherfy Farm, and fighting occurred at Barlow's Knoll."
p452
aS"Robert Rodes failed to assist Jubal Early's attack on the Eleventh Corps during this engagement, at which John Reynolds died."
p453
aS"Colonel Chamberlain ordered a bayonet charge down [*] Little Round Top at this battle, George_Meade's first as Union commander."
p454
aS"During this battle's third day, one day before the fall of Vicksburg, J.E.B."
p455
aS"Stuart's cavalry arrived too late to support a charge on Cemetery Ridge by George Pickett."
p456
aS'For 10 points, name this Civil War battle in southern Pennsylvania, after which Abraham_Lincoln gave a namesake "address."'
p457
aS"This battle started after troops under Henry Heth (HEETH) spotted John Buford's cavalry."
p458
aS"Key locations in this battle included the Peach Orchard and Devil's Den."
p459
aS'One general in this battle, Dan Sickles, disobeyed orders by moving his corps from its location along Cemetery Ridge.'
p460
aS"That ridge was the object of Pickett's Charge at the end of this battle."
p461
aS"George_Meade's victory in this battle ended a Confederate invasion of the North."
p462
aS'For 10 points, name this battle whose site was later the location of an Address by Abraham_Lincoln.'
p463
aS'During this battle, a bayonet charge by the 20th Maine, led by Joshua Chamberlain, helped defend one important hill.'
p464
aS"Besides Little Round Top, other areas of contest included Devil's Den and the Peach Orchard."
p465
aS"The decisive action in this battle was a failed assault on Cemetery Ridge known as Pickett's Charge."
p466
aS'For 10 points, name this Union victory after which Abraham_Lincoln gave a namesake "address."'
p467
aS'The brother of one man killed at this battle was named Tostig, and himself was killed weeks before this battle.'
p468
aS'One force in this battle was initially deployed on Senlac Hill, and one battle that preceded this one was at (+) Gate Fulford, while another took place north of the site of this battle and featured an invading force led by Harald Hardraada of Norway.'
p469
aS'That battle, Stamford Bridge, had weakened one side in this conflict, who were led by (*) Harold_Godwinson, and this battle is famously depicted by the Bayeux Tapestry.'
p470
aS"For 10 points, name this 1066 battle in which Harold's English force was defeated by the Norman army of William_the_Conqueror."
p471
aS'In the wake of this battle, a pursuing group of victors were ambushed and killed near an area known as The Malfosse.'
p472
aS"One side's troops consisted of a select number of Huscarls, or professional soldiers, while the majority of their forces were peasantry called Fyrd."
p473
aS"That side attempted to form a shield wall to hold off the enemy's cavalry, but those forces, loyal to Harold_Godwinson, were defeated by the Norman invaders under William_the_Conqueror."
p474
aS'For 10 points, name this 1066 battle fought in Britain.'
p475
aS"During this battle, a Breton division broke rank on the left flank, but their opponent's brothers Leofwyne and Gyrthe were still killed."
p476
aS'One side at this battle used warriors called housecarls, who unwisely left the protection of their shield wall in pursuit of retreating foes.'
p477
aS'This battle, which was preceded by the defeat of(*) Harold Hardrada at the battle of Stamford Bridge, ended when the English commander was shot through the eye with an arrow.'
p478
aS'For 10 points, identify this 1066 battle at which William_the_Conqueror defeated Harold_Godwinson, taking control of England.'
p479
aS'During this battle, Senlac Hill was the site of a defensive position set up by housecarls.'
p480
aS"The losing side's forces had been weakened in a previous battle against Harold Hardrada at Stamford Bridge."
p481
aS"The winning side's commander claimed to be the rightful successor to Edward_the_Confessor."
p482
aS'King (*) Harold_Godwinson was killed during this battle.'
p483
aS'For 10 points, name this 1066 battle in which William of Normandy conquered England.'
p484
aS'A shipwreck at Ponthieu two years before this battle led to one of the shipwrecked men swearing an oath to the eventual victor of this battle.'
p485
aS'The commander of the losing army in this battle at Senlac Hill was struck by an arrow in the eye, as depicted on the Bayeux Tapestry.'
p486
aS'The losing commander of this battle, who earlier defeated Norwegian invaders at the battle of Stamford Bridge, was Harold_Godwinson.'
p487
aS'For 10 points, name this 1066 victory of William_the_Conqueror over the Saxons, establishing the Normans as the rulers of England.'
p488
aS"According to legend, a man with the surname Truelove was renamed Eyre after saving one man's life in this battle."
p489
aS'One side in this battle arrived at Pevensey and feigned retreat after they were unable to break through the shield wall formed by fyrds and (*) housecarls.'
p490
aS'The leader of the losing side in this battle succeeded Edward_the_Confessor and had earlier won the Battle of Stamford Bridge, but was later killed by an arrow in the eye as depicted in the Bayeux Tapestry.'
p491
aS'For ten points, name this 1066 battle in which Harold_Godwinson was defeated by a Norman force led by William_the_Conqueror.'
p492
aS'This battle opened when the jester Taillefer attacked a soldier while reciting the Song of Roland.'
p493
aS'After this battle, victorious troops were ambushed in the Malfosse.'
p494
aS'One side in this battle employed housecarls and effectively used a shield wall to defend against archer attacks.'
p495
aS"This battle took place after Tostig's brother defeated a Viking invasion at (*) Stamford Bridge that was led by Harold Hardrada."
p496
aS'This battle occurred at Senlac Hill, where its loser was shot in the eye.'
p497
aS"The Bayeux Tapestry depicts Harold_Godwinson's loss at this battle."
p498
aS'For 10 points, name this 1066 victory for William_the_Conqueror.'
p499
aS"This battle started with the winning side firing a barrage of arrows into the shielded losing side's front, with not that much effect."
p500
aS"A barrage by the winning side on foot weakened the losing side's wall enough where the winners were easily able to lob arrows over the their wall and defeat the British."
p501
aS'The beachhead of this battle was near the cities of Senlac and Pevensy, which required a long march for the British from their victory several weeks earlier against a strong Norwegian Viking force.'
p502
aS'For 10 points, name this battle, which saw the death of Harold_Godwinson, allowed the Normans to take England from the Saxons, and established William_the_Conqueror as King of England.'
p503
aS'The Song of Roland was sung by Taillefer, a jester, whose death from charging the opposing line started this battle.'
p504
aS'After the battle, some of the defeated soldiers were chased into a deep pit known as the Malfosse.'
p505
aS'Due to unfavorable winds, the eventual victors landing at Pevensey was delayed by two days, with the arrival two weeks later of the victors of the Battle of Stamford Bridge.'
p506
aS'With their position at the top of the hill, the Saxons were able to make a charge by crippling the Norman horses before their leader was shot in the eye by an arrow.'
p507
aS'Depicted on the Bayeux Tapestry, this is, FTP, which 1066 battle that saw Harold Godwinsson suffer defeat at the hands of William_the_Conqueror'
p508
aS'The core of one army in this battle was made up of full-time professional soldiers, called Housecarls.'
p509
aS'The victorious army in this battle was delayed by a storm for two days before finally landing at Pevensey, which was within two miles of the battle site at Senlac Hill.'
p510
aS'The losing army was probably weakened having fought a battle three weeks earlier at Stamford Bridge.'
p511
aS'For 10 points, name this 1066 battle depicted on the Bayeux Tapestry that saw William_the_Conqueror defeat Harold_Godwinson.'
p512
aS'This battle saw an early skirmish in which surprise fighting broke on in the streets of Wachau, but its beginning occurred as Austrian forces advanced on a Polish-held mill in Dolitz.'
p513
aS'Usually considered the successful execution of the Trachenburg Plan, this battle saw the French expulsed from a school house by Poniatowski and the Polish forces in the town of Markkleeberg.'
p514
aS"One important turning point in this battle was Murat's disastrous use of cavalry arranged in columns at Liebertwolkwitz, followed shortly by Blucher's routing of Marmont's French forces at Mockern."
p515
aS"Though Napoleon's side was bolstered by men from the Confederation of the Rhine, the Prince of Schwarzenherg's coalition of six nations emerged victorious."
p516
aS"For 10 points, name this October 1813 battle that resulted in Napoleon's abdication and exile on Elba."
p517
aS"This battle's outcome was partially caused by the losing commander's decision to split up his army so it could live off the land, leading to the initial skirmishes at Benautzen, Grossbeeren, and Katzbach."
p518
aS'Also, the losing general was so badly afflicted with bladder problems that he could not mount a horse and even fell asleep at one point in the action, leading his subordinates to try to hold Mochern without his guidance on the first day.'
p519
aS'After the second day, the losing commander tried to retreat during the night, but he prematurely blew up the stone bridge over which his army was retreating and stranded his rear guard, whose 30,000 men were annihilated.'
p520
aS'Despite the efforts of Marmont and  Murat, this battle ended in victory for the forces of Karl van Schwarzenberg , Crown Prince Jean Bernadotte, and Marshal Gebhard van Blcher.'
p521
aS'FTP, name this battle fought in October, 1813, a defeat for Napoleon whose nickname came from the alliance of the victorious side.'
p522
aS'At one point in this battle, troops under General Sacken forced a division under General Dabrowski to flee from Gohlis to Pfaffendorf.'
p523
aS'This battle was the culmination of the Trachenberg Plan, created by Prince of Sweden Jean-Baptiste Bernadotte.'
p524
aS'It began as General Kleist attacked Marshal Poniatowski at Markkleeberg.'
p525
aS"Marshall Murat unwisely used massive columns at Liebertwolkwitz, while at Mockern, Marmont's Sixth Corps was attacked by Russian and Prussian forces under Blucher."
p526
aS'For 10 points, name this 1813 victory for the Sixth Coalition, also known as the "Battle of the Nations," which led to Napoleon\'s abdication and exile.'
p527
aS'This engagement was preceded by the battles of Preveza and Djerba.'
p528
aS"One side in this battle was able to bring artillery and arabesques to bear on their opponent's bowmen, while the other side was only able to capture one ship."
p529
aS"This battle saw flanking attempts by Andrea Doria and Uluc Ali, and the losing side's morale was lowered when their commander was killed and his head displayed on a pike."
p530
aS'This battle was the greatest victory of Don Juan of Austria as the head of the Holy League.'
p531
aS'For 10 points, name this battle which saw the destruction of the Turkish navy in 1571.'
p532
aS'At one point it looked as if Sirocco would break through the wall set up by Augustino Barbarigo, who was deployed on the left near Capes Oxia Scrophia.'
p533
aS"Luckily, the Marquis of Santa Cruz's forces stayed back in reserve."
p534
aS'One side lay in wait after its success at Famagusta and was met with a four pronged force.'
p535
aS"Though Uluch Ali successfully split Andrea Doria's slower galleys, he was undone by sheer numbers and had to retreat."
p536
aS"Meanwhile the commander of Selim_II's invasion of the Gulf of Patras had been beheaded and without the leadership of Ali Pasha his men soon lost the desire to continue the battle."
p537
aS'As Pius V had predicted, the forces of the Holy League, under Don John of Austria, defended the Venetian province of Cyprus, at FTP, what October 7th, 1571 naval battle.'
p538
aS"Prior to this engagement, the losing commander stole all of the other side's treasure and prisoners of\\n war at Sebastea."
p539
aS'Leading up to this battle, Arisiaghi, brother of one commander, captured Manuel, the\\n nephew of the rival commander.'
p540
aS'Troops under Roussel de Bailleul in Georgia did not participate in this\\n battle because the losing monarch believed his enemy was in Persia.'
p541
aS'Following this battle, General\\n Andronikos Doukas returned home and proclaimed Michael VII emperor.'
p542
aS'Fought near Lake Van, this battle\\n saw the death of many members of the Varangian Guard.'
p543
aS'For 10 points, name this 1071 disaster for the\\n Byzantines, where Emperor Romanos IV was taken captive by the Seljuk Turks under Alp Arslan.'
p544
aS'In the aftermath of this battle, the losing commander was sent to Prote and his wife was committed to a nunnery.'
p545
aS"Prior to this engagement, the losing commander had sent half of his army under Russell of Balleiul to take the nearby fortress of Khiliat, but they never returned, and that commander's army was further weakened by days of skirmishing and the defection of Uzes."
p546
aS'The victorious commander arranged his troops in a crescent formation with his archers at the rear, which enabled him to constantly apply pressure on the right and left flanks of his enemy.'
p547
aS'The eventual losers of this battle were attacked while they were retreating because the rearguard of Andronicus Ducas had fled.'
p548
aS'For ten points, name this 1071 battle that saw the Seljuk forces of Alp Arslan defeat the Byzantine Empire under Romanos IV.  '
p549
aS"According to legend, the emperor of the winning side of this battle humiliated the emperor of the losing side by placing his boot on the loser's neck and forcing him to kiss the ground."
p550
aS"Roussel de Bailleul refused to serve at this battle, where one general's interpretation of a retreat call as a sign to charge ahead depleted 5000 of his commander's troops."
p551
aS'Coupled with the inexplicable disappearance of 20,000 troops under Tarchaneiotes and the mass desertion of Kipchak and Penecheng mercenaries, an enemy force massacred at Lake Van by Romanus IV Diogenes.'
p552
aS'For 10 points identify this 1071 battle where the Byzantine Empire was crushed by the Seljuk Turks under Alp Arslan.'
p553
aS"In the aftermath of this battle, the losing side travelled to the opponent's capital, believing it undefended, but the victorious army had beaten them back by one hour."
p554
aS"The winning side captured seven of the opponent's ships, though Cynaegirus had his hand removed by an axe during one such capture and died soon after, and lost just 192 men as opposed to approximately six thousand of the opponent."
p555
aS'Callimachus died during it, ensuring that Miltiades got the credit for the victory.'
p556
aS'For 10 points, name this 490 BC battle in which the Greeks defeated the Persians, after which Phidippides ran back to Athens carrying the news.'
p557
aS'One figure in this battle died after attempting to grip onto a ship with his bare hands, only to have a member of the opposing army cut it off.'
p558
aS"The initial charge of one side managed to catch the rear cavalry off-guard, and caused the other groups' missiles to land harmlessly behind them."
p559
aS'The retreating side in this battle traveled towards Mesogia and attempted to escape on their triremes, where some of them drowned in a swamp after getting pincered.'
p560
aS'A group of Platean hoplites helped one side, and this battle is most famous for the exploits of Phidippides, a messenger.'
p561
aS'FTP, name this 490BC battle in which Datis and Artaphernes lost to a group of Athenians under Miltiades, which lends its name to a 26-mile race.'
p562
aS'Before this battle, Callimachus casted a deciding vote in favor of attack.'
p563
aS'This battle occurred after the fall of Eretria, an ally of the winning army, whose forces included a thousand troops from Plataea.'
p564
aS"This battle saw the winning side's flanks push through to encircle the stronger troops in the center, led by the victorious commander, Miltiades."
p565
aS'In legend, its victors sent a courier named Pheidippides to report the victory in Athens.'
p566
aS'For 10 points, name this battle that ended the invasion of Greece by Darius_I of Persia, and gave its name to a modern-day twenty-six-mile race.'
p567
aS'This battle saw the capture of Psyttaleia by a recently turned general named Aristides.'
p568
aS'One side\\n included the female general Artemisia, which prompted her leader to note that his female general became a\\n man and his male generals became women.'
p569
aS'Accounts differ over whether an early retreat by Adeimantus at\\n this battle was out of cowardice or to force the enemy into an enclosed area.'
p570
aS'This battle was fought after\\n one sided retreated following the Battle of Artemisium and included a force led by Eurybiades of Sparta.\\n During it, Themistocles led a force of about 270 triremes that opposed a force sent by Xerxes I south of the\\n Isthmus of Corinth.'
p571
aS'For 10 points, name 480 B.C.'
p572
aS'battle, a decisive Greek naval victory against the\\n Persians.'
p573
aS'A book by Barry Strauss describes it as the battle that saved Western civilization, and the victorious force used a tactic known as diekpolous.'
p574
aS'One leader in this battle demoralized a portion of the losing side through an inscription on the rocks of Euboea, and the opposing head watched this battle from Egaleo hill.'
p575
aS'The winning side in this battle was a force of 350 triremes, and the forces led by Themistocles drove the Persians led by Xerxes I. FTP, identify this 480 BC naval battle between the Persians and Greeks.'
p576
aS'The second part of this battle is also known as the Battle of Bemis Heights.'
p577
aS"The first part of this engagement occurred at John Freeman's farm."
p578
aS'Benedict_Arnold suffered injuries to his leg at this battle.'
p579
aS'John Burgoyne was the British commander here and Horatio Gates was the American commander at this battle in New York.'
p580
aS'After this battle, France agreed to give military assistance to America.'
p581
aS'For 10 points, name this fall of 1777 American victory in the Revolutionary War that was a major turning point in the war.'
p582
aS'This battle is commemorated by an unnamed statue of a boot.'
p583
aS"In the early stages of this battle, sharpshooters under Daniel Morgan attacked and killed nearly all enemy officers in the advance company, before unwittingly charging into the enemy's main force."
p584
aS'After General Lincoln brought two thousand men, the Americans were able to force a surrender when British forces moved out to find more rations.'
p585
aS"Consisting of two major action sites, at Bemis Heights and Freeman's Farm, the result of this battle turned the war into a global conflict, bringing French and Spanish aid to the victors."
p586
aS'Benedict_Arnold was the hero of this battle, which resulted in the surrender of General Burgoyne.'
p587
aS'For 10 points, name this battle, a victory for Horatio Gates that turned the tide of the American Revolution.'
p588
aS"During this battle Ebenezer Learned's 2nd, 8th, and 9th Massachusetts lines joined with Benedict_Arnold's troops to attack the central Hessian position."
p589
aS"This battle consisted of a series of engagements; one was at Freeman's Farm and the second was at Bemis Heights."
p590
aS'For 10 points, name this turning point battle in 1777, in which Horatio Gates was victorious over John Burgoyne in New York.'
p591
aS'This battle began with simultaneous attacks on Bazeilles, Givonne and La Moncelle, though the decisive moment may have been the series of futile charges of Generals Margueritte and Gallifet near the village of Illy.'
p592
aS'In a comic incident near the end of the battle, general De Wimpffen arrived from Algeria to relieve the command, and tore down the white truce flag several times before the final surrender.'
p593
aS"The battle broke out following the minor Battle of Beaumont, during an attempt to relieve Metz by generals Ducrot and Macmahon, who were encircled and crushed by Moltke's forces."
p594
aS'FTP, name this 1870 battle, a defeat for France that virtually ended the Franco-Prussian_War.'
p595
aS'The Union\'s victory in this battle depended on the actions of Prentiss and Wallace, who defended the ""Hornet\'s Nest.'
p596
aS'"" It was fought after the opening of the Tennessee and Cumberland Rivers during the battles of Forts Henry and Donelson.'
p597
aS"Albert Sydney Johnston was killed at this battle, which turned after Don Carlos Buell's forces arrived on the second day."
p598
aS'For 10 points, name this battle fought at Pittsburg Landing that was a major Civil War engagement in southwestern Tennessee.'
p599
aS'One side began marching from Corinth, where the other army thought they would remain.'
p600
aS"Thus, Halleck wired Grant erroneously telling him to wait for Buell's forces to arrive."
p601
aS"The Union set up their line and attempted to hold the Sunken Road, where General Prentiss defended near Sarah Bell's peach orchard in an area called the Hornet's Nest."
p602
aS"After the arrival of Buell's army, the Confederates under A. S. Johnston were finally repelled, leaving Memphis and Vicksburg susceptible to Union attack."
p603
aS'FTP, identify this April 6, 1862 battle in Tennessee also known as Pittsburg Landing.'
p604
aS"The leader of the winning side came into this battle with the goal of attacking the Charleston Railroad, and one side aimed to drive the other into the swamps of Owl Creek and prevent a link-up with Don Carlos Buell's Army of the Ohio."
p605
aS'The day after this battle was over, Nathan Bedford Forrest led a charge which served as the beginning of the Battle of Fallen Timbers.'
p606
aS'The tide turned in this battle when forces led by Benjamin Prentiss and W.H.L.'
p607
aS"Wallace defended the position nicknamed the Hornet's Nest at this battle."
p608
aS"A victory for Grant's Army of the Tennessee."
p609
aS'FTP, identify this April 1862 Civil War battle fought in Tennessee following the capture of Fort Donelson.'
p610
aS"Pavlov's house was used as a fortified position during this battle."
p611
aS'This battle was preceded by an offensive called Case Blue that was intended to capture vital oil fields.'
p612
aS'Victory for one side came following Operation Uranus, an offensive partially planned by Georgy Zhukov.'
p613
aS'Eventually, the German 6th Army under the command of Friedrich Paulus (*) surrendered after being encircled along the Volga River.'
p614
aS'For 10 points, name this extremely bloody World_War_II battle that lasted from 1942 to 1943, a Soviet victory that marked a turning point on the Eastern Front.'
p615
aS"David Glantz has debunked several myths about this battle in a book titled for 'Armageddon at' it."
p616
aS"One side in this battle was trapped in a pocket which they dubbed 'the Cauldron' where they were forced to eat their own horses."
p617
aS'In this battle, the invaders were stalled by the 1077th anti-aircraft regiment, which was composed mostly of women just out of high school.'
p618
aS'During this battle, a tractor factory was modified to produce (*) T-34 tanks.'
p619
aS'The tide of battle turned after Georgy Zhukov unleashed Operation Uranus, and this battle ended shortly after the capture of Friedrich Paulus.'
p620
aS'For 10 points, name this battle of World_War_II in which the Soviets defeated Germany at a city on the Volga River which was then named for the Soviet premier.'
p621
aS'When the general tasked with the defense of the city of this namesake battle was asked how he interpreted his assignment, he said "We will defend the city or die in the attempt." That man was General Chuikov.'
p622
aS"One site of heavy fighting in this battle was Pavlov's House, and forty Soviet soldiers held back hundreds of German tanks and troops for five days hiding in a grain silo."
p623
aS'The German Sixth Army under General Paulus saw its offensive grind to a halt and then found themselves surrounded by a winter counterattack led by General Zhukov.'
p624
aS'For 10 points, name this Eastern front battle of World_War_II that changed the tide of the war and left over two million casualties.'
p625
aS'In this battle, Colonel Raiynin led the 1077th Anti-Aircraft Regiment, which was composed entirely of young women.'
p626
aS'The command of Mamayev Kurgan altered several times during this battle, during which Yakov Pavlov used an apartment building as a fortress.'
p627
aS"During this battle's Operation Uranus, Vasilevsky and (*) Zhukov encircled the enemy, including General Paulus and his Sixth Army who were unsuccessful in constructing an air bridge with the Luftwaffe."
p628
aS'For ten points, name this Eastern Front battle in which the Nazis were unable to take control of a certain Russian city on the Volga.'
p629
aS'An offensive launched after the end of this battle saw the annihilation of an army led by Gusztav Jany at Voronezh, and the conduct of this battle was the subject of Order 227.'
p630
aS'The destruction of forces commanded by Petre Dumitrescu and Constantin Constantinescu during this battle allowed two armies to meet at Kalach.'
p631
aS'This battle was the result of an offensive code-named "Plan Blue".'
p632
aS'Much of the fighting involved a force led by Vasily Chuikov, who defended the Mamayev Kurgan during this battle.'
p633
aS'Operation Uranus was a pincer movement that resulted in the encirclement of the Sixth Army in this battle, leading to the surrender of Friedrich Paulus, who had just been promoted to Field Marshal and to an offensive that included the subsequent Battle of Kursk.'
p634
aS'For ten points, name this World War Two battle for control of a Russian city on the Volga named for a certain Soviet dictator.'
p635
aS'One side in this battle was supplied in part by a group of troops who ran the Red Ball Express.'
p636
aS'An offensive launched by the other side in this battle was Operation Bodenplatte, and that side in this battle also launched a surprise attack on the ""ghost front.'
p637
aS'"" For 10 points, name this 1944-1945 battle fought in the Ardennes Mountains, in which the Germans were ultimately repulsed despite causing a temporary namesake deformation in the Allied line.'
p638
aS'During this battle, part of the 1st Panzer Division murdered 84 American POWs, which is known as the Malmedy Massacre.'
p639
aS"The resistance at Bastogne and the eventual arrival of Patton's Third Army from the south resulted in an Allied victory at this battle."
p640
aS'The German code name for the offensive during this fight was the (*) ""Watch on the Rhine.'
p641
aS'"" Begun in December 1944, for 10 points, name this battle of World_War_II so named because of the large incursion into Allied lines.'
p642
aS'During this battle, part of the 1st Panzer Division murdered 84 American POWs, which is known as the Malmedy Massacre.'
p643
aS"The resistance at Bastogne and the eventual arrival of Patton's Third Army from the south resulted in an Allied victory at this battle."
p644
aS'The German code name for the offensive during this fight was the ""Watch on the Rhine.'
p645
aS'"" Begun in December 1944, for 10 points, name this battle of World_War_II so named because of the large incursion into Allied lines.'
p646
aS'A definitive study on this engagement was authored by Hugh Cole, who devotes a section to discussing the Losheim Gap.'
p647
aS'It also stresses the importance of the oft-overlooked Operation Bodenplatte carried out on a holiday and alternately known as Operation Hermann.'
p648
aS'The clash saw the murder of the Wereth 11, a group of waylaid black soldiers, and courageous stands at St. Vith and Bastogne, which turned the fight and made up for failure to garner intelligence through ULTRA.'
p649
aS'Anthony McAuliffe became famous for his reply of "Nuts" and Patton for his diary statement that it was "lovely weather for killing Germans.'
p650
aS'" FTP, name this final German offensive of World_War_II also known as the Battle of the Ardennes.'
p651
aS'Those killed during it included the Wereth Eleven.'
p652
aS'Beginning with assaults on the Losheim Gap and the Elsenborn Ridge, one branch of it involved the capture of a supply depot at Bullingen, resulting in a battle at Baugnez that devolved into the Malmedy massacre.'
p653
aS'Paratrooper operations included Operation Stosser, while the man behind Operation Panzerfaust returned to run Operation Grief, a disinformation campaign that led to his proclamation as the most dangerous man in Europe.'
p654
aS'General Anthony McAuliffe gave his famous reply of Nuts!'
p655
aS'to demands that his encircled 101st Airborne Division surrender at Bastogne and Otto Skorzeny impersonated American soldiers at, for ten points, what final German offensive of World War Two'
p656
aS'A secessionist party in this country, the Vlaams Belang, has significant support.'
p657
aS'Despite elections being held nine months ago, this country only named (*) Yves Leterme to replace prme minister Guy Verhofstadt in March, as King Albert II tried to navigate contention among the Walloon and Flemish populations.'
p658
aS'For 10 points name this country, the home of the NATO and European Union headquarters.'
p659
aS'Robert Rothschild helped draft the 1957 Treaties of Rome as a diplomat of this nation, which was the home of "school war" as subsidies were increased for private institutions between 1950 and 1955.'
p660
aS'The Ten Days Campaign was an attempt to suppress the independence movement in this nation, which was also the home of a 1966 coal mine strike.'
p661
aS"Baudouin refused to give Royal Assent to the liberalization of this nation's abortion laws in 1990, while Martens led the Christian Democrat-Liberal coalition as prime minister here."
p662
aS'This nation\'s power over the Congo Free State was attributed to Leopold II, while this nation was invaded by Germany during its advance on France in World_War_I. FTP, name this nation whose deaths at Ypres were memorialized in "In Flanders Fields".'
p663
aS'This man unsuccessfully led a fleet at the Battle of Valcour Island and was briefly relieved of command after suffering leg wounds at Bemis Heights.'
p664
aS'This man was en route to Philadelphia when the Battle of Ridgefield broke out, which led to his promotion to major general.'
p665
aS'His most famous action was triggered when he was passed over for a promotion by the Continental Congress and was accused of malfeasance by other officers.'
p666
aS'This man showed great heroism at Fort Ticonderoga with Ethan Allen and at the Battle of Saratoga.'
p667
aS'For 10 points, name this traitor who attempted to sell West Point to the British during the Revolutionary War.'
p668
aS'This person was visiting his family while en route to Philadelphia to protest the promotion of junior officers when the Battle of Ridgefield broke out, leading to his promotion to major general.'
p669
aS'He unsuccessfully commanded a fleet at the Battle of Valcour Island, was briefly relieved of command after successfully leading troops at Saratoga, and was wounded in the leg at Bemis Heights.'
p670
aS"While he recuperated, it was through intermediaries Joseph Stansbury and Peggy Shippen, that this man made contact with Shippen's former boyfriend, a major in the British army."
p671
aS'Identify this American military figure who barely escaped when it was learned he was preparing to turn over West Point to the British Army.'
p672
aS'This man had an unfortunate penchant for dueling as he defeated a sea captain off Honduras early in his career and later repeatedly challenged James Easton.'
p673
aS'Initially finding success as a pharmacist and merchant captain, his later career saw him passed over in favor of Thomas Mifflin.'
p674
aS'He met Margaret Shippen, known as Peggy, in Philadelphia and she became his wife and confidante, after he earlier turned back an invasion at Valcour Island, triumphing over Guy Carleton.'
p675
aS'Also a victor at Fort Stanwix, FTP, name this general who commanded brilliantly at the Battle of Saratoga before attempting to grant the British control of the Hudson River Valley in 1779, thereby becoming infamous as a traitor to the American cause.'
p676
aS'His namesake law gave civil courts jurisdiction over churchmen.'
p677
aS'As head of the Supreme Court, he had a claim to the presidency when his predecessor, Ignacio Comonfort, was ousted.'
p678
aS'In office, his suspension of foreign debt prompted England, France, and Spain to invade, and he fled after Maximilian of Austria took the capital.'
p679
aS'He was captured at El Paso del Norte, which now bears his name, but later returned to office and was succeeded by Sebastin Lerdo de Tejada upon his death in 1872.'
p680
aS'For 10 points, name this longtime president of Mexico who oversaw the May 5 victory at Puebla.'
p681
aS'The composer of the song The Crabs once saved the life of this ruler, whose name is borne on a law abolishing of immunities of the clergy; this ruler had helped it pass before becoming the Chief Justice of the Supreme Court.'
p682
aS'He defeated a coup by leading the Rebels in the War of the Reform, causing this man to succeed Comonfort, and he went on to annul his countrys foreign debts, leading to the Battle of Puebla.'
p683
aS'A key figure in drafting the Plan of Ayutla, he put down several insurrections by Porfirio_Diaz prior to his death in 1872.'
p684
aS'FTP, name this Mexican leader who opposed French rule under Maximilian.'
p685
aS'This man supported South_African mining operations with his newspaper The Representative.'
p686
aS'He wrote the political novels Coningsby and Tancred, as well as the romance Vivien Grey.'
p687
aS'This leader used a Rothschild loan to buy forty- four percent of the Suez Canal Company.'
p688
aS'Unlike his rival, he supported the Second Reform Bill.'
p689
aS'He was a close friend of Queen Victoria, and created her Empress of India with the 1876 Royal Titles Act.'
p690
aS'For 10 points, name this British Prime Minister, a Conservative rival of William Gladstone whose surname reflects his Jewish ancestry.'
p691
aS'This man learned Italian by means of playing chess games wherein the loser had to learn part of the language.'
p692
aS'This first U.S. Minister to Sweden once made fun of Harvard students in letters to The New England Courant that he signed ""Silence Dogood.'
p693
aS'"" He was also the first (*) Postmaster General.'
p694
aS"His scientific experiments led him to set the convention for electric charge, and he wrote Poor Richard's Almanac."
p695
aS'For 10 points, name this American who probably did not actually fly a kite in a thunderstorm.'
p696
aS'This man, along with his cousin Timothy Folger, was the first to chart the Gulf Stream, which he gave its name.'
p697
aS'Along with John Hadley, this scientist conducted experiments in Cambridge that demonstrated the principle of evaporative (+) cooling.'
p698
aS'This scientist was the first to show the conservation of charge, and it is because of him that we use the terms ""positive"" and ""negative"" to describe charge.'
p699
aS'Georg Richmann was killed attempting to repeat an experiment in which this man attempted to show that vitreous and resinous (*) electricity were the same.'
p700
aS'For 10 points, name this inventor of the lightning rod and conductor of a kite experiment.'
p701
aS'This author of the satirical abolitionist tract ""Sidi Mehemet Ibrahim on The Slave Trade"" used the pseudonym ""Silence Dogood"" for a series of letters to the New England Courant.'
p702
aS'This man urged colonial cooperation in a cartoon showing a divided snake with the caption ""Join or Die,"" which supported his Albany Plan of Union.'
p703
aS"With John_Adams, this man revised Jefferson's first draft of the Declaration of Independence."
p704
aS"For 10 points, name this Founding Father who published Poor Richard's Almanack and flew a kite in a lightning storm."
p705
aS'After being insulted by the Privy Council, this person supposedly refused to wear the same set of clothes until he could wear them while dismembering the British Empire.'
p706
aS'Those insults were made by Alexander Wedderburn after this person turned letters written by Thomas Hutchinson over to a newspaper, and he wore those same clothes nine years later while signing the Treaty of Paris.'
p707
aS'His Plan of Union became a model for the Articles of Confederation and was presented at the Albany Congress, and in 1775 he became the first American Postmaster General.'
p708
aS"Name this founder of the University of Pennsylvania who published Poor Richard's Almanack, also known for experimenting with electricity."
p709
aS'This man manipulated having a meeting with Paul Wentworth into getting a treaty agreed to, but was unaware that Wentworth had turned his secretary Edward Bancroft.'
p710
aS'Alexander Wedderburn attacked this man for an hour in front of the Privy Council for his role in illegally obtaining private letters during the Hutchinson Affair.'
p711
aS'William Strahan was never sent this man\'s "You Are Now My Enemy" letter.'
p712
aS'He employed his grandson Temple as a secretary, and never reconciled with his son William, the last royal governor of New Jersey.'
p713
aS'This man wore a coonskin cap to play up the folksiness of Americans while negotiating for an alliance with France, which happened after the victory at Saratoga.'
p714
aS'For 10 points, name this Founding Father from Pennsylvania who was also an accomplished scientist.'
p715
aS'This person lost an Assembly seat for criticizing the Paxton Boys Affair, which prompted him to go on a diplomatic mission.'
p716
aS'During this mission on behalf of his adoptive home colony, he became the representative of Georgia, New Jersey, and Massachusetts, beginning to bring about the unification proposed in his failed Albany Plan of Union.'
p717
aS'Also the first Postmaster General of the United_States, this was, for ten points, what founding father associated with the lightning rod and Poor Richards Almanac'
p718
aS'After he left office, he published This Country of Ours, a series of essays on how the government works.'
p719
aS'In addition, he served as counsel for Venezuela over a boundary dispute with British Guiana.'
p720
aS'Successes of his presidency included calling the first Pan American Conference and passing the Dependent Pension Act for war veterans.'
p721
aS'When James Blaine declined the Republican nomination, this man and his running mate, Levi Morton, quickly seized the opportunity.'
p722
aS'Despite the popular Sherman Silver Purchase Act, he was damaged by the formation of the Populist Party.'
p723
aS"FTP, name this 23rd president who interrupted Cleveland's two terms."
p724
aS'This person lost a good deal of popularity for supporting the Burlingame Treaty against a piece legislation passed fourteen years after that treatys signing.'
p725
aS'This leaders first Secretary of State inaugurated the Pan-American Conference and his second proposed a treaty to annex Hawaii.'
p726
aS'The high degree of legislative spending during this persons administration was used against him in his reelection campaign, in which he was accused of complicity in the Billion-Dollar Congress, which passed the Chinese_Exclusion_Act and Sherman Anti-Trust Act.'
p727
aS'This Presidents Naval Secretary was Benjamin_Franklin Tracy, his Secretaries of State were John Watson Foster and James_G._Blaine, and his Vice President was Levi Morton.'
p728
aS'For 10 points, name this twenty-third President of the United_States.'
p729
aS'This President returned the body of USS Monitor inventor John Ericsson to Sweden, and he signed a treaty with Britain creating a two-year moratorium on seal hunting in the Bering Sea.'
p730
aS'His administration saw a diplomatic crisis with Portugal over the nationalization of the Delagoa Bay Railroad.'
p731
aS'Two years before becoming President, he lost his Senate seat to David Turpie.'
p732
aS'When his first Secretary of State died of Bights Disease, he nominated John W. Foster to replace him, while his Postmaster General was the department store mogul John Wanamaker.'
p733
aS'His rule saw the drafting of the Ocala Demands by agitating farmers, as well as the passage of the Sherman Anti-Trust Act and the then-highest tariff in US History, the McKinley Tariff.'
p734
aS'For ten points, name this Republican who worked with the Billion Dollar Congress, more famous for being sandwiched between Grover_Cleveland.'
p735
aS'His Secretary of State presided over the First International Conference of American States, and after the overthrow of Liliuokalani, he put forth a treaty of annexation that was blocked.'
p736
aS'The legislative branch during his time in office was known as the Billion Dollar Congress, and several pieces of business legislation, including the the McKinley Tariff and the Sherman_Antitrust_Act, were passed during his presidency.'
p737
aS'Defeated in the 1892 election by the man he defeated in the 1888 election, FTP, identify this 23rd President who served before and after Grover_Cleveland and was a grandson of the 9th President.'
p738
aS'Bills he signed into law included an extension of federal disability benefits to Civil War veterans injured after the war.'
p739
aS'A veteran himself, he served under Joseph Hooker as a Brigadier General at the Battle of Peachtree Creek and in the Atlanta campaign.'
p740
aS'His campaign treasurer, William Dudley, employed the blocks of five, or voters who were bribed to support this candidate, his State Department encouraged the coup that ended native rule in Hawaii.'
p741
aS'Selected largely due to being from the then swing-state of Indiana, this Republican presided over the Billion Dollar Congress, which passed such measures as the Sherman Anti-Trust Act, Sherman Silver Purchase Act, and the McKinley tariff.'
p742
aS'For ten points, name this 23rd US President, the grandson of an earlier President.'
p743
aS'This man was criticized for nominating the sixty-year-old George Shiras to the Supreme Court and Philadelphia merchant John Wanamaker was made his Postmaster General.'
p744
aS'His administration saw the addition of six new states, including Wyoming and Washington, and the passage of the Morrill Land-Grant Act.'
p745
aS'The inclusion of Whitelaw Reid on his re-election ticket owed partially to the fact that the Federal Elections Bill was not supported by his vice president, Levi P. Morton.'
p746
aS"Sherman's Silver Purchase and Antitrust Acts were passed during the Billion Dollar Congress, which sat during his administration."
p747
aS"Defeated in a re-election bid by Grover_Cleveland, for 10 points, name this president elected in 1888, the grandson of the nation's ninth president."
p748
aS'This city was bombed in Operation Whitebait to divert attention from Operation Hydra, which targeted Peenemunde.'
p749
aS'A street in this city is named after the 17th of June, the date a construction-worker strike boiled over into widespread protests.'
p750
aS'Operation Vittles was an attempt to supply this city, which was home to a structure that could be crossed at Checkpoint Charlie.'
p751
aS'While visiting this city in 1963, President Kennedy gave his "ich bin ein" speech.'
p752
aS'For 10 points, name this German capital that was relieved by a 1948 airlift and was once divided by a wall.'
p753
aS"It's not in the Soviet Union, but a film about this city was subtitled Symphony of a Great City."
p754
aS'A planned "Great -Hall" for this city\'s "World Capital" plan referenced Rome by having a dome featuring an eagle grasping a globe.'
p755
aS'During one event in this city, Avery Brundage benched Sam Stoller and Marty Glickman, perhaps to prevent embarrassment.'
p756
aS'The never completed Volkshalle in this city was planned by (*) Albert Speer.'
p757
aS'It was where Rosa Luxemburg was killed during the failed left-wing Spartacist movement.'
p758
aS'This city is the setting of a two-part 1938 film made shortly after Triumph of the Will by Leni Riefenstahl.'
p759
aS'For 10 points, name this city where Jesse Owens won four gold medals at the 1936 Summer Olympics, which was intended to promote the Nazi regime.'
p760
aS"Wolfgang Kapp's coup was stopped in this city after a general strike."
p761
aS'A meeting at this location gave Cyprus to the British, while another meeting here concluded with a General Act that established the Congo as private property.'
p762
aS'The Glienicke Bridge just outside this city was used to conduct several spy exchanges.'
p763
aS'Three corridors were used to access this city during one event here, where Operation Little Vittles was conducted.'
p764
aS'Checkpoint Charlie in this city was a famous part of a structure built here under orders from Walter Ulbricht.'
p765
aS'For 10 points, identify this capital of the Hohenzollern family of Prussia, split into 4 occupation zones following World_War_II.'
p766
aS'Casualties of this incident include Samuel Maverick and Patrick Carr.'
p767
aS'Private Hugh White was on guard during the beginning of this event, which ended when Thomas Hutchinson cleared the crowd.'
p768
aS'This incident was known to one side as the "Incident on King Street."'
p769
aS'John_Adams defended the soldiers involved in this incident, a snowball fight gone awry that claimed the life of a runaway slave named Crispus Atticus.'
p770
aS'For 10 points, name this incident where British Redcoats shot at colonists in a Massachusetts city in 1770.'
p771
aS"John Damrell became this city's Inspector of Buildings following an 1872 event in which much of its financial district was destroyed in a fire."
p772
aS'On 15 January 1919, twenty-one people were crushed to death or died of asphyxiation in its North End after a (*) storage tank burst and an immense wave of molasses rushed through the streets.'
p773
aS'A much earlier incident in this city saw five people shot dead outside its custom house, including the black merchant seaman Crispus Attucks.'
p774
aS"Five years after that event, British troops were defeated in a battle that took place primarily on and around Breed's Hill, located near this city."
p775
aS'For 10 points, name this city, the home of John Hancock and Paul Revere, where tea was dumped into the harbour in 1773.'
p776
aS'John Hynes served as the acting mayor of this city when its elected mayor James Curley was in prison   in 1947, and Hynes then defeated Curley in the next election.'
p777
aS'This city had large demonstrations  in favor of Anthony Burns when he was tried under the Fugitive Slave Act.'
p778
aS'After the passage of   the Stamp Act, the home of Thomas Hutchinson in this city was attacked, and Hutchinson later  removed troops from this city after an incident involving five deaths, including Crispus Attucks.'
p779
aS'Name this home of Paul Revere, where Samuel Adams supported forcefully boarding English ships  and destroying their tea.'
p780
aS"During the 1980's, African-American communities attempted to secede from this city and create the new municipality of Mandela."
p781
aS'During the Revolutionary War, the British were driven from this city after Henry Knox fortified the (*) Dorchester Heights in a single night.'
p782
aS'Attractions in this home of Mary Baker Eddy include the global headquarters of Christian Science.'
p783
aS'The suburbs of this city were the scene of the Sacco and Vanzetti trials.'
p784
aS"Political speeches were often given at this city's Faneuil Hall and people killed in this city include Crispus Attucks."
p785
aS'For ten points, name this American city that names a massacre and a tea party, the largest in Massachusetts.'
p786
aS'One leader of this country refused to follow the traditional political practice of "cafe com liete" by not choosing his successor from the southernmost state.'
p787
aS'That leader, Washington Luis, was succeeded by Getulio_Vargas, who established the "Estado Novo" in this country.'
p788
aS"The invasion of this country's Mato Grosso state by Francisco Solano Lopez's army began the War of the Triple Alliance, in which this modern day country formed an alliance with Argentina and Uruguay."
p789
aS'For 10 points, name this South American country whose first ruler was the Portuguese Dom Pedro I.'
p790
aS'The first modernist building in this country was a house whose architect tricked the permit office by claiming that he had run out of money to add any decoration to its plain concrete facade.'
p791
aS'That Casa Modernista was built by Gregori Warchavchik, who spent his career here.'
p792
aS'Le Corbusier joined a team of architects from this country to construct the Ministry of Education and Health building, which used really big pilotis and brises-soleil to adapt modernist techniques to [*] warmer climates.'
p793
aS'A bridge in this country is suspended from three skewed arches, and a "Monumental Axis" in its capital ends at the Plaza of Three Powers.'
p794
aS"This country's National Congress building is topped by a matching white dome and bowl."
p795
aS'For 10 points, name this South American country whose Juscelino Kubitschek Bridge can be found in an airplane-shaped city developed by Lucio Costa and Oscar Niemeyer.'
p796
aS'One era of this country\'s history is called the "Coffee with Milk" period because of the dominant agricultural interests.'
p797
aS'During the 20th century, this country saw multiple revolts by the tenentes, a group of junior military officers.'
p798
aS'Later, this country was home to a fascist movement that used the Greek letter sigma as its symbol and marched in bright green uniforms, the (*) Integralists.'
p799
aS'This country\'s Revolution of 1930 overthrew President Washington Luis, whose successor installed an "Estado Novo".'
p800
aS'Today, this country is notable for its heavy reliance on ethanol fuel and is ruled by the leftist Luiz Inacio Lula da Silva.'
p801
aS'For ten points, name this South American country that speaks Portuguese.'
p802
aS"This man's government eliminated the manufacturing tax and replaced it with a five percent VAT paid by consumers called the Goods and Services Tax."
p803
aS'His government also issued a moratorium on cod fishing after he won an election on the strength of an all-provinces strategy and a strong debate performance, where he gave the legendary retort "You had an option, sir." His government accepted refugees from the pro-American governments in Guatamala and El_Salvador and engineered a failed agreement in Charlottetown that was to replace the Meech Lake Accord.'
p804
aS'He was succeeded by the less popular Kim Campbell as PM and Progressive Conservative leader.'
p805
aS'For 10 points, name this Prime Minister of Canada from 1984 to 1993.'
p806
aS'In 2005, this man gave a short speech in which he said "Peter Newman: go fuck yourself" as Newman painted an unflattering picture of him in a biography.'
p807
aS'His time in power saw him sell 23 of his nation\'s 63 "crown corporations" and pay out 300 million dollars in reparations to Japanese interred during WWII.'
p808
aS"He replaced the Manufacturer's Tax with the Goods and Services Tax and passed an agreement that opponents like Ed Broadbent claimed would turn Canada into the 51st state, the Free Trade Agreement."
p809
aS'He engaged in failed negotiations with Robert Bourassa over the Meech Lake Accord, which would have given a constitutional veto to Quebec, after he came to power by succeeding John Turner.'
p810
aS'For 10 points, name this Canadian prime minister who was followed by Kim Campbell after serving from 1984 to 1993.'
p811
aS'locations in this citys downtown include Plaza de Mayo and the office of its country president is called the Casa Rosada.'
p812
aS'Its residents are sometimes called porteos [por-te-nyos].'
p813
aS'For 15 points, identify this Argentine city which lies on the south shore of the Rio de la Plata.'
p814
aS'Mauricio Macri is its current mayor, and it is served by the Pistarini International Airport.'
p815
aS'Important sites in this city include the teatro Colon opera house and the Cabildo, a colonial-era government building.'
p816
aS'Neighborhoods in this city include Palermo, Puerto Madero, and La Boca, and the Riachuelo forms its southern border.'
p817
aS'The Plaza de Mayo is home to the Casa Rosada or presidential palace, and the Plaza San Martin is named after the South-American liberator who is buried in this city.'
p818
aS'Other famous inhabitants include Julio Cortazar, Diego Maradona and Eva Peron.'
p819
aS'Located on the Rio de la Plata, FTP, what is this Argentinian city, its capital'
p820
aS'This nation was led from 1934-1935 by the dictatorial Zveno Group, and it faced the Radomir Rebellion in 1918.'
p821
aS'Aleksandur Stamboliyski initiated agrarian reforms in this nation in the early 1920s.'
p822
aS'This nation suffered the worst per-capita number of (+) troops killed in World_War_I, and it was forced to sign the punitive Treaty of Neuilly at the end of that war.'
p823
aS'A national of this country was acquitted of setting the Reichstag fire and that man, Georgi Dimitrov, became prime minister of this country at the end of World_War_II.'
p824
aS"A member of the Axis in World_War_II, this nation's King Boris III refused to (*) deport Jews from this country."
p825
aS'For 10 points, Sofia became the capital of this country in 1879 after this nation gained its independence in the Treaty of San Stefano.'
p826
aS'The future communist leader of this country was tried in the Leipzig Trial for setting fire to the\\n Reichstag.'
p827
aS'This nation of Georgi Dimitrov rebelled against the Ottoman_Empire in the April Rising, the\\n suppression of which led William Gladstone to denounce a series of "horrors." This country was defeated\\n in the Second Balkan War and led by Tsar Boris III during World_War_II.'
p828
aS'For much of the twentieth\\n century this country was led by Todor Zhivkov, who had the longest stint in power of any Soviet bloc\\n leader.'
p829
aS'For 10 points, name this Balkan nation which during World_War_II saw allied aircraft heavily bomb\\n Sofia.'
p830
aS'In June of each year, a US Campaign for this country holds thousands of Arrest Yourself parties.'
p831
aS'The National League for Democracy won 392 of the 492 seats in this countrys 1990 parliamentary elections, but State Law and Order Restoration Council quickly overruled their victory.'
p832
aS'Civil unrest increased in 2007, when General Than Shwe crushed the Saffron Revolution, a nonviolent uprising by thousands of Buddhist monks.'
p833
aS'For ten points, name this country in Southeast Asia where the ruling military junta is currently holding Nobel Peace Prize winner Aung San Suu Kyi in detention.'
p834
aS'This kingdom was established when Anawrahta captured the city of Thaton, and its final classical ruler was the devout forest king Nara-thi-hapate.'
p835
aS'Its capital then moved outward to Ava and then the coastal city of Pegu, which saw the succession of a number of Toungoo Dynasties.'
p836
aS'Early on, though, it expanded by capturing the territory of the Mons in the south, and was known as the Pagan kingdom, though that empire would decline concurrently with Srivijaya and the others.'
p837
aS'Its important 20th century figures have included the demented monk Saya San who set himself up as a false king and Ne Win who led the Way to Socialism.'
p838
aS'FTP, name this country whose leaders have also included Aung San and his daughter Aung San Suu Kyi.'
p839
aS"On Monday, Japan canceled a multimillion-yen grant to this nation in protest of the death of Kenji Nagai, a photographer who was killed by this country's troops."
p840
aS'Canada recently granted honorary citizenship to a democracy advocate from this country, Aung Sang Suu Kyi.'
p841
aS'Over 3,000 people were arrested in this country in pro-democracy rallies this week.'
p842
aS'In September, the government of this country arrested thousands of monks and students.'
p843
aS'FTP, name this southeast Asian nation governed by a military junta known as SLORC, with current capital at Naypyidaw and a large former capital at Rangoon.'
p844
aS'A group of officers in this nation swore oaths to each other and Commander Thunderbolt by using a syringe to remove some blood, putting it in a bowl, and drinking it.'
p845
aS'In Operation Longcloth, a group of soldiers under Orde Wingate infiltrated behind enemy lines in this nation.'
p846
aS"Joseph Stilwell led a retreat from this nation during World_War_II, during which time Merrill's Marauders fought against the Japanese 18th division."
p847
aS'The "thirty comrades" fought for the independence of this nation, and founded a force that would later become the (*) Tatamdaw.'
p848
aS'The Chindit brigade fought in this nation.'
p849
aS'The "Hump" was a feature of a supply route named for this nation, which was guarded by Claire Chennault\'s Flying Tigers.'
p850
aS'For 10 points, name this nation, which along with China and India lends its name to the Southeast Asian land theatre of World_War_II, and which after said conflict was headed by Aung San.'
p851
aS'According to one source, this ruler executed Sallustius Lucullus for inventing a new type of spear and then naming it after himself.'
p852
aS'Fearing rebellion, this ruler forbade two legions from sharing the same camp, and he gained favor with the army by increasing its pay by one-third from the previous Caesarian-Augustan rate.'
p853
aS'The first emperor since Claudius to campaign in person, this emperor took for himself the title of "Germanicus" after defeating the Chatti and was largely responsible for the construction of the Rhine-Danube fortifications.'
p854
aS'Unpopular with the aristocracy for such extravagances as demanding to be called dominus et deus, this emperor commanded the executions of his relatives Flavius Sabinus and Flavius Clemens and was opposed in the Senate by a coalition headed by the son of a man executed by Vespasian, Helvidius Priscus.'
p855
aS'This emperor also put down the 89 C.E.'
p856
aS'revolt of Satruninus.'
p857
aS'Succeeded upon his assassination by Nerva, for 10 points, identify this Roman emperor, the successor to his brother Titus.'
p858
aS'This man conquered the Isle of Wight during the Roman conquest of Briatain.'
p859
aS'This man was chosen proconsul of Africa, and Suetonius recounts that he was pelted with turnips at a riot in Hadrumetum.'
p860
aS'His reign saw the beginning of the construction of the Colosseum as well as a temple that deified Claudius.'
p861
aS'This man was also appointed to suppress the Great Jewish Revolt, and he later became emperor after the short reigns of Galba, Otho, and Vitellus in a certain year.'
p862
aS'The father of Titus and Domitian, for 10 points, identify this founder of the Flavian dynasty who ruled from 69 to 79 AD.'
p863
aS'a general, this man defeated the Durotriges while in command of the second legion.'
p864
aS"He executed Helvidius Priscus for his staunch defense of the Senate's power and appointed Gnaeus Agricola to a seven-year governorship of Britain."
p865
aS'His generals included Gaius Licinius Mucianus, who stopped the Great Jewish Revolt, and Antonius Primus, who helped this man defeat Vitellus to become emperor.'
p866
aS'For 10 points, name this founder of the Flavian dynasty who started building the Colosseum and was succeeded by Titus and Domitian, the final victor in the Year of the Four Emperors.'
p867
aS'This man ordered the execution of Sallustius after Sallustius named new lances after himself, and he also sent a legion under Velius Rufus against the Sarmatians.'
p868
aS'Suetonius reports that he was extremely sensitive about his baldness and wrote a work titled "On the Care of Hair," and his architect Rabirus built the Domus Augustana on the Palatine hill.'
p869
aS'He also attacked the Suebian Marcomanni and the Quadi in the two Pannonian wars.'
p870
aS'This man sent an army led by Cornelius Fuscus, and that force lost the first battle of Tapae against the Dacians, before a temporary peace was concluded with Decebalus.'
p871
aS'His reign also saw a revolt led by Saturninus, and he recalled Agricola from Britain after Agricola won the battle of Mons Graupius.'
p872
aS'He was assassinated in 96 CE, after which Nerva was elected emperor by the senate.'
p873
aS'For 10 points, identify this last of the Flavian emperors, the brother of Emperor Titus.'
p874
aS'In The Skin of Our Teeth, Henry Antrobus once shared his name with this person.'
p875
aS"Jose Saramago's final novel is titled for this figure."
p876
aS'A character who represents this figure is told Timshel at the end of the novel in which he appears.'
p877
aS'That character sells beans during World_War_I and causes his mother Cathy Ames to commit suicide.'
p878
aS'Grendel and his mother are said to be descendants of this figure.'
p879
aS"Caleb Trask is the stand-in for this character, contrasting him with his brother Aron, in John Steinbeck's East of Eden."
p880
aS'For 10 points, name this Biblical character who gets a namesake "mark" for killing his brother Abel.'
p881
aS'Racial violence in this city began with the 1909 lynching of William_James, as well as the later 1967 murder of black soldier Robert Hunt.'
p882
aS'Its Chief of Police was shot in 1969 violence stopped when Governor Richard Ogilvie sent in the National Guard.'
p883
aS"Rooster Cogburn opened a bar here after the Civil War, and it was the inspiration for Eden in Charles Dickens' Martin Chuzzlewit."
p884
aS'Stephen Foster wrote a song about being "way down" in this city, which is where Magnolia Manor and Fort Defiance State Park are located.'
p885
aS"Huck and Jim intend to go to this city to obtain Jim's freedom in Huckleberry Finn, but they end up sailing past it."
p886
aS'This city has the lowest elevation of any within Illinois and is located at the confluence of the Mississippi and Ohio Rivers.'
p887
aS'For 10 points, name this southernmost city in Illinois, which shares its name with a city in Egypt.'
p888
aS'The "bodies upon the gears" speech was given in this state after the arrest of activist Jack Weinberg at one of this state\'s universities.'
p889
aS'One riot in this state began at a cafeteria and was sparked when a drag queen threw coffee in the face of a police officer.'
p890
aS'Tort law in this state was greatly expanded by its former Chief Justice, Roger Traynor.'
p891
aS'One city in this state was home to a radical theater group called the "Diggers," as well as the first free clinic.'
p892
aS'Mario Savio organized the Free Speech Movement in this state.'
p893
aS'A university in this state controversially rejected the application of a NASA engineer who had served in Vietnam and was told by Lewis Powell that while "plus factors" were allowed, it could not reserve 16% of seats in its medical school for minorities because quotas violated the constitution.'
p894
aS'For 10 points, name this state sued by Bakke and formerly governed by Ronald Reagan.'
p895
aS'Antonio de la Ascension, who kept a journal for Sebastian Vizcaino, claimed that it was an island with its very own Mediterranean Sea.'
p896
aS'This image, perpetuated for over a century by mapmakers such as Briggs, Sanson, Blaeu, and Speed, may owe something to the literary origins of the name as an island inhabited by Amazons in a fifteenth-century romance by Garci Ordonez de Montalvo.'
p897
aS"Father Eusebio Kino's travels confirmed that it was not, in fact, an island, but it was Juan Bautista de Anza who made the first overland journey here, a trek to resupply the missions founded by Junipero Serra."
p898
aS'FTP, give the geographic term now applied to the gulf also known as the Sea of Cortes and the peninsula of Baja.'
p899
aS'Czeslaw Milosz has written a poem titled "Against" a poet from this polity, who dedicated "A Threnody" to his sister and wrote "Rock and Hawk" and "Shine, Perishing Republic!'
p900
aS'" Another poet from this polity wrote a poem that claims "I pledge allegiance to the soil" that contains lines such as "One ecosystem, in diversity, under the sun, with joyful interpenetration for all.'
p901
aS'" In addition to this polity\'s Robinson Jeffers and Turtle Island author Gary Snyder, a poem set in this polity imagines Garcia Lorca by the watermelons and Walt Whitman eyeing the grocery boys.'
p902
aS'For 10 points, name this state, a "Supermarket" in which names a poem by Allen Ginsberg.'
p903
aS'This man was the target of plots by both Cnaeus Cornelius Lentulus Gaetulicus and Cassius Chaerea.'
p904
aS'In one incident, this man ordered the construction of a massive two mile long pontoon bridge across the Bay of Baiae after a soothsayer claimed he had no more chance of becoming ruler than of crossing the bay on horseback.'
p905
aS'This man was the son of (*) Agrippina the Elder and had an incestuous relationship with his sister Agrippina the Younger.'
p906
aS'He succeeded Tiberius, was killed by his own Praetorian guards and had a name meaning "little sandal".'
p907
aS'For 10 points, name this Roman emperor who preceded Claudius and tried to make his horse a consul.'
p908
aS'This emperor began the custom of donatavum, a cash bonus to soldiers which became increasingly cumbersome later on.'
p909
aS'The only primary source on this man is a work by Philo Judaeus that recounts an embassy of Jerusalemites which tried to persuade him to intervene in a religious dispute with pagans.'
p910
aS'This leader was told that he had as much chance of becoming emperor as he did of crossing the bay and keeping his feet dry, so he created a floating causeway of boats.'
p911
aS'When audience members booed him for a poor gladiator show, this emperor had their tongues cut out and then fed them to the lions.'
p912
aS'This emperor once threw a party for Incitatus, presenting him with paintings to hang in his marble bedroom.'
p913
aS'He also appointed Incitatus, a horse, to the Senate.'
p914
aS'for 10 points, name this son of Agrippina the Elder who preceded Claudius as Roman emperor.'
p915
aS"Junia Claudilla and Livia Aurestilla were the first two of his man's four known wives."
p916
aS'His first exposure to public office was as pontifex at the age of 19, and he became quaestor two years later.'
p917
aS'He would have no other public experience before assuming his most important position.'
p918
aS"He would join his father on his many successful military expeditions, until his father died, according to some sources due to poisoning by this man's predecessor."
p919
aS'His rise to power was assisted by the prefect Macro, and together they persuaded the senate to ignore the will of his predecessor; shortly afterwards, he had his co-heir, Gemellus, killed.'
p920
aS'He is best known for his autocratic and capricious rule, including the supposed elevation of Incitatus to the consulship.'
p921
aS'It is from the aforementioned expeditions with his father Germanicus that his nickname of "little boots" originates.'
p922
aS'FTP, who was this Roman emperor, successor to Tiberius'
p923
aS"This man twice vetoed the McNary-Haugen Act, and his vice president won the Nobel Peace Prize for devising a namesake plan to help stabilize Germany's devastated economy."
p924
aS'His Secretary of State, Frank Kellogg, coauthored a plan that prohibited the use of war except as a tool of self defense.This president proclaimed that "I do not choose to run for president" while in South Dakota.'
p925
aS'He earlier gained national prominence when he forcefully ended the Boston Police Strike.'
p926
aS'For 10 points, name this "silent" president of the United_States who succeeded Warren Harding in 1923.'
p927
aS'This president vetoed the McNary-Haugen Farm Bill twice due to objections to establishing price ceilings.'
p928
aS'He was criticized for his leadership during the "Great Mississippi Flood." This man signed the Indian Citizenship Act into law.'
p929
aS'This president capitalized on dissention in the opposition party by defeating compromise candidate John W. Davis in his reelection campaign.'
p930
aS'He put down a police strike during his time as Governor of Massachusetts.'
p931
aS'This man was sworn in at 3 in the morning after the death of the previous President, Warren Harding.'
p932
aS'For 10 points, name the 30th President of the United_States, known as "Silent Cal."'
p933
aS'He twice vetoed the McNary-Haugen Bill, under which the federal government would have bought surplus crops, and his Secretary of War was Dwight Davis of Davis Cup fame.'
p934
aS'His signed the first gift tax into law, along with a reduction of the immigration quota from 3 to 2 percent.'
p935
aS'As a state Senator, this former Mayor of Northampton mediated the Bread and Roses Strike and allied with the Winthrop Crane faction of the Massachusetts Republican Party against Henry Cabot Lodge, but prior to nominating Harlan Fisk Stone and beating John Davis he gained national attention by shutting down a police department strike.'
p936
aS'For ten points, name this 30th S President, notable for small-government policies in the 1920s, the successor of Warren Harding.'
p937
aS'The Royal Council of the Throne determines the king of this country, who currently is Norodom Sihanouk.'
p938
aS'Its capitol was moved from Longvek to Udong in 1618, and Lon Nol ruled this country until 1975.'
p939
aS'One leader of this country tried to cleanse the country and start over with a "Year Zero." This nation became a French Protectorate in 1866, and was later renamed "The Republic of Kampuchea" by Pol Pot during the rule of the Khmer Rouge.'
p940
aS'For 10 points, name this Southeast Asian kingdom containing Angkor Watt with a capitol at Phnomh Phen.'
p941
aS'A political party in this country massacred people in a former high school called S-21, or Tuol Sleng, and overthrew Norodom Sihanouk ["sigh"-an-ouk].'
p942
aS'That party was named after an ancient empire in this country, which was ruled by(*) Jayavarman [JAI-uh-var-man] II and led by a man who identified himself as "Brother Number One." The Ba Chuc Massacre led to war between Vietnam and the Pol Pot-led Khmer Rouge of this nation.'
p943
aS'For 10 points, name this country where the ancient city of Angkor Wat lies to the north of Phnom ["Puh-NOM"] Penh.'
p944
aS"One rebellion in this country saw the execution of Thomas Scott, which led this country's leader to dispatch the Wolseley Expedition."
p945
aS"Another rebellion in this country was sparked by the Battle of Montgomery's Tavern and ended with the defeat of the rebels at the Battle of the Windmill."
p946
aS'That rebellion, which was a protest against the Family Compact, was one of two rebellions in this country which took place in 1837.'
p947
aS"The Battle of Fish Creek was part of a (*) rebellion of this country's Metis, led by Louis_Riel."
p948
aS'For 10 points, name this country which saw the North-West Rebellion take place in Saskatchewan.'
p949
aS"The Durham Report urged for the union of this modern-day country's two parts."
p950
aS'The explosion of the SS Mont-Blanc occurred in this country, whose first prime minister left office after accepting bribes over the construction of a transcontinental railroad in the (*) Pacific Scandal.'
p951
aS"Louisiana's Cajun culture originated from settlers in this country called Acadians."
p952
aS'The Battle of the Plains of Abraham occurred in this country during the French and Indian War, and its Klondike Gold Rush resulted in the settlement of Yukon Territory.'
p953
aS'For ten points, identify this largest member of the British Commonwealth home to the province of Ontario.'
p954
aS'ANSWER: Canada'
p955
aS'Producer of the Ram tank based on the American M3 tank, during World_War_II, its commanders included Andrew McNaughten and Henry Crerar, while its most notable commander during World_War_I was Arthur Currie.'
p956
aS'During that war, its forces were regarded as an elite force and left alone by the Germans after the Battle of Vimy Ridge, and ships in its navy included the Athabaskan, Nootka, Micmac, and Haida, which is preserved at Hamilton.'
p957
aS"Its 3rd Infantry Division was the primary landing force at Juno Beach during Normandy landings, and in 1945, it possessed the world's third-largest navy."
p958
aS'FTP, name this Commonwealth country.'
p959
aS'This country and its southern neighbor entered into the Ogdensburg Agreement.'
p960
aS"Freight rates were lowered in this country following the Crow's Nest Pass Agreement."
p961
aS'The speedy arrival of a force under Frederick Middleton led to the relatively quick end of a rebellion in this country.'
p962
aS'After the death of Premier Duplessis, the desire to be "masters of our own house" led to the Quiet Revolution in this country.'
p963
aS'The passage of Bill 178 led to great opposition to the "distinct society" clause of the Meech Lake Accord, which was an attempt to amend this country\'s constitution.'
p964
aS"Hugh Allan was given the contract to build this country's namesake Pacific Railway, which led to the resignation of John Macdonald."
p965
aS'For 10 points, name this country whose PMs have included Kim Campbell and Pierre Trudeau.'
p966
aS'The colonial history of this nation includes a time when it was dominated by the "Hundred Associates," and a longstanding dispute in this nation was partially resolved through the recent Clarity Act.'
p967
aS'William Vander Zalm was elected to a leadership role in one part of this country under the banner of the Social Credit movement.'
p968
aS'One leader of this nation was intermittently opposed by George Brown and was involved in the Pacific Scandal.'
p969
aS'Another leader of this nation took advantage of the War Measures Act to proclaim a state of "apprehended insurrection," in one part of this country, a response to a series of events known as the October Crisis.'
p970
aS'This nation held a constitutional convention in 1987 which culminated in the Meech Lake Accords, and its leaders have included Brian_Mulroney and Pierre Trudeau.'
p971
aS'For ten points, identify this country currently led by Steven Harper.'
p972
aS'One tower in this country features an elliptical floor plan rotated through 180 degrees as it ascends.'
p973
aS"That building, nicknamed the Marilyn Monroe Tower, forms part of MAD's Absolute World development in this country."
p974
aS'In this country, a brown skyscraper with a parallelogram-shaped plan has v-shaped recessions cut into its upper levels.'
p975
aS'In this country, heraldry-covered octagonal coffers perforate the ceiling of a room whose walls display murals of World_War_I.'
p976
aS'That room in this country, the home of [*] Scotia Plaza, is found in the Centre Block, which is topped by the Peace Tower.'
p977
aS'One tower in this country features the "Space Deck" and "SkyPod" viewing platforms.'
p978
aS'For 10 points, identify this country whose tallest structure is the CN Tower.'
p979
aS'This man\'s two spies confirm that another character\'s "self-torture" flogging ruse was actually legitimate, leading this man to be misled during a major engagement.'
p980
aS"This man dies after developing rheumatism in the skull and refusing a physician's offer to split his skull open with an axe to extract fluid."
p981
aS'He built the Bronze Bird Pavilion and has his son compose a rhapsody to demonstrate his intent to capture a pair of sisters.'
p982
aS'This man has a conversation in which he says that there were only two heroes in the realm: himself and the man with whom he is having tea.'
p983
aS'This man has a falling out with his mentor Yuan Shao after trying to curb the power of the Ten Attendants.'
p984
aS'He escapes from Luoyang after failing to use the Seven Star Sword to assassinate Dong Zhuo.'
p985
aS'His linked ships are destroyed by a fireship strategy devised by Zhou Yu and Zhuge Liang.'
p986
aS'For 10 points, name this founder of the Northern Wei state, who lost at the Battle of the Red Cliffs, an antagonist of most of the Romance of the Three Kingdoms.'
p987
aS'This man was removed from his position as a captain in Luoyang after instituting a policy that resulted in the flogging of an uncle of Jian Shuo.'
p988
aS'He had his subordinate Dong Zhao build the Pinglu and Quanzhou trenches, which he used to convey supplies north for his campaign against the Wuhuan; in that campaign he won a decisive victory at White Wolf Mountain.'
p989
aS'At the suggestion of his advisor Xun Yu, he convinced Emperor Xian to move the capital to Xuchang.'
p990
aS'His greatest victory came after minor skirmishes at Boma and Yan Ford and saw him lead a strike force that burned the Wuchao supply depot.'
p991
aS"In a later battle, he was fooled by Huang Gai's false defection, resulting in the burning of his navy and his defeat at the hands of the forces of Zhou Yu, Sun Quan, and Liu Bei."
p992
aS"This general, who triumphed over Yuan Shao's forces at the Battle of Guandu and lost the Battle of Red Cliffs, gained early fame for putting down the Five Pecks of Rice and Yellow Turban revolts."
p993
aS'For 10 points, identify this villainous first King of Wei.'
p994
aS"He may have suggested Wang Lung use his daughter Diao Chan to bring down a mutual rival, and before the discovery of the Yinqueshan Han Strips, this man's commentaries on The Art of War served as its primary source material."
p995
aS'After leading the campaigns against (*) Dong Zhuo, he used emperor Xian to support his wars in the north, which led to victory of Yuan Shao at the Battle of Guandu.'
p996
aS'Despite drastically outnumbering Sun Quan and Liu Bei, this man lost the Battle of Red Cliffs, dooming his Kingdom of Wei to mismanagement.'
p997
aS"For 10 points, identify this figure of China's Three Kingdom's period, considered the epitome of ruthless cunning in Chinese history."
p998
aS'_Before one battle, Xu You defected to this man and revealed the location of an enemy supply depot in Wuchao, which allowed this man to break a stalemate.'
p999
aS"In 2009, this man's tomb was supposedly dug up in Henan, but controversy exists on whether it is genuine or whether it belongs to one of his descendants."
p1000
aS'This man was appointed the "General who (+)_ Arranged the Army" of the Army of the Western Garden, which did not last.'
p1001
aS'However, this man later built up the Qingzhou army.'
p1002
aS'His domestic policies included Tun Tian System, which was directed at farmers and helped alleviate results of a locust plague.'
p1003
aS'He is often depicted with a (*) white face in operatic productions, as he is often depicted as a treacherous villain.'
p1004
aS'This man gained the support of Emperor Xiao after a campaign in which he captured Luoyang and defeated Dong Zhuo.'
p1005
aS'This man also defeated Yuan Shao at the Battle of Guandu.'
p1006
aS'In his goal of unifying China, this man was defeated by Sun Quan and Liu Bei at the Battle of Red Cliffs.'
p1007
aS'For 10 points, name this warlord of the Three Kingdoms period, who laid the grounds for the kingdom of Cao Wei.'
p1008
aS'[AR] This man served as a diplomat at the Valteline War and the Mantuan War of sucession.'
p1009
aS'He was recommended to his best-known position upon being able to effect a reoccupation of Sedan in 1641.'
p1010
aS"During an assembly of bishops, he added executive force to the decrees of Innocent X, ordering Pascal's Provincial Letters to be burnt-partially motivated by his own anti-Jansenist stance because of their support of de Retz."
p1011
aS'He held the title of Bishop of Metz, despite some speculate he was secretly married to Anne of Austria, though he continued the policies of his predecessor against the House of Austria.'
p1012
aS'For 10 points, name this chief minister under Louis XIII and Louis XIV who succeeded Cardinal Richelieu.'
p1013
aS'While serving his first master, he brokered the negotiation of the Treaty of Cherasco, which ended the War of the Mantuan Succession.'
p1014
aS'After leaving the service of Urban VIII, he negotiated a treaty between his new master and Tommaso of Savoy.'
p1015
aS'Once in power, he gave asylum to the Barberini family, putting him in conflict with Innocent X, and put down the rebellion of Ardeche, a Huguenot city.'
p1016
aS'Treaties he negotiated included the Treaty of Munster and the Treaty of Osnabruck, while he arranged the marriage of Maria_Theresa of Spain to Louis XIV in the Peace of the Pyrenees.'
p1017
aS'For ten points, name this Italian Cardinal who served as an advisor to several kings of France.'
p1018
aS'This event\'s namesake test of proportionality and necessity helped establish the doctrine of "anticipatory self-defense." A year after it occurred, Hunters\' Patriot insurgents were defeated at the Battle of the Windmill.'
p1019
aS'Pirate Bill Johnston destroyed the steamship Sir Robert_Peel in retaliation for the death of Amos Durfee during this event, but Alexander McLeod was acquitted on all charges of providing the main agitators with guidance.'
p1020
aS"In response to this event, Winfield_Scott was dispatched to prevent further tensions after Sir Allan MacNabb's militia tried to prevent supplies from reaching William Lyon Mckenzie at Navy Island."
p1021
aS'For 10 points, name this 1837 incident in which a group of Canadian loyalists crossed the Niagara River and set ablaze the namesake American steamer.'
p1022
aS'Amos Durfee, a New York sailor, was the only man killed during this event, but tensions remained high for nearly two years afterwards, culminating in the retaliatory burning of the steamship Sir Robert_Peel on the St. Lawrence River.'
p1023
aS'In spite of the propaganda efforts of William Lyon MacKenzie, however, it did not lead to war between the U.S. and Great Britain.'
p1024
aS'For 10 points name this international incident of 1837, named for an American ship attacked and burned on the Niagara River by Canadian militiamen.'
p1025
aS'This event resulted in the death of a boy named Johnson, and known popularly as "Little Billy.'
p1026
aS'" It happened a year before the Battle of the Windmill, during which men like Samuel Lount allied with groups known as the Hunters\' Lodges.'
p1027
aS'A letter by Governor Francis Bond Head responded to a communiqu between John Forsyth and Henry Fox in the wake of this event; Head denied responsibility for the happenings at Fort Schlosser, where Andrew Drew had acted under orders from Colonel Allan MacNab.'
p1028
aS'This event saw the death of Amos Durfee after departure from Navy Island, but Alexander MacLeod was acquitted on all charges.'
p1029
aS'General Winfield_Scott was sent to quell hostility on the American side, after William Lyon Mackenzie had tried to incite war with Great Britain.'
p1030
aS'FTP, name this 1837 incident, the Canadian-led takeover and burning of a ship on the Niagara River.'
p1031
aS'Governor Francis Head denied responsibility for this event and for the events at Fort Schlosser.'
p1032
aS'After this event, Benjamin Lett murdered a loyalist involved in the violence, and retaliation for this event saw the Sir Robert_Peel burned.'
p1033
aS'Amos Dufee was killed in conjunction with this event, which was ordered by Allan McNab and Andrew Drew.'
p1034
aS'The object at the center of this even was en route to Navy Island, where a Republic of Canada had been set up by William MacKenzie.'
p1035
aS'General Winfield_Scott was sent to quell hostility on the American border after this event, but the tensions surrounding this event were not alleviated until the Webster-Ashburton Treaty.'
p1036
aS'For ten points, identify this event which nearly brought the US to war with Britain, in which a certain boat filled with arms was set on fire and sent over Niagara Falls.'
p1037
aS'In the fallout of this event, Alexander Baring claimed that "No slight to the authority of the United_States was ever intended.'
p1038
aS'" One of its instigators was killed by an Irish rebel name Benjamin Lett, and in the incident, only one man named Amos Durfee was killed, although initial reports indicated that dozens had died.'
p1039
aS'After a failed revolt, Rensselaer Van Rensselaer took refuge on Navy Island, leading to this event.'
p1040
aS'It was perpetrated by Col. Allan MacNab, and in retaliation, Martin_Van_Buren ordered the burning of the S.S. Robert_Peel.'
p1041
aS'FTP, name this incident, which saw Canadian loyalists cross the US border to burn a ship supplying separatists.'
p1042
aS'It was an ancient commercial hub, with beds, cushions and mattresses from this city being regarded as luxuries.'
p1043
aS'Gaius Gracchus and Marcus Fulvius Flacchus were charged with establishing a colony on this site.'
p1044
aS'Tertullian and Cyprian were leading Christian theologians from this city.'
p1045
aS'After the decline of the Romans, the Vandals established a kingdom centered around this city under Gaiseric, which lasted for a century until Gelimer, its final king, was defeated by Belisarius, who established a Byzantine Exarchate.'
p1046
aS'FTP, name this city, which was reduced to insignificance under Arab rule as Tunis rose to take its place.'
p1047
aS'A force of this city defeated Dorieus when he attempted to found a colony at the foot of Mount Eryx.'
p1048
aS'It founded the city of Gabir and emerged victorious under Malchus, who was later banished.'
p1049
aS'Its government featured a body of judges known as the Hundred and Four and it celebrated the cult of the goddess Tanit, at the religious district or Tophet in the south.'
p1050
aS'This is where its practice of child sacrifice is said to have occurred, and its power center was the citadel Byrsa.'
p1051
aS'It was defeated at the Battle of Himera and a revolution overthrew its Mago dynasty.'
p1052
aS'Led by several members of the Barca family, FTP, name this ancient Phoenician city which fought against Rome in the Punic Wars.'
p1053
aS"battle fought at the capital of this former polity resulted in the deaths of both Gordians, ending their rebellion against Maximinus Thrax, and long after the fall of this polity, its capital was razed by forces under Hasan ibn al'Numan, who besieged a force here under John the Patrician and Tiberius Apsimarus."
p1054
aS'This polity featured a military tribunal known as the One Hundred and Four, and an earlier siege of its capital saw the capture of its citadel, the (*) Byrsa, and a final stand at the temple of Eshmoun.'
p1055
aS'Its forces were defeated at the Battle of Himera by Gelon, and it was victorious at the Battle of The Saw to fight off a revolt under Spendius and Mathos in the Truceless War, also known as the Mercenary War.'
p1056
aS'A kingdom that shared its capital fell after the battles of Ad Decimum and Tricamarum, leading to the deposition of Gelimer the Vandal.'
p1057
aS'Mago and Hanno the Navigator were subjects of, for 10 points, this empire, which had victories at Lake Trasimene and Cannae while fighting the Second Punic War against Rome.'
p1058
aS'Agathocles led an expedition against this city and forced it to withdraw troops from Syracuse, and in a war with Epirus, this city sued for peace but was denied by Pyrrhus.'
p1059
aS'This city was home to navigators like Hanno and Himilco, and one military leader from this city attacked Saguntum at the start of a war.'
p1060
aS'This city\'s army won victories at (*) Trebia and Lake Trasimene in a war begun after Cato the Elder declared that this city "must be destroyed", and he crossed the Alps with his war elephants.'
p1061
aS'For ten points, name this African city home to Hannibal Barca, which lost to Rome in the Second Punic War.'
p1062
aS'This ruler established the Palatine School and the system of missi dominici to oversee his lands.'
p1063
aS'He hired Alcuin of York to educate his people, and he defeated Desiderius and the Lombards at Pavia, a feat which was chronicled by his biographer Einhard.'
p1064
aS'His rearguard was defeated by the Basques at the Battle of (*) Roncevaux Pass, and he split his territory amongst his three grandsons in the Treaty of Verdun.'
p1065
aS'Ruling from Aachen, this man was the grandson of Charles_Martel, and Pope Leo III crowned him in the Christmas Day Mass.'
p1066
aS'For ten points, name this Frankish king, son of Pepin the Short, who became the Holy Roman Emperor in 800 CE.'
p1067
aS'Pope Hadrian II appealed to this leader for help defeating the Lombard Desiderius, after which this man conquered Pavia and took over the Lombard crown.'
p1068
aS"This leader advanced to Saragossa, but when Ibn al-Arabi's forces failed to appear to confront Cordova, this man retreated, losing to the Basques at Roncesvalles."
p1069
aS'This ruler was the son of the first king of the Carolingian dynasty, Pepin the Short, and co-ruled with his brother for a time before Carloman died.'
p1070
aS'For 10 points, name this king of the Franks and emperor of the Romans.'
p1071
aS'This ruler set up a system of authority and law in his namesake Capitulary.'
p1072
aS'A biography of this ruler was written by Einhard.'
p1073
aS'This ruler originally split lands with his brother Carloman after the death of his father, Pepin the Short.'
p1074
aS'This man was unexpectedly crowned while kneeling to pray in St. Peter\'s Basilica on Christmas by Pope Leo III, becoming by that action ""Emperor of the Romans"" in the year 800.'
p1075
aS'For 10 points, name this grandson of Charles_Martel and Carolingian ruler who greatly expanded the Frankish empire.'
p1076
aS'To secure the southern border, this ruler created a kingdom of Aquitaine, which even eventually gained control over the Spanish March.'
p1077
aS"His court included a circle of educated clerics who produced a renovatio, including the scholar Alcuin of York and this ruler's biographer, Einhard."
p1078
aS'Aachen was the site of the Palatine Chapel and palace of this man, the son of Pippin the Short who was crowned Emperor of the Romans on Christmas Day 800 by Pope Leo III.'
p1079
aS'For 10 points, name this Frankish King, the first Holy Roman Emperor.'
p1080
aS"In a meeting at Thionville, this man sided with the Pope's representatives rather than his father-in-law's, and proceeded to conquer a Lombard Kingdom ruled by Desiderius."
p1081
aS'This man ordered the beheading of over 4000 Saxons in the Massacre of Verden.'
p1082
aS"This man's grandsons divided his kingdom at the Treaty of Verdun, and he employed Alcuin at his capital in Aachen."
p1083
aS'Leo III crowned this man as the first Holy Roman Emperor in 800.'
p1084
aS'For 10 points, name this Carolingian Frankish king.'
p1085
aS'This ruler signed the Treaty of Heiligen with the Danish king Hemming.'
p1086
aS'This leader defeated the Lombards in the Siege of Pavia.'
p1087
aS"Scholars such as Alcuin of York engineered this man's namesake renaissance."
p1088
aS'This ruler lost the Battle of Roncevaux (ron-say-VOE) Pass, where his rearguard was led by Roland (roe-LON).'
p1089
aS'He was the son of (*) Pepin the Short and the grandson of Charles_Martel.'
p1090
aS'For 10 points, name this Frankish king who was crowned Holy Roman Emperor in 800.'
p1091
aS'After a successful attack by the Saxons against this man, he retaliated by executing 4500 Saxons in a single day.'
p1092
aS'His focus on the destruction of Pamplona led to his inability to capture Zaragoza.'
p1093
aS'He put down a revolt by Hunald, and distaste with his wife Fastrada led to a minor revolt by Pepin the Hunchback.'
p1094
aS"This ruler's court was centered around a unique octagonal chapel at the royal capitol of Aachen, where this ruler died after bathing in the warm springs."
p1095
aS'The brother of Carloman and son of Pepin the Short, FTP, identify this second Carolingian king, crowned emperor of the Romans by Pope Leo III in 800, with a name meaning Charles the Great.'
p1096
aS'With Himiltrude, this ruler produced a son with a hunchback that rebelled against his father and was subsequently confined to a monastery.'
p1097
aS'He was married at one point to a daughter of the king of Desiderius, before he defeated him, thus assisting Pope Adrian I.'
p1098
aS'A military incident involving this ruler involved this ruler being appeased by Husayn of Zaragoza, then afterwards being ambushed in Ronceveaux Pass in the Pyrenees.'
p1099
aS'This man declare himself King of the Lombards after he defeated them at Pavia.'
p1100
aS'His biographer was Einhard, and he ruled for a time with Carloman.'
p1101
aS'For ten points, name this first Holy Roman Emperor, a son of Peppin the Short that is the namesake of the Carolingian Dynasty.'
p1102
aS"This ruler's third wife, Fastrada, had fought against him with Widukind's Saxons."
p1103
aS'He ushered in a "Renaissance" that included such scholars as Alcuin of York and this man\'s biographer, Einhard.'
p1104
aS'Three of his grandsons carved up his empire in the Treaty of Verdun.'
p1105
aS'This ruler defeated the Lombards at Pavia, though his rear guard lost to Basques at Ronceveaux Pass.'
p1106
aS'In 800 CE, this predecessor of Louis the Pious was crowned by Pope Leo III as "King of the Romans.'
p1107
aS'" For 10 points, name this son of Pepin the Short, a great Frankish king of the Carolingian dynasty.'
p1108
aS'.'
aS'This politician angered the British and Russians by describing a Europe "from the Atlantic to the Urals." Rene Coty threatened to resign unless this man was made president.'
p1109
aS'He was opposed by a series of May 1968 riots, and was forced to negotiate with the FLN and grant Algerian independence.'
p1110
aS'For 10 points, name this French president who served from 1959 to 1969 after working with the Free French during World_War_II.'
p1111
aS'This man used a televised speech to refer to the Jewish people as ""this elite people"" following Israel\'s\\n victory in the Six-Day War.'
p1112
aS'His other speeches included the ""Appeal of 18 June"" and a controversial\\n declaration of ""vive le Quebec libre.'
p1113
aS'"" This man criticized the static strategy of the Maginot Line in his book\\n The Army of the Future and encouraged his countrymen to reject the policies of Philippe Petain, who led\\n the collaborationist Vichy regime in this man\'s country.'
p1114
aS'For 10 points, name this leader of the Free French\\n during World_War_II, a general who was also the first president of the Fifth Republic.'
p1115
aS"An attack on this man's life failed due to the bullet hitting a photograph of his daughter Anne, who suffered from Down's syndrome."
p1116
aS"As a former cabinet member, he would launch his appeal of the 18th of June so as to reinvigorate his country's morale."
p1117
aS"Following the results of the October referendum, he temporarily stepped down, and as his RPF movement didn't gain momentum, his wilderness years would last a total of twelve years, devoted on writing his war memoirs and waiting to be recalled."
p1118
aS'Called back to service by his country at the verge of civil war and military uprising in 1958, he would change its stumbling political system and act as a stabilizer by changing its constitution.'
p1119
aS'Heavily attacked by street protests in 1968, he again overcame the threat of street riots and civil war and again emerged victorious, only to resign one year later over a relatively minor issue of devolution and reform of the French senate.'
p1120
aS'FTP, who is this French president and general, founder of the fifth republic'
p1121
aS'In a Delaroche painting, this man calmly holds a book as soldiers blow pipe smoke into his face and insult him.'
p1122
aS'The supposed writer of the spiritual autobiography Eikon Basilike, this ruler\'s advisers supported strict policies that were known as "Thorough."'
p1123
aS"Such advisers included a man assassinated during this man's reign by John Felton."
p1124
aS'That adviser was the Duke of Buckingham.'
p1125
aS'He appointed the unpopular Archbishop of Canterbury, (*) William Laud.'
p1126
aS'This ruler was depicted "at the hunt" by his court painter, Anthony van Dyck.'
p1127
aS"In the 1640's, his cavalry was led by Prince Rupert of the Rhine, a noted Cavalier."
p1128
aS'This ruler was put on trial by the Rump Parliament.'
p1129
aS"For 10 points, name this king who was executed after losing the English Civil War to Oliver_Cromwell's forces."
p1130
aS'This monarch revived the 14th century custom of obtaining revenue from Forest Laws.'
p1131
aS'His appointee for archbishop of Canterbury used the Court of the Star Chamber to chop off the ears of the author of Histriomastix; that author was the lawyer William Prynne.'
p1132
aS'The state of Maryland was named after the wife of this monarch, who courted Maria Anna of Spain while still the Prince of Wales.'
p1133
aS'He set a precedent by charging ship money from non-coastal cities.'
p1134
aS'He appointed William Laud to one post and convened a body to fund the Bishops\'_Wars, thus ending a period of personal rule called "Eleven Years Tyranny."'
p1135
aS"This man's advisors included the Duke of Buckingham, George Villiers."
p1136
aS'His supporters were forcibly ejected by Thomas Pride from the Long Parliament, a body he summoned.'
p1137
aS'For 10 points, identify this monarch whose tyranny led to his execution during the English Civil War.'
p1138
aS"The ecclesiastical policies of this king caused a riot that began when Jenny Geddes threw a stool at a minister's face."
p1139
aS'He faced a scandal after he ordered the execution of Sir John Eliot and eight others for holding down Sir John Finch in his chair.'
p1140
aS'Thomas Darnell was among the "five knights" who brought a common-law challenge to this king\'s "forced loans," which he used to raise funds alongside an unconventional "ship money" tax on people living within fifteen miles of the sea.'
p1141
aS'This king, who set off a rebellion in Ireland when he signed the death warrant of Thomas Wentworth, entered into "The Engagement" with the Scots, which prompted John Cook to accuse him of treason.'
p1142
aS"After the murder of the Duke of Buckingham three years into his reign, this king's policies prompted the promulgation of the Petition of Right."
p1143
aS'For 10 points, what king, who appointed William Laud as Archbishop of Canterbury during a "personal rule" that prompted the English Civil War, was executed in 1649'
p1144
aS'His religious policies caused the Covenanter Rebellion led by James Montrose, and he was forced to capitulate with the Treaty of Berwick.'
p1145
aS'Sir Thomas Stafford was his harshest critic, and though Stafford was acquitted of treason, he was executed anyway.'
p1146
aS"Bishop of Exeter John Gauden ghost-wrote a controversial autobiographical apology for this man's reign, entitled Eikon Basilike."
p1147
aS'Ever a fan of the theatrical, he whispered his famous last words - "Remember" - to the notoriously lazy Bishop of London, William Juxton.'
p1148
aS'FTP, name this English monarch, who lost his head in 1649.'
p1149
aS'[AR] A humiliating treaty whereby this king had to pay for war damages the Scots incurred against him was known as the Treaty of Ripon.'
p1150
aS'Unpopular religious moves such as the attempt to force a new prayer book on Scotland, the appointment of William Laud as Archbishop of Canterbury and the marriage to Roman Catholic Henrietta Maria all led to the issuing of the Grand Remonstrance by the Long Parliament against this king.'
p1151
aS'Succeeding James VI, for 10 points, name this king during the English Civil War who was eventually executed for high treason after the monarchy was abolished and replaced by a Commonwealth led by Lord Protector Oliver_Cromwell.'
p1152
aS'With his mistress Ruodhaid, this man sired the bastard son Bernhard, and this man was the grandfather of Saint Adalard of Corbie.'
p1153
aS'This man, who was often supported by Bishop Milo, fought a civil war against Ragenfried and defeated an invasion by Radbod, King of the Frisians.'
p1154
aS'The introduction of Percheron horses into the army was one deed of this man, who held the office once held by his grandfather, who was called the Elder of Landen.'
p1155
aS'After the defeat of Duke Eudes of Aquitaine, this man intervened to prevent the looting of the abbey of St. Martin by winning a battle outside of Poitiers.'
p1156
aS'For ten points, name this man who defeated Abdulrahman, a Majordomo who won the Battle of Tours and has a nickname meaning the hammer.'
p1157
aS"This ruler's chief minister, Georg Heinrich von Gortz, became hated for debasing his nation's  currency through the issuing of copper tokens."
p1158
aS'This ruler manipulated the Ottoman Sultan Ahmed III  into an unpopular war with Russia, therefore making himself the target of an uprising called the  "kalabalik." He was killed while besieging the fortress of Fredriksten, after which his army was  decimated by a brutal winter while making this ruler\'s namesake "Death March." After two early  victories, he forced (*) Frederick IV and Augustus the Strong to sign the Treaties of Travendal and  Altranstadt, respectively, but he is perhaps best known for a crushing defeat he suffered after allying  himself with the Cossack Hetman Ivan Mazepa.'
p1159
aS'For 10 points, name this loser of the Battle of Poltava,  who ruled as King of Sweden for much of the Great_Northern_War.'
p1160
aS"This man's death prevented him from promulgating an octal numbering system he invented to his kingdom."
p1161
aS"This ruler received early military instruction under General Rehnskjold, putting it to great use in his army's successful crossing of the Western Dvina River."
p1162
aS'This man was killed by a sniper while inspecting the siege works at Fredrikshald.'
p1163
aS"Although this man's troops were victorious at the Battle of (*) Holowczyn, the scorched earth tactics of the enemy made the victory pyrrhic."
p1164
aS'In one campaign, this man installed Stanisaw Leszczyski as King of Poland after deposing Augustus the Strong.'
p1165
aS"Although this man's armies found early success at the Battle of Narva, they lost the devastating Battle of Poltava."
p1166
aS'For 10 points, name this Swedish king who lost the Great_Northern_War.'
p1167
aS'This ruler won the Battle of Klissow against a king who later led the Sandomierz Confederation in opposing this man.'
p1168
aS'He was forced to give up resisting and be arrested after a fire broke out in a house where he was staying, after which he escaped incognito from Turkey and returned to his home country.'
p1169
aS'This ruler had a prisoner broken on a wheel and then quartered after Johann Patkul was given up through the Peace of Altranstadt.'
p1170
aS'Stanislaw I was placed on the Polish throne by this ruler after he deposed Augustus the Strong.'
p1171
aS'He was shot in the head during a siege of Fredrikshald.'
p1172
aS'The Cossack hetman Ivan Mazeppa allied with this leader in a loss at Poltava.'
p1173
aS'For 10 points, name this king who fought the Great_Northern_War against Peter_the_Great while leading Sweden.'
p1174
aS'South of the city of Kielce, this man led his twelve thousand troops and defeated the twenty-four thousand troops led by Augustus II the Strong at the Battle of Kliszow.'
p1175
aS"However in Ukraine, this ruler's general Adam Ludwig Lewenhaupt surrendered twelve thousand troops to Alexander Menshikov at Perevolochna."
p1176
aS'In Estonia, eight thousand five hundred troops led by Carl Gustav Rehnskiold who assisted this ruler defeated thirty-seven troops led by Charles Eugene de Croy at one battle.'
p1177
aS'This ruler escaped to the Turkish fortresses located at Bender, Moldava, when again in Ukraine, forces outnumbered two to one led by Rehnskiold and Ivan Mazepa would be defeated.'
p1178
aS"Victorious at the Battle of Narva but defeated at the Battle of Poltava, for 10 points, name this king of Sweden defeated by Russia's Peter I during the Great_Northern_War."
p1179
aS'This man signed the Treaty of Pressburg alongside Austrian representatives.'
p1180
aS'Pope Pius VI excommunicated this man for his support of the Civil Constitution of the Clergy.'
p1181
aS'He persuaded Barras to resign whilst executing the coup of 18 Brumaire.'
p1182
aS'Later, he was made the ambassador to Great Britain following the July_Revolution.'
p1183
aS'He negotiated most of the 1802 Treaty of (*) Amiens with Great Britain and he demanded that a delegation consisting of Elbridge Gerry, Charles Cotesworth Pinckney and John Marshall pay him a bribe to speak to three agents during the XYZ affair.'
p1184
aS'For 10 points, name this diplomat who represented France at the Congress_of_Vienna.'
p1185
aS'One of these people was the last Confederate general to surrender when the Civil War ended.'
p1186
aS'That man, Stand Watie, succeeded as leader of these people a man who refused to sign the Treaty of New Echota and was named John Ross.'
p1187
aS'These people were the subject of the Supreme Court case Worcester v. Georgia.'
p1188
aS'Sequoyah created the writing system for this most populous of the Five Civilized Tribes.'
p1189
aS'For 10 points, name this American Indian group that was forcibly removed to Oklahoma along the Trail of Tears.'
p1190
aS'The first American-Indian-language newspaper was printed on their settlement of New Echota in 1828, in a written language devised by Sequoyah.'
p1191
aS'They lost that land after Andrew_Jackson famously refused to uphold a Supreme Court decision that declared Georgia had annexed the land unconstitutionally.'
p1192
aS'FTP, name this largest of the Five Civilized Tribes, which was decimated by the forced march known as the Trail of Tears.'
p1193
aS'A member of this tribe led forces in the Wagoner massacre of black haycutters.'
p1194
aS'A chief of a splinter faction of this tribe was known as "Nimrod Smith."'
p1195
aS'Another member was blamed for the death of Deputy Marshal Daniel Maples, triggering "Ned Christie\'s War."'
p1196
aS'A white man who joined this tribe and became chief was named William Holland Thomas.'
p1197
aS'It published a newspaper called the Phoenix.'
p1198
aS'The final Confederate general to surrender in the field was part of this tribe; that man, Stand Watie, was the younger brother of the assassinated Elias Boudinot.'
p1199
aS'It was divided into a faction led by Major Ridge and one led by John Ross.'
p1200
aS'Samuel Worcester was a missionary to this tribe, whose actions prompted a Supreme Court case.'
p1201
aS'For 10 points, name this American Indian tribe which signed the Treaty of New Echota before being removed westward on the Trail of Tears.'
p1202
aS'General Robert Viaux led his artillery regiment in protest against a Christian Democratic president of this country who was likely murdered with mustard gas pellets by the DINA while recovering from acid reflux surgery.'
p1203
aS'The competing Rettig and Valec reports documented human rights abuses by this country\'s government, which targeted socialists through "la ley maldita" and faced the Pig Trotters\' plot during the 1940s under President Gabriel Gonzalez Videla.'
p1204
aS"Eduardo (*) Frei was forced to raise military wages after protests by its Tacna Regiment, not to be confused with Roberto Souper's later Tanquetazo, in which tanks surrounded the Presidential palace."
p1205
aS'That aborted coup followed three years of nationalization under the most notable socialist to lead this country, who was overthrown in 1973.'
p1206
aS'For 10 points, name this country led by Salvador_Allende and Milton Friedman BFF Augusto Pinochet from Santiago.'
p1207
aS"In this country, the execution of Auguste Chapdelaine caused France to enter a war that began with this country's seizure of the merchant ship Arrow."
p1208
aS'A man claiming to be the younger brother of Jesus established the Heavenly Kingdom in this country, which is where the Eight Nation Alliance put down a revolt led by the Society of the Righteous and Harmonious Fists.'
p1209
aS'This country was the site of the Opium_Wars and the Taiping and Boxer Rebellions.'
p1210
aS'For 10 points, name this country ruled during the 19th century by the Qing Dynasty.'
p1211
aS'This emperor exempted the people of Ilium from military service, on the grounds that they were the ancestors of the Romans.'
p1212
aS'He refused to build temples to himself in Egypt, as described in his "Letter to the Alexandrians."'
p1213
aS'As a scholar, he wrote a twenty-volume history of the Etruscans and an eight-volume text on the Carthaginians.'
p1214
aS'This emperor captured Camulodunum and incorporated (*) Britain as a province, which led one of his sons to be named Britannicus.'
p1215
aS'Suetonius claims that this emperor was controlled by his third wife Messalina and that he was murdered at the behest of his fourth wife Agrippina the Younger.'
p1216
aS'For 10 points, name this Roman emperor who succeeded Caligula, and who inspired two Robert Graves novels.'
p1217
aS'This mans brother was a general who won victories at the Battle of the Angivarian Wall and the Battle of the Weser River.'
p1218
aS'Early in this rulers reign, he had to put down the rebellion of Scribonianus in Dalmatia.'
p1219
aS'That same year, he formally annexed Phamphylia and Lycia as Roman provinces.'
p1220
aS'Forces he sent to another future province did battle with Caratacus under the command of the general Aulus Plautius, and he himself was present at the surrender of Camulodonum, the last British stronghold.'
p1221
aS'His dysfunctional personal life included one wife who had an affair with Silius, whom he executed, and a wife named Aggripina, who may have killed him with poisoned mushrooms.'
p1222
aS'For ten points, name this Roman Emperor, a noted scholar who ruled between Caligula and Nero.'
p1223
aS'He staged a sea battle on the Fucine Lake with the silver Triton rising from the center to start the fight, added a Procurator of the Tiber Bank to the senatorial commission charged with preventing flooding, and completed the Anio Novus by bringing it over the Praenestine Gate.'
p1224
aS'He gave clemency to Caractacus, who lived out the rest of his life in Rome after being part of the victory that gave his son his name.'
p1225
aS"That son was with (*) Messalina, but was murdered after this man's successor and son-in-law by marriage, Nero, took the throne."
p1226
aS'For 10 points, name this emperor who oversaw the conquest of Britain and was likely poisoned by his niece and wife, Agrippina.'
p1227
aS'A speech of this ruler is recorded on the Lyon tablet, and Hadrian extended this rulers effort to drain the Fucine Lake.'
p1228
aS'This ruler decreed that sick slaves left at the Temple of Aesculapius would be freed, and he upheld the rights of Egyptian Jews with his Letter to the Alexandrians.'
p1229
aS'This ruler temporarily restored the autonomy of Judea, but reclaimed it as a province after the death of Herod Agrippa I.'
p1230
aS'He used elephants to conquer Camulodunum, and this ruler pardoned the captured general Caratacus after sending Aulus Plautius to conquer Britain.'
p1231
aS'The freedman Narcissus wielded power under this man and helped to expose the plot of his wife Messalina.'
p1232
aS'He was poisoned by his fourth wife, Agrippina.'
p1233
aS'For 10 points, name successor to Caligula, the dice-playing fourth Roman emperor.'
p1234
aS'The largest labor movement in this country was organized by Carlos Mahecha and Maria Cano, but was crippled when a general fired into a demonstration in 1929.'
p1235
aS'Jorge Eliecer Gaitan orated against the "masacre de las bananeras" and presented its Congress with the skull of a child killed by the Army.'
p1236
aS'Gaitan\'s assassination in 1948 is regarded as the start of "La Violencia", a still-existing war in this country between liberals and conservatives.'
p1237
aS'Though once ravaged by a conflict over banana workers\' unions, this country is now home to a group, often described as "narcoterrorists," which kidnaps politicians.'
p1238
aS'For 10 points, name this country, the home base of FARC.'
p1239
aS'This river passes near the city of Kettle Falls, although the rapids that give the city its name no longer exist.'
p1240
aS'Tributaries of this river include the Okanogan River, and this river passes through the artificial Franklin D. Roosevelt Lake.'
p1241
aS'In 1979, the Chief Joseph Dam opened on this river.'
p1242
aS'The 1915 opening of the Celilo Canal provided access to (+) Lewiston from this river, although the Celilo Falls were eventually flooded by the construction of The Dalles Dam on this river.'
p1243
aS'An important source of power in the region comes from the Grand (*) Coulee Dam on this river.'
p1244
aS'It is the largest North American river to flow into the Pacific Ocean.'
p1245
aS'For 10 points, name this river that provides much of the border between Oregon and Washington State.'
p1246
aS'The New Progressive Party and Popular Democratic Party are the leading political groups here, and the chairman of the latter announced in March 2008 that its nominating delegates will be selected by a (*) primary rather than a caucus.'
p1247
aS'Roberto Prats also pointed out that its primary will take place on June 1, before Montana and South Dakota, and will not be the last contest.'
p1248
aS'For 10 points name this commonwealth.'
p1249
aS"General Blanton Winship was blamed for a 1937 massacre in which police killed seventeen unarmed protesters here, and Lolita Lebron led a group of people from this place who fired automatic pistols from the Ladies' Gallery of the House of Representatives injuring Alvin Bentley and four other congressmen."
p1250
aS'Thirteen years after the Ponce massacre, Law 53 banned the displaying of flags, inciting a coordinated October 30, 1950 urpising at Jayuya and Utuado.'
p1251
aS'Revolutionaries from this place uttered the "Grito de Lares" and used the Blair House to stage an unsuccessful assassination attempt on Harry Truman.'
p1252
aS'The Jones-Shafroth amended the "Organic Act of Puerto_Rico" established by the 1900 Foraker Act, which created a government for this island.'
p1253
aS'For 10 points name this current territory of the United_States won from Spain in the Spanish American War.'
p1254
aS'The lead-up to this legislation saw the formation of a Committee of Thirteen and the Nashville Convention.'
p1255
aS'It organized the territories of Utah and New_Mexico under popular sovereignty and established the borders of Texas, which was also given money to pay off its debts.'
p1256
aS'This piece of legislation ended the slave trading market in Washington, D.C., but did not outlaw slavery there.'
p1257
aS'Other provisions of this legislation admitted California as a free state and provided for a harsh Fugitive Slave Act.'
p1258
aS'For 10 points, name this compromise passed during the middle of the nineteenth century.'
p1259
aS'This legislation was supported by Howell Cobb and Robert Tombs, two members of the Georgia Platform.'
p1260
aS'The "Higher Law" speech was delivered by William Henry Seward during the debate over this legislation.'
p1261
aS'Daniel_Webster was criticized by abolitionists for supporting this legislation.'
p1262
aS'It declared popular [*] sovereignty in New_Mexico and Utah, admitted California as a free state, banned the slave trade in Washington, DC, and passed a stricter Fugitive Slave Act.'
p1263
aS'For 10 points, name this compromise, mediated by Douglas and Clay, which managed to preserve the Union and postpone the Civil War for ten more years.'
p1264
aS"The navy of this man's rival was decimated when this man's son defeated Abantus at the Battle of   Hellespont, and this emperor finally beat his rival at the Battle of Chrysopolis [kry-SAH-puh-liss]."
p1265
aS"This emperor put down Maximian's revolt after that man proclaimed this ruler was dead."
p1266
aS'He   supposedly saw a cross in the sky before defeating a force twice that of his at the Battle of Milvian  Bridge.'
p1267
aS'This enemy of Licinius joined with him to support religious tolerance by issuing the Edict  of Milan.'
p1268
aS'Name this first Christian Roman emperor, in whose honor the city of Byzantium was  temporarily renamed.'
p1269
aS'The third led a revolt based in Britain and was briefly recognized by Honorius before being suppressed.'
p1270
aS'The second died in a civil war with his similarly-named brothers.'
p1271
aS'The fifth was nicknamed Copronymus and continued the iconoclastic policies of his father Leo II.'
p1272
aS'The last was the eleventh and was also the last emperor of Byzantium.'
p1273
aS'All these men shared their name with, for 10 points, what emperor who fought Licinius and Maxentius on his way to becoming the first Christian Roman emperor.'
p1274
aS'Possibly as a response to rumors of their illicit relationship, this man put his son Crispus and wife Fausta to death.'
p1275
aS'This man brought back the solidus coins, introduced by his predecessor, and regained control over the empire after a meeting at Chrysopolis led to the surrender of his co-emperor.'
p1276
aS'The buckling of a wooden or possibly pontoon bridge proved decisive in his greatest victory.'
p1277
aS'That engagement was the battle of the Milvian Bridge, during which his rival Maxentius drowned in the Tiber.'
p1278
aS'Along with co-emperor Licinius, the man issued the Edict of Milan, introducing religious tolerance in Rome.'
p1279
aS'For 10 points, name this Roman emperor who rebuilt Byzantium and converted to Christianity.'
p1280
aS'One ruler with this name had his army ambushed and defeated by the Bulgarian Vinekh at Rishki Pass.'
p1281
aS'In addition to that ruler with the sobriquet "the Dung-Named," another ruler with this name saw his enemy cut off his trade routes by building the Rumelihisari and smash the walls of his capital with guns constructed by the Hungarian Orban.'
p1282
aS'Another ruler with this name defeated Maxentius at Milvian Bridge, after seeing a cross in the sky and the words, "In this sign conquer." Possessed by rulers with epithets "Dragases" and "the Great", FTP, give this name shared by the last Byzantine emperor and a Roman emperor who converted to Christianity.'
p1283
aS'This body was addressed by Johann von Falkenburg, whose treatise argued for the legal right to kill the King of Poland and all other Poles.'
p1284
aS"This meeting also saw Jean Petit defend the Duke of Burgundy for murdering Louis d'Orlans."
p1285
aS'Often regarded as the Sixteenth Ecumenical Council, other issues this council oversaw were the canonization of St. Bridget of Sweden, and the termination of the Utraquist Wars by condemning Jerome of Prague and Jan Hus.'
p1286
aS'Called to resolve the triple-claim to the papacy, FTP, identify this 1414-18 council that ended the Great Schism by electing Martin V as pope.'
p1287
aS'This event saw the condemnation of a form of communion practiced by Jakoubek of Stribro.'
p1288
aS"John XXIII offered to resign from the papacy during the second session of this event and the primary election at this event occurred despite not having Peter de Luna's cardinals present."
p1289
aS'This event saw the order to exhume the bones of John Wycliffe and occurred due to the wishes of Emperor Sigismund.'
p1290
aS'One of the major consequences of this event was the wars fought by figures such as Jan Ziska, a result of the execution of Jan Hus that occurred after this event.'
p1291
aS'For ten points name this 1414-1418 Church Council that installed Oddo Colona as Pope Martin V thereby ending the Western Schism. '
p1292
aS'It resulted in the resignation of Angelo Corraro, and the deposition of Pedro Martinez de Luna.'
p1293
aS'At this assembly, voting was not by individual but by the four (later five) large regions falling under its jurisdiction.'
p1294
aS"It condemned tyrannicide such as that of the assassination of the Duc d'Orlans, and denounced the practice of Utraquism."
p1295
aS'The first eight months of this council are not considered valid by the Catholic Churchthe period until John XXIII was deposed for being a lecher, simoniac, pagan, and pirate, and the council reconvened under the authority of Gregory XII.'
p1296
aS'This implies that its revolutionary Haec Sancta, declaring the Pope subservient to the council, has never been official Catholic doctrine.'
p1297
aS'It condemned the teachings of John Wycliff and his body was ordered to be exhumed For 10 points, name this early fifteenth century council which ended the Great Schism and burned Jan Hus.'
p1298
aS'This event saw a moving oration by Paulus Vladimiri asserting the right to self-determination, which led John of Falkenberg to retort, "the Poles must be exterminated!'
p1299
aS'" In keeping with one of its secondary resolutions, participants like John of Ragusa formed subgroups based on nationality, an approach rejected at the ensuing Council of (*) Florence.'
p1300
aS'It compiled the text "The Art of Dying" and resolved a disastrous situation involving the successors to Benedict XIII and Gregory XII, which was only further confused when the Council of Pisa elected Alexander V, who was then succeeded by John XXIII.'
p1301
aS'More famously denouncing John Wycliffe and incinerating Jan Hus, For 10 points, identify this 1414-1418 ecumenical council held in Switzerland that elected Martin V to end the Western Schism.'
p1302
aS'One polity on this island was established by Abo Hafs Omer Al-Baloty, who had fled from Moorish Spain after his unsuccessful Al-Rabed revolt against Al-Hakam I.'
p1303
aS'This island was home to a rebellion led by Ioannis Vlachos, commemorated in a local epic poem known as The Song of Daskalogiannis.'
p1304
aS'The Prussian-born Geissler Pasha helped Omer Pasha brutally put down a rebellion here led by Demetrios Mavrocordatos that started at the Fair of Omalos, known as this islands great revolt, which included a massacre at the Arkadi Monastery.'
p1305
aS'For a time this island was stabilized by the 1878 Pact of Halepa.'
p1306
aS'Originally falling to the Turks after the Siege of Candia, during World War Two it was the target of Operation Mercury, a costly airborne invasion by Nazi Germany.'
p1307
aS'For ten points, name this Greek island once home to bull-jumping and the Minoans.'
p1308
aS'This conflict was preceded by the London Straits Convention.'
p1309
aS"This conflict was instigated in part by concern over one side's upholding of the Treaty of Kuchuk Kainarji."
p1310
aS'One event during this war was the Massacre of Sinope.'
p1311
aS'This war saw the first Siege of Sevastopol.'
p1312
aS'During this war, the British Heavy Brigade made an attack at the Battle of (*) Balaclava.'
p1313
aS'For 10 points, name this 1850s war over a former Ottoman territory whose fighting inspired ""The Charge of the Light Brigade.'
p1314
aS'""'
p1315
aS'Near the end of this war, William Fenwick Williams surrendered the city of Kars after a five-month-long   siege by Nikolay Muravyov.'
p1316
aS'Earlier in this war, Colin Campbell repelled enemy cavalry with his Thin  Red Line of infantry.'
p1317
aS'Under a heavy fog during this war, Fyodor Soymonov doomed his forces by  leading them the wrong way at the Battle of Inkerman.'
p1318
aS"The Earl of Cardigan's mistakes caused  heavy British casualties during the disastrous Charge of the Light Brigade in this war's Battle of  Balaclava."
p1319
aS'Name this 1850s war in which Britain, France, and the Ottoman_Empire fought Russia on  the namesake Ukrainian peninsula.'
p1320
aS'At the end of this war, the losing power was forced to cede Bessarabia and the Danube river was opened to shipping from all nations.'
p1321
aS'One side had a squadron destroyed at Sinope, and in order to prevent Austria from entering the conflict, the opposing side evacuated the Danube region.'
p1322
aS'Notable engagements in this war occurred at the Alma River and at Balaklava, and a very notable engagement in this war was a year long siege of Sevastopol.'
p1323
aS'It was ended by a Treaty of Paris.'
p1324
aS'For ten points, identify this war between Russia and an alliance headed by Turkey that included France and Sardinia-Piedmont, named for the peninsula on which it was primarily fought.'
p1325
aS'In the opening battle of this war, artillery at Turtukai were used to push forces under PA Dannenburg from Oltenitza.'
p1326
aS'Another battle began after Michael Gorchakov sent his generals a note reading, "Let\'s start it." That battle at the Chernaya was part of a larger siege during this war that included assaults on Alma, Inkerman and a fort called the Great Redan.'
p1327
aS'Marechal Canrobert allied with Lord Raglan at another battle during this war which included an action called the "Thin Red Line." The battles of Balaclava and Sevastopol took place during, for 10 points, what war between Russia and a French-British-Ottoman alliance'
p1328
aS'This event was investigated by a committee led by Aaron F. Perry, and it was publicized thanks to letters leaked by Henry Simpson McComb.'
p1329
aS'A company involved in this event was founded by George Francis Train and Thomas Durant.'
p1330
aS'It occurred because Oakes Ames offered (*) shares in a certain construction company to other congressmen at discounted rates during the construction of the First Transcontinental Railroad under the purview of Union Pacific.'
p1331
aS'For 10 points, name this scandal which took place in 1872, during the presidency of Ulysses S. Grant.'
p1332
aS'The New York Sun broke the story about this event, and Dr. William Keeter stepped down shortly before this event took place.'
p1333
aS'James W. Patterson was implicated in this event, as was Henry Wilson.'
p1334
aS'In 1872, a congressional investigation revealed that several highly placed Republicans had accepted stock in the company for which this event was named.'
p1335
aS'One of those men was Massachusetts Congressman Oakes Ames; another was Ulysses Grants Vice-President, Schuyler Colfax, although he was absolved.'
p1336
aS'For ten points, identify this scandal, which centered on a fake company that helped build the Union Pacific Railroad.'
p1337
aS'One conflict on this island began with William Shafter landing forces at Siboney and Daiquiri.'
p1338
aS'Forces under Henry Lawton and Joseph Wheeler engaged defenders of this island at El Caney and Las Guasimas.'
p1339
aS'After this island was occupied, its fate was decided by the Platt and Teller amendments.'
p1340
aS'It was the site of another battle in which Leonard Wood charged up (*) San Juan Hill with the Rough Riders.'
p1341
aS'For 10 points, name this island which was plunged into conflict by the explosion of the U.S.S Maine in one of its harbors.'
p1342
aS"At the beginning of this country's fight for independence, Carlos Manuel de Cespedes freed his slaves, and they fought together in the Ten Years' War."
p1343
aS'Its Revolt of the Sergeants was reversed by the 26th of July Movement, which ended the rule of Fulgencio Batista.'
p1344
aS'Che Guevara helped move this Caribbean country to (*) Communism in 1959.'
p1345
aS'For 10 points, name this nation that has been led by Raul and Fidel Castro.'
p1346
aS"One conflict for independence within this nation was known as the Little War, which took place shortly after the Pact of Zanjon ended the Ten Years' War."
p1347
aS'One leader of this nation led the 26th of July Movement that overthrew Fulgencio Batista, and U.S. control over this nation was the subject of the Teller Amendment.'
p1348
aS'The best known leader of this nation was the target of the Bay of Pigs invasion, and this country was blockaded by the U.S. during a namesake "missile crisis." For 10 points, name this Caribbean nation long ruled by Fidel Castro.'
p1349
aS'Natives of this country included the Ciboney ("see-bone-ay"), who were driven to its western part by the Taino and decimated by European contact.'
p1350
aS'While a colony, its minister criticized McKinley in the De Lome letter, which, along with the actions of (*) Butcher Weyler, prompted a conflict centering on this country.'
p1351
aS'One leader of this country led the 26th of July Movement and overthrew Fulgencio Batista.'
p1352
aS'The Soviet Union attempted to build missile launch sites in this country after the failed Bay of Pigs invasion.'
p1353
aS'For 10 points, name this Caribbean country formerly led by Fidel Castro.'
p1354
aS'Antonio Maceo and Calixto Garca began La Guerra Chiquita in what is now this country, immediately after the Convention of Zanjn ended another independence movement.'
p1355
aS'That movement was sparked by the Grito de Yara, led by Carlos de Cspedes, and known as the Ten Years War.'
p1356
aS'An earlier attempt at separating this country from Spain was led by filibuster Narciso Lpez.'
p1357
aS'Shortly after the deprivations of Valeriano Weyler in the 1890s, this country found itself under another occupation led by John Brooke and Leonard Wood, who achieved what Mximo Gmez and Jos Mart could not.'
p1358
aS'For 10 points, name this island country later ruled by Fulgencio Batista and Fidel Castro.'
p1359
aS'In this nation, Calixto Garcia and others who refused to accept the Pact of Zanjon fought a continuation of another conflict known as the Little War.'
p1360
aS'Generals who accepted the aforementioned peace included Maximo Gomez and Antonio Maceo, who supported a man whose Grito de Yara began the Ten Years War, Carlos Manuel de Cespedes.'
p1361
aS'The final war for independence in this nation saw the atrocities of Butcher Weyler, and in 1895, the death of its early leader Jose Marti.'
p1362
aS'For 10 points, name this Caribbean nation which gained its independence from Spain after a war which the United_States began after the sinking of the USS Maine in its port of Havana.'
p1363
aS'One ruler of this country gained power through the revolt of sargents by overthrowing a leader who had organized a secret police called the Porra.'
p1364
aS'This country saw rebellions led by free black men such as Nicholas Morales and Jose Antonio Aponte in 1795 and 1812 respectively.'
p1365
aS'This country also saw Carlos Manuel de Cespedes issue the Grito de Yara which led to the Ten Years War.'
p1366
aS'The United_States Congress also declared it did not wish to occupy this country through the Teller Amendment.'
p1367
aS'For 10 points, identify this country in which Fulgencio Batista was overthrown in 1959 by Fidel Castro.'
p1368
aS'Bronze age artifacts from this place include a bronze "horned god" statue from the settlement of Enkomi.'
p1369
aS'The castles of Kantera, Buffavento, and St. Hilarion were built here to repel Arab Raiders.'
p1370
aS'An 1878 convention put the British in charge of this place, but it nominally remained under Ottoman control until the UK annexed it in 1914.'
p1371
aS'The rebel governor Isaac (*) Komnenos declared himself emperor of this place.'
p1372
aS'After being deposed as King of Jerusalem, Guy of Lusignan bought the kingship of this place from Richard the Lionhearted.'
p1373
aS'A 1974 coup installed Nikos Sampson as dictator here.'
p1374
aS'The revolutionary movement EOKA was founded here with the aim of bringing about "enosis," or unification, with Greece.'
p1375
aS'For 10 points, name this Mediterranean Island which is still split between Greek and Turkish claimants.'
p1376
aS"According to legend, this leader's head was put in a jar of blood by Tomyris, the queen of the Massagetae."
p1377
aS'He supplanted an empire led by Astyages, establishing a capital at Ecbatana.'
p1378
aS'He fought to a draw at Pteria with (*) Croesus of Lydia, but he dealt the Lydians a final defeat by taking Sardis in the Battle of Thymbra.'
p1379
aS'Xenophon wrote a biography of this ruler, who conquered Babylon, freeing the Jews from the Babylonian Captivity.'
p1380
aS'For 10 points, name this father of Cambyses who defeated the Median Empire as the founder of the Achaemenid Persian dynasty.'
p1381
aS'This ruler introduced the daric coin, and he rose to power with help from Gobrayes and Intaphernes.'
p1382
aS'His murder of Gaumata was recorded in the Behistum Inscription, and this victor against the Scythians claimed the throne after the death of Cambyses II.'
p1383
aS'He divided his empire into twenty strictly defined (*) satraps, and he suppressed the Ionian Revolt in 499 B.C.E.'
p1384
aS'He began construction projects at his capitals of Susa and Persepolis.'
p1385
aS"Miltiades defeated this man's general, Datis, during the first Persian Invasion in Greece."
p1386
aS'For ten points, name this father of Xerxes I, who led the Persian Empire at its peak.'
p1387
aS"One early victory for this man came against his grandfather at Echbatana, and this man's general Gubaru conquered Opis, giving him control of a vast canal system."
p1388
aS'He suffered a draw in the Battle of Pteria against Croesus, but managed to catch up to him near Sardis and soundly defeated him at Thymbra.'
p1389
aS'He promulgated the Edit of Restoration, which ended the Babylonian captivity of Jews.'
p1390
aS'He was succeeded by Cambyses II after his death near the Syr Darya during a campaign towards Egypt.'
p1391
aS'For 10 points, name this Achaemanid ruler and conqueror from Persia, whose namesake cylinder is one of the earliest charters of human rights.'
p1392
aS"An imposter named Gaumata took the identity of this ruler's son Bardiya to overthrow this ruler's rightful successor."
p1393
aS'That successor fought at the Battle of Pelusium and defeated Psametik III, pharaoh of the 26th Dynasty.'
p1394
aS'Xenophon wrote a fictionalized biography of this ruler, whose head was supposedly placed in a jar of blood by the vengeful Queen Tomyris of the Massagatae.'
p1395
aS'He founded his capital at Pasargade, although the city that he conquered from his grandfather Astyages, Ecbatana, also served that function.'
p1396
aS'After having defeated the Neo-Babylonians under Nabonidus, he made the Jews happy by ending the Babylonian Captivity.'
p1397
aS'He is also known for defeating the Croesus, King of Lydia, and establishing his empire by overthrowing the Medians.'
p1398
aS'Father of Cambyses II, for 10 points, identify this founder of the Achaemenid dynasty of the Persian empire.  '
p1399
aS'In the Middle Ages, it was widely believed that this man was buried at Susa.'
p1400
aS'He was taken to court as a boy during the fourth year of the reign of Joakim, where he was assigned the eunuch Asphenez as his tutor.'
p1401
aS'Later, he changed his name to Baltassar at the same time that his friends Misael, Ananias, and Azarias changed their names.'
p1402
aS'Later still, the prophet Habbakuk was carried by the hair from Judea to feed him lunch when he was in captivity.'
p1403
aS'Many of his prophecies concern Antiochus Epiphanes, who appears as the "little horn" in the prophecy of the four beasts.'
p1404
aS"One portion of his book features the Song of the Three Children, while others concern the rescue of Joachim's wife and the episode of Bel and the Dragon."
p1405
aS"FTP, identify this companion of Shadrach, Mesach, and Abednego who was thrown into the lions' den."
p1406
aS'This man controversially supported the Fugitive Slave Act in his Seventh of March speech.'
p1407
aS'He concluded a speech in a debate with Robert Hayne with the words, ""Liberty and Union, now and forever, one and inseparable!'
p1408
aS'"" This man argued that a state could not revoke a charter granted to his alma mater in the Supreme Court.'
p1409
aS'As Secretary of State under (*) William Henry Harrison and John_Tyler, he negotiated a treaty defining the border between Maine and Canada.'
p1410
aS'For 10 points, name this orator from New Hampshire who negotiated a treaty with Baron Ashburton.'
p1411
aS'In a debate about tariffs with Robert Hayne, he referenced ""liberty and union, now and forever, one and inseparable.'
p1412
aS'"" In the Marshall court, he won the case Dartmouth v. Woodward and lost McCullough v. Maryland.'
p1413
aS'Many abolitionists were angered by the ""Seventh of March"" speech this orator gave.'
p1414
aS'This man served as Secretary of State under Millard Fillmore and John_Tyler.'
p1415
aS'After the Caroline_affair, he signed a treaty delineating the Maine-New Brunswick border.'
p1416
aS'For 10 points, name this Massachusetts Senator who signed that treaty with Baron Ashburton.'
p1417
aS'Along with his successor as Secretary of State, he authored the Hulsemann Letter to justify Americans observing revolutionary activity in Hungary.'
p1418
aS"This man's son Fletcher announced William Henry Harrison's death to John_Tyler, and died at Second Bull Run as a Union colonel in the Civil War."
p1419
aS'This man claimed that the government was "made for the people, made by the people, and answerable to the people," in a debate over tariffs with Robert Hayne.'
p1420
aS'He defended an institution claiming that though it was small, "yet there are those who love it," referencing the precedent set in Fletcher v. Peck, in Dartmouth College v. Woodward, and he signed a treaty delineating the Canadian boundary with Lord Ashburton.'
p1421
aS'FTP, name this senator from Massachusetts.'
p1422
aS'This man became an emperor by assassinating Bardiya with the assistance of six other nobles, and the Behistun inscription details this man\'s suppression of eight "lying kings" shortly after he came to power.'
p1423
aS'He divided his empire into twenty satrapies, and introduced Zoroastrianism as the state religion of his empire.'
p1424
aS'This ruler sent his brother-in-law Mardonius to punish Athens and Eretria for supporting the Ionian revolt.'
p1425
aS'For 10 points, name this Persian emperor who lost at the Battle_of_Marathon and was succeeded by his son, Xerxes I.'
p1426
aS'Along with six other chieftains he hatched a plot to murder Gomates, the usurper to the throne.'
p1427
aS'Following this, he won the throne in a contest in which victory was determined by whose horse neighed first.'
p1428
aS'A towering rock known as the Behistun Inscription gives an account of the reign of this son of Hystaspes.'
p1429
aS'That reign included the building of the Royal Road from Smyrna to Susa and the quelling of a revolt of several Ionian cities in Asia Minor.'
p1430
aS'To that end he formed an army led by his son-in-law and nephew, Mardonius.'
p1431
aS"Though he was defeated at Marathon, FTP, what Persian emperor's fight would be carried on by his son Xerxes"
p1432
aS"He ascended to the throne by defeating a usurper who pretended to be this man's murdered uncle."
p1433
aS'In one of his notable administrative acts, he reorganized his empire into 20 sections.'
p1434
aS'Near the end of his life, he ordered a large limestone rock to be inscribed with his genealogy in three languages; that inscription was translated into English in 1849.'
p1435
aS'He also led an expedition against the tribes of the Danube River in 516 BC, put down a rebellion of Ionians in 499 BC, and attempted to subjugate Greece with his son-in-law Mardonius, but his forces were defeated at Mt.'
p1436
aS'Athos and Marathon.'
p1437
aS'FTP, name this Persian emperor who was succeeded by his son Xerxes I.'
p1438
aS'This ruler created the siglos and daric coins.'
p1439
aS'Economic administration in this rulers domain was headed by his uncle Pharnaces, as recounted in the Fortification Tablets.'
p1440
aS'This ruler faced a revolt from Vahyazdta, and he sent Scylax of Caryanda to explore the Indus.'
p1441
aS'This mans Behistun Inscription records how he killed the Magian usurper Gaumata, who was supposedly impersonating Smerdis.'
p1442
aS'This leader of an expedition against the Scythians divided his empire into twenty satrapies, and he built a noted network of roads.'
p1443
aS'This man successfully claimed the throne of Cambyses II.'
p1444
aS'He was the target of the Ionian Revolt, after which he launched an expedition under Datis that was defeated by Miltiades at Marathon.'
p1445
aS'For 10 points, name this Persian ruler who was succeeded by his son Xerxes I.'
p1446
aS'A fleet led by Lourenco de Almeida was among the first Europeans to colonize this modern day nation.'
p1447
aS'One empire in this modern day nation, whose largest ethnic group is known as the Sinhalese, had its capital at Nallur.'
p1448
aS"The Palk Strait is at the northern end of this nation, as is a series of small islands known as (*) Adam's Bridge."
p1449
aS"The northern tip of this island was also home to this nation's Jaffna kingdom, which ruled at the same time as other empires on this modern country like the Kotte Kingdom and the Kandy Kingdom."
p1450
aS'For 10 points, name this Asian nation once known as Ceylon.'
p1451
aS'This place was criscrossed with three new canal systems and divided into provinces called  "dissavanis" during its rule by the Dutch East India Company.'
p1452
aS'During the breakup of one kingdom in this place, the new states of Rayigama and Sitawake were formed by the sons of Vijayabahu, former rule of the independent (*) Kotte kingdom.'
p1453
aS'The Sama Samaja was a Marxist party here, which formed a coalition along with the party led by the first female prime minister in world history.'
p1454
aS'For 10  points, SRD Bandaranaike was n power in what country, once known as Ceylon'
p1455
aS'An ancient king of this country made good on his promise that no water would reach the ocean "without being made useful to man" by walling in a reservoir called the Giant\'s Tank.'
p1456
aS'This modern-day country was home to kingdoms based in Polonnaruwa and Kotte, as well as an ancient rock fortress called Sigiriya.'
p1457
aS'Riots in this country against a minority group led July 1983 to be termed "Black (*) July" and that minority group fought a series of Eelam Wars against the this country\'s government.'
p1458
aS"This country's president Ranasinghe Premadasa was killed in a bombing by the separatist group that was also responsible for killing Rajiv Gandhi."
p1459
aS'For 10 points, name this cinnamon-rich island whose government fought from 1983 to 2009 to defeat the Tamil Tigers.'
p1460
aS'Later in life this leader went on a "Southern Tour," leading to the formation of many Special Economic Zones.'
p1461
aS'This leader advocated the "Four Modernizations," removed his liberal general secretaries Hu Yaobang and Zhao ("jow") Ziyang, and had been placed under house arrest after the death of Zhou ("jo") Enlai.'
p1462
aS'Opposition to him was a key factor in the beginning of the Cultural Revolution, in which he was purged twice.'
p1463
aS'For 10 points, name this Chinese leader who began the "reform and opening" policy and suppressed the 1989 Tiananmen Square protests.'
p1464
aS'This man forced the resignation of Hu Yaobang as general secretary, and he shut down the Democracy Wall and arrested its leading figure Wei Jingsheng.'
p1465
aS'He was replaced as party leader by Jiang Zemin, and this man authorized the use of force against protesters in Tienanmen Square in 1989.'
p1466
aS'For 10 points, name this leader of China who spearheaded the liberalization of the Chinese economy in the 1980s.'
p1467
aS'This man\'s forced publishing of an itemized list of "self-criticisms" influenced his support for works of "Scar Literature", and he established the use of Special Administrative Regions to reconcile the Basic Law governing key regions with his own central leadership, advocating the "one country, two systems" doctrine.'
p1468
aS'He famously derided the need to use a cat of any particular color to catch mice and advocated enlarging rather than removing the bird cage in zoological metaphors defending his economic flexibility, rejecting the extreme rigidity of his major rival, Hua Guofeng.'
p1469
aS'This man presided over the Four Modernizations implemented by Zhou Enlai but was forced to arrest his protg, Zhao Ziyang, after Tiananmen Square.'
p1470
aS'For 10 points, identify this man who after the death of Lin Biao outmaneuvered the Gang of Four, credited with shifting toward a mixed economy during the 1970s and 80s as the leader of Communist China.'
p1471
aS'A leading organizer in the Kiangsi Soviet, he led the Second Field Army during his countrys civil war and his superiority in the political arena engineered the appointments of Zhao Ziyang and Hu Yaobang.'
p1472
aS'Allying himself with Liu Shaoqi made him a target of the Cultural Revolution, and near the end of his career Jiang Zemin replaced him as head of the Military Commission.'
p1473
aS'Power struggles came to a halt after he became Chief of Staff of the Peoples Liberation Army, which he used to assert dominance and later put down student demonstrations in Tiananmen Square.'
p1474
aS'FTP, identify this Chinese leader.'
p1475
aS'This country lost the Battle of Dybbol, which led it to give up Schleswig and Holstein (SHLAYS-vig and HOLE-stine) to the German Confederation after a brief 1864 war.'
p1476
aS'During the fifteenth century, this country was joined with Norway and Sweden as the Kalmar_Union.'
p1477
aS'Its king Christian IV joined the Catholic side during the Thirty Years War.'
p1478
aS'Its king Christian X apocryphally wore a Star of David on his sleeve during World_War_II.'
p1479
aS'For 10 points, name this Scandinavian country with a capital city at Copenhagen.'
p1480
aS'On the day Nazi troops moved into this country, an afternoon newspaper printed all of its articles double-spaced in order to alert citizens to "read between the lines.'
p1481
aS'" Teenagers in this country formed their own partisan movement called the Churchill Gang, while other efforts were coordinated by the Freedom Council.'
p1482
aS'The vast majority of Jews in this country were saved from an impending Nazi action by ambulance drivers who looked for Jewish names in phone books and used their vehicles to hide whomever they found.'
p1483
aS"The Lutheran Church recognizes Kaj Munk, a pastor in this country who was killed after delivering an anti-Nazi sermon, as a martyr, and its other World_War_II figures included the collaborationist prime minister Erik Scavenius.After a German officer threatened to shoot anyone removing the swastika flag from this country's government headquarters, the king of this country volunteered to climb the flagpole himself."
p1484
aS'For 10 points, name this country where a false urban legend states that king, Christian X, wore a yellow star himself. '
p1485
aS'Two other countries signed the Convention of Badgasten to formalize a seizure of territory from this country in 1865, and "Anne" of this place was the wife of (*) James I of England.'
p1486
aS'In 1943, the king of this country was imprisoned after delivering a speech against its Nazi occupiers; Christian X had earlier spoken out against persecution of Jews.'
p1487
aS'For 10 points name this Scandinavian state.'
p1488
aS'One ruler of this nation dismissed the cabinet of his Prime Minister Zahle in an incident known as the Easter Crisis, but he was met with a lack of public support and pledged no longer to interfere in political decisions.'
p1489
aS"A peasant uprising in this country known as the Count's War was initiated by a group under Skipper Clement."
p1490
aS'This country, which originally established a colony at Tranquebar, was the site of a underground movement during World_War_II known as its namesake "Freedom Council," consisting of groups like its Unity Party.'
p1491
aS'Also the birthplace of the wife of King James I of England, this country sold its rights to St. Croix, St. John, and St. Thomas to the United_States in 1917.'
p1492
aS'Governed by the Folketing, for 10 points, name this nation which hosted the Battle of Copenhagen in 1801.'
p1493
aS"One resident of this city condemned wayward wives for making their husbands impotent by baking bread from wheat and honey smeared on the wives' naked bodies; that passage is contained in the Corrector sive Medicus, the 19th volume in a collection of 20 books on church government written by Burchard, an 11th century bishop of this city."
p1494
aS'An agreement reached in this city provided for the reception of the regalia "through the sceptre"; that agreement reached between Callixtus II and emperor Henry V was the 1122 concordat of this city that brought a halt to the investiture controversy.'
p1495
aS'In the Nibelungenlied, this city is the location of the Burgundian court.'
p1496
aS'Along with Speyer and Mainz, it is home one of the three imperial cathedrals of the Rhineland.'
p1497
aS'In a later meeting at this city, Johann Eck, assistant to the Archbishop of Trier, asked a question which drew the response "my conscience is captive to the word of God.'
p1498
aS'I cannot and will not recant anything." For 10 points, what German city was visited by Charles V and Martin Luther during a 1521 Diet'
p1499
aS'The interrogator present at this event was Dr. Ecken, who was in the employ of the Archibishop of Trier.'
p1500
aS'Frederick III was responsible for this event in part, and his intervention was necessary primarily due to the execution of Jan Hus.'
p1501
aS'The edict issued from this meeting failed to cause its subject to be executed but did prevent many of his books from being read or published.'
p1502
aS'One person present at this meeting famously said Here I am; I can do no other before leaving for the Wartburg; that man was present at the proceedings primarily to answer charges of heresy.'
p1503
aS'For ten points, identify this 1521 meeting at which Martin Luther was present, named for the town in Germany where it was held.'
p1504
aS"Following this man's defeat of Narseh and capture of Ctesiphon, he achieved favorable peace terms with the Sassanid Persians."
p1505
aS'Under this ruler, the "traditors" emerged; those were Christian leaders who handed over sacred texts during his persecutions, the last meaningful anti-Christian period in Rome.'
p1506
aS'The late life of this emperor was spent at the place of Split in Croatia.'
p1507
aS'After monetary policy under this man led to rampant inflation, he issued the Edict on Maximum Prices to freeze food prices.'
p1508
aS'Other reforms undertaken during his reign include the establishment of capitals at Milan, Sermium, Nicomedia, and Trier, in order to share power with Maximian, Galerius, and Constantius.'
p1509
aS'For 10 points, identify this Roman emperor ruling between 244 and 311 AD, who established the Tetrarchy.'
p1510
aS'This man took the title Iovius to denote his role as a planner and commander.'
p1511
aS'This man fought a war against Narseh, and forced his co-commander to march in front of the Imperial caravan as humiliation after a defeat in that conflict.'
p1512
aS'He came to power after a victory at the Battle of the Margus against Carinus, and he was a general under Numerian during a campaign in Persia.'
p1513
aS'This man wanted to replace the denarius with the argentus in order to combat inflation in his Edict on Maximum prices, and after rising to power, this man appointed Maximian, Galerius, and Constantius as co-emperors in the Tetrarchy.'
p1514
aS'For 10 points, name this 3rd century Roman emperor who began a massive persecution of Christians.'
p1515
aS"This city's medieval archbishop Ariberto lead its brief rebellion against Holy Roman Emperor Conrad II from 1036 to 1038."
p1516
aS'The Swiss drove Louis XII from this city in the Battle of Novara, but Francis I recovered it for the French in the Battle of Marignano.'
p1517
aS'Maximian made this his capital after Diocletian established the tetrarchy.'
p1518
aS'In 1848, republican forces here expelled the Austrians under Josef Radetzky during a rebellion known as the "five days" of this city.'
p1519
aS'Its first duke, Gian Galeazzo, almost captured the entire Po valley, and was a member of the house that ruled it before the Renaissance, the Visconti.'
p1520
aS'Another ruler, known as "il Moro" brought Leonardo da Vinci to work there; that ruler, Ludovico, was a member of its Sforza family.'
p1521
aS'For 10 points, name this Italian city where Constantine proclaimed a 313 CE edict tolerating the practice of Christianity in the Roman Empire.'
p1522
aS'This incident led to the doctrine that the "republican form of government" clause of the Constitution is non-justiciable.'
p1523
aS"One side of this conflict supported the Freemen's Constitution."
p1524
aS'This conflict ended when its namesake was caught in a house in (*) Woonsocket.'
p1525
aS'John_Tyler sent observers to monitor this conflict.'
p1526
aS"This conflict's namesake was elected the Governor of his state alongside Samuel Ward King."
p1527
aS'For ten points identify this conflict fought over the electoral system in Rhode Island.'
p1528
aS'Slogans which became popular in this country included "we don\'t want to be slaves anymore"  and "down with the government, down with the police."'
p1529
aS"This country was home to the underground Christian organization Young Congregation, which helped instigate an event whose nine demands were issued by the Bitterfeld committee, the most influential of the workers' councils which emerged here."
p1530
aS'People in this country received boxes containing peas, flour, milk, and lard that were known as (*) Eisenhower Packages.'
p1531
aS'After this country announced the New Course program, replacing Constructing Socialism, and including a ten percent increase in production quotas, workers walked out onto Stalin Alley.'
p1532
aS'In this country, where the play The Plebeians Rehearse the Uprising takes place, Soviet tanks were deployed to end a 1953 popular uprising.'
p1533
aS"For 10 points, identify this country which erupted into mass demonstrations against Walter Ulbricht's regime."
p1534
aS"One participant in this country's June 1953 rebellion was fictionalized as Harry Melchior in the 2001 film The Tunnel."
p1535
aS'The movie Night Crossing depicted how two families fled this country via a hot air balloon, and Peter Fechter was left to die in a "death strip" after being shot while trying to escape it.'
p1536
aS'Egon Krenz was the last leader of this country, whose citizens were policed by the (*) Stasi.'
p1537
aS'Due to a massive brain drain, Walter Ulbricht began the construction of a structure in this country that would later be torn down in 1989 with pickaxes and sledgehammers.'
p1538
aS'For ten points, name this Soviet-dominated nation that built the Berlin Wall and joined with West Germany in 1990.'
p1539
aS'This first provision of this document stated that everything done between nine and thirteen years before it was agreed to should be obliterated and forgotten.'
p1540
aS'This also forbade religious discrimination by hospitals and universities as well as the baptism or confirmation of children without parental permission.'
p1541
aS'Everybody was still required to tithe, however, and several secret provisions allowed forts to be controlled by Protestants.'
p1542
aS'This document was revoked in 1685 by Louis XIV, and its creation was supposed to end the French Wars of Religion.'
p1543
aS'Name this document that granted certain rights to French Calvinists--also known as Huguenots--signed by Henry IV.'
p1544
aS'It established a court system, its namesake chamber, one of the most famous instances of which was located at Castres.'
p1545
aS'The renunciation of this agreement led to the Potsdam Proclamation of Frederick Wilhelm, which caused a mass emigration.'
p1546
aS'Among its provisions was the non-transfer of control of certain places de sret, the maintenance of which was to be paid for by the government.'
p1547
aS'Partially annulled by the Peace of Ales, it restored Catholicism in many places, but was vehemently opposed by Clement the Eighth and other popes until its repudiation at Fountainbleu.'
p1548
aS'FTP, identify this declaration by Henry IV that sought to protect Huguenots.'
p1549
aS'The 95 articles in its main text were based on recent unsuccessful peace treaties, while 56 of them, signed less than a month later, were particulars or secret articles.'
p1550
aS'It established a special chamber to settle disputes as well as 66 places de sret, such as Montauban and La Rochelle.'
p1551
aS'However, soldiers were billeted in homes under the system of dragonnades, and its political clauses were removed by the Peace of Als.'
p1552
aS'While it ended the Wars of Religion, it was revoked by Louis XIVs enactment of the Edict of Fontainebleau, which declared that Protestantism was illegal.'
p1553
aS'FTP, name this 1598 decree, where Henry_IV_of_France granted religious freedom to the Huguenots.'
p1554
aS'It claimed that "the realm was so torn by innumerable factions and sects that the most legitimate of all the parties was fewest in numbers.'
p1555
aS'" Certain terms within it were violated by the Convention of Alais.'
p1556
aS'Its terms were annulled by the Peace of Ales, and it was fiercely opposed by Pope Clement VIII.'
p1557
aS'Its last section forbade discrimination in education and medical care, while section XVIII of it concerns the (*) kidnapping of children.'
p1558
aS'Its first section granted an amnesty for actions undertaken since March 1585, and its terms included the establishment of strongholds for which the king would pay for garrisoning.'
p1559
aS'Revoked by Louis XIV through the Edict of Fontainebleau, FTP, identify this edict that granted liberties to Protestants, issued by Henry IV in 1598'
p1560
aS'This artist painted a work which shows a group called the Communards being killed and is called The Barricade.'
p1561
aS'Another work by this man shows a confrontation off the coast of Cherbourg involving a ship commanded by Raphael Semmes during the American Civil War.'
p1562
aS'In addition to (+) Battle of the Kearsage and Alabama and Execution of Emperor Maximilian of Mexico, this artist painted a work in which a black cat stands to the right of a naked woman who lays down on a bed while she is attended to by a (*) black maid.'
p1563
aS'For 10 points, name this French artist of Olympia and The Luncheon on the Grass.'
p1564
aS'A King of Wessex by this name won the Battle of Tettenhall against the Northumbrians, ending Danish all raids south of the river Humber.'
p1565
aS'That king was the son and successor of Alfred_the_Great and nicknamed "the Elder".'
p1566
aS'One prince by this name was a son of Edmund Ironside who spent most of his life in Hungary, earning the nickname "the Exile".'
p1567
aS'An English king by this name was unseated by Aethelred the Unready and thus nicknamed "Martyr".'
p1568
aS'Another English King by this name had a royal court dominated by Earl Godwin and was canonized after his death.'
p1569
aS'For ten points, name this common name for English kings, such as one nicknamed "the Confessor".'
p1570
aS'One legend tells that this king gave his ring to a poor beggar who was actually St. John the Evangelist.'
p1571
aS'The replacement of his archbishop Robert of Jumieges by Stigand angered the pope.'
p1572
aS"Through his marriage to (+) Edith of Wessex, this monarch's early reign was dominated by Godwine, the earl of Wessex."
p1573
aS'He warred with the historical Scottish king Macbeth.'
p1574
aS"He ultimately provoked an invasion by promising the crown both to his advisor's son (*) Harold and to the Norman Duke William II."
p1575
aS'For 10 points, name this saintly king of England whose 1066 death led to the Battle_of_Hastings.'
p1576
aS"This man's reign saw the confederation known as the Cinque Ports."
p1577
aS'He appointed Robert Champart as Archbishop of Canterbury and was forced to choose another heir over his grandson Edgar the theling.'
p1578
aS'He confined his wife Edith to a monastery at Wherwell, arousing the ire of her father Godwin, Earl of Wessex, who staged a rebellion against this king.'
p1579
aS'The eldest son of thelred the Unready and Emma, he gained the throne after the death of Hardecanute in 1042.'
p1580
aS'FTP, identify this penultimate Saxon king most famous for establishing Westminster Abbey and for his 1161 canonization.'
p1581
aS'After a Danish invasion, he returned to the court of King Hardecanute, his half-brother, and soon after ascending the throne he seized the lands of his mother, Emma of Normandy, who had conspired against him.'
p1582
aS'During his rule, he banished the family of Godwin, including his wife Edith, for refusing to attack Dover.'
p1583
aS'The son of Ethelred II, he fell out of favor after giving Normans upper-level government positions, and his son Harold subjugated Wales and succeeded him after his death in 1066.'
p1584
aS'FTP, identify this English king that was canonized in 1161.'
p1585
aS'In the Wilton Diptych, this ruler appears holding a ring behind Richard II.'
p1586
aS'This ruler gathered ships to prevent an invasion by King Magnus of Denmark, and sent Siward, Earl of Northumbria, to invade Scotland.'
p1587
aS'Early in his life, this king escaped to Normandy after he and his brother Alfred led a revolt against Harold Harefoot.'
p1588
aS'He named Robert Champart Archbishop of Canterbury, which caused a rebellion led by Godwine, the earl of Wessex, and repealed the Danegelt after succeeding Hardicanute.'
p1589
aS'This son of Emma ordered the construction of Westminster Abbey, and named Harold_Godwinson as his successor.'
p1590
aS'Ruling from 1042 to 1066, FTP, name this penultimate Anglo-Saxon king of England, a son of Ethelred the Unready nicknamed for his piety.'
p1591
aS'This ruler was protected by the Bond of Association, which authorized the execution of anyone who attempted to usurp the throne.'
p1592
aS'That document was drawn up by William Cecil and the man who helped foil the Throckmorton and Babington Plots, Francis Walshingham.'
p1593
aS"This ruler defeated the Earl of Tyrone's Irish revolt in the Nine Years War, and her forces defeated the Spanish Armada, which was attempting to restore Catholic rule to her country."
p1594
aS'For 10 points, name this "Virgin Queen" of England.'
p1595
aS"During this monarch's reign, the Dutchman Guilliam Boonen introduced the spring-suspension couch to England."
p1596
aS"Also during this monarch's reign, Parliament passed the Statute of Artificers, which abolished the power of gilds."
p1597
aS'This monarch signed the Treaty of Nonsuch with the Netherlands.'
p1598
aS'Rebellions against this ruler include the Desmond Rebellions in Ireland and the Northern Rebellion by English Catholics.'
p1599
aS'Francis Walsingham discovered the Throckmorton and Babington plots against this ruler, who knighted Sir Francis Drake.'
p1600
aS'For ten points, name this last Tudor monarch of England, nicknamed the "Virgin Queen.'
p1601
aS'"'
aS'An economic minister in this nation was deemed a "one-club golfer" in the 80s for relying exclusively on interest rates.'
p1602
aS'In October 1986, this country experienced a "Big Bang" deregulation of financial markets.'
p1603
aS"George Soros made a billion dollars on September 16, 1992, this country's Black Wednesday, by shorting its currency, forcing it to withdraw from the ERM."
p1604
aS'Labor strikes in this country in 1979 led to the "Winter of Discontent." This nation hasn\'t yet accepted the "three pillars," because it didn\'t join the Eurozone under John Major.'
p1605
aS'For 10 points, George Osborne is the current Chancellor of the Exchequer in which country which uses the Pound sterling'
p1606
aS'Some advocates of this concept are divided into the opposing Raumist and Finvenkist camps, the latter of which seeks a "final victory" for it.'
p1607
aS'UNESCO passed the 1954 Montevideo resolution to increase support for this concept, which was first endorsed by a world congress in the Declaration of Boulogne.'
p1608
aS'Its most famous literary advocate was the author of The Infant Race, the Scottish Nobel nominee William Auld.'
p1609
aS'It was first outlined in the (*) Unua Libro, which was published under a pseudonym meaning "one who hopes" that eventually gave its name to this concept.'
p1610
aS'Though this concept proved to be more popular than Ido, it faces competition from Interlingua.'
p1611
aS'For 10 points, name this brainchild of L.L.'
p1612
aS'Zamenhof, the most widely-spoken constructed language.'
p1613
aS'One ruler of this country entrusted Charles Duncan Cameron to deliver a letter to Queen Victoria, but the letter was delayed for over a year, resulting in the ruler taking Cameron hostage.'
p1614
aS'An 1868 expedition to rescue the hostages in this country was led by Robert Napier, who triumphed at the battle of Magdala, after which Emperor Tewodros II committed suicide.'
p1615
aS"Oreste Baratieri was court-martialed after decisively losing to this country's forces in 1896."
p1616
aS'This country won the Battle of Adowa against Italy during the reign of Menelik II, but was later attacked again by Mussolini in the Abyssinia Crisis.'
p1617
aS'For 10 points, name this African nation once ruled by Emperor Haile Selassie from a capital at Addis Ababa.'
p1618
aS'This country was the location of the Ogaden War, which occurred during the time when Colonel Mengistu led this country as the head of a committee called the Derg.'
p1619
aS'Many of its forces in the nineteenth century were organized by Ras Gobena, an ally of its emperor (*) Menelik II.'
p1620
aS'It fought a series of wars against Italy that included the Battle of Adowa.'
p1621
aS'For many years during the twentieth century this country was ruled by Haile Selassie.'
p1622
aS'For 10 points, name this African nation, sometimes called Abyssinia, with capital Addis Ababa.'
p1623
aS'Theodore II ["the Second"] took the throne in 1855.'
p1624
aS'In 1868, British troops invaded and Theodore committed suicide.'
p1625
aS'In 1872, Johannes IV ["the fourth"] became king; but he had a civil war with Menelek, whom the Italians backed.'
p1626
aS'In 1896, Italy invaded but was humiliated.'
p1627
aS"Menelek's grandson, Lij Yasu, converted to Islam in 1916, and the Christian church deposed him."
p1628
aS'His aunt chose a regional governor, Ras Tafari, as his heir.'
p1629
aS'This is a history of, for 10 points, what African nation'
p1630
aS'tumultuous "Age of the Princes" in this country came to an end with the Battle of Desrage.'
p1631
aS'James Bruce was a European explorer who discovered the source of a river in this country.'
p1632
aS'This nation was the subject of the Hoare-Leval Pact.'
p1633
aS'One emperor of this nation died at Gallabat during the Sudanese Mahdist Wars, and was known to westerners as John IV.'
p1634
aS'This nation experienced a succession crisis after that death, which resulted in the ascent of an emperor who defeated Oreste Baratieri in battle.'
p1635
aS'Another emperor of this nation succeeded Empress Zewditu and was deposed during its second war with Italy.'
p1636
aS'For 10 points, name this nation once ruled by Haile Selassie.'
p1637
aS'In 1930, Gugsa Welle attempted to secure sole control of this country for his wife, Zewditu.'
p1638
aS'In the Ogaden War, the Soviets switched to aiding this country.'
p1639
aS"In the 1980's, the Tigray People's Liberation Front fought against Mengistu, the leader of this country's Derg military junta."
p1640
aS"Almost a century earlier, at the Battle of Adowa, this nation's Menelik II repelled the Italians, who later returned under Mussolini to conquer this nation."
p1641
aS"Rastafarians revere this country's 20th-century emperor Haile Selassie."
p1642
aS'For 10 points, name this East African country which later lost access to the sea when Eritrea gained independence from it.'
p1643
aS'After the greatest naval victory of this people and one of its allies, Diodorus claimed that they stoned to death the prisoners at the city at which this culture erected its Sarcophagus of the Spouses.'
p1644
aS'Dionysisus of Halicarnassus relates that these victors at the Battle of Alalia saw their army of half a million repulsed by forces led by Aristodemus at Cumae, losing their control of Campania.'
p1645
aS'Aristodemus also defeated an army of these people led by Arruns, at Arcia.'
p1646
aS"Arruns's father had earlier been so impressed by a youth who stoically put his left hand into a fire after being captured by these people that he lifted his siege of Rome."
p1647
aS'Lars Porsena was a leader of, for 10 points, what civilization which provided many early Kings of Rome, including Tarquin the Proud, a predecessor of Roman culture eventually absorbed into Rome'
p1648
aS"This country's cabinet was challenged by the USSR in 1958 in the Night Frost incident, and three years later, a Soviet suggestion of a defense pact with this country led to the Note Crisis."
p1649
aS'Cold War politicians in this country were each expected to have a "kotiryssa," a personal Soviet contact.'
p1650
aS'This country banned The Manchurian Candidate until 1989 as part of the (*) YYA Treaty policy, which also used the phrase "Germany or its allies" to implicitly bind it to military action against the U.S. Its policy of  "bowing to the east without mooning the West" led to the coining of a term for insidious Soviet influence on a democracy, this country\'s namesake "-ization."'
p1651
aS'For 10 points, name this country which pursued close relations with the Soviet Union under the "Paasikivi-Kekkonen line."'
p1652
aS'One massive depression in this country was solved through the efforts of Esko Aho.'
p1653
aS'This nation signed a treaty of friendship with the Soviet Union called the YYA Treaty.'
p1654
aS'It had earlier fought against the Soviet Union in the aptly-named Continuation War, which followed a conflict that had seen fighting at the Mannerheim Line and resulted in the loss of Karelia, called the (*) Winter War.'
p1655
aS'Those conflicts were followed by the Lapland War, named after a region of this country.'
p1656
aS'For 10 points, name this Baltic nation with capital Helsinki.'
p1657
aS'Tension between this country and the Soviet Union came to a head in the Note Crisis.'
p1658
aS'Years earlier, a group called the Kagal claimed responsibility for the assassination of Nikolai Bobrikov in this country.'
p1659
aS'Due to the nationalistic drivings of Johan Snellman, this country underwent a namesake language strife in the 1800s.'
p1660
aS'This country won the Battle of Raate Road.'
p1661
aS'The February Manifesto of 1899 enacted Russification in this modern country, which became a Grand Duchy under Alexander I.'
p1662
aS'This country fought the Continuation and Winter Wars with the Soviet Union, during which its forces were led by Carl Mannerheim.'
p1663
aS'For 10 points, name this European country that fought the Soviet Union on the Isthmus of Karelia and endured the bombing of Helsinki.'
p1664
aS'This nations Continuation War involved an alliance with Germany partially to respond to a neighbors use of the Aland Islands and ended during Gustaf Mannerheims presidency.'
p1665
aS'It helped the Nazis because it allowed for submarine training in the Baltic and cut off the Murmansk railroad.'
p1666
aS'This followed a 4 month war with fighting was over control of the (*) Petsamo mines, Lake_Ladoga, and the the Karelian Isthmus, called the Winter War.'
p1667
aS'They were a grand duchy controlled by Russia until 1917, and which was taken from Sweden.'
p1668
aS'Inhabited by the Suomi, this is FTP what Baltic nation with capital Helsinki'
p1669
aS'The fascist party in this country used the logo of a man riding a bear, and this country was home to the Diet of Porvoo.'
p1670
aS'Frederick Charles of Hesse briefly served as King of this country, but was deposed after World War One.'
p1671
aS'This country developed the motti tactic, which allowed it to win the Battle of Raate Road against a numerically superior force, but it was forced to cede the Petsamo region to its eastern neighbor.'
p1672
aS'Before fighting the Continuation War, this country built a defensive line named for Carl Mannerheim and developed the Molotov Cocktail.'
p1673
aS'For ten points, name this country that fought the Winter War against the Soviet Union, with capital at Helsinki.'
p1674
aS"This country's neighbor had a political party called the Hats, which instigated a war in which Peter Lacy invaded this country."
p1675
aS"That conflict that ended with the Treaty of Abo, which resulted in this nation's occupation."
p1676
aS'The traitorous Gustav Otto Douglas was the governor of this country during one occupation period that also saw Mikhail Golitsyn act as its governor.'
p1677
aS'In addition to being occupied in the Lesser and Greater Wraths, this country was invaded by Great Britain during (*) World_War_II during raids on its cities of Kirkenes and Petsamo.'
p1678
aS'The Mainila incident precipitated a war in which this country was invaded, and that war saw this country capitulate to the Treaty of Moscow and give up parts of Karelia.'
p1679
aS'10 points, name this country that constructed the Mannerheim Line to defend itself from Russia in the Continuation and Winter Wars.'
p1680
aS'At one point in this battle, Nathan "Shanks" Evans held off the attacks on the Confederate left flank by Robert C. Schenck.'
p1681
aS'General Daniel Tyler moved towards the Stone Bridge in the morning of this battle.'
p1682
aS"Joseph Johnston's reinforcements would prove to be a major turning point in this battle, and after his defense of Henry House Hill here, Stonewall Jackson earned his nickname."
p1683
aS'The Union was commanded by General Irvin McDowell.'
p1684
aS'For 10 points, name this battle which saw the Confederates under P.G.T.'
p1685
aS'Beauregard triumph over the Union, the first major land battle of the Civil War.'
p1686
aS'Edmund Kirby Smith was wounded at this battle and thereafter departed for the western theater.'
p1687
aS'It was fought on Sudley Ford, Matthews Hill, and Henry Hill, and it was where Barnard Bee gave the nickname ""stonewall"" to Thomas Jackson.'
p1688
aS"This battle began when Joseph Johnston's forces arrived to support P.G.T."
p1689
aS'Beauregard.'
p1690
aS"Irvin McDowell's losing performance at this battle led to McDowell's replacement with George McClellan."
p1691
aS'For 10 points, name this 1861 battle at a railroad depot in northern Virginia, the first of two at the same location.'
p1692
aS'On the morning of this battle, General Tyler was sent to harass the opposing generals left wing until the reinforcements of Hunter and Heintzelman arrived.'
p1693
aS'At the same time, Colonels Richardson and Davies were sent to attack the other flank of the Confederate army.'
p1694
aS'Henry Slocums regiment broke through Confederate lines but defeat was staved off as the timely arrival of Confederate soldiers allowed Bernard Bee and others to mount a staunch defense at Henry House Hill.'
p1695
aS'Afterwards, Union General Irvin McDowell was replaced with the man who would lead the Army of the Potomac, George McClellan.'
p1696
aS'FTP, name this battle where Thomas Jackson earned the nickname Stonewall, the first major battle of the Civil War, a July 21, 1861 victory for the Confederates.'
p1697
aS'Prior to this battle, one commander sent Brigadier Generals David Hunter and Samuel Heintzelman and their divisions over Sudley Springs Ford.'
p1698
aS'Also prior to this engagement, a device demonstrated by Professor Thaddeus S. C. Love was called on to help one side perform reconnaissance efforts.'
p1699
aS"One side's wagon was overturned by artillery fire on Cub Run Creek, and the bridge across that creek was later destroyed."
p1700
aS'At the end of this battle, blocking the roads of the retreating forces to the north were panicked (*) civilians who had come to watch.'
p1701
aS"A famous statement of the resilience of one man's forces in this battle gave that leader his most recognized nickname; that statement was proclaimed by Bernard Bee."
p1702
aS'After the poor showing of one side in this engagement, its commander was fired and replaced with George McClellan.'
p1703
aS'For ten points, name this battle, a victory of the forces of Joseph E. Johnston, P. G. T Beauregard, and Thomas "Stonewall" Jackson over Irvin McDowell in July 1861, the first major battle of the Civil War in northern Virginia.'
p1704
aS'Carl Erdmann hypothesized that the main goal of the instigators of this conflict was to assist the Byzantines.'
p1705
aS"One side in one part of this conflict was led by Walter the Penniless and Peter the Hermit and was known as the People's Crusade."
p1706
aS'This crusade also included the Siege of Nicaea and the Siege of Jerusalem.'
p1707
aS'This conflict resulted in the establishment of (*) Antioch, Edessa, and other crusader states.'
p1708
aS'For 10 points, name this Crusade that was launched at the 1095 Council of Clermont by Urban II.'
p1709
aS'One leader in this conflict was killed in the second battle of Ramla and was named Stephen II.'
p1710
aS'Another figure in this conflict was named Peter the Hermit.'
p1711
aS'This conflict was chronicled by Robert the Monk.'
p1712
aS'This campaign began after a speech given by Pope Urban II at the Council of Clermont.'
p1713
aS'A key battle in this conflict ended when a (*) Fatimid leader fled a certain holy city.'
p1714
aS'For 10 points, name this military conflict in which Europeans sought to regain control of Jerusalem, which was the original campaign of this type.'
p1715
aS'Adhemar, bishop of Le Puy, was the papal legate assigned to this event.'
p1716
aS'He traveled with the largest contingent, raised by Raymond of Toulouse, who led his forces across northern Italy and into Dalmatia, where they clashed with the Byzantines.'
p1717
aS'One branch lost a quarter of its men looting Hungary under the leadership of Walter the Penniless and Peter the Hermit.'
p1718
aS"Alexius I's envoy to the Council of Piacenza would have preferred veterans capable of reversing the verdict of the Battle_of_Manzikert."
p1719
aS'FTP, the success of this movement was led by Godfrey of Bouillon and sanctioned by Pope Urban II at the Council of Clermont.'
p1720
aS'One army in this conflict under Folkmar was destroyed at Nistra, and forces under William of Aquitaine suffered a similar fate.'
p1721
aS'Early leaders included Walter Sansavoir, and internal strife arose when Tancred deserted Raymond of St. Giles.'
p1722
aS'In one battle, knights under Bohemond of Taranto swarmed over the enemy walls to open the Gates of St. George.'
p1723
aS'However, its unwilling direct instigators were envoys sent to the Council of Piacenza, and in the Princes phase of this campaign, Kerbogha was defeated at Antioch.'
p1724
aS'FTP, identify this campaign to recapture the Holy Land called at the Council of Clermont in 1095 by Pope Urban II.'
p1725
aS'The government of this polity was based on the Ordinances of Justice developed by Giano della Bella, and one prominent post in this city was the Gonfaloniere of Justice.'
p1726
aS"After the murder of the Abbot of Vallombrosa, this city's forces were dealt a crushing defeat at the Battle of Montaperti due to the treachery of Bocca degli Abati."
p1727
aS'Later, this city fought the War of the Eight Saints against Pope Gregory XI, leading to the end of the Avignon Papacy.'
p1728
aS"That same year saw a revolt of wool carders demanding inclusion in this city's trade guilds."
p1729
aS"That Revolt of the Ciompi was suppressed by an ancestor of this city's ruling family, which would later be targeted by the Pazzi Conspiracy, feud with the monk Savonarola, and produce members such as Cosimo and Lorenzo the Magnificent."
p1730
aS'For 10 points, name this birthplace of the Italian Renaissance, a city on the Arno long ruled by the Medici.'
p1731
aS'Richard Call was the second territorial delegate from this future state, and served as its territorial governor twice; his nephew Wilkinson Call was a Civil War general and Senator from this state.'
p1732
aS'The first statehood governor was William Moseley.'
p1733
aS'This state saw a mass lynching known as the Rosewood Massacre.'
p1734
aS'Civil War battles in this state include the Battle of Natural Bridge, the Battle of Marianna, and the Battle of Olustee.'
p1735
aS'This state, which saw the 1980 Arthur McDuffie riots after an incident of police brutality, elected the first Jewish Senator, David Levy Yulee.'
p1736
aS'Confederate Secretary of the Navy Stephen Mallory hailed from this state.'
p1737
aS'An international incident during the Monroe administration occurred when Andrew_Jackson served as its territorial governor; he had earlier entered this future state to capture and hang British subjects.'
p1738
aS'The site of the Treaty of Paynes Landing and three same-named Indian Wars, for 10 points, name this home state of Osceola and Janet Reno, which decided the 2000 Presidential election.'
p1739
aS'The ""Appeal of June 18"" was given to rally troops in this country.'
p1740
aS"This country's general Gamelin was replaced with Weygand after the success of Operation Fall Rot."
p1741
aS'This country was the starting point of ""Operation Dynamo,"" also called the Dunkirk Evacuation.'
p1742
aS'This country was also the site of beaches nicknamed Gold, Juno, Omaha, Utah, and Sword during a landing in its region of Normandy.'
p1743
aS'For 10 points, name this site of the Vichy puppet government during World_War_II.'
p1744
aS'A politician in this country was mocked by appearances of a puppet alter ego known as "Super Liar."'
p1745
aS'An election here used the slogan "vote for the crook, not the fascist."'
p1746
aS'A riot in this country began when two youths were electrocuted while hiding from the police in a substation.'
p1747
aS'After the 1986 elections, it had a government system known as (*) "cohabitation" with the Prime Minister and President from different parties.'
p1748
aS'This country bombed the Rainbow Warrior, a Greenpeace ship that was protesting nuclear tests in the Pacific.'
p1749
aS"This country's experienced 1968 protests sparked by a series of student strikes."
p1750
aS'In 2005, it endured a series of riots blamed on North African immigrants.'
p1751
aS'This country has a right wing movement led by Marine Le Pen.'
p1752
aS'For 10 points, name this European country recently led by Jacques Chirac.'
p1753
aS'This country twice banned the publication of a work that cross-referenced "the Eucharist" with "cannibalism".'
p1754
aS'A thinker from this country wrote that people who put up fences are the founders of "civil society," and argued that children can only understand emotions like sympathy when they grow into adolescence.'
p1755
aS'Salons hosted philosophical discourse in this country, which produced a work that describes people all forfeiting the same amount of individual rights to set up a political community.'
p1756
aS'That work is the Social Contract.'
p1757
aS'For 10 points, name this country, home to philosophes like Denis Diderot, Baron de Montesquieu, and Jean-Jacques Rousseau.'
p1758
aS"Tensions arose between this nation and the United_States in 1985 when it didn't allow US planes to use its airspace on bombing flights against Muammar Khaddafi."
p1759
aS"The first party divisions in the US partly began when Jeffersonian republicans supported this country's grievances after the Jay_Treaty."
p1760
aS"US ships frequently engaged this country's navy in the late 18th century in the undeclared Quasi War."
p1761
aS"FTP what nation's navy helped blockade British forces at Yorktown at the end of the Revolutionary War, led by Admiral de Grasse and General Rochambeau"
p1762
aS"Leon Gambetta attempted to organize one side's defenses in this war, but fled in a hot air balloon."
p1763
aS'The Treaty of Frankfurt ended this war, in which the Battle of Sedan was fought.'
p1764
aS'One cause of this war was the possibility of Leopold of Hohenzollern gaining the Spanish throne.'
p1765
aS'Another cause of this war was an edited letter between the ambassador of one country in this war and Wilhelm I.'
p1766
aS'That document known as the Ems Dispatch was used to advance the goals of Otto_von_Bismarck.'
p1767
aS'For 10 points, name this 1870-1871 war between two European nations that led to German unification.'
p1768
aS"In this war, one man left the losing side's capital by hot air balloon to become war minister at Tours; that man was Leon Gambetta."
p1769
aS'Jules Favre halted negotiations with the victors of this war until the Treaty of Frankfurt was signed.'
p1770
aS'Italy annexed the Papal States during this war without opposition.'
p1771
aS'A misinterpreted conversation between Vincent Benedetti and Wilhelm I on Spanish Succession was used to spark this war.'
p1772
aS"After Napoleon_III's capture at this war's Battle of Sedan, the Second French Empire collapsed."
p1773
aS'For 10 points, the Ems Dispatch sparked what war wherein the North German Confederation and its allies defeated France before becoming the German Empire'
p1774
aS'When he was 18, he plotted to flee to England with Hans Hermann von Katte, and was forced to watch his friends execution after their arrest.'
p1775
aS'While serving a 1-year prison sentence for his crime, this prince befriended Gabriel Fredersdorf, whom he would later make chancellor of his kingdom.'
p1776
aS'His expansionist policies led to his being the last ruler to hold the title King in instead of King of his country, as after his annexation of most of Royal Prussia from the First Partition of Poland in 1772.'
p1777
aS'FTP, named this enlightened monarch of Prussia who led his country to victory in the Silesian Wars.'
p1778
aS'He nicknamed one of his generals Quintus Icilius after a dispute over the battle of Pharsalus.'
p1779
aS'He was a grandson of George I of England through his mother Sophia Dorothea and his brother Henry was allegedly invited to be emperor of America by Baron von Stuben.'
p1780
aS'He allied with Britain in the Convention of Westminster and despite winning the battle of Rossbach, he was on the verge of collapse before being saved by the Miracle of the House of Brandenburg in the form of the accession of Peter III with the death of the Czarina Elizabeth.'
p1781
aS'He accepted the least amount of land of the powers involved in the First Partition of Poland, but managed to hold on to Silesia which he had taken from Austria following the ascension of Maria_Theresa and his rejection of the Pragmatic Sanction.'
p1782
aS'For 10 points name this man who fought the War of Austrian Succession and the Seven Years War as King of Prussia from 1740 to 1786.'
p1783
aS'This thinker described "Upper Savagery" as beginning with "the invention of the bow and arrow" in one work, before in a later chapter building on Lewis H. Morgan\'s idea that the "bodies of consanguinei" in the Iroquis predated the "genea" of the Greeks.'
p1784
aS'Earlier in his career, this man wrote articles for the Telegraph under the last name Oswald and was influenced by Moses Hess.'
p1785
aS'This man referenced a polemic against Cato by Julius_Caesar in his colloquial name for a group of essays, Anti-Duhring.'
p1786
aS'This author of The Origin of the Family, (*) Private Property, and the State died before finishing Dialectics of Nature.'
p1787
aS"One of this man's best-known works after extensive exposure to the effect of the industrial revolution on factory communities in Liverpool and Manchester."
p1788
aS'The author of The Condition of the Working Class in England may be better-known for collaborating with a more prolific partner on The Holy Family and The German Ideology, as well as a work which declares that a spectre is haunting Europe.'
p1789
aS'FTP, identify this man who published The_Communist_Manifesto along with Karl Marx.'
p1790
aS'He captured his greatest enemy by turning King Bocchus after his agent Bomilcar failed in betrayal.'
p1791
aS'He was the first to recruit soldiers from the Head Count and their loyalty to him is signified by the fact that they were known as his "mules.'
p1792
aS'"  He used those troops to great effect by crushing Teutobod and Boiorix successeively at Aqua Sextiae and Vercellae, thereby turning back the Teutones and Cimbri.'
p1793
aS'However jealousy over a subordinate led to a civil war and eventually his seventh consulship.'
p1794
aS'FTP, name this superior of Sulla and victor over Jugurtha.'
p1795
aS'His political career began after he met Zakaria Mohieddine and Abd al-Hakim Amir in the Sudan.'
p1796
aS'Eighteen years later, he sparked international controversy through a secret arrangement with Czechoslovakia for weapons.'
p1797
aS"During that controversy, this leader reacted to John_Foster_Dulles's withdrawal of funding for a dam project by (*) nationalizing and instituting tolls on the Suez Canal."
p1798
aS'For 10 points, name this predecessor of Anwar Sadat as the president of Egypt.'
p1799
aS'With the USSR, this man sent troops to the Republican side of the Yemeni Civil War.'
p1800
aS'He joined his country with Syria in the United Arab Republic.'
p1801
aS'He joined Muhammad Naguib to depose King Farouk with the Free Officers Movement.'
p1802
aS'This African co-founder of the Non-Aligned Movement lost the (*) Six-Day War, built the Aswan High Dam, and nationalized the Suez Canal.'
p1803
aS'For 10 points, name this man who preceded Anwar Sadat as President of Egypt during the 1960s.'
p1804
aS'This leader attempted to regain lost territory in the War of Attrition and supported the rebels during the North Yemen Civil War.'
p1805
aS'Along with Muhammad Naguib, this figure founded the Free Officers Movement and deposed King Farouk, and he combined his country with Syria to form the short-lived United Arab Republic.'
p1806
aS'This co-founder of the (*) Non-Aligned Movement supported the construction of the Aswan High Dam and nationalized the Suez Canal, though he later lost the Six Days War.'
p1807
aS'For ten points, identify this predecessor of Anwar Sadat who served as the second President of Egypt from 1956 to 1970.'
p1808
aS'Operation Musketeer was launched against this man, who denounced the Baghdad Pact, also known as CENTO.'
p1809
aS'He sent a military force to aid the Republicans in the North Yemen Civil War.'
p1810
aS'With Syria, he founded a short-lived United Arab Republic, and he imprisoned Sayyed Qutb, the leader of the Muslim Brotherhood.'
p1811
aS'Earlier, as leader of the Free Officers Movement, he had overthrown King Farouk.'
p1812
aS'This man built the Aswan High Dam, and he attempted to take the Suez Canal back from the British.'
p1813
aS'For 10 points name this man who led his country during the Six-Day War and founded modern Egypt.'
p1814
aS'This man was removed from power after refusing to support a series of land reforms, and he served as the vice chairman of the Revolutionary Command Council.'
p1815
aS'He led his country through the War of Attrition after his resignation.'
p1816
aS'As part of one conflict, he blockaded Eilat under the suggestion of his defense minister Amer.'
p1817
aS'He led a revolution with Muhammad Naguib and the Free Officers Movement in 1952, and after gaining control of the government he allowed the deposed Farouk I to leave without incident.'
p1818
aS'A leader of the non-aligned movement who ordered the construction of the Aswan High Dam, FTP, name this Egyptian prime minister responsible for the Suez_Crisis.'
p1819
aS'21 (Tiebreaker).'
p1820
aS"This man's rise to power began when he allied with his father's blood brother, Toghrul, in a campaign, and this man created a civil code called the Yassa."
p1821
aS'This ruler conquered the Naimans, Merkits, and Uyghurs [WEE - gurs] in addition to the Khwarezmid [kwar-EZZ-mid] Empire.'
p1822
aS'Some geneticists have hypothesized that as many as(*) 1 in 200 people are descended from this man, and he used mounted archers and faked retreats to fool foes into traps.'
p1823
aS'For 10 points, name this unifier of the Mongol Tribes whose grandson Kublai ruled the largest contiguous empire in history.'
p1824
aS'Introducing the signal flag, using a mobile circle of wagons as a base of operations, and adopting the decimal system to troops units, this general overcame both limited manpower and a deficiency of protective armor.'
p1825
aS'Prioritizing speed, he relied solely on cavalry units, engaging in sneak attacks on smaller enemy detachments.'
p1826
aS"Turning on his former allies, Torghil and Jamulka, he consolidated victories over the Taichi'ut and Tatars."
p1827
aS"FTP, identify this general who destroyed the Khwarizm Empire, sacked Beijing in 1215, and totally ravaged Asman's Sporting Goods in a 1989 movie."
p1828
aS'This rulers chief justice was Shigi Qutuqu, and he also appointed the minister Yel Chucai.'
p1829
aS'An account of travels to this rulers court was published as the Journey to the West of the Taoist monk Kiu Chang Chun.'
p1830
aS'This promulgator of the Yasa law code was served by the general Jebe, who died soon after a victory at the Battle of the Kalka River.'
p1831
aS'A prime source for this rulers life is a Secret History, and he rose to power by allying with the Kerait ruler Toghrul before fighting a power struggle with Jamuka.'
p1832
aS'This ruler conquered the Khwarezmid Empire and invaded the Tangut kingdom of Western Xia.'
p1833
aS'This mans general Subotai would go on to serve his son and successor, Ogdi.'
p1834
aS'For 10 points, name this conqueror, born Temjin, who united the steppe tribes and founded the Mongol Empire.'
p1835
aS'Governor Robert Dinwiddie once asked this man to carry an Ohio-related ultimatum to the French at Fort Le Boeuf.'
p1836
aS'His nephew Burwell Bassett served three terms in the House, while the opinion of Corfield v. Coryell was authored by his Supreme Court Justice nephew Bushrod.'
p1837
aS'His Iroquois guide Tanacharison gave him the nickname Town Destroyer during the French and Indian War, in which he served as Edward Braddocks aide and was forced to surrender at Fort Necessity.'
p1838
aS'Later, he led the Continental forces escape from Long Island.'
p1839
aS'For 10 points, identify this victor at Princeton, Trenton, and Yorktown, the first president of the United_States.'
p1840
aS'One governor of this state died in a duel with Lachlan McIntosh, while its royal Governor James Wright was the only British administrator to regain power of a colony during the American Revolution.'
p1841
aS'One of its Loyalist leaders, Thomas Brown, was defeated while holding Fort Cornwallis against Elijah Clarke and Light-Horse Harry Lee.'
p1842
aS'Another engagement saw fatal wounds suffered by Casimir Pulaski in this state, which earlier in 1742 had witnessed the Battle of Bloody Marsh.'
p1843
aS'Home to the patriots Lyman Hall and Button Gwinett, a Supreme Court case voided the conviction of a missionary in this state who refused to obtain a state license to live in Indian Territory.'
p1844
aS'That case prompted the line "John Marshall has made his decision--now let him enforce it!" by Andrew_Jackson.'
p1845
aS'FTP, name this state which convicted Samuel Worcester, a colony originally founded by James Oglethorpe.'
p1846
aS"This state's senator Sam Nunn traveled with Colin Powell to Haiti on a mission to remove Raoul Cedras from power in Haiti."
p1847
aS'In this state, the so-called ""Immortal Six Hundred"" were held prisoner at Fort Pulaski during the Civil War.'
p1848
aS'The Supreme Court ruled that this state could not redraw Indian land boundaries in the case of Worcester against this state.'
p1849
aS'A President from this state returned the Panama Canal Zone to Panama and was in office during the Iran hostage crisis.'
p1850
aS'For 10 points, name this home state of President Jimmy Carter.'
p1851
aS"This colony's eastern border was settled by the Treaty of Beaufort in the wake of the American Revolution."
p1852
aS"Governed for a time by James Wright, during the War of Jenkins' Ear it was the site of the Battle of Bloody Marsh."
p1853
aS"That battle was won by the man who obtained the charter for this colony as a relief for debtors' prisons named James Oglethorpe."
p1854
aS'In the 1830s, many of its Cherokee Indian residents were forcibly removed during the Trail of Tears.'
p1855
aS'For 10 points, name this state, which during the Civil War saw the siege of Atlanta.'
p1856
aS'In his opinion on a case from this state, Justice Powell cited a lack of evidence that suggested asymmetric punishment for African-American murderers in McLeskey vs. Kemp.'
p1857
aS"This state's attempt to extend capital punishment to rapists was thwarted in Coker."
p1858
aS'A 1972 case from here ruled the death penalty cruel and unusual, an opinion that was overturned by a case in this state.'
p1859
aS'Tom C. Clark wrote the majority opinion of a court case that began in this state, writing that Congress could prohibit (*) racial discrimination in certain public places under the commerce clause.'
p1860
aS'The Furman and Gregg cases occurred in this state, where New Echota postmaster Samuel Worcester opposed Indian Removal.'
p1861
aS'For 10 points, name this state, of origin of the Heart of Atlanta Motel case.'
p1862
aS'One Supreme Court case arising out of this state found that evidentiary hearings must be open to the public; that was the case of Waller versus this state.'
p1863
aS'Another decision naming this state as respondent upheld the Article III provision allowing a citizen of one state to sue another.'
p1864
aS'In two related cases, the Court found that federal courts cannot review state laws and that Indian tribes hold distinct sovereign powers.'
p1865
aS'Appeals against this state invalidated then reinstated the death penalty.'
p1866
aS'For ten points, name this state brought before the Supreme Court by such plaintiffs as Chisolm, Cherokee Nation, Worcester, Gregg, and Furman.'
p1867
aS"This state's Governor Joseph E. Brown forced the state-owned Western and Atlantic Railroad to operate more efficiently."
p1868
aS'Forces from this state ambushed the forces of Manuel de Montian on St. Simons island at the Battle of Bloody Marsh, and Governor Charles Jenkins was replaced by Thomas Ruger after refusing to use state funds to support a racially integrated constitutional convention.'
p1869
aS'One Supreme Court case originated here with the arrest of the federal postmaster to New Echoda, and in another case originating here, John Marshall ruled that public land grants were contractual obligations.'
p1870
aS'For 10 points, name this state which was sued by Samuel Worcester and was home to the Yazoo Land Scandal which led to Fletcher v. Peck, originally founded as a haven for debtors by James Oglethorpe.'
p1871
aS'This country expelled the Seljuk Turks in 1121 at the Battle of Didgori, increasing the power of David the Builder from its Bagrationi dynasty.'
p1872
aS'During World_War_I, it tried to gain the Lori Province, which is now controlled by Armenia.'
p1873
aS"One of Lenin's last writings criticized Stalin's handling of this Soviet republic after Budu Mdivani and Filipp Makharadze had their power reduced."
p1874
aS'After the dissolution of the Soviet Union, it was headed by former Soviet Minister of Foreign Affairs Eduard Shevardnadze, who was deposed in the Rose Revolution.'
p1875
aS'It is now led by Mikheil Saakashvili, who got into a brief war with Russia in 2008 over South Ossetia.'
p1876
aS'Name this country that several times has lost control of its capital of Tbilisi.'
p1877
aS'The printing press was introduced to this country by a learned king who issued a law code that prescribed blood payment as the penalty for every offense, Vakhtang VI of the Mukhranian dynasty.'
p1878
aS'This country resisted the Mongols under the leadership of a king nicknamed "the Brilliant" after earlier rebelling against Persia under the leadership of Gorgasal and being Christianized by St. Nino.'
p1879
aS'During its time as a client state of Byzantium, this country was ruled by the "kuropalates" or "guardian of the palace," a title which Ashot the Great held before founding the independent Bagratid dynasty here.'
p1880
aS"This country's current capital was incorporated into the state during the campaigns of David the Builder, and many of its lands were later conquered by Queen Tamar."
p1881
aS'For 10 points, name this state whose "Rose Revolution" elevated Mikhail Saakasvilli to power over Eduard Shevardnadze, and which was reconquered for the USSR by native son Joseph_Stalin. '
p1882
aS"The last king of this nation's longest-ruling house, Erekle II, died in 1798 following the disastrous battle of Krtsanisi [ter-sah-NEE-see]."
p1883
aS'In the 11th century, this nation was united under the Bagratid dynasty, which produced the rulers David the Builder and Queen Tamar.'
p1884
aS'It was ruled from Telavi in the 18th century, when its eastern kingdom was joined with Kartl-Kakheti [kahr-till kah-KEH-tee].'
p1885
aS'A short-lived democratic republic here was governed by Noe Zhordania before being absorbed by the Soviet Union in 1921.'
p1886
aS'More recently, Mikhail Saakashvili became its president in 2004 after helping to topple Eduard Shevardnadze in the Rose Revolution.'
p1887
aS'FTP, name this Eastern European country, the birthplace of Stalin, whose capital is Tblisi.'
p1888
aS'One ruler of this country wrote the Hymns of Repentance, was known as the Builder, and annexed the Ghishi-Kabala area after defeating Illghazi at the battle of Didgori.'
p1889
aS'Another ruler was the son of Demeter the Self-Sacrificing and was known as the Great, and one of its ruling dynasties was founded by Ashot Kurapalati.'
p1890
aS'That dynasty was at times headed by queens such as Rusudan and Tamar, and this country once fractured into kingdoms like Kartli and Imereti.'
p1891
aS'Past leaders included interior secretary Eduard Shevardnadze, while under the government of Zviad Gamsakhurdia, it saw conflicts in the regions of Abkhazia and South Ossetia.'
p1892
aS'For 10 points, name this country which underwent a Rose Revolution and which has its capital at Tbilisi.'
p1893
aS'A standoff between the navies of this country and the United_States during a hurricane at Apia left over a hundred dead.'
p1894
aS"A rebellion in one of this country's colonies was led by Kinjikitile Ngwale and was known as the Maji Maji rebellion."
p1895
aS'In 1897, this country seized territory, including Tsingtao, that would later be given to Japan in the Shandong settlement.'
p1896
aS"One of this country's colonies saw the Battle of Waterberg, which led to the Herero and Namaqua genocide."
p1897
aS"One of this country's leaders gave up Zanzibar in return for a narrow piece of land giving access to the Zambezi river, the Caprivi strip."
p1898
aS'For 10 points, name this country that colonized Nauru, Togoland and Cameroon, as well as Tanganyika and the future Namibia, all of which it lost by the Treaty_of_Versailles.'
p1899
aS'His bodyguard Gregorio Fortunato was accused of masterminding one assassination plot for this man, which led to him writing the Letter of Testament.'
p1900
aS'He ended the politics of "coffee with milk," and Eduardo Gomes resigned his position due to his policies.'
p1901
aS'He served in the treasury department for Washington Luis, and came to power after the overthrow of Julio Prestes.'
p1902
aS'He fabricated the communist "Cohen Plan" and supported a movement founded by Plinio Salgado.'
p1903
aS'He won power in part due to the "tenentes" and was deposed in a coup by Eurico Dutra.'
p1904
aS'After the Rua Tonelero plot to kill his opponent, Carlos Lacerda, in the 1954 presidential election was exposed, he killed himself.'
p1905
aS'For ten points, name this multiple-time president who created the Estado Novo in Brazil.'
p1906
aS'He created at-large seats in the legislature, which his opponents dubbed the "forty thieves.'
p1907
aS'" He invented a new office called the "interventor," a federally controlled state governor, and often filled that post with "tenentes," the junior officers who supported a move to fascism.'
p1908
aS'He dubbed himself "Father of the Poor" and helped Francisco Campos rewrite the constitution, and he later ordered his supporters, the Queremistas, to vote for his successor, Eurico Gaspar Dutra.'
p1909
aS'His second regime ended with his suicide.'
p1910
aS'For 10 points, name this dictator, and then elected president, who implemented the "Estado Novo" in Brazil.'
p1911
aS"His refusal to enforce his own Consolidation of Labor Laws led workers to attack him in the Miner's Manifesto."
p1912
aS'His abuses caught up with him when his guard Tenente Fortunato was implicated in the murder of Rubens Vaz during the Tonelero Street conspiracy.'
p1913
aS'His replacement of the Constitution of 1891 attempted to ease the lot of the workers, but his brutal suppression of the cangaos did not endear him to his anti-coronelist power base, and he used the Cohen Plan, a fabricated plot by the Integralistas, to assume dictatorial powers.'
p1914
aS'Starting out as the governor of Rio Grande do Sur, he led the Liberal Alliance in overthrowing the government of Washington Luis in 1930, and he modeled his rule on the Estado Nvo of Antonio Salazar.'
p1915
aS'FTP, name this president of Brazil.'
p1916
aS'This ruler was criticized for deporting Olga Prestes, the pregnant Jewish wife of one of his rivals, to Nazi Germany, where she died in a concentration camp.'
p1917
aS'This ruler came to power with the help of the tenentes, disgruntled young military officers, and he fabricated a communist revolutionary plot, the Cohen Plan, to take dictatorial powers.'
p1918
aS'While he began his career in the Liberal Party this ruler was supported by paramilitary fores who wore the greek letter epsilon and bright green shirts, part of Plinio Salgados fascist Integralist movement.'
p1919
aS'His downfall came when he bungled the assassination of his rival Carlos Lacerda and killed an army Major instead, causing him to lose military support and driving him to suicide.'
p1920
aS'For ten points, name this man who turned Brazil into an Estado Novo during his 1930-1954 rule.'
p1921
aS'In one of his last written words, this man claimed that his blood will be an immortal flame that upholds the sacred will to resist, and that speech ends with an image of this man walking towards history, leaving life to enter history.'
p1922
aS"This man's early career was helped because of Antonio Borges, and he came to power provisionally when Junta Pacificadora."
p1923
aS'This ruler was succeeded by Jose Linhares, and after he commited suicide Joao Filho took over his role.'
p1924
aS'This man instigated a new Constitution for his contry in 1934.'
p1925
aS'This man was in power when the Integralists rose, and he also tried to assassinate Carlos Lacerda during the crime of Rua Tonelero.'
p1926
aS'For ten points, name this instigator of the Estado Novo who served as dictator of Brazil 1930 to 1945.'
p1927
aS"This location's sanitation was improved by its governor George Don, who also started its first police force and rebuilt St. Bernard's Hospital."
p1928
aS"Jacob van Heemskerk died at a Dutch victory here during the Eighty Years' War."
p1929
aS'A failed siege of this location in 1727 led to the construction of a contravallation line which is now the site of a town named after the Immaculate Conception.'
p1930
aS'At a later siege of this location, George Augustus (*) Eliot successfully defended a garrison here from French and Spanish forces.'
p1931
aS'It also suffered two sieges during the Reconquista, the first of which led to the exile of the Sultan of Granada, Muhammed III.'
p1932
aS'Diego Salinas surrendered this location to the Anglo-Dutch forces of George Rooke during the War_of_the_Spanish_Succession, and along with Minorca it was eventually ceded to Britain by Spain under the Treaty_of_Utrecht.'
p1933
aS'For 10 points, name this location in southern Spain, one of the legendary Pillars of Hercules.'
p1934
aS'The man for which it is named deserted Roderick, "the last of the Goths" and the king of Spain, in 711, the year he made the crossing for which he was immortalized.'
p1935
aS"993 years after Tariq ibn Siyad's Muslims took it, its owners were again deprived of it, and the deprivers possess it to this day."
p1936
aS'FTP, name this English possession, the "mount of Tariq," or in the Arabic, "Jebel al-Tariq.'
p1937
aS'"'
aS'Home to the last Barbary Macaque population in the whole of Europe, it joined the EU in 1973, but is a continuing source of diplomatic rows between two of its member states, also because of its role as an international tax haven.'
p1938
aS'Its current status dates back to the 1713 treaty of Utrecht.'
p1939
aS'During the Second World War, the German army devised the Operation Felix to capture this site that acted as an important and strategic British garrison and stronghold, but abandoned it subsequently.'
p1940
aS'Its name is supposed to be derived from Arabic, meaning mountain of Tariq, and in Greco-roman mythology, it was known as one of the Pillars of Hercules.'
p1941
aS'FTP, what is this site, famous for its rock, controlling the entry to the Mediterranean'
p1942
aS'The two-pound coins of this political entity have changed annually to depict different images of the 12 labors of Hercules.'
p1943
aS"The town of La Linea de la Concepcion lies on the northern border of this political entity, serving as the major tourist entry point to this entity's most popular tourist destination."
p1944
aS'That landmark in this entity is home to a population of semi-wild macaques, its namesake "apes." Home to a 1400-foot limestone monolith originally considered one of the Pillars of Hercules, FTP what is this British Overseas Possession at the southern tip of Spain known for its namesake "Rock"'
p1945
aS"This military leader's early career was spent fighting imperialists in the War of the Farrapos, or Tatters."
p1946
aS'This man, who retired to his semi-private island of Caprera, told Abraham_Lincoln he would join the Union side of the Civil War if the war shifted focus to abolishing slavery.'
p1947
aS'This crusader for Uruguayan independence led the "Expedition of the Thousand" and had an uneasy relationship with the Piedmont-Sardinian Prime Minister, Count Cavour.'
p1948
aS'For 10 points, name this Italian military leader of the Risorgimento known for his colorful "Redshirts."'
p1949
aS'At the Battle of SantAntonio, he fought against Juan Manuel de las Rosas after having made a trek from Rio Grande do Sul Province with his wife.'
p1950
aS'He defeated a French army at the Janiculum Hill although he was later made a member of the French National Assembly for his efforts in the Franco-Prussian_War.'
p1951
aS'Wounded and captured at Aspromonte after fighting the Austrians, he won the battles of Milazzo and Calatafimi, securing his control over Sicily before crossing the Strait of Messina and taking Naples.'
p1952
aS'Fighting for Victor Emmanuel, he captured Naples with the help of his red shirts.'
p1953
aS'For 10 points each, name this liberator of Italy.'
p1954
aS"This man fought as the head of the Uruguayan navy in the Guerra Grande, opposing Manuel Oribe, and he won victories at Cerro and Sant'Antonio."
p1955
aS'He was exiled from his home country after a failed Carbonari insurrection, and upon his return he battled Louis Napoleon and was exiled again.'
p1956
aS"In his most successful campaign, he won the battle of Volturno against the Neapolitans before Cavour's Piedmontese army prevented him from marching on Rome."
p1957
aS'FTP, name this leader of the red shirts whose military victories helped unite Italy.'
p1958
aS'Support for this person increased when James Graham was accused of opening his letters in the Post Office Espionage Scandal.'
p1959
aS'He started a journal whose name means "Thought and Action," and used those words as a slogan when serving in a triumvirate with Carlo Armellini and Aurelio Saffi.'
p1960
aS'That position dissolved when the pope supported a French invasion of Rome, so he moved to London and started the Friends of Italy.'
p1961
aS'Because he wanted a republican government, he opposed the monarchy with King Victor Emmanuel set up by Camillo di Cavour.'
p1962
aS'Name this activist who started the secret society known as Young Italy.'
p1963
aS'The execution of the Bandiera brothers after the seizure of information sent to this man led to the revelation that the British government was opening private mail.'
p1964
aS'He outlined his political philosophy in "On the Duties of Man," an essay published in his newspaper Apostleship of the People.'
p1965
aS'Disdained by (*) Cavour as the "chief of assassins," he was such staunch Republican that he did not participate in the constitutional monarchy under Victor Emmanuel.'
p1966
aS'For 10 points name this founder of Young Italy.'
p1967
aS'Newspapers started by this man include one named Apostleship of the People, and he expressed views on moral and political theory in his book Duties of Man.'
p1968
aS'One of this mans followers married a woman nicknamed Hurricane Jessie who wrote propaganda articles for this man, Jessie White.'
p1969
aS'A scandal resulted when the British authorities opened this mans mail after the execution of the Bandiera brothers.'
p1970
aS'This man briefly served as a Triumvir in a republic that was broken up by the troops of Napoleon_III, and late in life he refused to serve in Parliament because he did not want to swear allegiance to the king, perhaps because he had spent most of his exile plotting invasions of Savoy in the hopes of unifying his country.'
p1971
aS'For ten points, name this founder of the Young Italy movement.'
p1972
aS'When a group of his fellow students took refuge from a failed revolution in Austria, this man declared that he would only wear black.'
p1973
aS"The British government admitted to opening this man's mail after the execution of the Bandiera brothers."
p1974
aS'This man used the slogan "Thought and Action" and met opposition when he planned to use Charles Albert to lead an army against Radetzky in 1848.'
p1975
aS'In 1865, he refused an appointment to the Turin Parliament because he would not take an oath of allegiance to the monarchy.'
p1976
aS'Sentenced to death in absentia due to his part in an army coup and invasion in Savoy, this man was elected Triumvir of Rome after the assasination of Pellegrino Rossi.'
p1977
aS'He said that "neither Pope nor king," but rather "God and the people" would lead to victory the movement he founded.'
p1978
aS'For 10 points, name this leader of Young Italy, a democratic figure of the Risorgimento. '
p1979
aS'Members revered their great ancestors who they identified as the Yasa and later leaders include Tokhtamysh and Emir Mamay Mizra, whose support of Islam spurred its division into two branches.'
p1980
aS'At the battle of Kulikovo Russian princes won a major battle against Mamai who struggled to reach the military success that earlier rulers like Oz Beg and Batu had tasted.'
p1981
aS'Also known as the Khipchak Khanate, it was dealt a final blow in 1395 when Tamerlane sacked Sarai Berke.'
p1982
aS"FTP identify this western part of the Mongol empire that took its name from its founder's magnificent gleaming tent."
p1983
aS'Created as the territorial endowment of the descendents of Juchi, its capital was originally Sarai Batu, and later Sarai Berke.'
p1984
aS'Its greatest ruler was Oz Beg, and his death in 1341 marked the beginning of its decline.'
p1985
aS'For ten points, what is the better known name of the Kipchak Khanate, the Mongol state centered around the lower Volga river'
p1986
aS'This polity fractured after its ruler Berdibek was assassinated.'
p1987
aS'Uzbeg converted this polity to Islam.'
p1988
aS'This polity ended the rival Chupanid dynasty by sacking their capital of Tabriz.'
p1989
aS'This polity lost the Battle of the (*) Blue Waters to Grand Duke Algirdas, and its capital was Sarai.'
p1990
aS'This polity was reunited by Toktamysh, who became its last ruler when he was vanquished by Tamerlane.'
p1991
aS'This polity lost the Battle of Kulikovo to Dmitry Donskoi.'
p1992
aS'Earlier, this polity had turned Muscovy into a vassal state.'
p1993
aS'For ten points, name this Mongol horde that conquered Russia.'
p1994
aS'In one of the treaties which ended this war, one side ceded Bremen to Hanover and much of Pomerania\\n to Prussia.'
p1995
aS"One side's navy accomplished its first ever naval victory at the Battle of Gangut."
p1996
aS'The Ottomans\\n temporarily entered this war but withdrew after their victory in the Pruth River Campaign.'
p1997
aS"Poland's\\n Augustus the Strong was forced to abdicate after bowing out of this war with the Treaty of Altranstadt."
p1998
aS'One\\n side in this conflict was led by Charles XII, who defeated the Danes and won at Narva before losing at\\n Poltava and dying in 1718.'
p1999
aS"For 10 points, name this war between Sweden and a coalition led by Russia's\\n Peter_the_Great."
p2000
aS'One agitator of this conflict was broken at the wheel at Kazimiersz despite the pleas of his sister, Princess Ulrica; that man was Johann Patkul.'
p2001
aS"One battle in this war led to Denmark's exit in the Peace of Travendal, and another country in this conflict was occupied with Golitsyn as its governor in an event known as the Greater Wrath."
p2002
aS'The Treaty of Preobrazhenskoye spurred this conflict, which saw early defeat for the eventual victors under Charles Eugene de Croy.'
p2003
aS'This war ended by the Treaty of Nystadt included the decisive Battle of Poltava.'
p2004
aS"For 10 points, name this 1700s conflict that began at the Battle of Narva between Charles XII's Sweden and Peter_the_Great's Russia."
p2005
aS'In the aftermath of this conflict, Isokyro was burned to the ground.'
p2006
aS'An early treaty in this war saw one side agree not to intervene and cede territory to Holstein-Gottorp, the Peace of Travendal.'
p2007
aS'One side in this conflict scored its first ever naval victory at Gangut, while a land victory for the opposing side saw Charles Eugene de Croy defeated by a force one fourth the size of his.'
p2008
aS'Carl Gustav Rehnskiold commanded for one side in the bloodiest battle of this war, Poltava.'
p2009
aS'FTP, name this war during the time of Charles XII and Peter_the_Great, which saw the downfall of the empire of Sweden.'
p2010
aS'One event in this conflict involved the attempted peaceful extrication of a ruler from a house in which hundreds of members of the retrieving force were killed, also known as the Skirmish of Bender.'
p2011
aS'One treaty signed during this war handed over its instigator, the Livonian Johann Patkul, and replaced Augustus the Strong on the throne.'
p2012
aS'That treaty of Altranstadt forced Poland to stop fighting in this war.'
p2013
aS'A battle in this war taking place west of the Vorskla River saw 17,000 Swedes lose to an army that underwent great modernization following its defeat at Narva in this war.'
p2014
aS'For 10 points, name this conflict ended by the Treaty of Nystad which included the battle of Poltava and which pitted Charles XII against Peter_the_Great.'
p2015
aS'An immigration act passed as part of this program abolished the national-origins quota system.'
p2016
aS'A speech regarding this program stated that ""it is a place where man can renew contact with nature,"" and stated that it was meant to prevent an ""Ugly America.'
p2017
aS'"" That speech establishing this plan was delivered at the University of Michigan.'
p2018
aS'Among the other programs associated with it include Head Start, Job Corps, and Medicare.'
p2019
aS'For 10 points, name this domestic program of President Lyndon_B._Johnson.'
p2020
aS'Carnegie Corporation head John Gardner was tapped to lead this large-scale effort, one of the effects of which was to increase the ratio of the income of Blacks to that of Whites from 54 to 60 percent by the time its promulgator left office.'
p2021
aS'It included the creation of the Department of Housing and Urban Development and included the rapid creation of 32 national parks as well as Clean Air Act and laws on vehicle emissions.'
p2022
aS'Its cultural achievements include the National Endowments for the Arts and Humanities and the Corporation for Public Broadcasting.'
p2023
aS'First enunciated at a 1964 speech at the University of Michigan, its cornerstones included the Voting Rights Act and the creation of Medicare and Medicaid.'
p2024
aS'FTP what was the name for this ambitious legislative program enacted under Lyndon Johnson'
p2025
aS'A coup in this country in 1936 led to a four-year period called the 4 August Regime, and a coup   just before 1967 elections in this country led to a seven-year period known as the Regime of the  Colonels.'
p2026
aS"A major step towards this country's independence took place at the Battle of Navarino   in 1827, where several European powers defeated the combined forces of Egypt and the Ottoman  Empire."
p2027
aS"This country's actions in 1974 gave Turkey an excuse to invade Cyprus."
p2028
aS"Its current leader,  Antonis Samaras, recovered from a controversy over relations with this country's neighbor Macedonia."
p2029
aS'Name this country that officially calls itself the Hellenic Republic.'
p2030
aS'In this country, the Fourth of August Regime was led by John Metaxas.'
p2031
aS"Britain blockaded this nation in the Don Pacifico affair, but gave Zante to its king Otto I. Constantine II was overthrown by this nation's Regime of the Colonels."
p2032
aS'In the Treaty of Sevres, this nation gained Edirne but lost it in the Treaty of Lausanne to the Turks.'
p2033
aS'The Battle of Navarino was fought in this country, whose "enosis" is a proposed union with [*] Cyprus.'
p2034
aS"Fighting for this nation's independence, Lord Byron died before he could attack Lepanto."
p2035
aS'For 10 points, name this nation, which disputes the name of its northern neighbor Macedonia and which, in the Balkan Wars, won the Aegean island Crete.'
p2036
aS'Pro-Communist refugees from this country were accepted by Hungarian dictator Matyas Rakozi, who settled them in the city of Sztalinvarnos.'
p2037
aS'After a soldier chasing a beloved pet was shot upon crossing the border, this country fought its northern neighbor in the War of the Stray Dog.'
p2038
aS'After an unsuccessful coup at Kavala, this countrys last king was forced to flee the country.'
p2039
aS'Sailors from this country mutinied on the destroyer Velos in protest of anti-democratic activities by this countrys Regime of Colonels.'
p2040
aS'This country was blockaded by Great Britain during the Don Pacifico Affair, and this homeland of the rebel Alexander Ypsilanti lost most of the territory it gained from the Treaty of Sevres in the Treaty of Lausanne.'
p2041
aS'For ten points, name this neighbor of Bulgaria and Turkey, a European country with capital at Athens.'
p2042
aS'This country enforced a hard currency policy in the late 1990s, but failed to meet the budget deficit requirements of the Stability and Growth pact.'
p2043
aS"In the early 2000s, much of this country's budget went to defense spending due to a rivalry with Turkey."
p2044
aS'A government elected in October 2009 revised its deficit estimate from 5% to 12% of GDP, leading to an audit by Eurostat.'
p2045
aS"Syriza and Golden Dawn take up 89 seats in this country's parliament."
p2046
aS'Two separate bailout packages were prepared to avoid an exit from the Euro by this country, though neither the Grexit nor a default has yet occurred.'
p2047
aS'For 10 points, name this southern European country, led by Antonis Samaras, with capital at Athens.'
p2048
aS'Over thirty political prisoners in this country were broken out by the right-wing Organization X, which rose to prominence during the "December events".'
p2049
aS'A former Russian cavalry officer who led the "Society of Friends" of this nation was named Alexander Ypsilantis.'
p2050
aS'During its war of independence, the Ottomans lost the Battle of Navarino.'
p2051
aS'In ancient times, this modern-day nation fought against the Persians under the leadership of Themistocles at Salamis.'
p2052
aS"Cleisthenes and Solon laid the foundations for this nation's democracy."
p2053
aS'For 10 points, name this European country formerly led by George Papandreou from Athens.'
p2054
aS'Archbishop Mario Casariego was kidnapped by insurgents in this country, which was ruled by Mario Mendez Montenegro, a man whose tenure saw the atrocities committed by the so-called Butcher of Zacapa.'
p2055
aS"In the wake of Jorge Serrano's disastrous auto-coup, Ramiro de Leon Carpio became leader of this country."
p2056
aS'One leader of this country redistributed chunks of land bigger than 226 acres to the landless as part of the Agrarian Reform Law of 1952.'
p2057
aS"In the wake of Jorge Ubico's overthrow, a 1944 presidential election saw the rise of scholar Juan Jose Arevalo in this country."
p2058
aS"Carlos Castillo Armas wrestled power from this country's ruler Jacobo Arbenz, who was overthrown during a CIA coup led by Allen Dulles."
p2059
aS"For 10 points, identify this country whose plight was the subject of a biography by K'iche Rigoberta Menchu, and whose capital is a city named after the country."
p2060
aS'After World_War_II, President Bermejo became President of this country and promised to enact policies based on "Christian Socialism".'
p2061
aS"During the 1870's, Justo Rufino Barrios enacted liberal reforms in this country."
p2062
aS"At the turn of the century, this country's dictator Manuel Estrada, attempted to introduce Greco-Roman neo-paganism by instituting a cult of the goddess Minerva."
p2063
aS"This country's civil war ended in 1996 and was followed by a Truth and Reconciliation Commission."
p2064
aS'Earlier, President Jacobo Arbenz was overthrown here with the help of the United Fruit Company.'
p2065
aS'Notable for its large population of Quiche Mayans, for ten points name this Central American country just south of Mexico.'
p2066
aS"Some participators in this conspiracy earlier took part in Essex's Rebellion; two of those men were the brothers Christopher and John Wright, who were both killed at the Holbeache House along with this event's organizer."
p2067
aS'That man, Robert Catesby, was angered at the lack of religious freedom granted to Catholics by James I, whom this conspiracy targeted.'
p2068
aS'Ended on November 5, 1605, after the discovery of 36 barrels of a certain substance, this is, for 10 points, what plan to destroy the Houses of Parliament that featured the efforts of Guy Fawkes'
p2069
aS"The founder of this polity strengthened his position by marrying into the Lichchavi tribe, and after this polity's disintegration, much of the area around its founding would later become the seed of a kingdom under king Harsha."
p2070
aS'Much of the information about this polity comes from the monk Faxian, who lived at the court of the third ruler of this polity; that ruler would later be remembered as King Vikramaditya but was known in his time as the second king of a certain name.'
p2071
aS"This polity's second ruler revived the horse sacrifice, and another of its rulers repulsed the White Huns in 455 CE, and this polity's existence saw an extensive revision of the Arthasastra as well as the writings of the works of Kalidasa."
p2072
aS'For ten points, identify this polity which controlled northern India from 320 to 550 CE and was founded by a man who shares his name with the founder of the Mauryan dynasty.'
p2073
aS'This ruler nearly drowned at the Battle of Vittsjo, and after losing one war he was forced to pay a substantial indemnity at the Peace of Knared.'
p2074
aS'This ruler instituted the new parish regulations, making it easier for him to tax and conscript.'
p2075
aS'His treasury was boosted by the Falun Copper Mine.'
p2076
aS"This man promoted Scotsman Alexander Leslie to Field Marshal, and his army included the Scottish Mackay's Regiment and General Johan Baner."
p2077
aS'This man defeated General Koniecpolski in a war that ended with the Peace of Altmark.'
p2078
aS"The defense of Stralsund began this man's most storied campaign, which reached its high water mark at the Battle of the Lech, where his nimble light artillery fatally wounded the Count of Tilly."
p2079
aS'For 10 points, name this man killed at the Battle of Leutzen, the King of Sweden during the Thirty Years War.'
p2080
aS'This man executed his early political enemies Gaius Avidius Nigrinus and Lucius Quietus and he constructed a villa at Tivoli.'
p2081
aS'He was protected by his military advisor Marcius Turbo and by his secret police, the frumentarii.'
p2082
aS"A cult was created for his drowned lover Antinous, and he married Vibia Sabina at the behest of his predecessor's wife Pompeia Plotina."
p2083
aS'An uprising led by (*) Akiba ben Joseph led this man to suppress the Bar Kokhba Revolt in Judaea.'
p2084
aS'He rebuilt the Pantheon and he outlived his appointed successor Lucius Aelius, prompting him to appoint Antoninus Pius as his successor instead.'
p2085
aS'For ten points, identify this Roman emperor who succeeded Trajan and built a namesake wall across Britain.'
p2086
aS'This modern-day nation signed an agreement known as the ""Concordat of 1860"" with Pope Pius IX, which led to a series of religious uprisings.'
p2087
aS'W. Cameron Forbes led a commission to investigate unrest in this country, which helped lead to the election of President Stenio Vincent, ending a period of occupation in this country begun when Admiral William Caperton docked his flagship Washington in its main port.'
p2088
aS'A campaign to slaughter (*) black dogs in this nation was begun after its leader became convinced Dutty Boukman was haunting the shit out of its countryside.'
p2089
aS'The Battle of Siebert left Alexander Petion in control of the southern half of this country, which has been led by Paul Magloiy that won independence under Toussaint Louverture'
p2090
aS'One dictator of this nation kept a paramilitary force that abducted dissidents during the night known as the Tonton Macoutes.'
p2091
aS'Jean Dessalines was the first ruler of this nation after gaining independence, an event that saw the landing of a foreign army under Charles Leclerc.'
p2092
aS'Later, this nation was ruled by (*) Francois_Duvalier, popularly known as Papa Doc.'
p2093
aS'This nation gained independence during a revolt partially led by Toussaint Louverture.'
p2094
aS'For 10 points, name this Caribbean nation that shares the island of Hispaniola with the Dominican Republic.'
p2095
aS'Navassa Island, claimed by this country but occupied by the U.S., lies 40 miles to its west.'
p2096
aS'Another possession, Tortuga Island, is a former pirate haven; and Gonave Island lies between its two peninsulas.'
p2097
aS'The upper peninsula is bordered on the west and northwest by the Windward Passage and contains Limbe, one of the larger cities.'
p2098
aS'Its first peaceful transfer of power from one democratically elected president to another only occurred in 1996 when Rene Preval assumed power, even though it gained its independence nearly 200 years ago.'
p2099
aS'FTP, name this country previously led by Jean-Bertrand Aristide, a country that occupies the western part of Hispaniola.'
p2100
aS'An early resistance movement in this country was organized by a local queen named Anacaona.'
p2101
aS'One of its rulers lost power after foolishly entrusting sole leadership of his presidential guard to General Geffrard, who himself was ousted five years later in the wake of the Bizoton Affair.'
p2102
aS'Another came to power despite earlier partnering with Rigaud and Boyer in the failed "War of the Knives".'
p2103
aS'That man\'s rival shot himself with a silver bullet in the courtyard of his palace, whose name ironically translates to "without worry," after losing control of the southern half of this nation to a coalition of wealthy affranchis.'
p2104
aS'Alexandre Petion and Henri I jockeyed for control of this country, also ruled by Faustin I, following a revolution against forces led by Sonthonax and Charles Leclerc that briefly left Jean-Jacques Dessalines in power.'
p2105
aS'For 10 points, identify this French colony which saw the first successful slave revolution in the Caribbean organized by Toussaint Louverture.'
p2106
aS'One king of this country committed suicide in 1820 by shooting himself with a silver bullet rather than face a coup.'
p2107
aS'A more recent ruler of this country ordered the deaths of all black dogs due to the shape-shifting abilities of a rival.'
p2108
aS'That ruler of this country was served by his brutal secret police force known as the Tonton Macoutes.'
p2109
aS"This country once led by Papa Doc Duvalier fought for independence under Henri Christophe, Jean-Jacques Dessalines, and Toussaint L'Ouverture."
p2110
aS'FTP, name this Caribbean country on the western side of the island of Hispaniola.'
p2111
aS'The early succession of this dynasty was manipulated by the wife of its first emperor, Empress Lu.'
p2112
aS'This dynasty was interrupted by the fundamentalist Xin (SHIN) dynasty of Wang_Mang (WONG MONG).'
p2113
aS'After its fall, there ensued a 400 year ""Period of Disunion,"" which included the Three Kingdoms period.'
p2114
aS'This dynasty was founded after (*) Liu Bang (LOO BANG), or Gaozu (gow-ZOO), overthrew the Second Emperor of the Qin (CHIN) Dynasty.'
p2115
aS'For 10 points, name this dynasty that ruled from 208 BCE to 220 CE and names the ethnic majority of China.'
p2116
aS'The early succession of this dynasty was manipulated by the wife of its first emperor, Empress Lu.'
p2117
aS'This dynasty was interrupted by the fundamentalist Xin (SHIN) dynasty of Wang_Mang (WONG MONG).'
p2118
aS'After its fall, there ensued a 400 year ""Period of Disunion,"" which included the Three Kingdoms period.'
p2119
aS'It was founded after Liu Bang (LOO BANG), or Gaozu (gow-ZOO), overthrew the Second Emperor of the Qin (CHIN) Dynasty.'
p2120
aS'For 10 points, name this dynasty that ruled from 208 BCE to 220 CE and names the ethnic majority of China.'
p2121
aS'This dynasty saw two incidents in which Confucian scholars were imprisoned, the Disasters of Partisan Prohibitions.'
p2122
aS"This dynasty's Emperor Jing reduced the sizes of several principalities, sparking the Rebellion of the Seven States."
p2123
aS'The first emperor of this dynasty was a peasant named Liu Bang, who later became known as Gaozu.'
p2124
aS'It was briefly interrupted by the (*) Xin Dynasty after Wang_Mang took the throne.'
p2125
aS'This dynasty was preceded by the Qin and followed by the Three Kingdoms period.'
p2126
aS'For 10 points, name this dynasty which lends its name to the majority ethnic group of China.'
p2127
aS'Wang_Mang briefly replaced this dynasty with his Xin (SHIN) dynasty, separating this dynasty into "Western" and "Eastern" periods.'
p2128
aS'It was founded by Liu Bang and succeeded the Qin (CHIN) dynasty.'
p2129
aS'During this dynasty, Confucianism became prominent and the first census was taken.'
p2130
aS'For 10 points, identify this dynasty once ruled by Wudi (WOO-DEE), which shares a name with the primary ethnic group of China.'
p2131
aS'The founder of this dynasty was threatened with having his father boiled alive, to which he responded "Send me a cup of the soup." Following the death of Emperor Hui of this dynasty, Hui\'s mother instituted a reign of terror against anyone who dared to oppose her own clan of Lu.'
p2132
aS'This dynasty is separated into eastern and western periods by an interregnum caused by Wang_Mang.'
p2133
aS'This dynasty was founded after Xiang Yu and his Kingdom of Chu were defeated by Liu Bang.'
p2134
aS'For 10 points, name this dynasty which succeeded the Qin [CHIN] Dynasty and was  followed by the Era of the Three Kingdoms.'
p2135
aS'This dynasty sent Zhang Qian on exploring missions, and it was confronted by the Rebellion of the Seven States.'
p2136
aS'The Records of A Grand Historian were written by Sima Qian during this dynasty, and after the Battle of Jushi, Emperor Wu forced the Xiongnu to become its tributaries.'
p2137
aS'An interregnum by Wang_Mang\'s Xin dynasty divides this dynasty into [*] "Eastern" and "Western" parts.'
p2138
aS'It was founded by Liu Bang after the Qin dynasty and was followed by the Three Kingdoms period.'
p2139
aS'Challenged by the palace eunuchs and the Daoist Yellow_Turban_Rebellion, for 10 points, name the Chinese dynasty after which the primary ethnic group of China is named.'
p2140
aS"A contemporary account of this period is given in the Shih-chi of Ssu-ma Ch'ien."
p2141
aS'It is notable for the creation of the fu form and saw the introduction of Buddhism.'
p2142
aS'Founded when Liu Pang overthrew Hsiang Y, this dynasty was briefly interrupted by the Hsin when the rule of the child Emperor Ruzi was overthrown by Wang_Mang.'
p2143
aS'It is noted for Western and Eastern periods when the capitals were Chang-an and Lo-yang, respectively.'
p2144
aS'For ten points, name this Chinese dynasty lasting from 206 BCE to 220 CE.'
p2145
aS'It reached its summit in its victories over Waldemar IV of Denmark, gaining in the Treaty of Stralsund a virtual monopoly in Scandinavia, but its hegemony was curbed by a Dutch defeat in 1441.'
p2146
aS'The last diet was held in 1669, but this group never formally dissolved.'
p2147
aS'Originating in a treaty between Lbeck and Hamburg in 1241, its goal was to obtain mutual security and exclusive trading rights for its members.'
p2148
aS'FTP, identify this medieval German mercantile league.'
p2149
aS'Its failure to unify against the hostility of Richard II and the Merchant Adventurers was the first sign of its decline.'
p2150
aS'Its greatest enemy used Kampen and the towns of the Zuider Zee as a lure to split it in two and co-opt the Livonian cities, but they rebelled and joined with their Wendish rivals in the Confederation of Cologne to recover the fortress of Halsingborg and rights to trade through the Oresund.'
p2151
aS'The Peace of Stralsund confirmed its victory over Waldemar Attedag, despite his sack of Visby in 1361.'
p2152
aS'First formed to facilitate trade along the Kiel "salt road," FTP, name this medieval group of merchant associations from Lubeck, Hamburg, and other north German cities.'
p2153
aS'Its fleet unsuccessfully attacked Helsiborg under Mayor Wittenborgs leadership, and it secured concessions from Eric the Priest-Hater in the Treaty of Tongsberg.'
p2154
aS'A meeting in Wisnac led to its first Tohopestate in order to defend against princely influences, and Duke Albrecht of Mecklenburg sought to destroy it by hiring the Vitalenbruder pirates.'
p2155
aS'It established a Kontor at Novgorod and It reached its peak following the Treaty of Straslund with Waldemar IV of Denmark, and by the time its last diet convened in 1669, only Bremen, Hamburg, and its original center remained.'
p2156
aS'FTP, identify this union centered at Lubeck, an association German towns which dominated trade in northern Europe for centuries.'
p2157
aS"organization's warehouse in the King's Lynn was constructed as a result of the Treaty_of_Utrecht."
p2158
aS'Control of the Scania Market was instrumental in its rise to power, which was hindered by the Peace of Vordingborg.'
p2159
aS'Klaus Stortebeker and the Likedeelers harassed possessions of this polity, such as Abo.'
p2160
aS'After it captured Visby, it signed the Treaty of Stralsund with Waldemar IV and received 15 percent of Danish trade profits.'
p2161
aS'It was founded by Henry the Lion, and reached its height in the fourteenth century.'
p2162
aS'Bremen, Lubeck, and Hamburg were its only members by 1669.'
p2163
aS'For 10 points, name this medieval trade confederation of the Baltic.'
p2164
aS'While en route to a confirmation ceremony, this ruler was captured by Guy I of Ponthieu.'
p2165
aS'This man may have been crowned as ruler by the archbishop Stigand.'
p2166
aS'This ruler obtained fiefdoms for his brothers Gyrth and Leofwine after the death of Leofric, whose heir Aelfgar rebelled against this ruler with Welsh aid.'
p2167
aS"This ruler's brother was deposed as duke of Mercia by Morcar."
p2168
aS"This man's father was the earl of Wessex and Kent and, before his fall from favor, an important advisor to Edward_the_Confessor."
p2169
aS"This man was victorious against an alliance formed by his brother Tostig with Harald Hardrada; that victory came at Stamford Bridge, just two weeks before this ruler's fatal loss."
p2170
aS"For ten points, identify this ruler of England who was killed in 1066 by William_the_Conqueror's troops at Hastings."
p2171
aS'On one expedition where he would help capture the fortress of Dinan from Conan II, he was shipwrecked and held hostage by the Count of Ponthieu.'
p2172
aS'He cultivated his brothers Gyrth and Leofwine, who died serving him, but had intervened against his brother Tostig, giving his earldom to Morcar of Northumbria.'
p2173
aS'This caused Tostig to reject this mans election by the Witenagemot and successfully take up arms against him at the Battle of Fulford, though he and his Norse ally, nicknamed Hard Reign, were soon defeated at Stamford Bridge, though this ruler had far less success against a second invader.'
p2174
aS'For ten points, name this last Anglo-Saxon King of England, defeated at Hastings.'
p2175
aS'This man married Eadgyth, the widow of one of his military rivals, Gruffydd ap Llywelyn of Gwynned, whom this man fought a series of border skirmishes against.'
p2176
aS"After becoming the Earl of East Anglia, this man was briefly exiled due to his father's insubordination regarding a fight in Dover, leading this man to spend time in Ireland in the court of King Dermont of Leinster."
p2177
aS'After being imprisoned at Beaurain by Count Guy of (*) Ponthieu, this man supposedly swore an oath to a foreign noble that he would not accept a certain English title.'
p2178
aS'The victor over his brother Tostig and King Harald Hardrada at Stamford Bridge, FTP, name this successor of Edward_the_Confessor, who lost the crown and his life to William_the_Conqueror at Hastings.'
p2179
aS'This author wrote a novel whose title character falls in love with Mary, who is in love with a lost sailor named James Marvyn.'
p2180
aS"This author of The Minister's Wooing also wrote a memoir entitled Palmetto Leaves."
p2181
aS'She wrote about an escaped slave living in the Great Dismal Swamp in the novel Dred.'
p2182
aS'Abraham_Lincoln supposedly called (*) her "the little woman who wrote the book that started this great war," referring to her novel featuring an evil slave owner named Simon Legree.'
p2183
aS"For 10 points, name this author of Uncle Tom's Cabin."
p2184
aS'This president won re-election after bemoaning the efforts of the ""Do-Nothing Congress.'
p2185
aS'"" He replaced Henry Wallace in 1944 after leading a namesake committee to fight wasteful military spending.'
p2186
aS"A recovery program for Europe was named for this President's Secretary of State, George Marshall."
p2187
aS"This man authorized the use of the atomic bomb on Hiroshima and Nagasaki to force Japan's surrender at the end of World_War_II."
p2188
aS'For 10 points, name this President whom the Chicago Daily Tribune claimed was defeated by Thomas Dewey.'
p2189
aS'This man rose to prominence as the head of a namesake ""Senate Committee to Investigate the National Defense Program.'
p2190
aS'"" His Vice-President, Alben Barkley, was nicknamed the ""Veep.'
p2191
aS'"" This President unsuccessfully vetoed the Taft-Hartley Act, attacked the ""Do-Nothing Congress,"" and promoted his ""Fair Deal.'
p2192
aS'"" A Chicago Tribune headline falsely claimed that (*) Thomas Dewey had defeated this man.'
p2193
aS'This President integrated the armed forces and entered the U.S. into the Korean_War.'
p2194
aS'For 10 points, name this President who authorized the use of atomic bombs in World_War_II.'
p2195
aS"This man's first senatorial reelection bid was challenged by by Manvel Davis."
p2196
aS'A product of the Pendergast political machine, this man chaired a namesake committee that investigated waste in arms manufacturing during WWII.'
p2197
aS'He called the legislature at the time of his presidency the "Do Nothing Congress", despite Congress passing the Taft-Hartley Act over his veto.'
p2198
aS'As president, he established the containment policy through his namesake doctrine, recognized Israel and desegregated the military.'
p2199
aS'For 10 points, name this president who was, along with Thomas Dewey, the subject of an erroneous Chicago Tribune headline.'
p2200
aS'Along with Burton Wheeler, he co-sponsored an act which put the federal government at the head of railroad reorganization, and also headed the group that exposed production deficiencies and graft in the lead-up to World_War_II, the Special Committee Investigating National Defense.'
p2201
aS'His Attorney General wrote the majority opinion in Mapp_v._Ohio as well as School District of Abington v. Schempp.'
p2202
aS'In a famous speech, he stated that the United_States must support free people fighting (*) subjugation against either armed minorities or external pressures, which led to aid being sent to Greece and Turkey.'
p2203
aS'For 10 points, identify this figure the predecessor to Dwight Eisenhower as President of the United_States.'
p2204
aS'Yvor Winters disapproved of this poet\'s lines about "the graduate opacities of evening" which take numbers of people away to somewhere "Virginal perhaps, less fragmentary, cool.'
p2205
aS'"  This poet wondered what it would be like to drink the sun as did and does Xochipilli (cho-chee-pih-lee) in "The Circumstance.'
p2206
aS'"  In another poem, he advised some "brilliant kids" to "frisk with your dog" at the beach while remembering that "the bottom of the sea is cruel," while the speaker remembers having "heard a kitten in the wilderness" at the end of "Chaplinesque.'
p2207
aS'"  James Agee took the title for a book of poetry from this man\'s line "Permit me voyage, love, into your hands," which appears in the third section of "Voyages.'
p2208
aS'"  However, he is best known for a long poem whose first section asks the titular object to descend and of its "curveship lend a myth to God.'
p2209
aS'"  His three books include Key West and White Buildings, as well as a longer work which includes sections about Quaker Hill, "The Harbor Dawn," and Cape Hatteras.'
p2210
aS'FTP, name this American poet of The Bridge.'
p2211
aS'Following one trial in this region, four people previously convicted to 10 years hard labor for their involvement in the death of a prizefigher had their sentence commuted to one hour, to be served in the office of governor Lawrence Judd.'
p2212
aS'The overthrow of its government was decried as illegal in the Blount Report, which was later contradicted by the testimonies in the (*) Morgan Report.'
p2213
aS"Despite collecting 38,000 signatures, the Ku'e petition failed to annex this region, whose monarchy was rendered powerless by the Bayonet Constition."
p2214
aS"This region's sovereignty was transferred to the United_States with a ceremony on the steps of the Iolani Palace."
p2215
aS'For 10 points, name this region ruled by Queen Lili`uokalani before becoming the 50th U.S. State.'
p2216
aS'After a treaty involving it was withdrawn from the Senate, the president appointed James Blount to investigate the situation.'
p2217
aS'Blount determined that the behavior of Minister John L. Stevens, who had ordered marines to be landed from the cruiser Boston, was unacceptable.'
p2218
aS'Later Albert Willis was sent as the new minister, and instructed to maintain the liberal constitution of 1887.'
p2219
aS'When a republic was proclaimed in 1894, Lorrin Thurston declined the presidency in favor of Sanford Dole.'
p2220
aS'FTP, name this territory which was annexed by the U.S. after a power struggle was lost by Queen Liliuokalani.'
p2221
aS'Most recently Mary Brogger created a bronze monument to this event, while a streetcar driver intentionally crashed his vehicle into one of the first monuments to this event, created by Johannes Gelert.'
p2222
aS"William Seliger turned state's evidence in the aftermath of this event, and much later Albert Weinert created a monument to this event at Waldheim."
p2223
aS'August (*) Spies spoke from an open wagon immediately prior to this event.'
p2224
aS"Eight police officers died, leading to the trial of eight anarchists, none of whom had thrown the bomb that led to the police officers' deaths near the McCormick plant."
p2225
aS'For 10 points, name this 1886 demonstration of striking workers in Chicago.'
p2226
aS'The last speaker here was Samuel Fielden.'
p2227
aS'Carter Harrison joined the crowd for the time and left before it started.'
p2228
aS'Following a trial which Joseph Gary presided over, Albert Parsons, George Engel, and others were hanged, and Louis Lingg committed suicide.'
p2229
aS'The day before this event, one person was killed outside the McCormick Harvesting Compnay Plant.'
p2230
aS'Governor John Peter Altgeld pardoned three of the men convicted in this event, and later continued a pro-union stance during the Pullman Strike.'
p2231
aS'For 10 points, identify this incident of May 4, 1886 where someone threw a bomb into the crowd at a Chicago marketplace.'
p2232
aS'Benjamin Butler represented some of the men convicted after this event, all of whom were later pardoned by John Peter Altgeld.'
p2233
aS'Immediately preceded by a fight at the McCormick Harvesting Machine Co. at which four were killed by police, this event is commemorated by bonfires at some May Day celebrations.'
p2234
aS'For ten points, name this tragedy that helped lead to the downfall of the Knights_of_Labor; a May 4th, 1886 riot touched off when someone detonated a bomb at a labor rally in Chicago.'
p2235
aS'This man both wounded and was wounded by Humphrey Marshall, who opposed a resolution by this man that dictated the type of fabric that could be worn by legislators in a certain body.'
p2236
aS'That legislation was a predecessor to a better-known (+) policy by this man whose components included a high tariff and the continued existence of the Bank of the United_States.'
p2237
aS'In addition to the American System, this man was responsible for legislation that was passed in response to concerns over the passage of the (*) Wilmot_Proviso, and ended the balance of free and slave states.'
p2238
aS'For 10 points, name this legislator whose negotiation of the Compromise_of_1850 led him to be dubbed ""The Great Compromiser.'
p2239
aS'""'
p2240
aS"The Black Tariff was passed after this politician's public disbursement package was dropped from the bill, and he was a counsel for Aaron_Burr in Burr's treason trial."
p2241
aS'This man helped negotiate the Treaty_of_Ghent, and he secured American diplomatic recognition for most Latin American nations.'
p2242
aS'This man fought the Bank War against Andrew_Jackson, and he supported internal improvements as part of his American System.'
p2243
aS'He elevated John_Quincy_Adams to the presidency in 1824 while Speaker of the House by making the Corrupt Bargain.'
p2244
aS'For 10 points, name this Whig Senator from Kentucky who helped make the Missouri Compromise and the Compromise_of_1850.'
p2245
aS'The private correspondences of this politician were published by Calvin Colton.'
p2246
aS"Early on, he filled the Senate seat of Buckner Thruston when Thruston became a judge, after he'd earlier replaced John Adair as Senator."
p2247
aS'After being called a liar, he fought a duel at Silver Creek with Humphrey Marshall and was shot in the thigh.'
p2248
aS'He was eulogized in a speech which claimed that on the question of liberty, ""he knew no North, no South, no East, no West.'
p2249
aS'"" The Decatur House in Washington exhibits a "freedom suit" brought against him by his slave Charlotte Dupuy, whom he later freed.'
p2250
aS'This owner of the Ashland estate is the subject of a two-volume life by Carl Schurz.'
p2251
aS'Referred to as the ""Old Prince"" by his friends, he infamously stated that ""he\'d rather be right than be president"" after a failed run.'
p2252
aS'FTP, name this member of the "Great Triumvirate" who was made Secretary of State by a corrupt bargain, and championed the American System.'
p2253
aS'He began his congressional career as a Warhawk, urging President James Madison towards war with Britain in 1812.'
p2254
aS'After serving as a delegate to the peace talks in Ghent, he returned to Congress to propose an activist state that would promote the creation of a national, interdependent economy through the establishment of a national bank, protective tariff, and a network of internal improvements, collectively known as the "American System".'
p2255
aS'FTP, name this American politician instrumental in the passage of the Missouri Compromise and the Compromise_of_1850.'
p2256
aS'This man once dueled Humphrey Marshall over a resolution he introduced to his states General Assembly.'
p2257
aS'He was the namesake of an art collector and industrialist who was saved by John Leishman from murder at the hands of Alexander Berkman.'
p2258
aS'Along with John C. Calhoun, he pushed for the passing of the Tariff of 1816 as part of his proposed American System.'
p2259
aS'The fourth-place finisher in the 1824 presidential election, he threw his support to John_Quincy_Adams, later becoming Adamss Secretary of State in a Corrupt Bargain.'
p2260
aS'For 10 points, identify this War Hawk and Great Compromiser, a Whig from Kentucky.'
p2261
aS"This man's slave, Charlotte Dupuy, sued for her independence nearly two decades before Dred Scott."
p2262
aS"This politician's Annual Message of 1815 contained the Seven Points of his high-tariff plan to fund internal development."
p2263
aS'As Secretary of State, this man dueled with John Randolph over the accusation that he supported John_Quincy_Adams for political gain in the so-called "Corrupt Bargain.'
p2264
aS'" He brokered an agreement that allowed Maine to enter the Union as a free state.'
p2265
aS'For 10 points, name this longtime Congressman from Kentucky, a Whig known as "The Great Compromiser.'
p2266
aS'"'
aS'A Holy Roman Emperor of this name and number defeated Arduin of Ivera to get himself crowned King of Italy and was later canonized by Eugenius III.'
p2267
aS'A French king of this name and number established the Chambre Ardente to put heretics on trial and signed the Treaty of (+) Chambord with some German protestants as part of the war he inherited from his father, Francis I, against Charles V. Another monarch of this name and number issued the Constitutions of Clarendon.'
p2268
aS'That same monarch with this name and number was the second husband of (*) Eleanor of Aquitaine and father of Richard the Lionheart.'
p2269
aS'For 10 points, give this name of the English king who ordered the death of Thomas Becket.'
p2270
aS'Francis Maitland has claimed that a treatise written by Richard, grand-nephew of Roger the Poor, was "one of the most wonderful things" of this man\'s reign.'
p2271
aS'In addition to the Dialogus de Scaccario, other economic developments of his reign include the development of the possessory writ and the practice of scutage, in which men could pay their way out of military service.'
p2272
aS'This man also attempted to reassert the supremacy of the state over the church in the Constitutions of Clarendon.'
p2273
aS'FTP, name this Plantagenet king of England, famous for his clashes with Archbishop Thomas Beckett, and his marriage to Eleanor of Aquitaine.'
p2274
aS'This monarch established a legal framework for his realm with the Ordinance of Blois.'
p2275
aS'This ruler was inspired to go on religious pilgrimages by his minister, Emond Auger.'
p2276
aS'During his reign, Protestant worship was restricted to just one suburb of each town through the Peace of Bergerac.'
p2277
aS"A succession crisis developed after this childless king's brother and leader of the Malcontents, Francis, duke of Anjou, died."
p2278
aS'He succeeded (*) Sigismund II as King of Poland-Lithuania.'
p2279
aS'During the Day of the Barricades, he was driven out of Paris by Henry of Guise.'
p2280
aS'He was ultimately assassinated by a monk named Jacques Clement, making him the last Valois king.'
p2281
aS"For 10 points, name this French king who presided over the Saint Bartholomew's Day Massacre."
p2282
aS'The early years of his rule saw a revolt by Fawkes de Breaut, the French Dauphin who agreed to leave England in the Treaty of Kingston.'
p2283
aS'His regents included Hugh de Burgh and William the Marshall, and he faced an alliance between the Earl of Pembroke and Llywelyn the Great of Wales.'
p2284
aS'The Statute of Merton and the Battle of Evesham were among the fruits of his rivalry with the barons under Simon de Montfort, though he was forced to sign the Provisions of Oxford.'
p2285
aS'FTP, name this son and successor of John who ruled England from 1216 to 1267, when his son Edward I became regent.'
p2286
aS"This ruler's court favorites are known as Les Mignons, and included Anne de Joyeuse and the Duke of Epernon."
p2287
aS'Upon his coronation, this ruler was forced to consent to his namesake twenty-one articles, but one requirement of that position was that he marry Anna the Jagiellonian, which he never did.'
p2288
aS"A major point of contention during this man's reign was his childless marriage to Louis of Lorraine-Vaudemont, and in his early years, this ruler commanded the Royalist troops at the Battle of Jarnac in which Louis of Bourbon-Conde was killed."
p2289
aS"This ruler's promulgation of the Edict of Beaulieu, which granted concessions to the Huguenots, led Henry of Guise to form the Catholic League, and that man would ultimately force this ruler out of Paris shortly after which this ruler was assassinated by Jacques Clement."
p2290
aS"The son of Catherine de' Medici and Henry II, for 10 points, name this first freely elected King of Poland-Lithuania who is better known as the last of the Valois kings of France."
p2291
aS'During this mans reign, the castle of Alnwick fell due to the betrayal of Sir Ralph Grey to one of his political rivals.'
p2292
aS'Late in his reign, he executed George, the duke of Clarence, under suspicions that he had earlier allied with his rival.'
p2293
aS"He solidified an alliance with Burgundy by marrying his sister Margaret to Duke Charles the Bold, although Charles' inaction forced this monarch to sign the Treaty of Picquigny following an unsuccessful invasion of France."
p2294
aS'His army was defeated at the Battle of Edgecote Moor as part of a rebellion against him, facilitated by his secret marriage to the commoner Elizabeth Woodville.'
p2295
aS'A longtime rival of Louis XI, that rebellion against his rule was led by the "Kingmaker" Richard Neville, earl of Warwick, who threw him in jail in 1469.'
p2296
aS'FTP, name this British king, the victor at Tewkesbury and the father of the Princes in the Tower.'
p2297
aS'This monarch signed the Treaty of Etaples with Charles the Affable to cut of support for a domestic rival and sponsored the construction of the first European drydock.'
p2298
aS'One of this man\'s ministers developed a contradictory tax policy based on outward demonstration of wealth, the so-called "Morton\'s Fork", and he married off his eldest son in the Treaty of Medina del Campo.'
p2299
aS"One of this man's rivals posed as Edward VI and spoke a laughably minimal amount of English, while another posed as the Duke of York."
p2300
aS'This man overcame Lambert Simnel and Perkin Warbeck, and rose to the throne after a military victory where he was aided by Sir William Stanley and the Earl of Oxford in putting an end to the House of Plantagenet.'
p2301
aS'The victor at the Battle_of_Bosworth_Field over Richard III, for 10 points, identify this founder Tudor Dynasty and father of Henry VIII.'
p2302
aS'Innocent VIII issued a papal bull after this king forcibly removed the Stafford brothers from sanctuary after their abortive rebellion with Lord Lovell.'
p2303
aS'One of his first actions was to repeal the Titulus Regius.'
p2304
aS'This king greatly improved wool exports by signing the Intercursus Magnus with various European powers.'
p2305
aS'This king ended his invasion of France with the Peace of Etaples, and at the Battle of Stoke Field defeated John (*) de la Pole and the kitchen servant Lambert Simnel.'
p2306
aS'This king\'s Chancellor John Morton used a namesake "fork" to increase his treasury, and while not a Stuart, this king used the Treaty of Medina del Campo to marry his son Arthur to a Spanish princess.'
p2307
aS'FTP, name this king who later married another of his sons to Catherine of Aragon after defeating Richard III at Bosworth to become the first Tudor monarch, the predecessor of Henry VIII.'
p2308
aS"One of this ruler's first official actions was to retroactively declare himself King and charge his opponents with treason, although he spared the Earl of Lincoln, eventually leading to the Battle of Stoke."
p2309
aS'He destroyed all copies of the Titulus Regius and.'
p2310
aS"his reign saw the signing the Treaty of Etaples, abandoning his invasion plans for France, in exchange for a large payment, as well as France's promise no longer support a revolt following those by Stafford and Lovell and (*) Lambert Simnel."
p2311
aS'He joined with the Earl of Oxford in his position as Earl of Richmond to win a victory after landing at Milford Haven, defeating Richard III at the Battle of Bosworth field.'
p2312
aS'After the death of his son Arthur, this monarch arranged for Catherine of Aragon to marry his younger son, who succeeded him.'
p2313
aS'FTP, identify this English King who Wars_of_the_Roses to found the Tudor dynasty, the father of Henry VII.'
p2314
aS'Forces loyal to this ruler won the Battle of Depford Bridge, crushing the Cornish Rebellion, and shortly after coming to power this ruler had to put down a rebellion led by Viscount Lovell and the Stafford Brothers.'
p2315
aS'This king\'s Lord Chancellor implemented a tax policy known as "Morton\'s Fork", and he signed a trade agreement with the Dutch known as the "Intercursus Magnus", as well as the Treaty of Medina Del Campo with Ferdinand and Isabella of Spain, by which a Spanish princess was to marry his eldest son, Arthur.'
p2316
aS'Originally of Welsh descent, he landed in England in opposition to Richard III.'
p2317
aS'For ten points, name this victor of the Battle_of_Bosworth_Field, the first Tudor King of England.'
p2318
aS'21 (Tiebreaker).'
p2319
aS'This monarch, who personally oversaw the sieges of Therouanne and Tournay, defeated an uprising called the Pilgrimage_of_Grace.'
p2320
aS'This king met with Francis I at the Field of the Cloth of Gold and was advised by(*) Thomas Wolsey.'
p2321
aS"This king appointed Thomas Cranmer as Archbishop of Canterbury, and Cranmer subsequently assisted this king's religious reforms as he seized the monasteries and declared himself head of the Church of England."
p2322
aS'For 10 points, identify this English monarch who famously had six wives.'
p2323
aS"During this king's reign, Scotland honored the Auld Alliance by invading England, but Thomas Howard repulsed them at the Battle of Flodden Field."
p2324
aS'This king faced a rebellion called the Pilgrimage_of_Grace and issued the Act of Supremacy.'
p2325
aS'This monarch was advised by Thomas Cromwell after a break with his former advisor Thomas More, whom he had beheaded.'
p2326
aS'Succeeded by his young son (*) Edward VI, this monarch formed the Anglican Church in order to divorce his wife Catherine of Aragon.'
p2327
aS"For 10 points, name this king, Elizabeth I's father, who had six wives."
p2328
aS"During this man's reign, the Earl of Surrey killed James IV and about 10,000 Scots at the Battle of Flodden Field."
p2329
aS"The Pilgrimage_of_Grace was a demonstration against this man's policies."
p2330
aS'The Book of Common Prayer was written by his Archbishop of Canterbury Thomas Cranmer.'
p2331
aS"The Act of Supremacy grew out of Thomas Wolsey's failure to persuade Pope Clement VII to annul this man's first marriage."
p2332
aS'For 10 points, name this man whose divorce from Catherine of Aragon and marriage to Anne Boleyn sparked the English Reformation.'
p2333
aS'By the time he was eight, this man could read verses in Latin bestowed upon him by Erasmus, as well as works written in Greek and French.'
p2334
aS'He also was a great patron of music and the arts, with musicians like Thomas Wyatt and artists like Hans Holbein at his future court.'
p2335
aS'On the death of his older brother, this man married his widow, Catherine of Aragon.'
p2336
aS'FTP name this second Tudor king of England, known for his six wives.'
p2337
aS"Upon coronation, this ruler had his father's ministers Edmund Dudley and Richard Empson, who had been involved in the Council Learned in the Law, convicted of treason and executed."
p2338
aS'Historian Edward Hall, a contemporary of this ruler, wrote about how this man had Henry Courtenay executed for his leading role in the Exeter Conspiracy, which may not have existed.'
p2339
aS'This ruler defeated troops under Jacques de la Palice with the help of Holy Roman Emperor Maximilian I at the Battle of the Spurs.'
p2340
aS"Robert Aske led the Pilgrimage_of_Grace in opposition to the rule of this man and the Dissolution of the Monasteries, which had been enacted by this ruler after the passage of the Acts of Supremacy, which gave him control over his country's churches."
p2341
aS'Served by ministers such as Wolsey and Cranmer, for 10 points, name this leader of the Protestant Reformation in England, a Tudor monarch who had six wives.'
p2342
aS'When this man visited Argentina, Severino Di Giovanni planned to bomb the train he was on.'
p2343
aS'His namesake ""moratorium"" called for a one-year cessation of reparation payments by Germany.'
p2344
aS'This man signed the act outlawing yellow dog contracts named for Norris and La Guardia.'
p2345
aS'This man had (*) Douglas MacArthur break up the Walter W. Waters-led Bonus_Army.'
p2346
aS'For 10 points, name this President whose time in office was marred by his poor response to Black Tuesday, which occurred at the start of the Great Depression.'
p2347
aS"Late in life, this man travelled in Hermann Goring's former train car across West Germany to discredit the Morgenthau Plan."
p2348
aS"This President's Secretary of State responded to the Mukden Incident with the Stimson Doctrine."
p2349
aS'This man led the Food Administration during World_War_I, and MacArthur disobeyed his command to not attack the Bonus_Army.'
p2350
aS'He defeated Al Smith and created the Reconstruction Finance Corporation, but was ultimately remembered for his namesake shantytowns that resulted from the Great Depression.'
p2351
aS'For 10 points, name this President defeated in 1932 by FDR.'
p2352
aS'John_Maynard_Keynes called him the only man to emerge from Paris with an enhanced reputation, and during World_War_I, he was the head of the Committee for Relief in Belgium, while afterwards he headed the American Relief Administration.'
p2353
aS'During his election campaign, he called Prohibition a noble experiment, and while serving as Secretary of Commerce, he spearheaded the project that would become the St. Lawrence Seaway, and during his election campaign, he called Prohibition an experiment noble in motive.'
p2354
aS'FTP, identify this President during the beginning of the Great Depression who was defeated in 1932 by FDR.'
p2355
aS'This case went a step further in testing a law than a previous case based around Daniel Desdunes.'
p2356
aS"The plaintiff in this case was detained by a private detective who had been hired by the local (+) Citizens' Committee."
p2357
aS'The majority opinion in this case cited cases from thirteen years earlier that had said no ""badge"" was being imposed, and the opinion was written by Henry Billings Brown.'
p2358
aS"Albion Tourgee was hired as one side's legal counsel, which sought to test the (*) Separate Car Act."
p2359
aS'For 10 points, name this Supreme Court case in which the lone dissent by John Marshall Harlan stated that ""our Constitution is color blind"" in trying to overturn a Louisiana law that supported ""separate but equal"" segregation.'
p2360
aS'As a law clerk in 1952, William Rehnquist wrote a memo detailing his support of the decision in this earlier case.'
p2361
aS'It was argued on behalf of the Citizens Committe by Albion Tourge.'
p2362
aS'Justice David Brewer did not participate, and Justice Henry Billings Brown wrote the majority in this decision, arguing that the "badge of inferiority" assumed by the plaintiff was one he placed onto himself.'
p2363
aS'It was a 7-1 decision, with John Marshall Harlan\'s lone dissent saying that the "Constitution is color-blind" on behalf of its one-eighth black plaintiff from Louisiana.'
p2364
aS'For 10 points, identify this 1896 Supreme Court case that upheld the "separate but equal" doctrine.'
p2365
aS'Justice Thomas referred to this decision in his concurrence Parents v. Seattle, and, as a law clerk, William Rehnquist wrote that this decision was right and should be reaffirmed.'
p2366
aS'Justice David Brewer did not participate in this case, and Albion W. Tourgee served as lead counsel in arguing for the Citizens Committee.'
p2367
aS'In dissenting, Justice John Harlan wrote that the law was color blind and believed that the one-eighth-black man should not have had to move from the Louisiana railroad car.'
p2368
aS'FTP, name this 1896 Supreme Court Case which established separate but equal.'
p2369
aS'A controversial memo by William Rehnquist, written while he was still a law clerk, said that the decision in this case was right and should be reaffirmed.'
p2370
aS'John Marshall Harlan was the lone dissenter in this case, while the majority opinion was written by Henry Billings Brown, and this case was tried as a result of an earlier one against Louisiana by the same plaintiff.'
p2371
aS'The plaintiff in this case alleged that his 13th and 14th amendment rights were violated, and the controversy began when the plaintiff stood up on a Louisiana railroad car and announced that he was one-eighth black.'
p2372
aS'For ten points, name this 1896 court case in which Melville Fullers Supreme Court ruled 7-1 in favor of the doctrine of separate but equal.'
p2373
aS'The participants in this event burned an effigy of a man who had slashed their wages, who responded by building a twelve foot high fence with rifle holes and barbed wire.'
p2374
aS'Alexander Berkman attempted to assassinate one of the participants, which also saw William McCleary asked Philander Knox to intervene in this event.'
p2375
aS'Henry C. Frick was the general manager of the factory at the center of this event, which was owned by Andrew Carnegie.'
p2376
aS'The Pinkerton Detective Agency exchanged gunfire with the participants of this event, who were subdued by the state militia.'
p2377
aS'For ten points, identify this strike by the Amalgamated Association of Iron and Steel Workers, which took place at steel mill in a certain Pennsylvania town.'
p2378
aS"He was imprisoned for two days in 1855 after beating a sculptor at the World's Exposition in Paris, but was himself caned the following year by Albert Rust on the steps of the Capitol over his support for Nathaniel Banks."
p2379
aS'His books include the travelogue Glances at Europe, the autobiographical Recollections of a Busy Life, and a history of the Civil War, The American Conflict, which he finished writing in 1866.'
p2380
aS'Lincoln wrote a letter to this man identifying northern war aims as the presevation of the Union rather than "to save or destroy slavery," and was subsequently opposed by this longtime abolitionist.'
p2381
aS'Although his masthead urged Union armies "forward to Richmond" in 1861, he co-signed the bail bond for Jefferson_Davis.'
p2382
aS'He was fired from his best-known position by Whitelaw Reid and died before the meeting of the electoral college, where his electors split among minor candidates to oppose Ulysses S. Grant.'
p2383
aS'FTP, name this Democratic presidential candidate in 1872, the longtime editor of the New York Tribune.'
p2384
aS'His book What I Know of Farming described his work in swamp reclamation on his Chappaqua estate.'
p2385
aS'Earlier in his career, he founded an unprofitable journal called the New Yorker before moving on to edit a Whig campaign journal called The Jeffersonian.'
p2386
aS"He failed to get Seward's Senate seat in 1861, and two years later was unable to win his state's other Senate seat thanks to the opposition of Thurlow Weed, though over the next decade he became a leader of the Liberal Republicans."
p2387
aS'Sales of his collection The American Conflict took a nosedive after he signed a bond for the release of Jefferson_Davis.'
p2388
aS'FTP, name this founder of the New York Tribune who unsuccessfully ran for President in 1872.'
p2389
aS'This author of a letter entitled The Prayer of Twenty Millions supported Nathaniel Bankss election as Speaker of the House, leading to this mans caning by Albert Rust.'
p2390
aS'He was succeeded in his best known position by Whitelaw Reid.'
p2391
aS'During the Civil War this man urged the slogan forward on Richmond!'
p2392
aS'and he lost popularity after signing the bail bond of Jefferson_Davis.'
p2393
aS'This onetime ally of Thurlow Weed and William Seward joined with Carl Schurz and Charles Sumner to create an organization that pushed for civil service reform, the Liberal Republican Party.'
p2394
aS'He was unsuccessful in his bid to defeat Ulysses S. Grant in the 1872 Presidential Election and died soon thereafter.'
p2395
aS'For 10 points, name this founder and longtime editor of the New York Tribune who once urged go west, young man.'
p2396
aS'Whitlaw Reed succeeded this man at his longest-tenured job, in which capacity this man had endorsed Albert Brisbanes American interpretation of the Fourier socialist system.'
p2397
aS'A former campaign writer for Thurlow Weed, he hired Karl Marx as a European correspondent and yoinked John Soules advice to avoid lounging in the cities urging readers to Go west, young man!'
p2398
aS'Later, he joined with Vice-Presidential nominee Gratz Brown to finish second to Grant in the 1872 election under the banner of the Liberal Republican Party.'
p2399
aS'For 10 points, name this influential abolitionist editor of the New York Tribune.'
p2400
aS"One of this figure's works imagines appointing William Borah as Secretary of State, Herbert_Hoover as Commerce Secretary, and the current president as Secretary of the Navy."
p2401
aS'This politician earned a victory over Mayor Walmsley and the "Old Regular" political machine and later faced insurrection from Paul Cyr.'
p2402
aS'This author of My First Days in the White House had attracted Milo Reno and the radical Father Charles (*) Coughlin to form a party he planned to have deliberately lose an upcoming election.'
p2403
aS"His attempts as governor to gerrymander Judge Benjamin Pavy out of his job triggered action by the Square Deal Association, which included Pavy's son-in-law, Carl Weiss."
p2404
aS'FTP, name this man who sought to make "every man a king" in his Share Our Wealth program, an assassinated Louisiana politician nicknamed "Kingfish" and subject of Robert Penn Warren\'s All the King\'s Men.'
p2405
aS'By policy design, this persons tenure has seen the number of so-called ABCs drastically drop as a fraction of the population.'
p2406
aS'This leaders most recent election victory was over the candidate of the A New Era coalition and governor of Zulia, Manuel Rosales.'
p2407
aS'The system of mercales his government has created has been facing shortages of meat and sugar in recent months.'
p2408
aS'The head of the only member of OPEC in the Western hemisphere, he recently claimed that one of his political opponents smelled like sulfur.'
p2409
aS'For ten points, name this current president of Venizuela, noted for his anti-American stances on a variety of things.'
p2410
aS'While still serving in his nations military, he founded a movement known as MBR-200, which protested the government response to the sacudon protests, and which he would later replace with a new movement known as MVR.'
p2411
aS'He faces a domestic opposition group known as the Sumate, whose leaders he has charged with treason following an unsuccessful effort to recall him from office.'
p2412
aS'Organizing his major policy initiatives into Missions named Robinson, Ribas, Guaicaipuro, Sucre, and Bolivar, which variously involve aid to the poor and nationalization of industry.'
p2413
aS'He first came to prominence during the rule of Carlos Perez, whom he tried to overthrow in a 1992 coup, and ten years later he faced an unsuccessful coup against himself.'
p2414
aS'For ten points, name this current left-wing President of Venezuela.'
p2415
aS'Among his early German language poems was The Labyrinth, and he was helped to obtain election to his most famous post by Myconius.'
p2416
aS'The publisher Froschauer was a key ally, and this man defended Froschauers right to disobey Lenten food customs.'
p2417
aS'He refused permission to the Franciscan Bernardin Samson to enter his city, and among his key allies was Duke Ulrich of Wurttemberg.'
p2418
aS'With Leo Jud, he removed images from churches, and at a disputation attended with Heinrich Bullinger, blasted masses and the Eucharist.'
p2419
aS'Among his tracts on the subject of baptism are The Tricks of the Catabaptists and On Baptism, and he was finally killed at Kappel in 1531.'
p2420
aS'Elected to the position of peoples minister at Zurich in 1518, FTP, name this leader of the Swiss Reformation.'
p2421
aS"This country's history saw the signing of the Bulla Aurea by King Andreas in 1222, and the monk Capistrano helped Janos Hunyadi of this country in the siege of Belgrade."
p2422
aS'A dynasty established in the early 9th Century in this country was defeated at the Battle of Lechfeld by Otto the Great.'
p2423
aS'The 1848 Revolution in this country saw a list of 12 demands, which included secession from its Eastern Neighbor, though more recently, this country tried to withdraw from the Warsaw Pact in a revolution led by Imre Nagy.'
p2424
aS'For 10 points, identify this country whose people are known as the Magyars.'
p2425
aS'It\'s not India, but one religious leader in this country delivered the Eldmessa, or "Sermon of Fire", during a period known as the Mist Hardships.'
p2426
aS'This country was the site of the Battle of Haugsnes.'
p2427
aS'Another religious leader in this country, Jon Arason, was beheaded after the Battle of Sauthafell, and this country was subject to a raid known as the Turkish Abductions.'
p2428
aS"One source for this country's early history is the Book of Settlements, and it once lost its independence in an agreement made with Magnus the Lawgiver, the Old Covenant."
p2429
aS'Via the Act of Union it joined in a personal union with Christian X, and Hannes Hafstein served as its first Minister.'
p2430
aS'Chieftains called gothar engaged in the Battle of Orlygsstathir during an era of faction called the Age of the Sturlungs in this country.'
p2431
aS'For 10 points, identify this modern nation, the home of Snorri Sturlson, governed by a national assembly called the Althing.'
p2432
aS"This state was long represented by isolationist Senator William Borah, who had earlier prosecuted Big Bill Haywood for the assassination of this state's governor Frank Steunenberg."
p2433
aS'Later conflict in this state focused on racial extremists, including the Aryan Nations, whose headquarters were here, and Randy Weaver, who was involved in a shootout with the FBI at Ruby Ridge in 1992.'
p2434
aS'For 10 points, name this state, whose most recent appearance in nationwide headlines came when its Senator Larry Craig was arrested in a Minnesota airport restroom.'
p2435
aS'In this modern-day state, troops under Lieutenants W. C. Brown and Edward Farrow defeated the Turakina in the Sheepeater Indian War.'
p2436
aS'A warning by Zachias Van Ornum led troops under Colonel Patrick Connor to perpetuate the Bear River Massacre in this modern-day state.'
p2437
aS"In 1915, this state elected America's first Jewish governor, Moses Alexander."
p2438
aS'In 1907, Big Bill Haywood was acquitted of assassinating the governor of this state, Frank Steunenberg.'
p2439
aS'Senators from this state include the leader of the Irreconcilables, William Borah.'
p2440
aS'In 1992, U.S.'
p2441
aS'Marshals opened fire on Vicki and Randy Weaver in an incident in this state known as Ruby Ridge.'
p2442
aS"FTP, name this Northwest state recently represented by Larry Craig, whose largest cities include America's Neo-Nazi capital of Coeur d'Alene, Pocatello, and Boise."
p2443
aS'One of this man\'s subordinates was "Major" Bob Astles, also known as the "White Rat." He was accused of ordering Dora Bloch to be taken from her hospital bed and executed.'
p2444
aS"This man was ousted after a conflict which saw his country lose to Julius_Nyerere's nation."
p2445
aS'He previously seized power in a coup against President Milton Obote and lost power after his country lost a war to Tanzania.'
p2446
aS"This man's country was the site of Operation Thunderbolt, in which a hijacked Air France airliner was liberated by Israeli commandos at Entebbe Airport."
p2447
aS"In 1972, he expelled almost all Asians from his country, shattering the nation's industries."
p2448
aS"For 10 points, name this brutal, possibly insane 1970's dictator of Uganda."
p2449
aS'This man had served as a member of the Kings Rifles in World_War_II, and he later nationalized 85 British businesses and broke off all diplomatic ties with Britain.'
p2450
aS'He personally oversaw the Entebbe raid, and successfully persecuted the daylights out of the Lango and Acholi ethnic groups after he expelled the Asians living within his country.'
p2451
aS'This leader gained power after he staged a violent coup detat against Milton Obote in 1971, at which point he became President, and in 1976, he became President-For-Life.'
p2452
aS'For ten points, identify this Ugandan leader, who became known as the Butcher of Uganda for his brutality.'
p2453
aS"man lost power after attempting to annex the region of Kagera, but escaped death with the help of Libya's Muammar al-Gaddafi."
p2454
aS'He gained power by executing a coup while his predecessor was in a Singapore meeting of the Commonwealth of Nations.'
p2455
aS'This man expelled all the Asians in the country he ruled, crippling the economy.'
p2456
aS'He both succeeded and was basically succeeded by (*) Milton Obote.'
p2457
aS'He lost power after invading Tanzania led by Julius_Nyerere.'
p2458
aS'Along with saying that Hitler was "right to burn six million Jews," this man allowed a Palestinian liberation group to hijack an Air France airplane.'
p2459
aS'Israel responded with Operation Thunderbolt, which saw most hostages return safely from Entebbe Airport.'
p2460
aS'For 10 points, name this dictator of Uganda who may have been a cannibal.'
p2461
aS'His relationship with Englishman Bob Astles provided some of the inspiration for a novel by Giles Foden.'
p2462
aS'Despite originally being a supporter of Israel, he later condoned a hijacking of an Air France jet by Palestinian militants which resulted in an Israeli military rescue operation.'
p2463
aS'Seizing power after a 1971 military coup, he asserted his caretaker status following the presidency of Milton Obote.'
p2464
aS'For 10 points, name this president and dictator who, in 1979, was overthrown by a Tanzanian military invasion following 8 years of rule marked by massive human rights abuses in his native Uganda.'
p2465
aS'Polish journalist Ryszard Kapuscinski recalled meeting this man in 1962 and compared him to a cruel child.'
p2466
aS'Among the endeavors of this man include seizing an area once known as the West Lake Region, and he was once called a "big hearted-buffoon and strutting martinet" in an article by Time.'
p2467
aS'Serving as a cook for the Kings African Rifles, he eventually became a sergeant after helping put down the Mau Mau rebels.'
p2468
aS'He declared an economic war which resulted in government takeover of businesses abandoned by expelled Asians, which took place after overthrowing President Milton Obote.'
p2469
aS'Ruling from 1971 to 1979, during which time approximately 300,000 people are thought to have died in his country, this is, FTP, which Ugandan dictator'
p2470
aS'This US state was once home to the Cahokia culture.'
p2471
aS"During the War_of_1812 American soldiers were massacred at this state's Fort Dearborn."
p2472
aS'Later, settlers and Indians fought the Black Hawk War in this state.'
p2473
aS'A senate race in this state led to a series of debates where the losing candidate made the ""house divided"" speech.'
p2474
aS'For 10 points, name this Midwestern state with capital Springfield, nicknamed the ""Land of Lincoln"".'
p2475
aS'In one election in this state, a lieutenant governor candidate dropped out after revelations that he had held a knife to the throat of a former prostitute ex-girlfriend.'
p2476
aS'That man was Scott Lee Cohen.'
p2477
aS'One politician from this state was satirized by a fake Twitter account set up by Dan Sinker.'
p2478
aS'One politician from this state was criticized for using the phrase "fucking retarded" to describe activists.'
p2479
aS'In March of 2011, the governor of this state, saying a perfect system was impossible, abolished the death penalty.'
p2480
aS'A recent election in this state saw such losing candidates as Miguel del Valle, Gary Chico, and Carol Moseley-Braun, while Pat Quinn was also elected governor.'
p2481
aS'For 10 points, name this state which recently saw Rahm Emanuel elected mayor of its largest city, Chicago.'
p2482
aS'This state\'s bar associate claimed that the "strife" of lawyership would surely destroy Myra Bradwell\'s femininity, leading to Bradwell v. this state, which established a narrow reading of the privileges and immunities clause of the Fourteenth Amendment.'
p2483
aS'A 1968 case originating in this state overruled its law that the prosecution could challenge infinity jurors who were morally opposed to the death penalty.'
p2484
aS'In addition to being the origin for Witherspoon, this state was a party in the Presser case, which is a key precedent allowing for local gun control.'
p2485
aS'Justice Goldberg held that the Court would not "exalt form over substance" in a case from this state in which the plaintiff implicated himself while confronting Benedict DiGerlando.'
p2486
aS'This state was allowed to regulate the cost of using grain elevators in a law proposed by the National Grange in a case that was overruled by another case from this state that ushered in the Interstate Commerce Commission.'
p2487
aS'For 10 points, name this state, the origin of the Munn, Wabash, and Escobedo cases.'
p2488
aS"This empire's fortress of Sacsahuaman was built with precisely-fitted stone blocks carried across large distances without wheeled vehicles."
p2489
aS'This empire absorbed the Chimu civilization, and its records and messages were kept on elaborate knotted strings called quipus.'
p2490
aS"It reached its height under Huayna Capac, and that ruler's decision to divide this empire between Huascar and (*) Atahualpa led to a civil war that weakened this empire shortly before the arrival of Francisco Pizarro."
p2491
aS'For 10 points, name this South American empire located in present-day Peru.'
p2492
aS'The first prime minister of this country gave a speech outlining the Five Principles of Peaceful Coexistence that formed a basis for a treaty with China, and he also gave the "Tryst with Destiny" speech.'
p2493
aS'Another prime minister was assassinated by her bodyguards in 1984 soon after approving an attack on the Golden Temple in Amritsar.'
p2494
aS'(*) For 10 points name this country once headed by Jawaharlal_Nehru that disputes the status of Kashmir with Pakistan.'
p2495
aS"This country's strategic reserve command, the Kostrad, was created for a 1960 invasion, and this country itself was invaded during Operation Product."
p2496
aS"A. H. Nasution escaped execution during one incident in this country, the home of the People's Representative Council."
p2497
aS'This country opposed the formation of its northern neighbor in an undeclared conflict called the (*) Konfrontasi.'
p2498
aS"A massive crackdown on this country's Communist Party in 1965 was prompted by the assassination of six senior military officers by members of the 30 September Movement."
p2499
aS'One leader of this country advocated five principles called Pancasila, and that leader was succeeded by a leader of the Golkar party who declared the New Order Government and ordered the occupation of East Timor.'
p2500
aS'For 10 points, name this country once run by the dictator Suharto.'
p2501
aS'The Supersemar order led to the massacre of thousands of Communist in this nation, which was directed by the future leader of the Golkar Party.'
p2502
aS'That occurred after the 30 September movement, which indirectly caused the rise of the man who was later succeeded by Jusuf Habibie.'
p2503
aS'Although neither the Linggarjati Agreement nor the Renville Agreement could bring peace in this nation, it ultimately secured its independence at the Hague Round-Table Conference.'
p2504
aS'The five principles of Pancasila and the abbreviation NASAKOM were concepts related to the leader of the non-aligned movement from this nation, and the Bandung Conference occurred here.'
p2505
aS'For 10 points, name this Asian country whose leaders included Megawati, Suharto, and Sukarno, the most populous Muslim nation.   '
p2506
aS'After World War Two, this country experienced a period of guerilla warfare known as the Berisap.'
p2507
aS'Early nationalist movements in this country include the Budi Utomo and the Sareket Islam.'
p2508
aS'The Coup of September 30 led to this country\'s "New Order" era.'
p2509
aS'Mohammad (*) Hatta was the first Vice-President of this country, which only recently gave up its war against the Fretilin movement in a breakaway province.'
p2510
aS'It was in 1945 that this country declared independence from the Netherlands.'
p2511
aS'The two most notable dictators of this country may be Sukarno and Suharto.'
p2512
aS'For ten points, name this boyhood home of Barack Obama, a Muslim Southeast Asian country with capital at Jakarta.'
p2513
aS'Operation Product and Operation Kraai were two massive police actions in this country.'
p2514
aS'The New York Agreement granted land to this country and temporarily aligned it with the United_States during the Cold War.'
p2515
aS'A failed military coup, the Thirtieth of September Movement, led to violence in this nation.'
p2516
aS"This nation's Democratic Party of Struggle was once led by its only female Prime Minister, Megawati Sukarnoputri."
p2517
aS'That attempted coup led to an anti-Communist purge and the rise of a regime called the New Order, led by Suharto.'
p2518
aS'For 10 points, name this country that went through "Guided Democracy" under Sukarno, the most populous Muslim country in the world.'
p2519
aS'One leader of this modern country issued a farman in 1848 that abolished the importation of slaves by sea.'
p2520
aS"That leader was part of this country's Qajar dynasty."
p2521
aS'A ruler of another dynasty in this modern country had a secret police called the Savak, led the White Revolution, and was almost ousted by Mohammad Mossadeq.'
p2522
aS'That leader of the (*) Pahlavi dynasty lost power in this country after a revolution turned it into an Islamic republic.'
p2523
aS'For 10 points, name this Middle Eastern country taken over in 1979 by supporters of the Ayatollah Khomeini.'
p2524
aS'One of the reasons this scandal broke was the capture of Eugene Hasenfus after his Fairchild C-123 cargo plane was shot down.'
p2525
aS'In it, the executive branch disobeyed the Boland Amendment, leading to the resignation of National Security Adviser Admiral John Poindexter.'
p2526
aS'During this incident the president continued to insist that "we did not negotiate with terrorists" and acted against the wishes of Secretary of State Shultz and Secretary of Defense Weinberger.'
p2527
aS'Much of the work was carried out by Lieutenant Colonel Oliver North, who diverted money to rebels fighting against the ruling Sandinistas in Nicaragua.'
p2528
aS'Name this scandal during the Reagan presidency that involved selling weapons to a country headed by Ayatollah Khomeini.'
p2529
aS'Father Jean Loison was called to testify in an ICJ case regarding this event, and Benjamin Wier was released early on during it.'
p2530
aS'Fawn Hall was granted immunity in exchange for testimony during this event, and the Lebanese magazine Ash-Shiraa first revealed it.'
p2531
aS'Several nations participated in it to help the US circumvent the Boland Amendment.'
p2532
aS'Partly precipitated by the rise to power of Daniel Ortega, Israel served a key intermediary during this event.'
p2533
aS'The resulting Tower Commission report criticized the conduct of John Poindexter and Oliver North.'
p2534
aS'For 10 points, name this scandal involving the sale of weapons in exchange for the release of hostages and rebel funding, occurring during the Reagan Administration.'
p2535
aS'In response to this scandal, Bill Breeden was jailed for stealing the sign of a street named after a participant, leading Howard Zinn to deem him the "only person to be imprisoned as a result" of this scandal.'
p2536
aS"Secretary Fawn Hall shredded several documents pertaining to this scandal, which caused John Poindexter's resignation."
p2537
aS'It was investigated by the (*) Tower Commission and it violated the Boland Amendment, which forbid US assistance to a certain Nicaraguan rebel group.'
p2538
aS"For 10 points, name this scandal that implicated Oliver North and Ronald Reagan in the sale of arms to Ayatollah Khomeini's government in order to fund some Latin American rebels."
p2539
aS'The Saville Commission investigated a 1972 incident on this island in which soldiers shot at unarmed civilians.'
p2540
aS"This island, which was once ruled by High King Brian Boru, was later led by a man who supported the Home Rule bills and was disgraced by an affair with Kitty O'Shea."
p2541
aS"British troops massacred prisoners at Wexford and Drogheda during Cromwell's conquest of this island."
p2542
aS"This island was also the site of Patrick Pearse and James Connolly's Easter Rising."
p2543
aS'For 10 points, name this island which experienced a potato famine in the 1840s.'
p2544
aS'In this country, confusion over whether the phrase "bicycle combination" referred to a pair of overalls or a motorcycle led to the accidental discovery of a Nazi spy.'
p2545
aS'This country caused a diplomatic backlash when its heads of state and government both sent official condolences to Germany upon the death of Adolf Hitler.'
p2546
aS'A secret plan to protect this country from a Nazi invasion was known as Plan W, which was drawn up after Leonhard Kaupisch was put in charge of an operation to conquer this country which was never launched.'
p2547
aS'The television drama (*) Caught in a Free State depicts buffoonish attempts at inserting German spies into this country during World_War_II, which was referred to in this officially neutral country as "The Emergency."'
p2548
aS'For 10 points, identify this country which was targeted by the Nazi Operation Green and where a paramilitary group seeking reunification with Ulster collaborated with the Germans.'
p2549
aS'invasion of this country was prompted by the Papal Bull Laudabiliter, which established Papal supremacy over this area, and was proclaimed by Pope Adrian IV.'
p2550
aS'This country saw the Desmond Rebellion supported by Papal troops.'
p2551
aS'By the 1400s, only the area of this country called the Pale was in foreign control.'
p2552
aS"Although not related to the War of the Grand Alliance, this country was also the location of the Battle of Kinsale in the Nine Year's War, whose aftermath saw the Flight of the Earls from here."
p2553
aS'The Viking Ragnall invaded this country, creating some of its earliest cities.'
p2554
aS'During the Wars of the Three Kingdoms, Oliver_Cromwell sacked its town of Wexford.'
p2555
aS'The Glorious Revolution ended in this country with the Battle_of_the_Boyne.'
p2556
aS'For 10 points, name this home to the cities Limerick and Dublin.'
p2557
aS"A joint Spanish-Italian invasion of this place ended in a massacre at the Golden Fort, eighty-five years after its parliament was subdued by Poynings's Law."
p2558
aS"An early battle in this country's history was won by Murchad, on behalf of Murchad's elderly father, who was hacked to death by spiteful Norsemen fleeing the battlefield."
p2559
aS'This location of the Battle of the Diamond later was the site of the sack of Wexford and the massacre of Drogheda by the same occupier whose agents Cavendish and Burke were murdered by the Invincibles in its Phoenix Park.'
p2560
aS'For 10 points, identify this island whose autonomy was advocated by Charles Parnell and ultimately secured by Eamon de Valera and Michael Collins.'
p2561
aS'Austin Bourkes The Visitation of God is a history of this event, which was slightly mitigated by John Heslows extraction methods.'
p2562
aS'It was worsened by the bungled roads to nowhere make-work program put forth by Charles Trevelyan, who was charged with handling this matter by Prime Minister Russell.'
p2563
aS'Known locally as An Gorta Mor, it spurred the use of coffin ships for the emigration of 1.5 million people to North America and led to the repeal of the Corn Laws.'
p2564
aS'Caused by phytophthora infestans, which triggers late blight, it caused over a million deaths.'
p2565
aS'For 10 points, name this 1845 to 1849 crop failure in Ireland.'
p2566
aS"people died when this country's Ojhri ammunition depot exploded, in what may have been a cover-up of its westward sale of Stinger missiles."
p2567
aS"Another country's Operation Brasstacks military drill antagonized this country."
p2568
aS'U.S. ambassador Arnold Raphel died with a leader of this country in a C-130 Hercules crash after the "Doctrine of Necessity" defended a coup called Operation Fair Play here.'
p2569
aS'This country lost most of the "world\'s highest battlefield," the Siachen glacier, in a 2003 ceasefire.'
p2570
aS'Muhammad Zia-ul-Haq supported scientist A.Q.'
p2571
aS'Khan while leading this country, which aided the anti-Soviet Operation Cyclone by sending in its intelligence agency, the ISI.'
p2572
aS'For 10 points, name this nation with nuclear weapons, once led by Zulfikar Ali and Benazir of the Bhutto family.'
p2573
aS'The first president of this country protested for its independence on Direct Action Day, which devolved into a riot.'
p2574
aS'A movement to secede from this country was led by Sheikh Mujibur Rahman and the Awami League.'
p2575
aS'This country gained its independence due to the actions of the Muslim League under Muhammad_Ali_Jinnah.'
p2576
aS'In 1971, Bangladesh seceded from this country.'
p2577
aS'Asif Ali Zardari currently leads this nation, which saw a 1999 coup led by (*) Pervez Musharraf.'
p2578
aS'For 10 points, name this Muslim country, which was once a part of India.'
p2579
aS'The city of Gwadar in this country was an exclave of Oman until 1958 and the language isolate of Burushaski is spoken in the northern valleys of Yasin, Nagar, and Hunza.'
p2580
aS'Other former princely states here include Swat, and the ruins of Taxila were once an important trading center.'
p2581
aS'Modern day cities include Chitral and Gilgit, bases for a current search, and Quetta (kwe-tuh) and Multan.'
p2582
aS'The Sahiwal district recently refused to allow an amusement park to be built on the ruins of Harappa.'
p2583
aS'With former capitals including Rawalpindi and Karachi, FTP, name this South Asian country led by Pervez Musharraf.'
p2584
aS'At one battle in this country, artillery shells were transported by the bear Wojtek.'
p2585
aS'At that battle, in this country, the attacking side tried to break through the Gustav Line, while under the command of Harold Alexander.'
p2586
aS"M. W. Williamson led the initial attack of six Swordfish against this country's moored fleet at one battle."
p2587
aS'Admiral Cunningham and Lumley Lyster commanded British troops against this country during the first ship-to-ship naval engagement that only involved aircrafts, which was the Battle of Taranto.'
p2588
aS'As part of Operation Shingle in this country, John Lucas established a beachhead near Anzio.'
p2589
aS'A full scale invasion of this country followed Operation Husky.'
p2590
aS'For 10 points, name this country where the Allies won the Battle of Monte Cassino and captured Rome during World_War_II.'
p2591
aS"This nation overthrew Albania's King Zog."
p2592
aS'A major event in the unification of this nation was the Expedition of the Thousand, and its first king after unification was Victor Emanuel II.'
p2593
aS'In 1935 this nation invaded Ethiopia.'
p2594
aS"One of its leaders was called Il Duce, and along with Germany, it was one of Europe's major Axis powers."
p2595
aS'For 10 points, name this European country that was ruled by fascist dictator Benito Mussolini.'
p2596
aS'This European country was home to the 1970s ""historic compromise"" between its communist party and its other political parties.'
p2597
aS'This country\'s center-right coalition is known as the ""Pole of Freedoms.'
p2598
aS'"" During the ""Years of Lead,"" the Red Brigades kidnapped and murdered this country\'s prime minister, Aldo Moro.'
p2599
aS'This republic was created when, in 1946, Victor Emmanuel III abdicated the throne.'
p2600
aS'For 10 points, name this country that has recently been led by prime minister Romano Prodi from Rome.'
p2601
aS'In the late 19th century, this countrys politics saw the Transformation Movement in which Conservative members of Parliament supported Liberal prime ministers.'
p2602
aS'In the 1920s, this country was home to a secessionist insurgent group called TIGR.'
p2603
aS'The Acerbo Law reformed this countrys parliament, and the Irishwoman Violet Gibson attempted to assassinate a Prime Minister of this country.'
p2604
aS'Operation Oak was a German commando raid against a target in this country led by Otto Skorzeny during World_War_II.'
p2605
aS'One period in this countrys history is known as the Salo Republic.'
p2606
aS'During an unstable period known as the Days of Lead, the Red Brigades kidnapped and killed this countrys Prime Minister.'
p2607
aS'During World_War_II, German defenses in this country included the Bernhardt and Hitler lines, which made up the Winter Line, the breaching of which was an objective in the battle of Monte Cassino.'
p2608
aS'For 10 points, name this country that has been led by Aldo Moro, Giuliano Amato, and Silvio Berlusconi.'
p2609
aS'A horrible incident in this country\'s history occurred under the command of Alphonse Juin, whose Goumier troops enacted a campaign of mass-rape that rendered a portion of the population so-called "Moroccaned women.'
p2610
aS'" That incident saw Juin advance through the Bernhardt and Gustav Lines while main forces carried out Operation Strangle and Operation Diadem.'
p2611
aS'Part of this present-day country also saw a conflict in which Roger of Lauria defeated Charles the Lame, helping the (*) Michael VIII Palaeologus-backed Peter of Aragon in the wake of a rebellion against Charles I Anjou, that may have been initiated by another assault on the female population.'
p2612
aS'The wife of Collatinus sister of Lucius Junius Brutus was another victim of violence against women in this country, which saw a rebellion against the son of Priscus, Tarqin the Proud, who had attacked her.'
p2613
aS'FTP, identify this modern day country whose less fortunate historic females have included Lucretia and some Sabine Women attacked by the Romans.'
p2614
aS'nation experienced a rash of industrial strikes in 1969-70 called the "Hot Autumn.'
p2615
aS'" The longtime communist party leader from this nation met with Spain\'s Santiago Carillo to form the "Eurocommunism" movement.'
p2616
aS'Its communist party brokered the "Historic Compromise" with its Christian Democratic party in the 1970s, which broke down because of the actions of a group that targeted the "Imperialist Multinational State.'
p2617
aS'" This country suffered through the Years of Lead, during which the Red Brigades assassinated its Prime Minister, Aldo Moro.'
p2618
aS'For 10 points, name this nation whose presidency has recently flipped between Romano Prodi and Silvio Berlusconi.'
p2619
aS'One ruler of this name employed the general Aleksy Khvost in his war against Suzdal and Novgorod, and became known as ""the red.'
p2620
aS'"" In addition to that father of (+) Dmitri Donskoy, this name was borne by the man who overthrew Alexander of Tver and became rich by collecting tribute on behalf of the Golden_Horde, acquiring the nickname "moneybag." The (*) third ruler of this name stopped vassalage to the Horde and was known as "the great." For 10 points, give this name for several princes of Muscovy, including the first to take the title of Russian tsar, the fourth one known as "Grozny" or "the terrible."'
p2621
aS'A prince of this name was referred to as "the Young" and defeated the Tatars at the Great Standoff on the Ugra River.'
p2622
aS'A monarch of this name won the Battle of Chelon and married Zoe Paleologus.'
p2623
aS'The first ruler of this name had the nickname Kalita, or "moneybags," either due to his kindness to beggars or because he acquired so much territory via purchasing.'
p2624
aS"The forces of a different monarch of this name were defeated at the Siege of Pskov, thereby sealing his country's defeat in the Livonian War."
p2625
aS'That monarch used a police corps called the Oprichnina to institute a reign of terror in his country and beat his son of the same name to death.'
p2626
aS'For 10 points, give this name of four Rurik czars of Russia, the third of whom was called "the Great" and the last of whom was called "the Terrible."'
p2627
aS'This ruler asked for assistance from Gregory XIII to intercede in an unsuccessful conflict known as the Livonian War.'
p2628
aS'This ruler divided his kingdom into two realms, one of which was not ruled by him called the zemschina.'
p2629
aS'The other portion was governed by the oprichniki, who dressed in black and terrorized the countryside.'
p2630
aS'This ruler was the first to take the title of (*) tsar.'
p2631
aS'This man contributed to the decline of the Rurikid dynasty by killing his heir.'
p2632
aS'For 10 points, name this tsar whose reign included a considerable amount of violence.'
p2633
aS'He opened trade with England through the Muscovy Company and conquered Kazan and Astrakhan.'
p2634
aS'His reign saw the unsuccessful Livonian War, as well as the execution of Filipp Kolychv, head of the church, and Prince Vladimir Staritsky, his chosen successor, during a period of oppression known as the oprichnina.'
p2635
aS'He farcically abdicated for a year in favor of Simeon Bekbulatovich in 1575, and later killed his heir Ivan Ivanovich, leaving his feebleminded son Fyodor as the only heir.'
p2636
aS'FTP, identify this man essentially succeeded by Boris Godunov, the first Russian tsar.'
p2637
aS'Under this rulers reign, the first printers in his country fled from his capital to Lithuania.'
p2638
aS'This conqueror of Dorpat and Astrakhan gave up Narva in a treaty at Plussa with Sweden, and later renounced his claims on Livonia at the treaty of Jam Zaploski.'
p2639
aS'He called the first Zemsky Sobor, and he had his private army of Oprichniks harass the boyars.'
p2640
aS'His son Fyodor was succeeded by Boris Godunov, and he ordered the construction of St. Basils Cathedral.'
p2641
aS'For 10 points, name this first Russian to take the title of Tsar, whose brutal treatment of Novgorod led to his nickname.'
p2642
aS'When St. Philip refused to bless him, the former was subsequently martyred by him.'
p2643
aS'He conquered Kazan and Astrakhan, and captured Narva and Dorpat before being scared off by Sigismund II.'
p2644
aS'He confessed the sins of his youth to a Zemski Sobor, established the secret police known as the Oprichnina, and persecuted the boyars as no one ever had.'
p2645
aS'For ten points, name this ruler of Russia from 1533 to 1584, the first to hold the title of tsar.'
p2646
aS"This man's Composition with Pouring II and Water Figure can be found in the Hirshorn Museum."
p2647
aS'His wife Lee Krasner was also an important artist.'
p2648
aS'The truck driver Teri Horton bought a work he may have painted for five dollars at a thrift shop.'
p2649
aS'His paintings include Full Fathom Five, Lavender Mist, and Blue Poles.'
p2650
aS'For 10 points, name this Abstract Expressionist sometimes called "Jack the Dripper."'
p2651
aS'This figure organized his army with the mansabdari system and founded a new capital at Fatehpur.'
p2652
aS"A biography written by Abul Fazl was one of the Nine Jewels of this figure's court."
p2653
aS"This leader's dahsala system was based on a system used by Sher Shah Suri, and he pursued diplomacy with Hindus by marrying a Rajput princess."
p2654
aS'He gathered various religions and combined them into his (*) Din-i-Ilahi, or "Divine Faith." He repealed the jizya tax on non-Muslims and his general Bairam Khan defeated Hemu at the Second Battle of Panipat.'
p2655
aS'For ten points, identify this grandson of Babur who ruled over the Mughal_Empire at its height.'
p2656
aS'John Mildenhall, a representative of the East India Company, arrived at Agra during his reign, but received no concession until the rule of Jahangir.'
p2657
aS'Succeeding his father Humayun, he put a stop to the practice of forced sati and legalized the remarriage of widows.'
p2658
aS'His conquests included Malwa, Bengal, and Kabul, and by 1600 he was the undisputed master of north India.'
p2659
aS'FTP, identify this Mughul emperor, the grandson of Babar.'
p2660
aS'After his accession in 1556 at age thirteen he quickly defeated a Hindu army led by Hemu and a Punjab based Afghan kingdom headed by Sikander Shah Sur.'
p2661
aS'Soon after he removed himself from the control of his regent, Biaram Khan.'
p2662
aS'By the age of twenty in he had recovered the entire kingdom of his father, Humayun, and was ready to expand, eventually conquering the Rajput states, Gujaret, Bengal, Kashmir, and Afghanistan, but failing to take the Deccan.'
p2663
aS'He was tolerant of Non-Muslim religions and created a highly centralized state.'
p2664
aS'FTP name this Great Mughal, the grandfather of Shah Jahan and grandson of Babur.'
p2665
aS'He succeeded to the throne at age 13 under the regent Bairam Khan.'
p2666
aS"At his half-brother's pleading, he marched to Lahore to defend Kabul against Uzbek invaders."
p2667
aS'However, that half-brother, Mirza Hakim, turned against him, an action which resulted in the fall of an independent Kabul.'
p2668
aS'His rule was plagued with intrafamilial conflict as his own son Salim was openly hostile to him and in 1602 marched on Agra.'
p2669
aS'In a shrewd act of tolerance, he founded the new religion of Dini-Ilahi, which blended Christianity, Islam, and Hinduism.'
p2670
aS'FTP, identify this third Mogul emperor, son of Humayun and grandfather of Shah Jahan.'
p2671
aS'He led a massacre at Chitor during a conflict in Mewar, and a challenge to his throne was led by Hemu.'
p2672
aS'He established a system of autonomy for the imperial provinces, putting mansabars in charge of each.'
p2673
aS'During his reign, he instituted the principles of Dharmashastra and sulahkul, which allowed non-Muslims to retain their own courts, and he repealed the jizya and the pilgrimage taxes.'
p2674
aS'He founded the city of Fatehpur Sikri in 1569.'
p2675
aS'Abu\'l Fazl saw him as the embodiment of the perfect philosopher king, which may have led to his development of the Din-i Ilahi, or "divine faith.'
p2676
aS'" For 10 points, name this son of Humayun and father of Jahangir, the third and greatest of the Mughal emperors.  '
p2677
aS'While establishing himself, he ruthlessly put down the rebellion of Mirza Hakim, as well as setting up his group of nava-rathna, or nine gems.'
p2678
aS'He maintained a roving court, after trying to set up at Fatehpur Sikir, and part of this rulers territory was contested by Sikandar Sur and another part by the Hindu general Semu.'
p2679
aS'Among his regents was Bayram Khan, and among his conquests were Rajasthan, Gujarat, and Bengal.'
p2680
aS'His religious tolerance was evidenced by his repeal of the jirza tax on non-Muslims, and his establishment of the Din-i-llahi or Divine Faith.'
p2681
aS'For ten points, name this Mughal emperor, grandson of Babur.'
p2682
aS'The Spanish failed to recapture it in the Battle of Rio Nuevo, and in 1670 it officially changed hands via the Treaty of Madrid.'
p2683
aS'In the late 18th century, escaped slaves led by Queen Nanny and Cudjoe fought two Maroon Wars against its possessors.'
p2684
aS'In 1865, an arrest made for trespassing on abandoned property resulted in the Morant Bay Rebellion, and a namesake "commission" was formed in response to governor Edward Eyre\'s overreaction.'
p2685
aS'The participants in that uprising were emancipated in 1838, seven years after a general strike planned by Baptist minister Samuel Sharpe got violent on Christmas Day.'
p2686
aS'FTP, name this Caribbean nation, once ruled by the British from Spanish Town, but which now has its capital at Kingston.'
p2687
aS'Its original colonial capital, Villa de la Vega, was burned during the English conquest.'
p2688
aS'This island became a Crown colony shortly the 1865 Paul Bogle-led Morant Bay rebellion was brutally put down by troops under governor Edward Eyre.'
p2689
aS'Its Taino natives knew it as Xamayca, or land of wood and water, while Spanish colonists under Juan de Esquievel first dubbed it Santiago.'
p2690
aS'A namesake coffee is produced in its eastern Blue Mountains, while its international airport, named after former prime minister Donald Sangster, is located in its fourth-largest city, Montego Bay.'
p2691
aS'Its one-time capital of Port Royal was historically used as a base by Captain Henry Morgan.'
p2692
aS'FTP, name this island country with capital at Kingston.'
p2693
aS'This man claimed that Americans speak ""incomparably better English than the people of the Mother country"" in The American Democrat.'
p2694
aS"In a novel by this author of The Spy, Major Duncan Heyward escorts the Munro girls from Fort Edward to Fort William Henry, and Chingachgook's son Uncas is the title character."
p2695
aS'For 10 points, name this author of The Last of the Mohicans.'
p2696
aS"This author created the vainglorious Aristabalus Bragg in a work about the Effingham family's return to New York, Home as Found."
p2697
aS'He described the romance of Lucy Hardinge in Afloat and Ashore, a story that would be continued in Miles Wallingford.'
p2698
aS'He wrote of monkeys traveling in Europe and set another work in 16th Century Bavaria.'
p2699
aS'In addition to The Monikins and The Heidenmauer, he wrote about politics in A Letter to his Countrymen and The American Democrat, while his trilogy about the Anti-Rent War included the novel The Chainbearer.'
p2700
aS'Characters created by this man include Harvey Birch, in a story of Revolutionary War intrigue, as well as Judith Hutter, who appears in a series of novels that also features Cora Munro, the evil Magua, and the noble Uncas.'
p2701
aS'For 10 points, identify this author of The Spy who chronicled the adventures of Natty Bumppo in the Leather-Stocking Tales.'
p2702
aS'This politician responded to accusations that he married Harriet Stanwood in a shotgun wedding with a dubious claim that they had actually been married twice, the first time without a license.'
p2703
aS'A Walt McDougall cartoon showed this man taking part in the Boodle Banquet on the same day that he heard a speech at the Fifth Avenue Hotel by Samuel Burchard.'
p2704
aS"Bonds for the Little Rock and Fort Smith Railroad were the subject of this man's correspondence in the Mulligan Letters."
p2705
aS'New York may have been lost by this man after he failed to respond negatively to a speech about "rum, Romanism, and rebellion."'
p2706
aS'For 10 points, name this man who lost the election of 1884, and whose nicknames included "Magnetic Man," "Plumed Knight," and "Continental Liar from the State of Maine."'
p2707
aS'He was editor and co-owner of the Kennebec Journal, a crusading political newspaper.'
p2708
aS'Eight years after being elected speaker of the House, his good friend Robert Ingersoll called him the "Plumed Night" in offering up this man\'s name for a presidential nomination.'
p2709
aS'His later career was marked by his association with the Pan-American Movement, whose first conference he chaired.'
p2710
aS'However, the death of that movement and ill health caused him to leave public office in 1892.'
p2711
aS'FTP, name this failed Republican presidential candidate in 1884 and two-time secretary of state, a politician from Maine.'
p2712
aS'One of his longtime political rivalries began when he referred to an influential party figure as a turkey gobbler.'
p2713
aS'This man advocated the newly formed Republican Party when he bought the Kennebec Journal, and he was later given one of his nicknames by Robert Ingersoll.'
p2714
aS'He pushed for the formation of the Pan-American Movement as Secretary of State to Garfield and Harrison, though the defection of the Mugwumps and a few hundred votes in New York kept him from becoming President himself following his supporters remark about rum, Romanism, and rebellion.'
p2715
aS'For 10 points, name this man known variously as the Plumed Knight and the continental liar from the state of Maine.'
p2716
aS'Corona Regia, a satire in the form of an encomium to this king, praises him for elevating John Ramsay and Robert Carr to the peerage for paederastical reasons.'
p2717
aS"The former's honor occurred after he stabbed the Earl of Gowrie, thereby defending this king from an assassination attempt."
p2718
aS"Carr was this king's main advisor after the death of Robert Cecil, Earl of Salisbury, prompted this king to attempt to rule largely independent of council, and this king granted a divorce to Frances Howard to marry Carr."
p2719
aS"Howard and perhaps Carr conspired to poison Thomas Overbury while he was imprisoned in the Tower for disobeying this king and, essentially, for opposing Howard influence, in a major scandal during this man's reign."
p2720
aS'For 10 points, name this king who imagined himself the victim of an attempted bewitching at sea and so instigated the North Berwick witch trials and who really was the intended victim of the Gunpowder_Plot in 1605.'
p2721
aS'Travelling through Newark on his way to be crowned, he saw a pickpocket caught red-handed, and ordered the thief to be summarily executed.'
p2722
aS'When he was informed that the accused had to be tried, he expressed dismay at the vagaries of the English common law.'
p2723
aS'This lack of understanding caused his conflicts with the "Addled Parliament," which he dissolved after leaders like John Pym refused to grant him certain revenues known as "impositions" in 1614.'
p2724
aS'FTP, name this Stuart king of England and Scotland, father of Charles I.'
p2725
aS"This man was imprisoned by Protestant nobles during the Ruthven Raid, and his early reign saw the Battle of Langside and was dominated the Earl of Morey, who served as this man's regent."
p2726
aS'This son of Lord Darnley married Anne of Denmark.'
p2727
aS'An attempt by Catholic Priests to kidnap this man is known as the Bye Plot, while the Main Plot was hatched by Protestants who wanted to replace him with his cousin Arbella.'
p2728
aS'This king\'s attempt to find a Habsburg bride for his son was known as the "Spanish Match".'
p2729
aS'This author of "The Trew Law of Free Monachy" was also targeted by Catesby and Fawkes in the Gunpower Plot.'
p2730
aS'For ten points, name this Stuart, the first man to rule both England and Scotland, who lends his name to a Bible.'
p2731
aS'This man secured the release of Thomas Paine from prison by claiming his American citizenship.'
p2732
aS'States admitted to the Union during his presidency include Alabama, Illinois, and Missouri.'
p2733
aS'This man was the last of the Virginia dynasty of presidents.'
p2734
aS'His presidency lasted during the Era of Good Feelings and saw the Panic of 1819.'
p2735
aS'For 10 points, name this President who succeeded James Madison and whose namesake doctrine stated that European countries should no longer colonize the Americas.'
p2736
aS'The Quids, led by John Randolph of Roanoke, supported this man against James Madison and tried to make him run for president.'
p2737
aS"Earlier, as state governor, he called out the state militia to put down Gabriel's Rebellion."
p2738
aS'As president he vetoed the Cumberland Road Bill, sent Andrew_Jackson against the Seminole Indians, bought Spanish Florida, and served a second term after running unopposed due to the collapse of the Federalists.'
p2739
aS'For 10 points, identify this president who presided over the "Era of Good Feelings" and issued a namesake doctrine warning against European colonization in the Americas.'
p2740
aS'His early career included working as an army scout during the Battle of Monmouth and as the adjutant general to William Alexander, Lord Stirling.'
p2741
aS'His treatise A View of the Conduct of the Executive defended his conduct as minister to France and viciously attacked Washington, who never forgave him.'
p2742
aS'His diplomatic career continued as he assisted Robert Livingston in negotiating the Louisiana Purchase and argued against impressment in Britain.'
p2743
aS'He supported the founding of the Liberia colony and was known as the "Last-Cocked Hat" for being the last of his generation to be President, but his best-known contribution was actually written by John_Quincy_Adams.'
p2744
aS'FTP, name this man whose isolationist stance is now known as his "Doctrine," the fifth President of the United_States.'
p2745
aS'response to an economic downturn, he signed a bill that disallowed purchasing federal land on credit but decreased the price of that land to a dollar twenty five an acre.'
p2746
aS'After the ambush of a trapping expedition, he sent Henry Leavenworth to suppress the Arikara tribe.'
p2747
aS"This man's term saw the negotiation of a treaty sometimes named for the year of its signing or called the London Convention which corrected the Mitchell Map and set the Canadian border at the 49th parallel."
p2748
aS'Other treaties signed during his term include one which demilitarized the Great Lakes and another that set borders along the Arkansas and Red Rivers and acquired Florida from Spain.'
p2749
aS'Although he presided over the Rush-Bagot and Adams-Onis treaties, his most famous contribution to foreign policy states that European interference in the Western hemisphere would not be tolerated.'
p2750
aS'For 10 points, name this president during the Era of Good Feelings who had a namesake doctrine.'
p2751
aS'A soldier from this country infamously struck U.S. consul John Allison.'
p2752
aS'During peacetime, the U.S. gunboat Panay was bombed by this country.'
p2753
aS'Its actions were criticized by the U.S. in the Stimson Doctrine.'
p2754
aS'Camps such as Heart Mountain and Manzanar housed emigrants from this country during the 1940s.'
p2755
aS'For 10 points, name this country which fought against the US in the Pacific theater of World_War_II.'
p2756
aS'Like a neighbor later in the 1980s, this country implemented a "3-S" policy of sports, screen, and sex, while another of its leaders noted that the U.S. succeeded despite its "problematic" minorities.'
p2757
aS'In this home of the "construction state," the so-called "1955 System" ended when a former marquis led an eight-party coalition to victory in 1993.'
p2758
aS'An attempt to break up business groups in this country led to complaints of (*) "SCAPitalism."'
p2759
aS'In this country, the Clean Government Party was the predecessor to a Buddhist party that is currently in government.'
p2760
aS"This country's MITI ministry lost much of its influence in the 1980s, during which the Recruit Scandal occurred."
p2761
aS'This country experienced a "Lost Decade" in the 1990s.'
p2762
aS'For 10 points, name this country whose postwar politics have been been dominated by the Liberal Democratic Party, including the long premiership of Junichiro Koizumi.'
p2763
aS'This country\'s People\'s Life First party merged with its Tomorrow Party, and its prime minister recently called for "bold" monetary policy, 5 years after finally apologizing for the "comfort women" used by its army.'
p2764
aS'Property belonging to individuals from this country was destroyed in China after a September dispute over its buying of the Diaoyu Islands.'
p2765
aS"This country's TEPCO stock rose in value after news that the government sought to resume (*) nuclear power production."
p2766
aS"This country's LDP defeated the DPJ in the 2012 elections, meaning its new prime minister is Shinzo Abe."
p2767
aS'For ten points, identify this country whose Diet is located in Tokyo.'
p2768
aS'This man permitted a group of unarmed protesters to enter Goa in 1955, thirty of which were killed, and later invaded that colony.'
p2769
aS'This man stated, ""We shall never allow that torch of freedom to be blown out, however high the wind or stormy the tempest,"" in his ""Tryst With Destiny"" speech.'
p2770
aS'This man presided over the Lahore session of the Indian National Congress in 1929 that advocated independence.'
p2771
aS'For 20 points, name this man who served as the first prime minister of post-independence India.'
p2772
aS'He attempted to follow a policy of neutrality, cochairing the Bandung Conference in 1955 and signing the Panch Shila with Chou En-Lai.'
p2773
aS'At the same time, however, he favored territorial expansion, annexing Goa from Portugal and going to war over the Tibetan border in 1962.'
p2774
aS'FTP, identify this Brahmin, who became head of the Congress party in 1929 and served as prime minister of India from 1947 until 1964.'
p2775
aS'His father Motilal encouraged his education, and introduced him to such other independence activists as Anne Besant.'
p2776
aS'After visiting Dublin in 1907 and becoming interested in the Irish independence movement, he became more radical than his father in working towards Indian independence.'
p2777
aS'As a result, he helped found the Indian National Congress, and held important talks with Mohammed Ali Jinnah during the 1940s over the partition or unity of an Independent India.'
p2778
aS'FTP, name this man who was eventually succeeded as prime minister of India by his daughter Indira grandson Rajiv.'
p2779
aS'In his early life he was influenced by the theosophism of his tutor, Ferdinand Brooks.'
p2780
aS'During World_War_II, the envoys Lord Wavell and Stafford Cripps failed to reconcile his party with the rival party, founded by Aga Khan III.'
p2781
aS'In his most important post, he put through the Community Development Program and the 1951 five-year plan, going against the conservative politics of his father, Motilal.'
p2782
aS'Although under the influence of his minister Menon he was a leader of the non-aligned movement, he called for western aid when China encroached upon the Brahmaputra River.'
p2783
aS'FTP name this continuing leader of the Congress Party despite the protests of Sardar Patel and Gandhi, the grandfather of Sanjay and father of Indira Gandhi and first prime minister of independent India.'
p2784
aS'He served as secretary to an All Parties Conference where his father issued a namesake report calling for the creation of a federal government without a state religion.'
p2785
aS'Later in his life, he would gain fame for raising a flag of independence over the Ravi River in 1930, and later still he would be succeeded in the last office he held by Gulzaril Nanda.'
p2786
aS'The author of his countrys first 5-year plan in 1951, he would clash with his home secretary Vallabhbhai Patel over the handling of Kashmir, but later embraced Patels theories in his invasion of Goa.'
p2787
aS'Jailed eight times for, among others, his association with the Quit India movement and the Congress party, FTP, identify this first prime minister of India.'
p2788
aS'His Minister of Mines and Oil, K.D.'
p2789
aS'Malviya, was removed from office after an investigation by Judge Pathak found him guily of taking kickbacks, while the M.C.'
p2790
aS'Chagla Commission removed his corrupt Finance Minister, T.T.'
p2791
aS'Krishnamachari.'
p2792
aS'His political defeats included the election of party leader P.D.'
p2793
aS'Tandon and the election of President Rajendra Prasad, while political victories included his selection over Patel as Head of Government.'
p2794
aS'Accomplishments in the international sphere included a water treaty with Ayub Khan, the invasion of Goa, and, along with Josip Tito, founding the Non-Aligned Movement.'
p2795
aS'For ten points, name this first Prime Minister of India.'
p2796
aS'This man submitted an anonymous hit piece to the Modern Review accusing himself of being a condescending autocrat.'
p2797
aS'His sister was the first female president of the UN General Assembly, and his father was a founder of the Self-Rule Party.'
p2798
aS"This man's overtures to the nonaligned movement were discredited when he asked for Western help in a war with China in 1962."
p2799
aS'His government did overrun Goa and discredit the Punjabi independence movement before he was succeeded by L.B.'
p2800
aS'Shastri.'
p2801
aS'His daughter and grandson, Indira and Rajiv Gandhi, both became prime ministers.'
p2802
aS'FTP, name this first premier of India.'
p2803
aS"He is thought to have ordered the capture of Kashmiri Prime Minister Sheikh Abdullah, and this man's letters to his daughter were collected in Glimpses of World History."
p2804
aS'To commemorate a commitment to purna swaraj, he raised a flag over the Ravi River, and the achievement of this goal culminated in his "tryst with destiny" speech.'
p2805
aS"This figure's father led a failed (*) Bombay Conference attempt to reconcile the Muslim League with Hindu factions."
p2806
aS'Along with men like Sukarno and Gamel Nasser, he helped lead the Non-Aligned Movement, and both his daughter and grandson became prime ministers.'
p2807
aS'For 10 points, identify this oft-jailed first premier of India.'
p2808
aS'This man was defeated by 999 votes by Henry S. Foote for the Mississippi governorship after returning from a foot wound at the Battle of Buena Vista.'
p2809
aS"He negotiated the Gadsden Purchase as Franklin_Pierce's Secretary of War."
p2810
aS'His Secretary of State was Judah Benjamin.'
p2811
aS'This man, who was (*) captured in Irwinville, Georgia, removed his first Commander-in-Chief of his Army in favor of Robert_E._Lee.'
p2812
aS'For 10 points, name this President of the Confederate States of America.'
p2813
aS"John Reagan served as Postmaster General during the entirety of this president's administration."
p2814
aS'After\\n only seven months in office, this president was forced to shake-up his cabinet, firing Leroy Walker as\\n Secretary of War and Robert Toombs as Secretary of State.'
p2815
aS"This president's navy secretary, former Florida\\n Senator Stephen Mallory, authorized innovative ships like the Hunley."
p2816
aS"Several posts in this man's cabinet\\n were filled by Judah P. Benjamin, a Jew from Louisiana."
p2817
aS'Serving alongside Vice President Alexander\\n Stephens, this man appointed as commander of the Army of Northern Virginia Robert_E._Lee.'
p2818
aS'For 10\\n points, name this President of the Confederate States of America.'
p2819
aS'He resigned from the Senate in 1851 to run for governor, but was defeated by Henry Foote.'
p2820
aS'Five years earlier, he had resigned from the House to command the Mississippi Rifles in the Mexican-American War.'
p2821
aS"After serving as Pierce's Secretary of War, he returned to the Senate in 1857, only to resign again four years later, when Mississippi seceded."
p2822
aS'FTP, identify this Southern politician, who became provisional president of the Confederate government in 1861 and was elected to a six-year term as President the following year.'
p2823
aS"One ruler of this city feuded with the Egyptian leader Shawar; that man, a sometimes rival of Nur-ad-Din, was Amalric I. Amalric's successor, who was noted for his leprosy, defeated Saladin at the Battle of Montgisard and reigned as Baldwin IV."
p2824
aS"For 10 points, name this city that existed for many years as a crusader state and had earlier been the target of many crusades as Christianity's holy city."
p2825
aS'This man pardoned John Fries after his namesake Pennsylvania rebellion.'
p2826
aS'He noted that ""facts are stubborn things"" in his defense of the British soldiers implicated in the Boston_Massacre.'
p2827
aS'One of his last acts was appointing the ""Midnight Judges,"" including John Marshall.'
p2828
aS'This last Federalist president grew unpopular because of the Alien and Sedition Acts.'
p2829
aS'For 10 points, name this husband of Abigail and father of John Quincy, the second president of the United_States.'
p2830
aS"This man pardoned the instigators of Fries' rebellion."
p2831
aS'He served as the first ambassador to the U.K. and the Netherlands.'
p2832
aS'As president, he oversaw the Quasi War with France and appointed the ""Midnight Judges,"" partially sparking the case of Marbury_v._Madison.'
p2833
aS'This last Federalist president signed the Alien and Sedition Acts and served as the first vice-president of the U.S.. For 10 points, name this husband of Abigail and father of John Quincy, the second president of the United_States.'
p2834
aS'During his tenure as ambassador to the Dutch Republic, this man was able to obtain a loan for 5 million guilder, and on another occasion he participated in the capture of the Martha.'
p2835
aS"The Direct House Tax he signed led to Fries's Rebellion."
p2836
aS'As part of his efforts to expand the navy, he commissioned the USS Constitution, though he avoided using it to expand the Quasi-War.'
p2837
aS'In an attempt to quell growing criticism, this man signed the Alien and Sedition Acts, though Alexander_Hamilton spoiled his re-election bid by splitting part of the Federalist Party in favor of Charles Cotesworth Pinckney.'
p2838
aS'For 10 points, identify this first resident of the White House who succeeded George_Washington as president.'
p2839
aS'points, name this Federalist rival of Thomas_Jefferson, a U. S. President whose son was also President.'
p2840
aS"One of this man's mistakes was letting a train go through after the death of Hayward Shepherd."
p2841
aS'His earlier activities included moving to North Elba, New York and starting the League of Gileadites.'
p2842
aS'Using the alias Shubel Morgan, he led a group that killed David Cruise in Missouri, and helped a group that eventually went through Detroit to Canada.'
p2843
aS'In reaction to the sacking of Lawrence, he had earlier led a group that killed five people near Pottawatomie Creek.'
p2844
aS'On October 16, 1859, he led a group that captured a federal armory, but two days later his group was defeated by Marines under the command of Robert_E._Lee.'
p2845
aS'Name this abolitionist who led a raid on Harpers Ferry.'
p2846
aS'This man referred to Anabaptists as "yucokonoi" in the preface to a work refuting the idea of "soul sleep."'
p2847
aS'This author of Psychopannychia explained his theological views in Institutes of the Christian Religion.'
p2848
aS'He denounced Michael Servetus and mentored John Knox while heading the church of a city to which he returned five years after being expelled and going to Strasbourg.'
p2849
aS'For 10 points, name this French minister led the Protestant Reformation in Geneva, where he preached the doctrine of predestination.'
p2850
aS"This man's political career began after he accompanied his uncle Robert Lansing to the Versailles Peace Conference."
p2851
aS'Later he helped draft the UN charter while working under Arthur Vandenburg.'
p2852
aS'This man was the architect behind the treaty establishing SEATO and the Treaty of San_Francisco.'
p2853
aS'He also advocated intervention to aid the French during the Battle of Dien Bien Phu.'
p2854
aS"This man developed the Cold War policy of (*) brinksmanship and was the brother of Allen, the director of the CIA throughout most of the 1950's."
p2855
aS'For 10 points, name this Secretary of State under Dwight Eisenhower.'
p2856
aS'In 1918, he was legal counsel to the US delegation to the Versailles conference, which also included his uncle, Secretary of State Robert Lansing.'
p2857
aS'He engineered the CENTO alliance in Asia and instigated the overthrow of Jacobo Arbenz in Guatemala.'
p2858
aS'He always carried a copy of Problems with Leninism, and he famously said that The United_States does not have friends, it only has interests, and opposed containment in favor of a more aggressive rollback strategy.'
p2859
aS'For 10 points, name this career diplomat, Eisenhowers Secretary of State after Dean Acheson and older brother to CIA director Allen.'
p2860
aS'After a succession dispute with his rival Arthur, the Duke of Brittany, this rulers right to take the throne was recognized by the Treaty of Le Goulet.'
p2861
aS'An international alliance he established was soundly defeated at the Battle_of_Bouvines, while he was forced to agree to terms with the legate Pandulf after his refusal to accept Stephen Langton as Archbishop resulted in a papal interdiction.'
p2862
aS'The last years of his reign were spent fighting the forces of Louis VIII, who invaded England at the behest of this kings barons after he renounced some concessions forced upon him at Runnymede.'
p2863
aS'For ten points, name this King of England who signed the Magna_Carta.'
p2864
aS'This thinker published a series of letters containing child rearing advice as Some Thoughts Concerning Education.'
p2865
aS'As a secretary to the Earl of Shaftesbury, this man drafted the short lived Fundamental Constitutions of Carolina.'
p2866
aS'His theories of "government with the consent of the governed" and individual rights to life, liberty, and property, informed the U.S. founding fathers.'
p2867
aS'For 10 points, name this English philosopher.'
p2868
aS'This man wrote that "promises, covenants, and oaths...can have no hold on an atheist" a year before he argued against the idea that rightful kings are direct descendants of Adam, refuting Robert Filmer.'
p2869
aS"This man believed that money removed a natural limit on accumulation, and described man's mixture of his labor with nature as the basis of our entitlement to property."
p2870
aS'The Jeffersonian phrase "consent of the governed" echoes this man\'s view that government must secure "life, liberty, and estate."'
p2871
aS'For 10 points, name this man who wrote Two Treatises of Government in 1690, a British social contract theorist.'
p2872
aS'While serving with a delegation at the Versailles conference, this man was opposed by the "Heavenly Twin", so called because they demanded "astronomically" high reparations from Germany, an action that this man repudiated as a sound policy in his work The Economic Consequences of the Peace.'
p2873
aS'The concept of price stickiness was first introduced by this man, who also introduced the money multiplier and lends his name to a "cross" depicting equilibrium GDP.'
p2874
aS"This man's most influential work argues in favor of government intervention in the economy, including deficit spending."
p2875
aS'For 10 points, name this British economist, the author of The General Theory of Employment, Interest and Money.'
p2876
aS"This man once earned two of Louisiana's five electoral votes, the only ones he received from a slave state."
p2877
aS'He worked for eight years to repeal the Gag Rule in Congress.'
p2878
aS'This man lost a Senate seat when he went against his Federalist Party to support the Embargo Bill.'
p2879
aS'As Secretary of State, he purchased the Florida Territory.'
p2880
aS'After winning an election, this man made (*) Henry_Clay his Secretary of State.'
p2881
aS'For 10 points, name this man who succeeded James_Monroe as President, perhaps due to a ""corrupt bargain"" in the 1824 election.'
p2882
aS'After his time in office, this president was then elected as a member of the House of Represenatives for 17 years.'
p2883
aS'As Secretary of State, he authored the Monroe Doctrine, and thanks to the support of Henry_Clay, his presidential election in 1824 was successful, though this was deemed a ""corrupt bargain"" by opponents.'
p2884
aS'For 10 points, name this sixth U.S. President.'
p2885
aS'For unknown reasons his mastery of French at the age of 14 got him an appointment as interpreter and secretary to Francis Dana, U.S. envoy to Russia.'
p2886
aS'His later travels were the subject of his Letters to Silesia, though he had already gained note as Publicola, a journalistic supporter of France over Britain.'
p2887
aS'His work continued with the setting the groundwork for Rush-Bagot after he had headed negotiations at Ghent.'
p2888
aS'Known as "Old Man Eloquent," he died in 1848 on the floor of Congress.'
p2889
aS'FTP, name this man who served as a Representative after serving, from 1825 to 1829, as the sixth president of the United_States.'
p2890
aS"This man attempted to replace Smith Thompson with a man who had served as special prosecutor during the murder case of William Morgan and whose son was executed for his role in the Somers mutiny, which occurred during this president's time in office."
p2891
aS'He envisioned a tripartite treaty which would have ceded San_Francisco and Monterey to the US and Caleb Cushing helped to negotiate the Treaty of Wangxia during his presidency.'
p2892
aS"Edward Everett, his minister to Britain, helped keep the British out of the Sandwich Islands, though the deaths of David Gardiner, Thomas Gilmer, and Abel Upshur happened in a notable tragedy during this man's presidency, the USS Princeton incident."
p2893
aS"Governor Samuel King was able to put down the revolt of Thomas Dorr and the Webster-Ashburton Treaty was the crowning achievement of Secretary of State Daniel_Webster during this man's presidency."
p2894
aS'Most famous for signing the bill annexing Texas, FTP, name this "accidental" Virginian president who succeeded the late William Henry Harrison and served from 1841-1845.'
p2895
aS"He was elected to Congress to fill the seat left empty after John Clopton's death."
p2896
aS'He managed to get the Danish tariff of 1695 reduced, and Matthew Maury was made head of the National Observatory during his presidency.'
p2897
aS'He appointed Samuel Nelson to the Supreme Court, and one of his first acts was to veto the Fiscal Corporation bill, while the Treaty of Wangxia was signed during his presidency.'
p2898
aS"Two of his cabinet members, Thomas Gilmer and Abel Upshur, were killed by an explosion on the U. S. S. Princeton, while other events during his presidency were Dorr's Rebellion and the signing of the Webster-Ashburton treaty."
p2899
aS'FTP, Texas was annexed during the term of what man known as "His Accidency," who became president upon the death of William Henry Harrison'
p2900
aS'This man met with Army Secretary Robert Stevens in what would be called the "Chicken Luncheon.'
p2901
aS'" He was heavily criticized for his defense of the SS soldiers accused of perpetrating the Malmedy massacre.'
p2902
aS'This man was later investigated by the Watkins Committee, and he was earlier rebuked by the Tydings Committee.'
p2903
aS"This politician's downfall came after he was notably criticized by attorney Joseph Welch."
p2904
aS'In 1950, this man gave a speech in Wheeling, West Virginia, where he claimed to have an infamous list.'
p2905
aS'For 10 points, name this Wisconsin Senator whose name is synonymous with the 1950\'s "witch-hunting" of Communists in the government.'
p2906
aS"While leading his country, this man's policies helped cause a famine known as the Holodomor."
p2907
aS'He appointed Vyacheslav Molotov to be his prime minister, and his Five Year Plans included the creation of collective farms.'
p2908
aS'This leader, who espoused the policy of "socialism in one country," pulled troops from Manchuria after the Japanese bombed Pearl Harbor, and Nikita Kruschev spoke against this leader\'s policies in the Secret Speech.'
p2909
aS'This leader attended the Yalta Conference with the other Allies.'
p2910
aS'For 10 points, name this successor to Lenin as premier of the Soviet Union.'
p2911
aS'This man refused to agree to a prisoner exchange of his son for Friedrich Paulus.'
p2912
aS"This man's death halted the prosecution of the alleged conspirators in the Doctor's Plot."
p2913
aS'This ruler agreed to initiate an Eastern offensive to coincide with the opening of a Western Front at the Tehran Conference.'
p2914
aS'The excesses of his rule were denounced in Nikita_Khrushchev\'s ""Secret Speech.'
p2915
aS'"" This man saw to the expulsion of Leon Trotsky from the Soviet Union in 1929.'
p2916
aS'For 10 points, name this Soviet leader during World_War_II.'
p2917
aS'This leader was denounced by his successor in the ""Secret Speech.'
p2918
aS'"" His country agreed to a non-aggression pact with Germany, but Hitler invaded his nation in Operation Barbarossa.'
p2919
aS"He won a power struggle against Leon Trotsky after Vladimir Lenin's death."
p2920
aS'For 10 points, name this Soviet Premier during the Second World War.'
p2921
aS"He was captured in Bukovina and sent to a work camp in the Urals, where he was selected as the camp's leader."
p2922
aS'Eventually, he broke out, and made his way to St. Petersburg and eventually to Omsk where he joined the Red Guard.'
p2923
aS'After the revolution he made his way back to his native land where he became a member of the Communist Party of Yugoslavia.'
p2924
aS'He was a faithful ComIntern member until after World_War_II, when he was elected Prime Minister of his country, and eventually became dictator.'
p2925
aS"Refusing to cave to Stalin's demands on how to run his country, he began to emphasize neutrality from both the USSR and the US and became a prominent leader in the non-aligned movement."
p2926
aS'For ten points, name this man who ruled Yugoslavia from the end of World_War_II until his death in 1980 and formulated an adaptation of communism named for him.'
p2927
aS"This man was excommunicated for his government's conviction of Aloysius Stepanic."
p2928
aS'Able to stay in power through the tumultuous Informbiro Period, this man instituted economic decentralization despite the opposition of Aleksandr Rankovic.'
p2929
aS"This man signed a treaty at Vis with Subasic which was intended to relieve King Peter II's government in exile, and he led his Partisans to victory on the Syrmian Front."
p2930
aS"This man's open support of the Greek communist cause was one of several disagreements he had with the Soviets."
p2931
aS'Along with Nehru and Nasser, he founded the Non-Aligned Movement two decades after his break with Stalin.'
p2932
aS'For 10 points, name this leader of Yugoslavia from 1953 to 1980.'
p2933
aS'During this mans rule, compaas deslindadoras were set up to survey and privatize land that was often already settled by poorer citizens of his country.'
p2934
aS'This man created an office under himself to which Ramn Corral was appointed.'
p2935
aS'Corral was a member of this mans supporting group of cientificos.'
p2936
aS'This man was succeeded after his first term in office by Manuel Gonzlez.'
p2937
aS'This ruler had unsuccessfully used the Plan de Noria against one opponent, but the Plan de Tuxtepec helped this ruler replace Sebastin Lerdo de Tejada as president.'
p2938
aS'An interview with James Creelman inspired Francisco Madero to run against this man.'
p2939
aS'For 10 points, name this Mexican president who, despite once advocating for no reelection of presidents, ruled Mexico for most of the time between 1877 and 1911.'
p2940
aS'Mistakes made by this politician include the exile of Jose Limantour, leader of the Cientificos, and including a "no re-elections" slogan in his opposition to Lerdo de Tejada, which became the Plan of Tuxtepec and was issued from Oaxaca.'
p2941
aS'Advocating "bread or stick" governing, this target of the Plan of San Luis Patosi served in the War of the (*) Reform and used the rurales to push Hacienda owners to modernization after coming to power by battling against Jaurez.'
p2942
aS"He lost power following an offhand mark to James Creelman of Pearson's Magazine, after which his exiling of Bernardo Reyes and forged election results against Francisco Madero sparked the Mexican Revolution."
p2943
aS'FTP, identify this man who was overthrown as President of Mexico in 1911 after first assuming office in 1876.'
p2944
aS'He was an unsuccessful presidential candidate in 1867 and 1871, but would lead his nation for a period of 31 out of 35 years.'
p2945
aS'In 1876 he overthrew the government of President Sebastian Lerdo de Tejada, and while he had to cede power for four years because the constitution would not allow presidents to serve consecutive terms, he rewrote that rule when he returned to power in 1884.'
p2946
aS'For ten points, identify the Mexican dictator who ruled until 1911, when he himself was overthrown by Francisco Madero.'
p2947
aS'His wide-open, fearless, dark eyes were described as connecting him with the immensity of the landscape of his land by one interviewer.'
p2948
aS'He once expressed lament that his country was so far from God yet so close to another country.'
p2949
aS'He occupied his hometown of Oaxaca during the Reform War, and he later became the military commander of the Department of Tehuatepec.'
p2950
aS'He served under Bernardo Reyes during the battle of Puebla, and he led a revolt against Sebastian Lerdo de Tejada after becoming dissatisfied with the politics of Benito_Juarez.'
p2951
aS'For 10 points, identify this nineteenth century general and longtime presidential dictator of Mexico.'
p2952
aS'This man once led a rebellion that was defeated at the Battle of La Bufa.'
p2953
aS'Later, this man won the Battle of Tecoac, which led to the resignation of his rival Sebastian Lerdo.'
p2954
aS'This author of the Plan of Tuxtepec [tush-te-pec] briefly relinquished power to Manuel (*) Gonzalez and later to Francisco de la Barra.'
p2955
aS"This man's regime relied on educated advisors called tecnicos."
p2956
aS'This man first ran for office on the platform of "Free Suffrage, No Re-Election", but this hero of the Battle of Puebla served eight terms before being forced out by Francisco Madero.'
p2957
aS'For ten points, name this long-serving President of Mexico whose 1911 overthrow sparked the Mexican Revolution.'
p2958
aS'He was brought up at the estate of Macellum in Cappadocia and as a youth converted to Neoplatonism.'
p2959
aS'Ammianus Marcellinus describes him as a stocky, athletic type, which is confirmed by his statue in the Louvre.'
p2960
aS'He defeated and expelled the Alemanni and the Franks, and was set to take on Constantius II, when Constantius died.'
p2961
aS'After assuming power in 361, he ruled for only twenty months.'
p2962
aS'FTP, identify this nephew of Constantine_the_Great who gained his nickname when he renounced Christianity and became a pagan.'
p2963
aS'He stated that he only vomited once in his life and confessed that his breast was shaggy in the self-satirical Misopogon, or Beard-Hater.'
p2964
aS'His Gallic campaign saw victory at Strasbourg, and ended when he was ordered to put down the siege of Amida, which led the Petulantes to revolt and crown him in Paris.'
p2965
aS'He ordered Alypius of Antioch to rebuild the second temple of Jerusalem and promulgated the School Edict, which prevented Christian schools from using pagan texts.'
p2966
aS'He also reversed the policies of his predecessor, Constantius II, declaring freedom of religion in a 362 edict.'
p2967
aS'Known for attempting to revive Hellenism, FTP name this Roman Emperor whose moniker came from his rejection of Christianity.'
p2968
aS'Before coming to power, this man recaptured modern-day Cologne from the Alemanni, whom he subsequently routed at the Battle of Strasbourg, and later served as Governor of Belgium.'
p2969
aS'When ordered send his forces to Mespotamia, his soldiers rebelled and declared him emperor.'
p2970
aS'Upon coming to power, he took the unusual step of banning eunuchs from imperial office.'
p2971
aS'More famously, he convoked a tribunal under the command of Arbitio at Chalcedon for the purpose of purging his enemies, mostly supporters of Constantius II.'
p2972
aS'He sent the future usurper Procopius to Armenia to lead a joint attack against Ctesiphon, which he unsuccessfully besieged, but his campaign against the Sassanids ended when he was killed in battle, traditionally by St. Mercurius.'
p2973
aS'For ten points, name this Roman Emperor, best known for being a convert to paganism.'
p2974
aS'This man\'s illegitimate daughter was known as "Madonna Felice."'
p2975
aS'His former secretary became the controversial cardinal Francesco Alidosi.'
p2976
aS"This man excommunicated Alfonso d'Este, a duke of Ferrara, and he placed a republic under interdict during a conflict that featured the Battle of Agnadello."
p2977
aS'In attempting to fight (*) Venice, he created an alliance with such rulers as Louis XII, Maximilian I, and Ferdinand Ii of Aragon.'
p2978
aS'This pope united various monarchs as the League of Cambrai.'
p2979
aS'His tomb was initially to feature such sculptures as the "Dying" and "Rebellious Slave."'
p2980
aS'This pope commissioned Michelangelo to paint the ceiling of the Sistine Chapel.'
p2981
aS'For 10 points, name this 1500\'s pope known as the "Warrior Pope."'
p2982
aS'This figure was the subject of a murder plot by Giampolo Baglioni, whom he deposed along with Giovanni Bentivoglio.'
p2983
aS'In his early career he was outmaneuvered by Ascanio Sforza and another man, prompting this figure to retaliate by convincing Charles VIII to invade Naples.'
p2984
aS'He called on Duke Federigo to help subjugate Citta di Castello, while one effort to limit the power of this man saw a Synod at (*) Tours dictate that this ruler had no right to launch wars against foreign princes.'
p2985
aS'Convening the Fifth Lateran Council, his best-known achievements occurred after negotiations with Louis XI and Maximillian, leading this successor of Pius III to acquire the territories of Rimini and Faenza from the Republic of Venice after forming the Holy League in the War of the League of Cambrai.'
p2986
aS'FTP, identify this opponent of Alexander VI, the "warrior pope" whose patronage of Bramante, Raphael, and Michelangelo saw the creation of works like the Sistine ceiling.'
p2987
aS'He was elected by the shortest-lasting conclave of cardinals in papal history.'
p2988
aS'The start of his pontificate saw the conquering of Bologna, and he reluctantly joined the League of Cambrai to bring Venice under his reign.'
p2989
aS'The nephew of Pope Sixtus IV, he took the throne upon the death of Pius III, who reigned for only twenty-six days.'
p2990
aS'He delivered Italy from its subjugation to France, but is most famous as a patron of the arts.'
p2991
aS'Born Giuliano Della Rovere and ruling from 1503-13, FTP, identify this pope who commissioned Michelangelo to paint the Sistine Chapel.'
p2992
aS'This event may have inspired the subsequent Cadet Revolution in Poland, also known as the November Insurrection, and this event was preceded by a string of arsons known as The Norman Fires.'
p2993
aS'Those charged with stopping this event included Colonel Komierowski, while supporters of this event included the Count of Lobau, Georges Mouton, who was the leader of the National Guard, as well as the banker Jacques Laffitte.'
p2994
aS'The Address of the 221 was delivered a few months before this event, which was opposed by the security chief August de Marmont, and whose primary cause was discontent with the Prince de Polignac and the Saint-Cloud Ordinances.'
p2995
aS'Also known as the three glorious days and resulting in the adoption of the tricolor, for ten points name this revolt that overthrew Charles X and led to the accession of Louis-Philippe as King of the French, named for the summer month in which it took place.'
p2996
aS'People such as prominent banker Jacques Laffitte and liberal journalist Adolphe Thiers spear-headed the opposition view, which led to this event.'
p2997
aS'Tensions came to a head when the Chamber of Deputies objected as reactionary Jules de Polignac was directed to form a new ministry.'
p2998
aS'After insurrection developed, the seated monarch was forced to flee and abdicated in favor of his grandson.'
p2999
aS'Escalation occurred when ultraroyalists attempted a return to the anciens regime under Charles X, who would establish strong press controls and reduce the electorate through a series of decrees named by the titular month.'
p3000
aS"For 10 points, name this insurrection which brought to power the Duke d'Orleans Louis-Philippe and established a short-lived monarchy of the same name."
p3001
aS'This event was sparked by the passing six years earlier of the Law Against Sacrilege, which doled out increasing criminal penalties for theft or profanation of holy objects or vessels containing holy objects.'
p3002
aS'A petition drafted in the midst of this event by men like Casimir Perier and Georges Mouton was quickly rebuffed by Auguste Marmont.'
p3003
aS'Most immediately, it was caused by a set of documents which placed censorship orders on the press, drafted by the newly appointed Jules de Polignac.'
p3004
aS'His attempt to dissolve the Chamber of Deputies resulted in the storming of the Hotel de Ville during the "Three Glorious Days" after the drafting of some namesake ordinances in this event.'
p3005
aS'For 10 points, name this uprising by which King Charles X was forced into exile and replaced with Louis-Philippe in 1830, and which bears the name of a certain month.'
p3006
aS'This man called the Second Council of Constantinople in order to resolve the Monophysite Controversy.'
p3007
aS"One of this ruler's reform efforts was overseen by Tribonian."
p3008
aS"The Secret History of Procopius is an account of this man's reign."
p3009
aS'This ruler was opposed by the Blues and Greens in one rebellion.'
p3010
aS"That revolt, the Nika Riot, was suppressed by this man's general Belisarius."
p3011
aS'For 10 points, name this husband of Theodora, a Byzantine emperor who oversaw the creation of his namesake legal code.'
p3012
aS'This man employed such officials as the poet Paul the Silentiary, and a notable account of his reign was written by Agathias.'
p3013
aS'He ended the Lazic War by dispatching his envoy Peter the Patrician, and during his reign, Totila was slain at the Battle of Taginae.'
p3014
aS"This man ordered the officer Mundus to attack the supporters of Anastasius' nephew, (*) Hypatius."
p3015
aS'This monarch, a supporter of the "Blues" faction of chariot racing enthusiasts, employed such scholars as Tribonian, who helped to compile the legislative collection Corpus juris civilis.'
p3016
aS'This husband of Theodora was the target of the Nika riots and the ruler who dispatched his general Belisarius to retake Western Roman lands.'
p3017
aS'For 10 points, name this Byzantine ruler who built the Hagia Sophia.'
p3018
aS'This ruler ordered the reconstruction of the Baths of Zeuxippus, and he denounced the Three Chapters in an effort to reconcile two religious factions.'
p3019
aS'One of his first acts was to ban suffragia, or the sale of regional governorships.'
p3020
aS'This ruler brokered the Eternal Peace with his eastern neighbor, Khosrau I. Depicted with a halo over his head in a panel from the Church of San Vitale, he banished John of Cappadocia for conspiring against him with Antonina.'
p3021
aS"Unrest during this man's reign was caused by animosity between the Blues and the Greens in the Hippodrome."
p3022
aS'He promulgated a namesake law code compiled by Tribonian, and he instructed Narses to distribute gold as part of his suppression of the Nika Riots.'
p3023
aS'For 10 points, name this husband of Theodora, a Byzantine emperor who supervised the construction of the Hagia Sophia.'
p3024
aS'This ruler patronized such poets as Romanus the Melodist.'
p3025
aS'This ruler took advantage of the death of Amalasuntha to invade Sicily.'
p3026
aS"This man's reign saw a loss to Gelimer at Ad Decimum, but at Tricamarum generals serving this ruler defeated the Vandals."
p3027
aS"Another conflict occurring during this ruler's reign saw a major defeat at Callinicum, which was followed by a truce known as the Eternal Peace."
p3028
aS'He put down unrest instigated by members of the Blue and Green factions, and one of his most important achievements, which was overseen by Tribonian, solidified the power of the emperor and outlawed certain religious practices.'
p3029
aS'For 10 points, name this Byzantine emperor, husband of Theodora and author of a revolutionary legal code.'
p3030
aS'His father, who was illiterate, notably repealed a law preventing senators from marrying lower-class women.'
p3031
aS'Rebuilding projects during this mans reign included the Church of the Holy Apostles and the San Vitale in Ravenna, which featured mosaics of him and his consort Theodora.'
p3032
aS'While his reign was marked by conflict with the Papacy over the handling of the monophysite heresy in Syria, it also saw the recompiling of the Corpus Juris Civilis, which became known as his namesake code.'
p3033
aS'He had the Hagia Sophia rebuilt after it was burned down in the Nika riots, which were put down by his general Belisarius.'
p3034
aS'FTP, name this Byzantine emperor, the last leader of the Eastern Roman Empire.'
p3035
aS"This ruler's armies conquered the Zan people of Georgia but suffered losses to a group led by Totila."
p3036
aS"His forces engaged Gelimer's in the Vandalic War, and a namesake plague during his reign forced him to cancel many of his public works projects."
p3037
aS'The Chalke and the Baths of Zeuxippus were damaged during his reign after the Blues and Greens united, forcing him to remove Tribonian from office.'
p3038
aS'That mob in the Hippodrome was crushed by his general Belisarius.'
p3039
aS'For 10 points, name this Byzantine emperor who survived the Nika riots, instituted a namesake law code, and reconquered parts of the Western Roman Empire.'
p3040
aS"One of this ruler's generals was sent to overthrow the barbarian Gelimer and won the Battles of Tricamarum and Ad Decimum."
p3041
aS'He was called a "million year old demon" in The Secret History by Procopius, and the(*) Blue and Green factions at a chariot race turned into a rebellion against him, the Nika Revolt.'
p3042
aS"This emperor's general Belisarius reconquered much of the Western Roman Empire and this emperor built the Hagia Sofia in his capital city."
p3043
aS'For 10 points, name this "Great" ruler of the Byzantine Empire who created a namesake law code.'
p3044
aS"Achieved after Albert of Mecklenburg failed to pay a tribute, its end was precipitated by the Stockholm Bloodbath, Christian II's murder of 82 noblemen."
p3045
aS'Realized with the coronation of Erik of Pomerania, it was the driven by the ambition of Queen Maragaret of Norway and was the subject of the meeting of three Rigsraads on Trinity Sunday in 1397.'
p3046
aS'Dissolved by Gustav I Vasa in 1523, FTP name this 136 year union of Denmark, Sweden, and Norway.'
p3047
aS'Before ascending to the throne, King Hans was forced to add to the charter of this entity the principle of jus resistendi, or the legal removal of an unjust tyrant.'
p3048
aS'Formal recognition of Hans in one member state was put off for sixteen years by the maneuverings of the elder Sten Sture.'
p3049
aS'This polity was weakened by earlier rebellions led by Amund Bolt in one member and Engelbrekt in another, leading to the deposition of its monarch, Eric of Pomerania.'
p3050
aS'The struggle between Archbishop Gustav Strolle and Sten Sture the Younger provided Christian II the chance to regain full control of this entity by invading the capital of one member, culminating in the beheading of 80 nobles known as the Stockholm Bloodbath.'
p3051
aS'Gustav Vasas accession to the throne presaged the final dissolution of, FTP, what 1397-1521 political merger of the kingdoms of Sweden, Norway, and Denmark'
p3052
aS'[AR] The main plenipotentiary of this coalition, after removing all threats of domestic sedition through the acquiescence of Schleswig via the compact of Nyborg, was able to capture and imprison Albert of Mecklenburg and establish this confederation.'
p3053
aS'Major events that occurred during it include the Engelbrekt Rebellion, which led to the deposing of Erik of Pomerania and the Stockholm Bloodbath.'
p3054
aS'It was dissolved when Christian II of Demark was removed after a successful rebellion led by Gustav Vasa.'
p3055
aS'Formalized in 1397 by a treaty signed at the eponymous castle and spearheaded by Queen Margareta of Norway, for 10 points, name this 14th-16th century confederation of Denmark, Norway and Sweden.'
p3056
aS'Though it is not France, this polity was co-ruled by a man who assumed the name Charles VIII and was put down when trying to take full control of one of its constituents.'
p3057
aS'This polity captured Flensburg after fighting for control over the Oresund with its chief rival.'
p3058
aS'Its power was challenged with lower class uprisings led by Engelbrecht Engelbrechtson and had to be reinstated in an event led by Jorgen Holmuth whose targets were supporters of Sten Sture the Younger.'
p3059
aS"That event, the Stockholm Bloodbath, occurred during Christian II's authority over this confederation."
p3060
aS'Its creation was solidified by the Coronation Letter establishing a hereditary monarchy begun by Eric of Pomerania.'
p3061
aS'Engineered by Queen Margaret I in 1397, for 10 points, name this Scandinavian confederation of Norway, Sweden, and Denmark'
p3062
aS'In this state, Todd Tiarht defeated future Clinton Secretary of Agriculture Dan Glickman following redistricting that created the Big First.'
p3063
aS'A recent scandal in this state involved the Polanksy farms, and its junior senator served as chair of the Senate Intelligence Committee.'
p3064
aS'That man, Pat Roberts, joined in the senate the man who defeated Sheila Frahm.'
p3065
aS"Ohio Governor John J. Gilligan's daughter is rare democrat as the governor of this state, and was tasked with responding to the most recent state of the Union."
p3066
aS'FTP, identify this home to Kathleen Sebelius, Sam Brownback, and Bob Dole, whose cities include Wichita and Topeka.'
p3067
aS'Raiders led by William Quantrill responded to a jail collapse by sacking a city in this state.'
p3068
aS'A senator from this state, James Henry Lane, recruited the first African-American regiment to fight, and black colonies were created in this state by Benjamin "Pap" Singleton.'
p3069
aS'Many of the Exodusters settled in this state, where a pro-slavery Lecompton Constitution had been drafted.'
p3070
aS'John Brown led the Pottawatomie Massacre in this state, where Lawrence was burned as a result of conflicts between Bushwhackers and Jayhawkers.'
p3071
aS'For 10 points, name this last state admitted to the Union before the start of the Civil War, with its capital at Topeka.'
p3072
aS'_ _Pentecostal pioneer Charles Fox Parham founded his Bethel Healing Home in this state, in which Joseph McCoy built stockyards in railheads at the end of the Chisholm Trail.'
p3073
aS'This was the home state of William Allen White, whose Emporia Gazette published an attack on William_Jennings_Bryan asking "What\'s the Matter" with this state.'
p3074
aS'Earlier, this state had seen the Pottawatomie Massacre perpetrated by John Brown in Lawrence.'
p3075
aS'For 10 points, name this state where trouble was caused by "Border Ruffians" from Missouri.'
p3076
aS'A Nobel-winning environmentalist from this country founded the Green Belt Movement.'
p3077
aS"This country's government tried to increase the export price of gold in the Goldenberg scandal during the 1990s."
p3078
aS"This country's army fought against secessionist ethnic Somalis in the Shifta War."
p3079
aS'The trial of a group of nationalists from this country known as the "Kapenguria Six" took place under the governorship of Evelyn Baring.'
p3080
aS'Hezekiah Ochuka led a failed 1982 coup attempt against its second president, Daniel arap Moi.'
p3081
aS"The execution of Dedan Kimathi signaled the defeat of this country's rebellion against its British colonizers, the Mau Mau Uprising."
p3082
aS'For 10 points, name this African country whose founding father, a member of the Kikuyu people, was Jomo Kenyatta.'
p3083
aS"While under colonial rule, this country's natives were forced into the kipande labor system."
p3084
aS'The Luo chieftain Oginga Odinga formed the Forum for the Restoration of Democracy in this country, whose leading nationalists were put on trial by Governor Evelyn Baring as the Kapenguria Six.'
p3085
aS'Operation Anvil and a massacre at Lari were part of one uprising in this country that ended after the death of Dedan Kimathi.'
p3086
aS'Its first leader, who promoted (*) harambee, or "pulling together," was succeeded by Daniel arap Moi.'
p3087
aS"The native Kikuyu led this country's Mau Mau Rebellion."
p3088
aS'For ten points, identify this African country founded by Jomo Kenyatta, with capital at Nairobi.'
p3089
aS'In the 9th century, it was united by Jayavarman II, and Sanskrit literature flourished under the enlightened court of him and his successors, who tolerated both Buddhism and Siva worship.'
p3090
aS'This empire fought repeated wars against the Annamese and the Chams, finally falling to the Thais in 1434, after which its capital was transferred from the stone temples of the Angkor region to Phnom Penh.'
p3091
aS'FTP name this ancient Cambodian empire, which later lent its name to an infamous political party.'
p3092
aS'The declaration that formally established this dynasty was made on Kulan Mountain.'
p3093
aS'The first Westerner to discover their ruins was Henri Mahout, though stories of the elegance of its capital had been told much earlier by a visiting Chinese emissary, Zhou Daguan.'
p3094
aS'Among the landmarks in its main capital were the temples Ta Prohm, the Baphuon, and Ta Keo, the first of which was made entirely from sandstone.'
p3095
aS'A complex at Roulos formed the original capital of this empire, which expanded through its conquest of the Mon Kingdom and eventually that of Champa, though it would later fall itself to the Ayutthaya [ay-yut-THIGH-yuh].'
p3096
aS'Rajendravarman II, Suryavarman II, and the founder Jayavarman II were among the notable rulers of, FTP, what medieval empire of South Asia centered around Angkor in present-day Cambodia'
p3097
aS'One later polity of this name was ruled from Lovek by Chan I, and in 1794, this polity was partitioned before putting a refugee named Eng on its throne.'
p3098
aS"Zhou Daguan was arguably the most prominent foreign visitor to this polity and one period in this polity's history was the roluos period."
p3099
aS'The most famous leader of this polity was counseled by the priest Divakarapandita and later in life was defeated at Nghe An and at Harideva to the Chams, who he would die fighting against.'
p3100
aS'Its capital of Yasodhapura was founded by Yasovarman I, and later kings such as Jayavarman VII and Suryavarman II would add to the buildings at what came to be known as Angkor.'
p3101
aS'FTP, name this Cambodian empire.'
p3102
aS'This empire was forced to pay tribute by the Mongol General Sagatu, and after its destruction this empire was briefly restored by King Barom Reachea.'
p3103
aS'Important sources for the history of this empire include the diary of Zhou Daguan, a Chinese diplomat who visited it on behalf of the Yuan dynasty.'
p3104
aS"This empire's first major capital was Yasodharapura."
p3105
aS'It fought successful wars against its eastern neighbor, the (*) Champas, but was finally vanquished by its southern neighbor, the Ayutthaya Empire.'
p3106
aS'Featuring many kings named Suryavarman and Jayavarman, this empire is perhaps best known for a temple complex in its capital.'
p3107
aS'For ten points, name this empire based in Angkor, which once ruled Cambodia.'
p3108
aS'According to legend, this city was founded by a brother of Schek and Khoryv who was also the sister of Lybid, and the city now bears a version of his name.'
p3109
aS'It was captured by Oleg, the ruler of a neighboring city, which began its rise as a regional power.'
p3110
aS'Its prince Vladimir I oversaw its mass conversion to Christianity, while a later ruler, Yaroslav the Wise, appointed its first bishop, Hilarion.'
p3111
aS'Those leaders were a part of its namesake (*) Rus state.'
p3112
aS'For 10 points, name this city on the Dnieper River, now the capital of Ukraine.'
p3113
aS'A ruler of this country unsuccessfully attempted to raise money by instituting the tartib tax on produce and livestock.'
p3114
aS'A king of this country was nearly assassinated on the orders of his minister of defense Mohamed Oufkir while flying in a Boeing 727.'
p3115
aS'Muhammad ben Arafa ruled this country for a little more than two years between the exile and return of Mohammed V. People from this country entered a neighboring territory during the Green March, which sparked a conflict with the Polisario Front.'
p3116
aS'This country ruled by the Alaouite Dynasty was visited by the Panther and Wilhelm II, leading to two crises in the buildup to World_War_I.'
p3117
aS'For 10 points, name this West African country that was held as a French protectorate for over forty years and lays claim to the territory of Western Sahara.'
p3118
aS"One of this country's cities includes the square Jemaa el-Fnaa and includes the gate Bab Ksiba in its red sandstone walls."
p3119
aS"This nation's largest city contains the enormous Hassan II Mosque."
p3120
aS"Its border with its southeastern neighbor is formed by the Draa River, this nation's longest."
p3121
aS"In an incident named for this nation's city Agadir, its sultan fled."
p3122
aS"This nation's highest peak, Toubkal, is also the highest in the Atlas Mountains, of which this country contains the westernmost part."
p3123
aS'This country contains the city of Fez, and lies south of the Strait of Gibraltar.'
p3124
aS'For 10 points, name this north African country whose cities include Marrakesh, Rabat, and Casablanca.'
p3125
aS'President Carter once recommended sanctions on this country for not exporting more oil to the U.S. during the late 1970s to make up for dwindled American reserves due to the lingering aftereffects of the Arab oil embargo during the early 1970s.'
p3126
aS'An earthquake on Leap Year Day in 1960 in Agadir caused the deaths of more than twelve thousand people.'
p3127
aS'Until his death due to natural causes in 1999, its head of state adamantly claimed to be a direct descendant of the prophet Mohammed.'
p3128
aS'It is one of the worlds largest suppliers of phosphates.'
p3129
aS'This nation still has not regained control of the enclaves of Ceuta and Melilla, nor has it relinquished its territory annexed since 1976 with a territorial capital of El Aaiun and with Polisario guerillas roaming the desert regions.'
p3130
aS'For ten points, name this nation, independent since 1956.'
p3131
aS"Samuel Gummere was an important American diplomat in this country who helped negotiate a settlement to an affair in which a Greek-American who often visited this country was kidnapped and help for the ransom of $70,000 and two of this country's districts."
p3132
aS'That incident in this country prompted Teddy Roosevelt to say a memorable paraphrase of "dead or alive" at the Republican National Convention, and occurred when a bandit named Raisuli kidnapped Ion Perdicaris in this country.'
p3133
aS'Another occurrence in this country led to the contentious Mansion House speech in which Lloyd George claimed that England preferred honor to peace.'
p3134
aS"France's control of this country was achieved in exchange for the land that became Germany's colony of Kamerun."
p3135
aS'One incident in this country occurred when the Panther sailed into one of its harbors, while another incident in this country was sparked when Wilhelm II showed up here and called for its independence, which led to the Algeciras Conference.'
p3136
aS'For 10 points, name this country that was home to the Tangier and Agadir crises.'
p3137
aS'Its current Prime Minister was implicated in a fake employment contract debacle known as the Annajat scandal.'
p3138
aS'A Greek-American expatriate was ransomed after being kidnapped in this country, prompting Teddy Roosevelt to claim the government wants "Perdicaris alive or Raisuli dead.'
p3139
aS'" The publication by Gilles Perrault, "Our Friend the King" which documented the human rights violations of this country\'s previous monarch significantly deteriorated its relationship with France.'
p3140
aS'The deployment of the (*) German gunboat Panther to a port city of this country eventually sparked the second international crisis and earlier the first international crisis was tentatively settled at the Algeciras Conference.'
p3141
aS'For 10 points, name this country currently ruled by the Alaouite king Muhammad VI, with capital at Rabat.'
p3142
aS'One leader of this country organized the Blue Division, and this was led by Miguel Primo de Rivera and Juan Negrin.'
p3143
aS'The Abraham_Lincoln Brigades and the Condor Legion fought in this country.'
p3144
aS'A civil war in this country saw the Carlists side the with the Phalange, and one leader of this country suppressed minority languages like Galician and (*) Basque.'
p3145
aS'For 10 points, name this Iberian country long led by Francisco Franco.'
p3146
aS'One prime minister of this country carried out the "disentailment", or confiscation, of church lands to finance a war.'
p3147
aS'This country experienced a wave of anti-liberal purges during the "Ominous Decade."'
p3148
aS"During the 19th century, two political parties here agreed to the 'peaceful turn' system by which they would alternate terms in power."
p3149
aS'(*) Amadeo of Savoy briefly ruled here as king, and it is not Austria, but one ruler of this country issued the Pragmatic Sanction of 1830.'
p3150
aS'That pragmatic sanction blocked the pretender Charles V from taking the throne.'
p3151
aS'For 10 points, name this country in which supporters of Isabella II fought their countrymen in the Carlist Wars, and which was later ruled by the Falange under Francisco Franco.'
p3152
aS'Joseph ibn Naghrela was killed during a bout of violence in this modern day country.'
p3153
aS'Wilfred the Hairy ruled as count of a region in this country, and another region in this country laid out the laws of the Seven Part Code.'
p3154
aS'Along with its western neighbor, this country was ruled by a number of independent states called taifas.'
p3155
aS'The Visigothic ruler Reccared located his capital in this country.'
p3156
aS'A city in this country was home to the author of the Etymologiae, Isidore, and another city here was ruled by the Nasrid Dynasty.'
p3157
aS'Abd-ar-Rahman III founded an offshoot of the Umayyad_Caliphate in this country.'
p3158
aS'The Battle of Las Navas de Tolosa was fought in this country, which attempted to expel Muslim rulers in the Reconquista.'
p3159
aS'For 10 points, Leon and Castile were two medieval kingdoms in which modern day country also home to an infamous inquisition'
p3160
aS"This country's first well known king was Eric the Victorious, who worshipped in its great temple at Uppsala."
p3161
aS"Napoleon's general Jean Bernadotte became Charles XIV of this country."
p3162
aS"The country's forces were led by Charles XII at the battles of Narva and Poltava against the Russians during the Great_Northern_War."
p3163
aS'This country came to prominence under the Vasa Line, which included Queen Christina and her father Gustavus Adolphus.'
p3164
aS'For 10 points, name this Scandinavian country with capital at Stockholm.'
p3165
aS"Eugene de Kock claimed that an assassination that occurred in this country was the work of a South_African hit squad; a drug addict was acquitted of that 1986 murder of this country's Prime Minister."
p3166
aS'Another man from this country received an honorary citizenship from the United_States in 1981 in recognition of his work saving thousands of Hungarian Jews.'
p3167
aS'A third man from this country died in a plane crash while investigating the (*) Katanga conflict as Secretary-General of the U.N. For 10 points, name this homeland of Olof Palme, Raoul Wallenberg, and Dag Hammarskjold.'
p3168
aS"A former ruler of this country ordered the killing of Gian Rinaldo Monaldeschi after the latter revealed that ruler's plans to become the ruler of Naples."
p3169
aS'A ruler of this country notably organized his infantry linearly, rather than into tercios, and employed lighter artillery for greater mobility.'
p3170
aS'A nationalist party in this country called the "Hats" advocated war with Russia during the eighteenth century, during which this country experienced an "Age of Liberty."'
p3171
aS'This country was led by a queen who converted to Catholicism and whose father died at the Battle of Lutzen.'
p3172
aS'Along with Poland, this country was ruled by the House of Vasa, which included Queen Christina and her father, Gustavus Adolphus.'
p3173
aS'For 10 points, name this Scandinavian country whose capital was the site of the Stockholm Bloodbath.'
p3174
aS"This country's only Caribbean colony was St. Bart's, held until 1878."
p3175
aS'The longest river in this country is the Klar-Gota, while large lakes include Vanern, Vattern, and the agriculturally important Lake Siljan (seel-yahn) and (*) Storsjon (storrs-yohn).'
p3176
aS'Its largest island has its capital at Visby and is called Gotland.'
p3177
aS"Ystad, Uppsala, and Malmo are among this country's largest cities."
p3178
aS'For 10 points, name this Scandinavian country with capital Stockholm.'
p3179
aS'In 1992, this navy launched the first diesel-electric submarine with an air independent propulsion system.'
p3180
aS'This navy employed the master Dutch shipbuilder Arendt de Groot during a period in which it was commanded by Admiral Fleming.'
p3181
aS'This navy was decisively defeated at the Battle of Gangut, but earlier it had allowed an amphibious landing at Pillau that led to the Battle of Dirshau and the Treaty of Altmark.'
p3182
aS'It won the Second Battle of Svenskund during an 1788-90 war after it had heroically retreated through an opposing force that had surrounded it during an incident known as the "Gauntlet of Vyborg Bay".'
p3183
aS"A museum in this country's capital preserves a raised 17th century warship from this navy that sank on its maiden voyage during the Thirty Years War, the Vasa."
p3184
aS'For ten points, name this navy that was on the losing side of the Great_Northern_War, and which you might see defending Stockholm.'
p3185
aS'The Greek Constantine Phaulkon served as chief advisor to Narai, one ruler of a state in this country.'
p3186
aS'The Russian ship Aurora was present in 1912 for a coronation during the rule of this countrys sixth member of a still reigning dynasty.'
p3187
aS'In 1913 one ruler of this country passed a law banning the chewing of betel, and the Phibun dictatorship drew upon the concept of wiratham to expand its territory in the twentieth century.'
p3188
aS'In 1569, the Taungu wrought havoc upon a kingdom in this country, and in 1431 that kingdom sacked the Khmer capital of Angkor.'
p3189
aS'Home to the Ayutthaya kingdom and the current Chakri dynasty, for 10 points, name this country most famously ruled by the sexually hyperactive Mongkut, depicted in The King and I.'
p3190
aS'The city of Hat Yai has been the center of several recent attacks by Islamic separatists centered in the Pattani region of this nation, despite overtures from General Sothni.'
p3191
aS'After 10 months, CNS, the group currently in power in this country, disbanded the former ruling party, TRT, and lifted the ban on political activity here, which had been in effect since it placed General Surayud Chulanont into power.'
p3192
aS'In August, a constitution drafted by CNS won a referendum here, replacing the 1997 constitution, and paving the way for the promised return to elections in, FTP, what Southeast Asian nation which was formerly headed by Thaksin Shinawatra, with a capital at Bangkok'
p3193
aS"2008, a cabinet minister from this country was banned for failing to seek parliamentary approval to support the recognition of Cambodia's Praeh Vihar temple as a World Heritage site, and that event led to the resignation of Samak Sundaravej."
p3194
aS'Supporters of a former leader of this country rioted at the 2009 ASEAN meeting held in its city of Pattaya.'
p3195
aS"More recently, this country's Supreme Court ordered the seizure of $1."
p3196
aS'4 billion in assets of that leader who sold the Manchester United Football club in 2008.'
p3197
aS'It is currently led by Abhijit Vejjajiva, and in 2006 coup, a military junta overthrew Thaksin Shinawatra in this country.'
p3198
aS'For 10 points, identify this country whose government based is in Bangkok.'
p3199
aS"Cardinal Thomas Gibbons' defense of this organization would lead to Pope Leo XIII issuing an encylical, Rerum Novarum, supporting organizations of their kind."
p3200
aS'In contrast with its inclusive reputation, a chapter of this group was involved in the Seattle riots of 1886.'
p3201
aS'Internal feuding following the failed Missouri Pacific railroad strike of 1886, and the emergence of a rival organization of skilled craftsmen, meant that by 1900, this organization was almost nonexistent.'
p3202
aS'Name this labor organization that helped lobby for the Chinese_Exclusion_Act and, for 10 points, was founded by nine tailors in Philadelphia in 1869 and reached its peak under Terence V. Powderly.'
p3203
aS'This conflict introduced swept-wing fighter jets such as the F-86 Sabre, which engaged in skirmishes   in MiG ["mig"] Alley.'
p3204
aS'Outpost Harry held out against over a week of constant artillery fire, while  battles over White Horse Mountain and Pork Chop Hill ended in stalemates.'
p3205
aS'The American Tenth   Corps fought their way out after being encircled at Chosin Reservoir, while U.N. forces broke out of  the Pusan Perimeter after an amphibious assault at Inchon led by Douglas MacArthur.'
p3206
aS'Name this  1950 to 1953 war halted by an armistice that established a demilitarized zone along the 38th parallel.'
p3207
aS'The late Senator Robert Byrd once held the rank of Exalted Cyclops in this organization, whose first major leader was Nathan Bedford Forrest.'
p3208
aS'The Civil Rights Act of 1871 was also named for this group.'
p3209
aS"D.W. Griffith's film The Birth of a Nation glorifies this group, which was sued for (*) lynching Michael Donald."
p3210
aS'For 10 points, name this white supremacist group that burns crosses and wears white clothing.'
p3211
aS'This entity lost much of its membership after one of its leaders, David Stephenson, was convicted of murder.'
p3212
aS"Four members of this organization bombed the 16th Street Baptist Church in the 1970's."
p3213
aS"First led by Nathan Bedford Forrest, this organization was romanticized in D.W. Griffith's Birth of a Nation."
p3214
aS'For 10 points, name this organization led by a Grand Wizard, whose white-hooded members terrorized blacks during Reconstruction.'
p3215
aS'This organization was responsible for a raid against the Elduyens, and some of its activities were made illegal by a Force Act.'
p3216
aS'Thomas E. Watson was instrumental in leading its reformation, and a trial in Meridian convicted several members of this organization for the murders of Schwerner, Chaney, and Goodman.'
p3217
aS'This organization met after the death of Mary Phagan at Stone Mountain, while coverage of an event it held led to the case Brandenburg v. Ohio.'
p3218
aS'The Birth of a Nation glorified this group, and members from it bombed the 16th Street Baptist Church.'
p3219
aS'For 10 points, identify this organization first led by Nathan Bedford Forrest which heavily opposed the Reconstruction and whose members wore white.'
p3220
aS'This ruler dispatched the Nestorian monk, Rabban Sauma, as a diplomat to Christian Europe.'
p3221
aS'With the help of his general, Hundred Eyes Bayan, he successfully besieged the cities of Xianyang and Fencheng.'
p3222
aS'After those victories, he conquered the Southern Song and declared himself ruler of the Yuan_Dynasty.'
p3223
aS"This man sent an expedition to Kyushu, which was defended by a stone wall along Hakkata Bay; however, that expedition failed when a typhoon called the kamikaze destroyed this ruler's navy."
p3224
aS'For 10 points, name this Mongol ruler visited by Marco Polo who was the grandson of Genghis.'
p3225
aS'Early in his life, this man befriended a Buddhist monk named Haiyun.'
p3226
aS"This leader's accomplishments include putting down Nayan's rebellion and installing Wonjong as the ruler of the Goryeo dynasty of Korea."
p3227
aS'Three times, he attempted to invade Vietnam along with his brother (*) Mongke, and his two attempts to invade Japan were both cut short by severe typhoons known as kamikaze.'
p3228
aS'He employed Marco Polo and his father as ambassadors.'
p3229
aS'For 10 points, name this founder of the Yuan_Dynasty, a grandson of Genghis_Khan.'
p3230
aS"This man's expedition to Vietnam won the submission of the Champa people."
p3231
aS"This man's troops crushed the remnants of the previous dynasty at Yamen, and he enforced the use of a paper currrency called chao."
p3232
aS'This man created a capital at Dadu, which is now Beijing.'
p3233
aS"This man used the kurultai of Shang-tu to preempt his brother Arigboke, and he rose to power after his brother [*] Mongke's death."
p3234
aS"This man's expeditions to Japan were stymied by the kamikaze."
p3235
aS'The conqueror of the Song dynasty, for 10 points, name this Yuan dynasty Mongol emperor and grandson of Genghis_Khan who welcomed Marco Polo to China.'
p3236
aS'When this man tried to invade Vietnam, the Vietnamese trapped his invading fleet at low tide with hidden, underwater spikes and destroyed the entire fleet.'
p3237
aS'This was the second big setback for this man, who had previously tried to invade Japan only to be stopped by a major typhoon, which the Japanese described as kamikaze.'
p3238
aS'Moving his capital to Dadu, he would undertake gigantic building projects such as the rebuilding of the Grand Canal.'
p3239
aS'A power struggle with the Mongols under Arik Boke would lead this man to destroy the Mongol capital at Karakorum.'
p3240
aS'Ousting the Song dynasty and replacing it with his own, short-lived dynasty, FTP, who was this Mongol and first ruler of the Yuan dynasty in China'
p3241
aS'One leader opposed to this claims of this person was Kaidu, who denied him the use of Turkestan.'
p3242
aS'This ruler served by Uriyangqadai and Bayan deserted a siege in Nanchao in order to preempt Arigbge, his brother, which he did in the kuriltai of Shang-tu that was organized on the death of Mngke.'
p3243
aS'His early acts in his best-known role included demands of tribute from Annam, Champa, Java, and Japan, refusal from the last of which led to the dispatch of eventually destroyed fleets in 1274 and 1281.'
p3244
aS'The successor to the Sung that this khagan founded would rule until 1368.'
p3245
aS'For 10 points, name this founder of the Yan Dynasty, a grandson of Genghis_Khan.'
p3246
aS'son-in-law of King Kartanagar used a force sent by this ruler to depose the usurper Jayakatwang; due to the failure of that force led by Yikomusu, this man was unable to make Java a vassal state.'
p3247
aS"This man supported the rule of King Wonjong, and his daughter married Wonjong's son Chungnyol Wang, which increased his infuence over the Goryeos of Korea."
p3248
aS'He lost much of his naval possessions after a devastating incident at Hakata bay.'
p3249
aS'He eliminated strongholds of the Song dynasty by 1279 CE, and his court at Dadu also hosted Marco Polo.'
p3250
aS'The kamikaze winds prevented the invasion of Japan by, for 10 points, which grandson of Ghenghis Khan who founded the Yuan dynasty of China'
p3251
aS'He was interned in Kutahya for two years, but made the best of it by learning English from the works of Shakespeare during his imprisonment.'
p3252
aS'While living in Italy he wrote the so-called "Cassandra letter" to protest a compromise negotiated by Deak\'s government.'
p3253
aS'His work as a journalist covering the "Long Diet" led to his being appointed editor of the journal Pesti Hirlap, but he rose to power after Batthyany appointed him minister of finance.'
p3254
aS"After Grgey's surrender to the Russians, he lost power and was forced to flee to Turkey in 1849."
p3255
aS'FTP, name this man who in 1848 became the de facto dictator of Hungary.'
p3256
aS"This man's aliases included James Brunswill and Adam Smith, during which time his wife was known as Lady Smith."
p3257
aS'His wrote a noted "Letter from Vidin" while in Bulgaria and, late in life, delineated a plan for a "Danubian Federation" and wrote the book Memories of my Exile.'
p3258
aS'He was succeeded in office by his longtime general Arthur Gorgey, who served as dictator until surrendering to Rudiger at Vilagos, after this man had organized the Honvd army and served as regent-president.'
p3259
aS'The USS Mississippi was dispatched to rescue him from internment in Turkey by Millard Fillmore after this man had previously been hailed as a celebrity in England, causing a scandal for foreign secretary Lord Palmerston.'
p3260
aS'FTP, name this key participant in the 1848 revolution honored as a national hero in Hungary.'
p3261
aS'In late life this man became known as the "Hermit of Turin.'
p3262
aS'" He promulgated the April Laws and, after defeats such as one to Alfred I of Windisch-Grats at the Battle of Schwechat, he released a letter calling his successor Artur Gorgey a "Judas.'
p3263
aS'" This author of the "Cassandra" letter created a stir with Queen Victoria and Lord Palmerston in England with speeches inspired by his love of Shakespeare.'
p3264
aS"Jealously hated by Bertalan Szemare, he was a minister in Count Batthyani's government, and appealed to Archduke Franz Joseph of Austria before taking over his country in a fit of Magyar nationalism."
p3265
aS'For 10 points, name this Hungarian journalist who briefly led his nation during the Revolutions of 1848.'
p3266
aS"Traditionally, this country's first ruler is considered to be Fa Ngum, who established the Lan Xang kingdom."
p3267
aS'Coups in this country were led by Kong Le and Phoumi Nosavan, who both opposed the governments of Souvanna Phouma.'
p3268
aS'A group in this country that opposed the use of phu nyai or "big man"  politics was Hak Xat.'
p3269
aS'The former RLG member Thongthip Rathanavilai wrote Man in the Region of Death about prison camps in this country.'
p3270
aS'With the aid of the Viet Minh, Prince Souphanuvong led a group that overthrew a US-backed government of this country that was centered in Vientiane.'
p3271
aS'It is not Cambodia, but the Ho Chi Minh trail ran through this country.'
p3272
aS'For 10 points, in 1975 a namesake Communist Pathet party gained control of what country'
p3273
aS"This man's early career was promoted based on his actions during an obscure skirmish near the Black Sea, which would later become the subject of required reading in schools."
p3274
aS'This man persecuted journalist Yuri Daniel in his most famous post, and declared that only "clean hands" would construct the BAM railroad.'
p3275
aS'He had thousands of Romanians deported while serving as the first communist secretary in (*) Moldavia before serving in Kazakhstan.'
p3276
aS'In 1956 he aided his his superior against the Anti-Party Group led by Malenkov Molotov during his time in charge of heavy industry and the space program.'
p3277
aS'Although he signed SALT I and II and the Helsinki Accords, he ordered troops to crush the Prague_Spring in 1968 under his namesake Doctrine.'
p3278
aS'Succeeded by Yuri Andropov, FTP, identify this man who followed Nikita_Khrushchev as head of the Soviet Union.'
p3279
aS'He was responsible for implementing the Virgin and Idle Lands Campaign as a secretary in the Kazakhstan Communist Party, and his namesake doctrine declared the Soviet right to intervene if the essential common interests of other socialist countries are threatened by one of their number.'
p3280
aS'After Ismail Khan took over a garrison and gave weapons to the mob, he ordered the bombing of Herat, and he also oversaw the suppression of socialism with a human face in 1968.'
p3281
aS'A signatory to both SALT treaties, FTP, identify this Russian leader, the successor to Nikita Khruschev.'
p3282
aS'One monarch of this name and regnal number was the son of Francis I and Maria_Theresa, and brother of Joseph II and Marie Antoinette.'
p3283
aS"The other was originally named Louis Philippe Marie Victor, was married to the Austrian princess Marie Henrietta, and financed Lord Henry Stanley's trip along the Congo River."
p3284
aS'FTP, give the common name shared by these kings, respectively an 18th century Holy Roman Emperor and 19th century Belgian monarch.'
p3285
aS"His last act before dying was to lobby for the passage of a military draft, and he had earlier advocating fortifying Lige and Namur to protect his country's neutrality."
p3286
aS'His agents used such methods as holding families hostage and (*) cutting off limbs to pereptrate the "rubber atrocities" in his personal domain, which then became the Belgian Congo.'
p3287
aS'For 10 points name this king of Belgium from 1865 to 1909.'
p3288
aS'This work contains a story about Greeks in the city of Abdera catching a fever at the Tragedy of Andromeda in its section about Melancholy.'
p3289
aS'Another section of this work describes ""Phantasmes that appear in the air.'
p3290
aS'"" It contains a section describing the Kingdom of Darkness, and claims that life in the natural state of man is ""solitary, poor, nasty, brutish, and short.'
p3291
aS'"" For 10 points, name this work by Thomas Hobbes.'
p3292
aS'Its founder is considered to be Mindaugus, who received a crown from Pope Innocent IV in 1253.'
p3293
aS'Because its nobles desired aid in the Livonian War, it lost its independence in the Commonwealth of Two Peoples, also known as the Union of Lublin, in 1569.'
p3294
aS'At its height, it held the cities of Smolensk and Kiev.'
p3295
aS'For ten points, name this grand duchy, whose great leaders included Vytautus and Jagiello, before it lost its independence to Poland.'
p3296
aS"Nazi-sponsored activists that campaigned against this country's government were led by Ernst Neumann and Theodor von Sass."
p3297
aS"It saw a massive book-smuggling operation carried out by Masiulis and Bielinis in response to a Konstantin Kaufman ban of the use of the Latin alphabet by this country's language, and while serving as ambassador to this country, Chiune Sugihara issued thousands of passports to Jews."
p3298
aS'One prime minister of this nation from the Peasant Populist Party here, Kazys Grinius, was deposed in a coup led by Augustinas Voldemaras and the former head of the Taryba, Antanas (*) Smetona.'
p3299
aS'This country was led by the one-time fascist Iron Wolf party and had much earlier won the Battle of Saule under the leadership of Mindaugas and fought a civil war after signing a treaty with the Teutonic_Knights, which resulted in the crowning of Vytautas the Great.'
p3300
aS'For 10 points, name this Baltic nation which united with Poland at the Union of Lublin.'
p3301
aS"Rufus Peckham cited his decision in 1897's Allgeyer v. Louisiana and denied the relevance of 1898's Holden v. Hardy in his majority opinion, which raised the specter of communism."
p3302
aS'Justice Oliver Wendell Holmes\' dissent included his defense of the "reasonable man" test and included his statement that "General propositions do not decide concrete cases," but is best known for his assertion that "The 14th Amendment does not enact Mr. Herbert Spencer\'s Social Statics.'
p3303
aS'"   FTP, name this 1905 decision in which the court struck down a New York law setting maximum working hours for bakers.'
p3304
aS'Ronald Dworkin called this case the "whipping boy" of constitutional law.'
p3305
aS'In his denunciation of Roe v. Wade, John Hart Ely turned this case into a verb and compared the approach used in this case to a "green pastel redness".'
p3306
aS'This decision upheld a right previously established by Allgeyer v. Louisiana.'
p3307
aS'In his dissent, Oliver Wendell Holmes Jr. echoed his earlier opinion in Otis v. Parker with talk of "general propositions", but differentiated the two cases through the "reasonable man" test; that dissent also claimed that "the Fourteenth Amendment does not enact Herbert Spencer\'s Social Statics".'
p3308
aS'For 10 points, name this 1905 Supreme Court case that struck down a New York state law that regulated the amount of time bakers could work.'
p3309
aS"A 1947 explosion at the O'Connor Electro-Plating Company left a 22-foot crater in this city; the aftermath of that event was broadcast by its first television station, W6XYZ."
p3310
aS"This city's police chief Clemence Horrall was replaced by former Marine William Parker in the wake of a scandal involving the madam Brenda Allen."
p3311
aS'Wartime rationing of wool and the Sleepy Lagoon murder led to racial conflict in this city, whose Herald Express and Examiner newspapers nicknamed murder victim Elizabeth Short the "Black Dahlia."'
p3312
aS'Naval servicemen and gangs of pachucos clashed in the Zoot_Suit_Riots in this city, which erupted into riots in 1992 after the acquittal of police officers who were taped beating Rodney King.'
p3313
aS'For 10 points, name this California city, the location of Hollywood.'
p3314
aS'This man solidified Languedoc as a royal domain by requiring Raymond VII to sign the Treaty of Paris.'
p3315
aS"The marriage of this man's son Robert of Clermont resulted in the Bourbon line."
p3316
aS'After landing at Damietta and capturing the citadel of al-Mansurah, this man was later held for ransom after being captured by Sultan Baybars I.'
p3317
aS'For 10 points, name this Capetian French king who led the Seventh Crusade.'
p3318
aS'A Tunisian legend holds that this man converted to Islam and gave his name to the village of Sidi Bou Said.'
p3319
aS'Taking to heart his mother\'s words, "I would rather see you dead at my feet than guilty of a mortal sin," he founded the Quinze-Vingt for 300 blind men and purchased the Crown of Thorns and a fragment of the True Cross from Baldwin II.'
p3320
aS"His military exploits included leading an army that captured Damietta, though his brother Robert of Artois was killed and he was taken prisoner after the Battle of al-Mansurah, as recounted by this man's biographer Joinville."
p3321
aS'A leader of the Seventh Crusade who died on the Eighth Crusade in 1270, FTP, name this long-reigning French monarch, the only one to be canonized.'
p3322
aS"This man's habit of assembling his subjects at the foot of an oak to dispense justice is frequently recalled by his biographer Jean de Joinville and his chaplain, Vincent of Beauvais, wrote the first great encyclopedia, the Speculum Majus."
p3323
aS'This ruler achieved a bloodless victory over foreign forces supporting the rebel Hugh of Lusignan at Taillebourg Bridge, and his children with his wife Marguerite of Provence included Phillipe III.'
p3324
aS'This man sent Matthew Paris to Haakon IV of Norway in an unsuccessful attempt to get the latter to join him on his most famous military campaign, on which he was accompanied by Alphonse of Poitiers and Charles I of Anjou and during which he captured Damietta before Baibars captured him at the Battle of Fariskur.'
p3325
aS'FTP, name this Capetian king, son of Blanche de Castille, and leader of the Seventh Crusade, the only French king to be canonized. '
p3326
aS'This ruler fought the War of Spanish Succession in an attempt to place his grandson Phillip V on the throne of Spain.'
p3327
aS'William III of Orange and Holy Roman Emperor Leopold I created the League of Augsburg to oppose this man, who revoked the rights given to Protestants in his country with his Edict of Fontainebleau.'
p3328
aS'Advised by Jean-Baptiste Colbert and Cardinal_Mazarin, this ruler moved his court from the Louvre to the Palace of Versailles.'
p3329
aS'For 10 points, identify this long-ruling King of France known as the "Sun King".'
p3330
aS'This man recognized the accession of William III to the English throne in the Treaty of Ryswick.'
p3331
aS'His Edict of Fontainebleau revoked the toleration of Huguenots granted by the Edict_of_Nantes.'
p3332
aS'This ruler tried to prevent conspiracies against himself by centralizing power at a former hunting lodge whose most notable feature is its Hall of Mirrors.'
p3333
aS'For 10 points, name this king of France, often called the Sun King.'
p3334
aS'One offensive ordered by this monarch was blunted by the Water Line erected decades earlier by Maurice of Nassau, but still prompted his enemies to lynch the De Witt brothers for instigating the "Disaster Year", or Rampjaar.'
p3335
aS"One of this ruler's generals had a major rivalry with the Count of Montecuccoli, while another defeated Francisco Melo after a bold march through a mountain pass to break the siege of Rocroi."
p3336
aS"This ruler's territories were defended by a modification of the trace italienne that relied upon a pentagonal ravelin system, designed by his greatest military mind, Vauban."
p3337
aS'This monarch relied on the command of Turenne and the Prince of Conde to win clashes like the Battle of the Dunes, which led to the Treaty of the Pyrenees.'
p3338
aS'Forced to accept the Treaty of Ryswick, for 10 points, name this impetus behind the War_of_Devolution and the War of the Grand Alliance, a long-reigning Frenchman known as the "Sun King".'
p3339
aS"Early in this man's reign, he invaded the low countries during the War_of_Devolution."
p3340
aS'This king, whose presumptive successor was known as the "Grand Dauphin," renounced the Treaty of the Hague, leading to a war that included the battles of Ramillies and Malplaquet.'
p3341
aS"This man's mother Anne of Austria served as regent with the assistance of Cardinal_Mazarin."
p3342
aS'For 10 points, name this king of France who lost the War_of_the_Spanish_Succession, constructed the palace at Versailles, and was called the "Sun King" during his 62-year reign from 1643 to 1715.'
p3343
aS"One of this king's generals, Marshall Turenne, was defeated in the Battle of the Dunes, and his minister Jean-Baptiste Colbert welcomed Venetian glass in his country."
p3344
aS'This ruler settled his conflict with William III of Orange and the League of Augsburg in the Treaty of Ryswick, and his Edict of (*) Fontainbleau nullified the Edict_of_Nantes.'
p3345
aS'This ruler failed in his attempt to place Philip V on the throne of Spain in the War_of_the_Spanish_Succession, and he famously claimed, "I am the state." For ten points, name this French king who moved his palace to Versailles and was called the "Sun King".'
p3346
aS'This monarch requested that Clement XI issue the anti-Jansenist bullVineam Domini.'
p3347
aS'One his mistresses was implicated of witchcraft in the Affair of the Poisons.'
p3348
aS'This ruler tried to install one of his sons by that mistress, Madame de Montspan, as regent for his son, but the Duke of Maine was arrested by this mans nephew, the Duke of Orleans.'
p3349
aS'An invasion of the Netherlands by this ruler was ended with the Treaty of Nijmegen.'
p3350
aS'His ministers included the Marquis de Louvois.'
p3351
aS'This monarch was opposed by an alliance led by Leopold I and the Palatinate known as the League of Augsburg.'
p3352
aS'This man made his son Philip of Anjou king of another nation after the death of Charles II, leading to the War_of_the_Spanish_Succession.'
p3353
aS'For 10 points, name this French Sun King.'
p3354
aS"This ruler's secret service included the Ukrainian Cossack Grgoire Orlyk, and he was betrothed to the daughter of Elizabeth Farnese, Maria Ana Victoria de Borbon."
p3355
aS'This mans underlings issued the Edict of Marly, which taxed even the upper classes in an attempt to lower the budget deficit.'
p3356
aS"His regent stabilized his nation's currency with the help of Philibert Orry and Michel des Forts, and that regent suppressed the convulsionaries at Saint-Medard."
p3357
aS'He took the advice of Germain Chauvelin in order to obtain Lorraine from Francis III.'
p3358
aS'First Chaplain Fitz-James refused to give this man absolution unless he renounced his mistress Madame Chteauroux.'
p3359
aS'He attempted to absolve his prospective assassin, Robert Damiens, and put trust in, among others, Cardinal Fleury and Madame de Pompadour.'
p3360
aS'Ruling with his regent, Phillipe, duc de Orleans, for 10 points, name this king of France, nicknamed the Beloved, who came after the Sun King.'
p3361
aS"This man's namesake law allows residents of his home state to run for the Senate and the Vice Presidency at the same time."
p3362
aS'This man\'s powerful personality was known as "The Treatment," and it helped him pass the Chicken Tax, along with an Immigration Act, a Revenue Act and the National Endowment for the Humanities as part of his signature program.'
p3363
aS'He appointed Thurgood Marshall to the Supreme Court, and this president used the [*] Daisy ad to win re-election over Barry_Goldwater.'
p3364
aS'His "Great_Society" program failed due to his "credibility gap" on the Vietnam_War.'
p3365
aS'For 10 points, name the 36th US president, who took office after John F. Kennedy was assassinated.'
p3366
aS'When this man requested a combat assignment, he was assigned to inspect shipyards before the president asked him to survey the war effort in the Southwestern Pacific, where he was awarded a Silver Star for his participation in a bombing mission.'
p3367
aS'Back in the United_States, this man created Operation Texas, which established a refuge for European Jews fleeing Nazis.'
p3368
aS'He was one of three southern senators who refused to sign the Southern Manifesto, and Texas law was changed so that this man could run for two offices at the same time.'
p3369
aS'When he ascended to his highest post, this man created the Warren Commission and requested legislation like the Wilderness Act and the Economic Opportunity Act.'
p3370
aS'FTP, name this man, under whom the Gulf of Tonkin Resolution was passed, who pushed through the Civil Rights Act of 1964.'
p3371
aS'This man ordered Marines to the Dominican Republic to help defeat an insurrection of Juan Bosch supporters and prop up the right-wing regime of Reid Cabral.'
p3372
aS'Early in his career, this former aid to Richard Klegburg lost a Senate election to "Pappy" O\'Daniel.'
p3373
aS'This President worked closely with John William McCormack, the Speaker of the House during his term in office.'
p3374
aS'This man created the Kerner Commission, and early in his term he ordered Operation Pierce Arrow.'
p3375
aS'This President caused a scandal when he sought legal advice from a Supreme Court Justice he had appointed, which doomed his attempt to give the post of Chief Justice to Abe Fortas.'
p3376
aS'He ordered Operation Rolling Thunder, but may be best remembered for the Ann Arbor Speech, in which he described his domestic policies such as the War on Poverty.'
p3377
aS'For ten points, name this US President associated with the Great_Society, the successor of John F. Kennedy.'
p3378
aS"man's namesake rule allows candidates to simultaneously run for the senate and the vice presidency."
p3379
aS'He won a Senate seat election with the help of a rented helicopter nicknamed the "City Windmill.'
p3380
aS'" He quoted the lyrics to "America the Beautiful" in his "Let Us Continue" speech.'
p3381
aS'His use of the so-called "Treatment" to strong arm dissident party members was discussed in the biography (*) Master of the Senate by Robert Caro.'
p3382
aS'As president, he worked with the 89th congress to pass the Freedom of Information and Higher Education Acts, and gave the "We Shall Overcome" speech in response to the violence in Selma.'
p3383
aS'This president signed the Voting Rights Act and the Social Security Act as part of his Great_Society.'
p3384
aS'For 10 points, name this successor to John F. Kennedy.'
p3385
aS'One leader of this nation led a rebellion against the settlement of Foulpointe and had earlier founded the non-Canadian settlement of Louisbourg.'
p3386
aS'In addition to Maurice Benyovszky, this country was led by the Merina Dynasty, which included a ruler who prohibited the practice of Christianity in this nation and punished suspected converts with poisoning in the tangena ordeal.'
p3387
aS'The legendarily cruel queen Ranavalona I ruled this country, which in more recent times was controlled for a total of twenty-eight years by Didier Ratsiraka.'
p3388
aS'Inspired by similar efforts in Uganda, Hitler proposed making this country a forced emigration destination for European Jews.'
p3389
aS'For 10 points, name this country whose dominant ethnic group is the Malagsy, also the home of lemurs.'
p3390
aS'Its only ethnically Slovakian emperor was the Hungarian-born Moric Benovsky, who was elected in 1776 and introduced the Latin alphabet, though he soon returned home and was succeeded by a series of native-born emperors of the Merina tribe, such as Andrianampoini.'
p3391
aS'Prior to World War Two, Hitler frequently cited it as a possible place to which to forcibly deport European Jews, while the agreement by which Germany received Heligoland required Britain to cede all claims over this island to France, which colonized it in 1883  though it first foreign conquerors were not Europeans, but Polynesians traveling over a thousand mile from Indonesia.'
p3392
aS'For ten points, name this large Island off the coast of Mozambique, home to many lemurs.'
p3393
aS'Henry Every and Thomas Tew made this place their headquarters.'
p3394
aS'Queen Rasoherina of this country prohibited markets on Sunday, and it was ruled by two women named Ranavalona in succesion.'
p3395
aS'Paul Ramadier administered this nation on behalf of France (*).'
p3396
aS'The Merina kingdom controlled most of this nation at one point, and that dynasty contained the rulers Radama I and Andrianampoinimerina.'
p3397
aS'For ten points, identify this island nation off the coast of Africa, which is now ruled by the Malagasy republic.'
p3398
aS"John Lilburne praised it in his The Just Man's Justification, though he held it to be less important than the innovations of Edward_the_Confessor."
p3399
aS'Gerrard Winstanley and the Diggers strongly opposed it, while Edward Coke [cook] wrote that it was "such a fellow that he will have no sovereign.'
p3400
aS'" Reissued for the final time as part of Confirmatio cartarum, it was preceded by Stephen Langton\'s election as Archbishop of Canterbury instead of John de Gray.'
p3401
aS"Its signer's renouncement of it and its annulment by Pope Innocent III caused the First Baron's War, but it was reaffirmed as part of the Petition of Right, particularly the notion of habeas corpus."
p3402
aS'Ensuring freedom of the church and customs of the towns among its 63 clauses, this is, FTP, which charter which limited the power of the English king, signed at Runnymede by King John in 1215'
p3403
aS"One resident of this state served as Secretary of Defense for most of Bill Clinton's second term."
p3404
aS'Another man from this state was defeated for the Democratic nomination by 1972 after losing as the vice presidential candidate under Hubert Humphrey.'
p3405
aS'This home of William Cohen and Edmund (*) Muskie contained the capital of the John Baker founded Republic of Madawaska.'
p3406
aS"Abraham_Lincoln's first vice president Hannibal Hamlin served as governor of this state."
p3407
aS"The first Secretary of War, Henry Knox was from this state, as was a man who led this state's 20th volunteer regiment on a charge down Little Round Top at Gettysburg."
p3408
aS'For 10 points, name this state which was home to Joshua Chamberlain and a "Continental Liar" who lost to Grover_Cleveland, James Blaine.'
p3409
aS'One episode of violence in this country led to the establishment of the National Operations Council following the declarion of the "Darurat," or "national emergency," following the ethnic violence in the May 13th incident.'
p3410
aS'This country practices a form of positive discrimination for its "Bumeputera"  indigenous population, under the ideology of (*) "katuanan," part of its New Economic Policy.'
p3411
aS'This country has a rotating constitutional kingship known as the Yang di-Pertuan Agong.'
p3412
aS"In the 1990s, this country's longtime prime minister, who has also attracted attention for strident anti-Jewish remarks, launched a bizarre crusade to imprison his chief critic, Anwar Ibrahim, by charging him with sodomy."
p3413
aS'For 10 points, name this country still under the influence of Mahathir bin Mohammed, which once controlled neighboring Singapore.'
p3414
aS'One settlement in this modern-day nation was founded by Captain Francis Light.'
p3415
aS'The Briggs Plan instituted here forcibly created new ethnically-mixed villages as a response to an emergency period.'
p3416
aS'The National Development Policy was announced to replace the New Economic Policy in this country, which was first proclaimed in 1971 and aimed at a more fair distribution of wealth and improved standing for bumiputeras.'
p3417
aS'James Birch was killed here in 1875 as a result of the Perak War, named for an area in this country replete with valuable tin mines.'
p3418
aS'The Merdeka Mission, aimed at independence, was led by its first prime minister, Tunku Abdul Rahman, who presided over the uniting of its federated and unfederated portions in 1963 to form the nation.'
p3419
aS'FTP, name this country which includes Sabah and Sarawak, with its seat of government at Kuala Lumpur.'
p3420
aS'One kingdom that existed in this modern nation was centered at Beruas and fell after an attack by Rajendra Chola I.'
p3421
aS'In addition to Gangga Negara, it contained a state ruled by King Bhagadatta that was succeeded by the Pattani.'
p3422
aS'The Buddha-Gupta stone was found in this modern country, and it was home to the Kedah trading kingdom and ethnic groups which include the Batek and Lenoh and which are collectively known as Orang Asli.'
p3423
aS'The location of the Langkasuka kingdom, its eponymous language is first attested on the Kedukan Bukit inscription.'
p3424
aS'Its namesake kingdom, which was not coterminous with the modern state, was conquered by Singhasari in the 13th century, and its modern location was known to the Greeks as the "Golden Chersonese" and to the Tamils as the "Golden Peninsula".'
p3425
aS'For 10 points, name this name this modern nation which historically contained the Malacca Sultanate and partially lies on its namesake peninsula.'
p3426
aS'According to legend, one ruler of this empire sent a fleet of 200 ships to explore the Atlantic, none of which returned.'
p3427
aS'It was originally governed by the Gbara, and it grew out of the state of Kangaba.'
p3428
aS'A general of this empire named Sagmandia captured Gao, while al-Saheli designed its university at (*) Sankore.'
p3429
aS"Malinke stories tell of how this empire's founder shot a magic arrow into his adversary's eye at the Battle of Kirina, thus defeating the Sosso king Sumanguru."
p3430
aS'That founder, Sundiata, established his capital at Niani.'
p3431
aS'The most famous ruler of this empire inflated the price of gold in Cairo while on his hajj.'
p3432
aS'For ten points, name this West African empire which shares its name with a modern-day country and was led by Mansa Musa from Timbuktu.'
p3433
aS"This empire's first ruler defeated the Kaniaga dynasty at the Battle of Kirina and established this empire."
p3434
aS'That man was named Sundiata Keita, and all of the resulting rulers of this empire were descended from him.'
p3435
aS"One of this empire's greatest cities was Timbuktu, a great center of trade where many libraries and Islamic universities were built."
p3436
aS"This empire's most famous ruler brought with him sixty thousand people and two hundred camels laden with gold on his hajj."
p3437
aS'For 10 points, name this empire, whose ruler Mansa Musa depreciated the value of gold in Cairo during his pilgrimage to Mecca.'
p3438
aS'One ruler of this empire fired arrows at passerby from his palace for sport and was named Kalifa.'
p3439
aS'Its original territories were called "the Twelve Doors," including Siby and Tabon.'
p3440
aS"This empire began to crumble after losing the Battle of Jenne to Governor Sayyid Mansur's forces."
p3441
aS'It had a constitution called the Kurukan Fuga that divided this empire into clans.'
p3442
aS'This empire\'s founder was the son of a (*) hunchbacked woman known as "the daughter of the buffalo woman."'
p3443
aS'That founder defeated the Sosso monarch Sumanguru at the Battle of Kirina.'
p3444
aS'This empire founded the University of Sankore.'
p3445
aS'Founded by Sundiata, it had a later ruler who took 300 pounds of gold with him on a 1324 pilgrimage to Mecca.'
p3446
aS'For 10 points, name this West African empire once ruled by Mansa Musa.'
p3447
aS'One ruler of this empire took Inari Kunate as his senior wife.'
p3448
aS'The architect es-Saheli helped develop the capital of this empire, which included the Djinguereber (""jing-we-re-ber"") Mosque and Sankore Madrasah.'
p3449
aS'The founder of this empire won the battle of Kirina against Sumanguru.'
p3450
aS"This empire was eventually conquered by [*] Sunni Ali's Songhai troops."
p3451
aS"This empire's capital was established at Niani by Sundiata Keita."
p3452
aS'One leader of this empire collapsed the price of gold in Egypt while making a hajj.'
p3453
aS'With a trading center at Timbuktu, for 10 points, name this west African empire once ruled by Mansa Musa.'
p3454
aS'One early leader of this empire was Mari Djata the first, who conquered the cities of Oualata and Audaghost.'
p3455
aS'Other rulers included Uli, Qu, and Sakura, a freed slave who deposed Khalifa.'
p3456
aS'It exploded after its defeat of the Susu chief Sumanguru at the Battle of Kirina, arising out of the Kangaba state, whose inhabitants had helped transport gold from Ghana.'
p3457
aS'Its first leader was Sundiata, but it reached its apex under a guy who destroyed the price of gold, Mansa Musa.'
p3458
aS'For 10 points, name this West African empire whose name lives on in a large French-speaking country.'
p3459
aS'This man achieved full power within his party at the Zunyi Conference.'
p3460
aS'That conference occurred while this man and other members of his party were traveling from Jiangxi (jee-AHNG-shee) to Yanan as part of the Long March.'
p3461
aS"This leader's third wife was part of an influential group that was named the Gang of Four."
p3462
aS'This ruler was responsible for his country taking part in the (*) Great Leap Forward and the Cultural Revolution.'
p3463
aS'For 10 points, name this political rival of Chiang_Kai-shek who was the first leader of Communist China.'
p3464
aS'He helped found the Kiangsi Soviet Party, and served as a theorist and military leader in Yanan from 1936 until 1945, at which point he began the effort for the party he co-founded in 1921 to gain control of his nation, which he did in 1949.'
p3465
aS'FTP, name this man who led the 1934-35 Long March and ruled China until his 1976 death.'
p3466
aS"Thor Heyerdahl's theory of this people's origin is based on the fact that the staple crop kumara originates in South America."
p3467
aS'The first king of this people was Potatu.'
p3468
aS'One treaty to which this group was a party was negotiated by William Hobson and signed by Hone Heke, and is treated as a founding document of the modern nation in which this people resides.'
p3469
aS'For 10 points, name these native people of New_Zealand.'
p3470
aS"One of the major results of this decision was the repealing of clause 13 in the Judiciary Act of 1789, which stated that the court's jurisdiction could cover issues outside the Constitution."
p3471
aS'This case was originally filed because a "midnight judge" appointment that was issued had not been delivered in time so that its recipient could take his place on the federal court system.'
p3472
aS'This commission was not delivered by the Secretary of State under the new president Thomas_Jefferson.'
p3473
aS'For 10 points, name this 1803 Supreme Court case in which Chief Justice John Marshall stated that he could not give the petitioner his place on the court and where he expounded the concept of judicial review.'
p3474
aS'Calder v. Bull extended the results of this case to the states, and it was first applied in Little v. Barreme, also known as the "Flying Fish" case.'
p3475
aS"Cases arising from the decision of this case include one about the President's power to seize control of steel mills during a war, Youngstown Sheet & Tube v. Sawyer, and one about the extent of executive privilege, United_States v. Nixon."
p3476
aS'The author of the majority opinion wrote "an act of the legislature repugnant to the Constitution is void," as the Court ruled in favor of the plantiff\'s right to his commission as an appeals judge, but against the right of the Court to force its delivery by the Secretary of State.'
p3477
aS'For 10 points, identify this Supreme Court case that saw the first use of the doctrine of judicial review.'
p3478
aS'This man frequently corresponded in letters with Titus Atticus.'
p3479
aS'This man defended Milo, the murderer of Clodius Pulcher, who had earlier helped exile this man.'
p3480
aS"This man modeled his Phillipics off of Demosthenes's works."
p3481
aS'This man exclaimed "O the times, o the morals" in a speech in which he exposed the (*) Catilinian Conspiracy.'
p3482
aS"This man had his hand and head nailed to the Rostra after he was killed, which resulted from the proscription placed on this man by Mark_Antony due to this man's attacks on Antony and the Second Triumvirate."
p3483
aS'For 10 points, name this famously eloquent orator in the Roman Republic.'
p3484
aS"One of this ruler's ambassadors, Gottfried von Swieten (SVEET-n), was a noted patron of the arts."
p3485
aS'This advisee of Count von Kaunitz signed two Treaties of Versailles to ally with France in the Diplomatic Revolution.'
p3486
aS'A land tax on peasants called the Robot Patent, and other reforms, were enforced by Count von Haugwitz, an advisor of this predecessor of (*) Joseph II.'
p3487
aS'This successor of Charles VI lost Silesia (si-LEE-zhuh) to Frederick_the_Great in one war.'
p3488
aS'For 10 points, the Pragmatic Sanction of 1713 placed what last Hapsburg ruler and only Hapsburg queen on the throne of Austria'
p3489
aS'After she barely survived smallpox, she promulgated a general inoculation policy, and this female ruler also regulated the payment for peasant labor via the Robot Patent.'
p3490
aS'The last major conflict during her rule was ended by the Congress of Teschen, and her husband had to give up Lorraine to marry her.'
p3491
aS"She changed her country's allegiance from Britain to France prior to a conflict which kept Silesia in the hands of Prussia, which had invaded it to contest the wishes of her father, Charles VI."
p3492
aS'For 10 points, name this Holy Roman empress whose reign was secured by the Pragmatic Sanction and the succeeding War of Austrian Succession.'
p3493
aS'Cassius Dio scathingly reports that this man took the office of Gymnasiarch.'
p3494
aS'This man politically opposed the tribune Publius Cornelius Dolabella.'
p3495
aS'He was given the Eastern part of a partition created in the Pact of Brundisium.'
p3496
aS'This mans brother and wife fought the Perusine War, and another conflict started when this man attempted to seize control of Cisalpine Gaul from Decimus Brutus.'
p3497
aS'This loser of the War of Mutina attempted to grant land to his children in the Donations of Alexandria, and he had Sextus Pompeius executed without trial.'
p3498
aS'This man held power in Rome as Master of Horse, and he was the victorious commander at the Battle of Philippi.'
p3499
aS'For 10 points, name this right-hand man of Julius_Caesar who lost the Battle of Actium during a civil war with Octavian.'
p3500
aS"This man dreamed his right hand was thunderstruck and earned the public's distaste for antics like trying to kill Dolabella and having his chariot drawn by lions."
p3501
aS'He sent Ventidius to take care of Pacorus and his Parthians, while his fondness for dressing up as Dionysus was interrupted by the Sicilian rebellion of Sextus Pompeius.'
p3502
aS'He would besiege Decimus Junius Brutus Albinus at Mutina, though his losses at Forum Gallorum would force his retreat into Transalpine Gaul.'
p3503
aS'He earned yet more public ire with the Donations of Alexandria, which lavished land upon (*) Cleopatra Selene and Alexander Helios, the children of the woman he loved in spite of his marriage to Octavia.'
p3504
aS"That marriage did not prevent his ruin after losing to Octavia's brother and Marcus Agrippa at Actium."
p3505
aS'For 10 points, name this triumvir beloved of Cleopatra.'
p3506
aS"This man's first military campaign came against Aristobolus in Judea."
p3507
aS'Under command of his own troops at Forum Gallorum and Mutina, he lost decisive battles despite killing the two consuls he opposed.'
p3508
aS'In 37 BCE, he returned to Judea and captured Jersualem, installing Herod the Great as king.'
p3509
aS'His strife with Rome included an open distribution of territory among his children after conquering Armenia.'
p3510
aS'It was because he gave a title to a child that was not his own, Caesarion, that his onetime confederate went to war against him.'
p3511
aS'For 10 points, name this man who helped win the Battle of Philippi with Octavian and Lepidus, but was later defeated alongside Cleopatra.'
p3512
aS'One novel by this author features the twins Luigi and Angello Capelo, who were originally designed to be conjoined.'
p3513
aS"That novel by this author centers on Roxy's switch of her son, Valet de Chambers, with (+) Tom Driscoll, when the two were infants and features a title character who is a lawyer and a fingerprint enthusiast."
p3514
aS'Another switch between two people occurs between Tom Canty and Edward VI his (*) The Prince and the Pauper.'
p3515
aS'For 10 points, name this American author better known for creating such characters as Becky Thatcher and Tom Sawyer.'
p3516
aS'Beverly Tucker authored a dystopian future resulting from the hypothetical election of this man to a fourth presidential term entitled The Partisan Leader.'
p3517
aS'In economic matters, this man was strongly influenced by hard-money supporters such as William Gouge and Orestes Brownson and his economic policies included the eventual passage of the Independent Treasury Act.'
p3518
aS'As a state politician, this man, with the aid of such figures as future governor Silas Wright organized the Bucktails into the Albany Regency.'
p3519
aS'During his presidency, this man sent Winfield_Scott to settle the Aroostook War and eight years after leaving office he would receive about 10 percent of the vote as the candidate of the Free Soil Party after being passed over by Democrats in favor of James Polk.'
p3520
aS"For ten points, identify this New Yorker who replaced John C. Calhoun as Andrew_Jackson's vice president and served as president from 1837 to 1841."
p3521
aS'An early rebellion in this colony was led by William Claiborne.'
p3522
aS"Its original settlers landed on St. Clement's Island aboard two ships named the Ark and the Dove."
p3523
aS'Another revolt in this colony clashed with troops led by William Stone at the Battle of the Severn; that uprising led to the restoration of a version of an earlier Toleration Act, which had been itself enacted to balance Protestants and Catholics.'
p3524
aS'Originally founded with a charter by George (*) Calvert, the Lord Baltimore, for 10 points, name this state with capital Annapolis.'
p3525
aS"One conflict in this state was initiated by an attack on its namesake resident, Thomas Cresap, while another conflict here was Coode's Rebellion."
p3526
aS"That rebellion was launched in part because this state had thus far failed to recognize the new rulers of England who had taken power during the (+) Glorious Revolution, perhaps because many of the residents of this state were of a religion notably supported by this state's Toleration Act."
p3527
aS'Founded in part as a haven for (*) Catholics by the Calvert family, for 10 points name this state whose largest city is also named for a member of that family, Lord Baltimore.'
p3528
aS'This state\'s colonial governor William Stone was defeated by a puritan army at the Battle of the Severn after a period of instability called "the plundering time." This state was the site of the Battle of Bladensburg, and in another War_of_1812 action, forces under George Armistead withstood a 25 hour bombardment at its Fort McHenry.'
p3529
aS'During the Civil War, a battle in this state was the bloodiest single-day battle in American history.'
p3530
aS'For 10 points, name this state which was first colonized by Cecilius Calvert, the 2nd Baron Baltimore.'
p3531
aS'One of its residents sparked a namesake border dispute by seizing the ranch of James Patterson.'
p3532
aS'Another of its residents took control of its government in a namesake rebellion at the head of a Protestant Association shortly after the Glorious Revolution.'
p3533
aS'In addition to Cresaps War and Coodes Rebellion, this colony saw the 1649 promulgation of an eponymous toleration act.'
p3534
aS'As a result of Cresaps War, its governing family and the Penns selected a pair of English surveyors to determine part of its border, the Mason-Dixon Line.'
p3535
aS'FTP, name this American colony whose royal charter was granted to the Calverts.'
p3536
aS'The founder of the colony that became this US state left his settlement of Avalon on Newfoundland to move south to this location.'
p3537
aS"After that founder's death, his son Cecilius fought the London Company in court to retain the colony, sending his brother Leonard to become this colony's first governor."
p3538
aS'Leonard used military force to take Kent Island from William Claiborne, the man who later repealed the "Act Concerning Religion" passed in this colony to protect the rights of the minority who practiced the religion of its founder, George Calvert.'
p3539
aS'Established as a haven for Catholics in the New World, FTP name this colony named for the wife of Charles I, Henrietta Maria, and established by Lord Baltimore.'
p3540
aS'Hill was propped up as governor of this polity after which William Claiborne attempted to rouse residents of Kent Island against its governmnet.'
p3541
aS'That period of anarchy saw much looting by Richard Ingle and is called the "plundering time.'
p3542
aS'" William Fuller defeated a small force organized by William Stone which led to a Puritan government in this region.'
p3543
aS'Issues with the Articles of Confederation were discussed in a convention that occurred in this state that led to the Philadelphia convention.'
p3544
aS'In 1649, this colony passed the Act of Toleration which allowed Catholics to practice their religion.'
p3545
aS'For 10 points, identify this colony which was established by George Calvert, 1st Lord Baltimore.'
p3546
aS'The last ruler of this empire was Brihadratha, who was killed by his general, Pusyamitra Sunga.'
p3547
aS'In a marriage alliance, the founder of this empire traded 500 war elephants to Seleucus I in return for territories bordering the Indus River.'
p3548
aS'He also embraced Jainism and eventually renounced to throne to become a wandering ascetic, although his successor was Hindu.'
p3549
aS'Its third emperor famously converted to Buddhism after he has subdued the state of Kalinga, and he spread the Buddhist canon throught southeast Asia with his eponymous pillars.'
p3550
aS'For 10 points, name this Indian empire ruled by Ashoka, and founded by an eponymous Chandragupta.'
p3551
aS'According to legend, one ruler of this empire wrote a letter asking a neighboring empire to send him dried figs and a skilled public speaker, only to be told that skilled public speakers were not for sale.'
p3552
aS'This empire fell after its last ruler was unable to defeat the invasion of the Yavana army.'
p3553
aS'It officially supported the Ajivika Sect through public works projects like the construction of the Marabar Caves.'
p3554
aS'The founder of this empire defeated the villainous Shaktar, an advisor to the Nanda kings.'
p3555
aS'That founder allegedly starved himself to death after becoming a Jain, and its most notable conquest might have been the coastal province of Kalinga, which it defeated in a war so bloody that the victorious ruler became a Buddhist.'
p3556
aS'For ten points, name this Indian dynasty of Asoka, founded by Chandragupta.'
p3557
aS"Kunala lost his position as heir to the throne of this polity after he became blind, so this polity's fourth ruler was Dasaratha."
p3558
aS'An early rebellion against this polity occurred when the inept prince Susima ruled poorly as governor of a northern province.'
p3559
aS'This polity supported the Ajivika Sect and left inscriptions in the Nagarjuni and Barabar caves.'
p3560
aS'This polity was eventually succeeded by the (*) Sunga Empire, and its second ruler had to be born by C-section after his mother was poisoned.'
p3561
aS'Apart from Bindusara, another ruler of this polity conquered Kalinga before converting to pacifist Buddhism.'
p3562
aS'For ten points, name this Indian dynasty of Asoka, founded by Chandragupta.'
p3563
aS'The last ruler of this empire, Brihadratha, was overthrown and killed by the founder of the Sunga Dynasty.'
p3564
aS'The Seleucid ambassador Megasthenes visited another rule of this empire, who erected a  pillar topped by four lions at Sarnath.'
p3565
aS'With the help of Kautilya, the founder of this empire overthrew the Nanda Dynasty and established his capital at (*) Pataliputra.'
p3566
aS'The Great Stupa at Sanchi was commissioned by a ruler of this empire, who issued a series of rock edicts after warring with Kalinga and converting to Buddhism.'
p3567
aS'For ten points, identify this Indian empire which was once ruled by Ashoka and founded by Chandragupta.'
p3568
aS"August 11, 3114 BCE has been computed as the beginning date for this civilization's calendar."
p3569
aS'They used a vigesimal number system and knew the use of zero.'
p3570
aS'Sacrifices to the rain god Chac-mool were made by hurling virgins down a well.'
p3571
aS'The same was allegedly done to the 12th century ruler Kukulkan.'
p3572
aS'The great structures of their classical period include Bonampak, Palenque, and Tikal, which contains a pyramid 229 feet high.'
p3573
aS'FTP, name this civilization, the most famous ruin of which is Chichen Itza.\t'
p3574
aS'This period saw the crushing of the breakaway Republic of Ezo in the Battle of Hakodate.'
p3575
aS'In this period, Dutch Learning came into prominence with land reform and industrialization, including the building of the clock-watches, or the wadokei.'
p3576
aS'During this period, the disaffected Saigo Takamori gathered his fellow samurai into the [*] Satsuma Rebellion, which was crushed.'
p3577
aS'Edo was renamed Tokyo during this period, whose causes include the diplomatic visit of Commodore Matthew Perry.'
p3578
aS'For 10 points, name this period of Japanese history in which Japan became westernized and the Emperor regained real power.'
p3579
aS'An important account of this period was written by Ernest Mason Satow, and other important diplomatic figures in this period were Rudolf von Geist and Lorenz von Stein.'
p3580
aS'One important political force in this era was the Freedom and Peoples Rights Movement, which partially succeeded in decreasing the power of the oligarchy.'
p3581
aS'This period saw the creation of the breakaway Ezo republic, and its principles were outlined in the Charter Oath.'
p3582
aS'Also seeing an uprising under Saigo Takamori, the Satsuma Rebellion, this period saw the creation of an elected Diet.'
p3583
aS'FTP, name this period of Japanese history which saw the creation of a modern constitutional monarchy.'
p3584
aS'Peter Duus wrote about the ambivalence of contemporary historians towards this period, which saw the publication of the Rescript on Education and abolished the han system.'
p3585
aS'The Mito school of a certain religion became popular after this event, and this period saw a revolt ended by the Battle of Shiroyama that was led by Saigo Takamori.'
p3586
aS'Its general goals, including a commitment that "evil customs of the past shall be broken off," were set forth in the Five Charter Oath.'
p3587
aS'It featured the Satsuma Rebellion, and this event was in part a response to the arrival of Commodore Perry.'
p3588
aS'For 10 points, identify this "restoration," that ended the Tokugawa_shogunate.'
p3589
aS"The grid of this city was laid out by Robert Hoddle, and a wildfire scorched this city's lands on Black Thursday."
p3590
aS"The ownership of this city's territory was disputed by an organization led by John Wedge and the captain of the Enterprize."
p3591
aS"The treaty which allegedly bought the territory of this city from six elders of the Kulin people was quickly nullified by a governor's proclamation."
p3592
aS'This city was settled by John Pascoe Fawkner and the Port Phillip Association on the banks of the (*) Yarra River and was named by Richard Bourke in 1837, sadly depriving this city of the name Batmania after the man whose namesake treaty established it.'
p3593
aS'For 10 points, name this city named for a British prime minister, the capital of the state of Victoria in Australia.'
p3594
aS'At the request of Barbara Heck, Philip Embury delivered the first American sermon of this denomination in America in 1766.'
p3595
aS'In 1784 Richard Whatcoat and Thomas Vesey were installed as Elders of this denomination for America and sent there from Ireland, along with the author of A Plan of the Society for the Establishment of Missions Among the Heathen, Thomas Coke, as Superintendent.'
p3596
aS'Those three men then ordained Cokes fellow Superintendent, Francis Asbury.'
p3597
aS'Beginning as a movement within the Church of England and retaining 25 of its 39 Articles, George Whitefield helped create, for 10 points, what church founded by Charles and John Wesley'
p3598
aS'Their longstanding debate over whether or not to have bishops was elucidated in the 2005 document What Sort of Bishops In their Twenty-Five Articles, ministers are allowed to marry, and the independence of the United_States is recognized.'
p3599
aS'Their founder adapted his "Covenant Prayer" that begins "I am no longer my own, but thine.'
p3600
aS'" This denomination disregarded the idea of predestination, arguing that salvation is achieved by doing good works and helping all others achieve salvation, and one of their founders was Francis Asbury.'
p3601
aS'FTP, name this sect of Christianity that practices only the sacraments of baptism and communion and began with the preaching of Charles and John Wesley.'
p3602
aS'A sub-sect of this group formed under Countess Huntington embraces predestination; this is its so-called Calvinistic branch.'
p3603
aS"Twenty-four of this sect's Twenty Five Articles were adopted at the Baltimore Conference of 1784."
p3604
aS'This reformist sects founder held the views of its Arminian branch, though such notable members as George Whitefield cleaved to the aforementioned Calvinistic branch.'
p3605
aS'For ten points, name this sect of Christianity founded in 1739 to reform the Church of England by John Wesley.'
p3606
aS"A massacre by this nation's army of students was recorded in a 1971 work by Elena Poniatowska."
p3607
aS'This\\n nation had a severe 1994 economic crisis known as the "December mistake." One person from this country\\n wrote the children\'s book The Story of Colors and is the leader of a movement called "The Other\\n Campaign." That figure always wears a ski mask, holds the title "Sub commander," and was inspired by a\\n 1968 massacre in his country shortly before the Summer Olympics.'
p3608
aS'This country was led by Ernesto\\n Zedillo and Carlos Salinas, both members of a party in power nearly 70 years.'
p3609
aS'For 10 points, name this\\n country that saw the dominance of the PRI end in 2000 with the election of Vicente Fox.'
p3610
aS'This country captured Seth Thornton in the "Thornton Affair."'
p3611
aS'A record fifty-six Medals of Honor, including one to an embarrassed Smedley Butler, were awarded after a military action here.'
p3612
aS'When returning from this country, a general wrote that "we are sneaking home under cover, like a whipped cur with its tail between its legs."'
p3613
aS'Nicholas (*) Trist was fired after negotiating a treaty with this country, and a conflict with it was the subject of the "Spot Resolutions" introduced by Abraham_Lincoln.'
p3614
aS'John Pershing led an unsuccessful 1916 expedition into it.'
p3615
aS'Germany sent the Zimmermann Telegram to this country, which sold land in the Gadsden Purchase.'
p3616
aS"For 10 points, name this country which the United_States acquired California from in an 1840's war."
p3617
aS"In 1987, the monthly adjustment of prices and wages according to changes in expected inflation drew controversy during the first months of implementation of this nation's Pacto, which has gone through fifteen renegotiations."
p3618
aS'Rudiger Dornbusch recommended that this nation devalue its currency by 30 percent during a time when twenty billion dollars in currency swaps were provided by an Exchange Stabilization Fund; this occurred after Bill Clinton failed to pass a Stabilization Act through Congress to aid this nation, which also received aid through Brady bonds.'
p3619
aS'This currency crisis was also known as the December mistake, and during it cetes were exchanged for dollar-denominated tesobonos.'
p3620
aS"That disaster under Ernesto Zedillo's leadership, also known as the Tequila crisis, forced the signing of NAFTA by, FTP, which country whose currency is the peso"
p3621
aS'A general for this dynasty annihilated enemy forces at the Battle of Buyur Nor but failed to capture Togus Temur.'
p3622
aS'It saw the first development of the an hua technique at such places as Jingdezhen.'
p3623
aS'By letting enemy forces go around the Great Wall, the general Wu Sangui betrayed this dynasty.'
p3624
aS'The founder of this dynasty defeated a navy under the rival leader Chen Youliang at the Battle of Lake Poyang.'
p3625
aS'This dynasty fell after the rebel Li Zicheng sacked its capital, which led Emperor Chongzhen to commit suicide.'
p3626
aS'The first ruler of this dynasty, the Hongwu Emperor, took power during the collapse of the preceding Yuan dynasty.'
p3627
aS'For 10 points, name this Chinese dynasty succeeded in the seventeenth century by the Qing dynasty and famous for its innovations in ceramics.'
p3628
aS"This dynasty's Jiajing Emperor angered Tibet by persecuting Buddhism at his court."
p3629
aS"This dynasty's first emperor established a secret police called the Jinyi Wei."
p3630
aS"Fundamental to this dynasty's founding was the Battle of Lake Poyang, won by the leader of the Red Turbans, Zhu Yuanzhang, who became the Hongwu emperor."
p3631
aS"This dynasty's Yongle Emperor restored the Grand Canal, sent treasure boats with [*] Zheng He, and constructed the Forbidden City."
p3632
aS'Overthrown by the Manchus and succeeded by the Qing, for 10 points, name this dynasty of China which succeeded the Yuan and was renowned for its pottery.'
p3633
aS"Vietnamese national hero Le Loi defended his country against this dynasty's forces."
p3634
aS"The Fish Scale Records were used to calculate taxes by this dynasty's founder, the Hongwu Emperor."
p3635
aS"This dynasty's Yong-le Emperor ordered the construction of Beijing's Forbidden City."
p3636
aS'The (*) Yuan_Dynasty fell during the Red Turban Rebellion, which brought this dynasty to power.'
p3637
aS"Zheng He was a eunuch admiral who explored under this dynasty's banner."
p3638
aS'For 10 points, name this Chinese dynasty that began in the 1300s and was renowned for its porcelain.'
p3639
aS'This dynasty ended after the rebellion of the peasant Li Zicheng.'
p3640
aS'It gained power after the Battle of Lake Poyang, won by its first emperor, Hongwu, who had lead the Red Turban Rebellion.'
p3641
aS'During this dynasty, Matteo Ricci founded a Jesuit mission, and also during this dynasty were the Yung Lo-sponsored voyages of Zheng He.'
p3642
aS'(*) For 10 points, name this Chinese dynasty preceded by the Yuan, and followed by the Qing, which was known for its pottery.'
p3643
aS'This dynasty saw the rule of the Zhengtong Emperor, who was defeated and captured by Mongols in the Tumu Crisis.'
p3644
aS'It was forced to stop naval trade because wokou pirates swarmed its coastline.'
p3645
aS"This dynasty saw the visit of the Jesuit priest Matteo Ricci, and its last emperor decided to hang himself on a tree behind the Forbidden City before Li Zicheng's rebellion succeeded."
p3646
aS'Its founder, the (*) Hongwu Emperor, rose to power in the Red Turban Rebellion, and under Yongle this dynasty moved its capital to Beijing.'
p3647
aS'This dynasty saw voyages of the eunuch Zheng He and the introduction of porcelain.'
p3648
aS'For ten points, name this Chinese dynasty that was overthrown by the Manchus and ruled between the Yuan and the Qing.'
p3649
aS'Towards the end of this dynasty the Imperial Tutor Zhang Juzheng attempted to reinstate many obsolete government reforms, gaining power over Emperor Zhu Yijun, or the Wanli Emperor.'
p3650
aS'Other rulers included Zhu Di, or the Yongle Emperor, whose most important act was dispatching the eunuch admiral Zheng He on a south seas expedition; and Zhu Zhanji, the fifth emperor of this dynasty.'
p3651
aS"Its end was precipitated by Li's Rebellion and Nurhaci's victory in Manchuria."
p3652
aS'FTP, identify this Chinese dynasty that was founded by Zhu Yuanzhang and best known for its vases.'
p3653
aS'During this dynasty, the emperor controlled the government directly, ruling with the aid of a specially appointed Nei-ko, or Grand Secretariat.'
p3654
aS'Its second ruler, Jianwen, died in a mysterious palace fire during the revolt of his uncle Yongle, who ordered the construction of the Temple of Heaven and the Forbidden City and oversaw the seven voyages of Zheng He.'
p3655
aS'It was founded by an orphan and Buddhist novice who took the ruling name Hong Wu after ousting the Yuan dynasty.'
p3656
aS'FTP, what was this Chinese dynasty that ruled until the Qing took power in 1644'
p3657
aS'This polity sent the general Mu Ying to conquer the the land of Bai Yi, and using the murder of its vassal Chen Tian-ping as a pretext it annexed the Annam province and held it until a successful rebellion was launched by Le Loi.'
p3658
aS'In order to enforce the hai jin, it waged the Wokou Wars against coastal populations that were illegally trading with Japan.'
p3659
aS'The general Yuan Chonghuan won two battles of Ningyuan to repel its invasion by Nurhaci, though these descendents of the Hongwu Emperor had less luck against his descendants.'
p3660
aS'They may be best remembered the expeditions of Zheng He.'
p3661
aS'For ten points, name this Chinese dynasty that followed the Yuan and preceded the Qing.'
p3662
aS"The grandson of this dynasty's founder was overthrown in a coup by his uncle, the Prince of Yan."
p3663
aS"This dynasty's last emperor, Chongzhen, was dethroned by the peasant Li Zicheng."
p3664
aS'Its first emperor came to power during the Red Turban Rebellion and was known as Zhu Yuanzhang, the Hongwu Emperor.'
p3665
aS'One of its rulers, the Yong-le emperor, sent Zheng He on exploratory naval missions, commissioned the Forbidden City, and moved the capital to Beijing.'
p3666
aS'For 10 points, name this Chinese dynasty that succeeded the Yuan and preceded the Qing, known for its porcelain.'
p3667
aS'After the murder of an ambassador by the Tran Dynasty, this dynasty attempted to conquer Vietnam, thought that attempt was eventually thwarted by Le Loi.'
p3668
aS"This dynasty dispatched Chen Lin to aid the Joseon against Toyotomi Japan, and Li Zicheng's short-lived Shun dynasty succeeded it."
p3669
aS"General Wu Sangui's opening of Shanhai Pass ended this dynasty, which was crushed at the battle of Songjin."
p3670
aS'The seven voyages of the treasure fleet led by Zheng He occurred during this dynasty.'
p3671
aS'For 10 points, name this Chinese dynasty which began with a capital at Nanjing and followed the Mongol Yuan.'
p3672
aS'In this country, children may be given names meaning "No name" or "Don\'t know" to ward off evil spirits.'
p3673
aS'The saline Uvs Lake lies mostly in this country, which encloses the ancient Lake Khovsgol.'
p3674
aS'In this country south of Tuva, the Tuul River is held sacred.'
p3675
aS'This country lies northwest of a similarly named, rare earth metal-rich, and desertifying region in another nation, called "Inner [this country].'
p3676
aS'"The ger is a round, portable dwelling found in this country, whose namesake ethnicity invented the yurt.'
p3677
aS"This country's south lies in the Altai Mountains and Gobi Desert."
p3678
aS'For 10 points, name this landlocked steppe country between Russia and China.'
p3679
aS"This country's government has recently implemented Operation Production, an ill-conceived plan to move the homeless urban dwellers into the rural areas for farm work."
p3680
aS'This country\'s second president ordered all policemen to learn "Transcendal Meditation" in order to master "Yogic Flying."'
p3681
aS"The Margo Commission investigated the fatal air crash that killed this country's first president."
p3682
aS'Joaquim Chissano led this site of Operation Gordian Knot, an attempt to stop one of its major rebel groups.'
p3683
aS'This country was the subject of fighting between its RENAMO and FRELIMO groups, and like Angola gained independence after the fall of the Estado Novo.'
p3684
aS'For 10 points, name this African country colonized the Portuguese, whose capital is Maputo.'
p3685
aS'The government of this country agreed to stop funding the African National Congress in the Nkomati Accord.'
p3686
aS"Its current ruling party was founded by Eduardo Mondlane, who was then succeeded by Samora Machel before that party defeated (*) Renamo in this country's first free elections."
p3687
aS'For 10 points since independence in 1975, the Frelimo party has been the sole government of what former Portuguese colony'
p3688
aS"This country's independence was opposed by the Wiriyamu Massacre and Operation Gordian Knot."
p3689
aS'The first president of this country was a former nurse, who signed the Nkomati Accord pleding not to support foreign opposition movements and was killed in a 1986 plane crash.'
p3690
aS'A right-wing organization opposing the socialist government of this country drew support from such cities as the Beira port in Sofala province, was formed by Andr Matsangaissa, and laid down its arms in the 1990s following the Rome Accords.'
p3691
aS"Since then, Afonso Dhlakama has led that group into the government, though this country's presidency has always been in the hands of a left-wing group founded by Eduardo Mondlane, which was later led by Samora Machel and Joaquim Chissano."
p3692
aS'The guerilla organization RENAMO opposed the governing FRELIMO group in, for 10 points, what country which achieved independence from Portugal in 1975 and is located on a namesake channel'
p3693
aS"Kaulza de Arriaga designed the Gordian Knot Operation to fight back against this country's insurgency."
p3694
aS'Samora Machel became its first president, in which capacity he fought the RENAMO rebel movement.'
p3695
aS"This country's flag features an AK-47 in homage to the weapon used by FRELIMO, though it was only when the Carnation Revolution overthrew the Estado Novo that it won independence."
p3696
aS'For 10 points, name this country where a struggle for independence from Portugal resulted in the establishment of a country with its capital at Maputo.'
p3697
aS'One ruler of this empire held a court whose "Nine Jewels" included the witty Birbal, who joined that ruler\'s new religion of Din-i-Ilahi.'
p3698
aS"This empire's sixth ruler re-instituted a tax on non-Muslims called the jizya, while another ruler of this empire defeated Ibrahim Lodhi at [*] Panipat."
p3699
aS"This empire's last ruler was Bahadur II."
p3700
aS"One ruler of this empire was defeated by Sher Shah Suri, and Aurangzeb's father commemorated his own wife Mumtaz with the Taj Mahal."
p3701
aS"This empire was founded by Humayun's father Babur and later ruled by Shah Jahan and Akbar."
p3702
aS'For 10 points, name this Muslim Indian empire.'
p3703
aS'One ruler of this empire had a retinue of ministers known as his "Nine Jewels," including the wise tutor Bairam Khan.'
p3704
aS'Another ruler of this empire fought constant battles with Shivaji, the founder of the rival Maratha Confederation.'
p3705
aS"Nadir Shah stole this empire's Peacock Throne."
p3706
aS'It was founded after the defeat of the Lodis at the First Battle of Panipat.'
p3707
aS'One ruler of this empire built the Taj Mahal, and its rulers included Shah Jahan, Akbar, and Babur.'
p3708
aS'For 10 points, name this Muslim empire that ruled India from the sixteenth to the nineteenth century.'
p3709
aS'This man was stabbed by a member of the Khaksar Tehrik, and founded Dawn, a newspaper that is now the largest in his country.'
p3710
aS'He criticized as extremist the Khilafat movement to defend the Islamic caliphate.'
p3711
aS'This man declared a "Day of Deliverance" when, in protest of their country\'s entry into World_War_II, members of the Congress Party resigned from government.'
p3712
aS'He called for a day of "Direct Action," leading to riots in Bengal.'
p3713
aS'For 10 points, name this rival of Jawaharlal_Nehru, the leader of the Muslim League and founder of Pakistan.'
p3714
aS'A building was erected in honor of this man and his wife after they protested a ceremony honoring Lord Willingdon.'
p3715
aS'His call for a Direct Action Day led to massive riots that spread to Noakhali and Tippera.'
p3716
aS'His August 11th speech called for religious freedom, and about a decade after Woodrow_Wilson, this person presented Fourteen Points in an attempt to get more political power for Muslims.'
p3717
aS'With the Indian National Congress, he negotiated the Lucknow Pact requesting less British intervention in India.'
p3718
aS'He led a new nation for a year before dying of tuberculosis in 1948.'
p3719
aS'Name this leader of the All-India Muslim League who became the first leader of Pakistan.'
p3720
aS"To safeguard protections for his people, he organized 1916's Congress League Lucknow Pact."
p3721
aS"Originally a successful criminal lawyer, he initially worked with the Hindu-Muslim coalition, but soon grew disillusioned with Gandhi's mass demonstrations and call for independence."
p3722
aS'Leading the Muslim League to an overwhelming victory in the elections of the mid-1940s, his opposition to compromise with the Hindus led to the partitioning of India.'
p3723
aS'FTP, who was this man appointed the first governor-general of Pakistan'
p3724
aS"While abroad, this man joined the Lincoln Inn society and supported the Parliamentary campaign of the author of Lord Salisbury's Blackman and The Manners and Customs of the Parsees."
p3725
aS'Later this man founded the broadsheet "The Dawn" to advance the views of the organization he headed.'
p3726
aS'He called for protection of the minority in the legislature and cabinet, complete religious freedom, and safeguards of minority culture in his famous 1929 enumeration of his Wilsonianly-titled 14 Points.'
p3727
aS"During his brief rule, he used military force to help secure his nation's control of the province of Kalat."
p3728
aS'This man helped shape the Lucknow Pact with the Muslim League, an organization he came to head.'
p3729
aS'Coming to power after Lord Mountbatten ceded five Indian provinces, FTP, identify this first Governor-General and "Father of the Nation" of Pakistan.'
p3730
aS'This leader managed to free his polity from the Convention of Balta Liman, allowing him to establish a state monopoly on textiles.'
p3731
aS"This ruler sent an expedition to expel Wahabis from the Hejaz, and was the beneficiary of the Convention of Ktahya and his son's victory at the Battle of Nizip."
p3732
aS'He replaced the iltizam tax system and established a new army under Colonel Joseph Sve formed from conscription among the fellahin.'
p3733
aS'French support of this man led to the so-called "Oriental Crisis" when he invaded Syria, and he sent his son Ibrahim Pasha to wage a campaign in the Morea, though it was cut short by defeat at Navarino Bay.'
p3734
aS"This native Albanian led a massacre of the Mamelukes, and was named viceroy by Selim_III after expelling Napoleon's forces from the nation he would rule."
p3735
aS'For 10 points, name this man who achieved autonomy from the Ottomans while ruling Egypt from 1805 to 1848.'
p3736
aS'One building in this city served as the headquarters for the Energy Corporation in Rollerball.'
p3737
aS"A legend about the best-known church in this city states that a black footprint located in the church's foyer was where the devil stomped his foot after discovering that Jorg von Halsbach had built windows that were cleverly concealed by columns."
p3738
aS"This city's park Englischer Garten is in the style of Capability Brown."
p3739
aS'That best-known church in this city has twin towers topped with a cupolas modeled after the Dome of the Rock in Jerusalem, which tower over the city.'
p3740
aS'This city is located on the Isar River.'
p3741
aS'That used in Rollerball is the BMW Headquarters and Museum.'
p3742
aS'That best- known church is the Frauenkirche and its central square is Marienplatz.'
p3743
aS'Mein Kampf was written after the failed Beer Hall Putsch in this city.'
p3744
aS'For 10 points, identify this Bavarian city that hosts Oktoberfest.'
p3745
aS"This man's victories included overcoming a surprise attack at the Battle_of_Marengo and defeating Tsar Alexander I at the Battle_of_Austerlitz."
p3746
aS'This man devised the Continental System as a blockade against Great Britain.'
p3747
aS'The Peninsular War allowed this man to place his brother Joseph on the throne of Spain.'
p3748
aS'This man was sent to St. Helena after he returned to power during the ""Hundred Days,"" which followed his earlier exile to Elba.'
p3749
aS'For 20 points, name this emperor.'
p3750
aS"Horace Vernet painted this figure on his deathbed, while Antoine-Jean Gros's paintings of him include one at Jaffa and one at the Arcole Bridge."
p3751
aS'In one work by his most famous depicter, he stands in his signature pose as his candles burn out at dawn in his study, while in another the names of Charlemagne and Hannibal are carved  into a mountain beneath the hooves of his leaping horse.'
p3752
aS"If it were not for a mis-measurement of The Marriage at Cana, the painting of him placing a crown on his wife's head would be the largest at the Louvre, whose central hall bears his name."
p3753
aS'For 10 points, name this favorite subject of Jacques-Louis David, former Emperor of France.'
p3754
aS"_This person share his name with the cat of Tyler's brother."
p3755
aS"This man's first wife was Josephine de Beauharnais, also a name of one of Tyler's cats."
p3756
aS'This Corsican-born ruler was painted "Crossing the Alps" by Jacques-Louis David, who did another work featuring his coronation.'
p3757
aS'He became the First Consul after overthrowing the French Directory.'
p3758
aS'The Russian Army famously used scorched earth tactics against his Grande Arm__e__e during his failed invasion of Russia, contributing to his lose at Borodino.'
p3759
aS'For twenty points, name this French Emperor who lost at the battle of Waterloo._'
p3760
aS'He escaped from a life sentence by disguising himself as a stonemason and walking away from the fortress of Ham.'
p3761
aS"As an exile in England, he joined Wellington's special forces to suppress the Chartists and, while in Italy, he participated in the 1830 uprising."
p3762
aS"However, it wasn't until he defeated Ledru-Rollin, Cavaignac and Lamartine that he became the ruler of his home country."
p3763
aS'He created a Council of State, a powerless Senate and a Legislative Body the members of which were elected by universal male suffrage in corrupt elections.'
p3764
aS"After dissolving the original Legislative Assembly on the forty-sixth anniversary of his uncle's greatest victory, he declared himself emperor in 1852."
p3765
aS'FTP, who was this man who ruled France until his defeat at Sedan in 1870'
p3766
aS'In 1866 this mans nation under the command of his consul Henri Bellonet attempted to occupy the Korean island of Ganghwa, and in another part of the world, he freed the Algerian leader Abd al Qadir.'
p3767
aS'He made a deal with Cavour to assist Piedmonts rebellion against Austria in exchange for the territories of Savoy and Nice.'
p3768
aS'He developed the plan to increase his nations influence over Mexico by placing a Hapsburg prince as emperor, Maximillian I.'
p3769
aS'For ten points name this man who ruled France as an emperor from 1852 to 1870 before being deposed after being captured at the battle of Sedan, the nephew of the man who was finally defeated at Waterloo.'
p3770
aS'One leader of this religious movement was responsible for the creation of the newspaper The Final Call.'
p3771
aS"This movement's founder was (+) Wallace D. Fard."
p3772
aS'One part of the mythology of this movement claims that a Mother Plane was built in Japan in 1929 and can reach speeds of 9,000 miles per hour.'
p3773
aS'Three members of this religion were responsible for an (*) assassination in the Audubon Ballroom of a former member of this movement.'
p3774
aS'For 10 points, name this American religious movement whose leaders have included Elijah Muhammad and Louis Farrakhan, and once included Malcolm X.'
p3775
aS"The Bosporan Kingdom was annexed during this emperor's reign, and he married the ex-wife of a later emperor, Poppea Sabina."
p3776
aS'This emperor built a barge that would collapse on the water in an attempt to kill his mother,(*) Agrippina the Younger.'
p3777
aS"This man's death and Galba's ascension to the throne marked the beginning of the Year of the Four Emperors, and this man's rule saw Suetonius Paullinus crush a revolt led by the queen of the Iceni, Boudicca, in Britannia."
p3778
aS'For 10 points, name this Roman emperor that supposedly fiddled while Rome burned.'
p3779
aS'The founder of the Juvenalia and a namesake festival, he installed Tigranes and later Tiridates as kings of Armenia, and used the henchman Anicetus in divorcing and murdering his first wife.'
p3780
aS'Like Claudius, he married a Messalina as his third wife, but his only child died in infancy.'
p3781
aS'This ruler was rebelled against by Clodius Macer, the governor of Africa, and commanded the general Corbulo to commit suicide.'
p3782
aS'In early life he was advised the praetorian prefect Burrus and also the author of De Ira and the Apocolocyntosis.'
p3783
aS'He forced a man known as his arbiter elegantiae, Petronius, to commit suicide, and employed the architect Fabullus to build a palace known as the Domus Aurea.'
p3784
aS'The target of the Pisonian conspiracy, he was eventually unseated by the revolt of Gaius Vindex in Gaul.'
p3785
aS'For Ten Points, name this husband of Poppaea, student of Seneca, and predecessor of Galba, the last of the Julio-Claudian Roman emperors.'
p3786
aS'This ruler appointed Domitius Corbulo to fight King Tiridates of Armenia, and early in his reign, he provided aid to Jews at the request of Josephus.'
p3787
aS'He later faced insurrections in Gaul under Julius Vindex and in Britain under Boudicca, while a group including the poet Lucan and his former advisor Seneca tried to oust him in the Piso Conspiracy.'
p3788
aS'His personal struggles included killing his first wife Octavia to marry Poppea, and killing his mother Agrippina the Younger.'
p3789
aS'FTP, name this stepson of Claudius and fifth Roman emperor, who ruled during the great fire.'
p3790
aS"During his reign, his polity's forces won the Battle of Watling Street, crushing a revolt that had already sacked present-day Colchester and London."
p3791
aS'Another revolt against him was nearly busted by the efforts of one woman to recruit sailors to the cause; she strangled herself rather than reveal her co-conspirators under torture.'
p3792
aS'He sent Gnaeus Domitius Corbulo to negotiate peace with the Parthian_Empire, although he would eventually order Corbulo and two of his own advisors to commit suicide, Petronius and Seneca.'
p3793
aS'This man also appointed a future emperor to put down a revolt in Judea; he would use the same forces to eventually accede to the throne after a year of chaos.'
p3794
aS"Succeeded by Galba after his suicide triggered the Year of Four Emperors, this is, for 10 points, what nephew of Claudius, a Roman Emperor who probably didn't fiddle while Rome burned"
p3795
aS'The prefect Sextus Afranius Burrus was an early advisor to this man, who sent his general Corbulo to fight the Parthians, poisoned his stepbrother Britannicus, and built the Domus Aurea.'
p3796
aS'His reign was marked by a rebellion of the Iceni, as well as an assassination plot that led to the suicide of Seneca the Younger.'
p3797
aS"This ruler suppressed the Pisonian Conspiracy and (*) Boudica's Rebellion, and he had earlier murdered his mother Agrippina the Younger, who helped him become the successor to Claudius."
p3798
aS'His overthrow by Galba began the Year of the Four Emperors.'
p3799
aS'For ten points, identify this Roman emperor whose reign saw a fire that devastated Rome.'
p3800
aS'In this state, Clarence Burleson shot two elderly men in the Lordsburg Killings.'
p3801
aS'A March 1945 riot here began after shirts depicting the Rising Sun were confiscated.'
p3802
aS"In a battle fought in this modern day state, Henry Hopkins Sibley's supply train was burned at Johnson's Ranch."
p3803
aS'The basis of this state\'s laws was the "Kearny Code."'
p3804
aS"In this present day state, Confederates forces fought John Chivington's troops in the Battle of Glorieta Pass."
p3805
aS'At Fort Sumner in this state, Pat Garrett shot an outlaw, who had been tagged with a $500 reward by Governor Lew Wallace.'
p3806
aS'This modern day state\'s "Volunteers" were commanded in the Civil War by Kit Carson, who later, during the "Long Walk," forced the Navajo to move to Bosque Redondo here from Arizona.'
p3807
aS'For 10 points, name this state connected to Missouri via the Santa Fe Trail.'
p3808
aS'Though not in Georgia, James Oglethorpe\'s warnings about Spanish-instigated slave uprisings led to seventeen hangings as a result of this city\'s 1741 ""Conspiracy Trials.'
p3809
aS'"" Earlier, this city suffered the first large-scale (+) slave revolt, which took place in 1712 in the East Ward.'
p3810
aS"During the Revolutionary War, this city was abandoned after a clandestine retreat in August 1776, and it was the intended endpoint of (*) John Burgoyne's march meant to isolate New England from the rest of the colonies."
p3811
aS'Briefly, this city was renamed New Orange after being recaptured during the Third Anglo-Dutch War.'
p3812
aS'For 10 points, name this large city which was renamed from New Amsterdam.'
p3813
aS'The tennis player Edwin Fischer sent postcards warning of danger in this city, which resulted in him being committed to an asylum.'
p3814
aS'A flyer found after a criminal attack here read "Free the political prisoners, or it will be sure death for all of you."'
p3815
aS'Mario Buda, an associate of Sacco and Vanzetti, was suspected of carrying out a violent attack in this city.'
p3816
aS'The Buttonwood Agreement was signed in this city under the namesake type of tree.'
p3817
aS'In 1920, it was rocked by a bombing believed to be carried out by Italian anarchists, which killed at least 38 people.'
p3818
aS'"The Corner" here was the site of "The House of Morgan," a bank founded by J. Pierpont Morgan.'
p3819
aS'The first presidential inauguration took place in this city, as it was the first capital under the Constitution.'
p3820
aS'For 10 points, name this city where Wall Street is located.'
p3821
aS'Octavius Hadfield worked to spread Christianity in this country, the site of a church whose name translates as "The Abode of the Absolute."'
p3822
aS'A scandal was caused in this country after every household received a copy of a document citing the Petone Incident as being caused by a lack of Christian values.'
p3823
aS'This nation was the subject of the Mazengarb Report.'
p3824
aS'Its social security system was dubbed "applied Christianity" by its most notable proponent, Michael Savage.'
p3825
aS'Keith (*) Holyoake served for over ten years as prime minister of this country, where the "King Movement" began.'
p3826
aS'The pseudonym "Polly Plum" was used by feminists here, who helped make it the first country to grant women\'s suffrage.'
p3827
aS'After the Musket Wars, the British established control here via the Treaty_of_Waitangi.'
p3828
aS'For 10 points, name this country, home to the Maori_people.'
p3829
aS'A deposit of gold in this country was discovered by Gabriel Read, leading to a large influx of Chinese immigrants who came to work in its Otago region\'s goldfields after this country\'s namesake "Land Wars."'
p3830
aS'One culture from this country killed and ate most of the crew of the Boyd.'
p3831
aS'In 1893, the passage of the Electoral Bill made this country the (*) first to give women the right to vote.'
p3832
aS'The moa bird was hunted to extinction in this country.'
p3833
aS'A perpetual source of tension during this country\'s colonial period was the translation of the word for "sovereignty" in various versions of a treaty co-authored by William Hobson.'
p3834
aS'For 10 points, name this modern-day country where the Rainbow Warrior was sunk, and which was incorporated into the British Empire by the Treaty_of_Waitangi.'
p3835
aS'Leonardo Arguello lasted only one month as president of this country, before being overthrown in a coup that Harry Truman refused to recognize.'
p3836
aS'One rebel movement in this country was led by Eden Pastora, who called himself "Commandante Zero." Louis Mena was a rogue defense minister who led a rebellion in this country, which sparked US intervention to prop up the government of Adolfo Diaz in 1912.'
p3837
aS'One president of this country was assassinated by Rigoberto Perez, a local poet.'
p3838
aS'In the early 20th century, the politics of this country was dominated by the Chamorro family.'
p3839
aS'This country is now ruled by a democratically-elected former dictator, Daniel Ortega, and for a long time it was ruled by members of the Samoza family.'
p3840
aS'For ten points, name this Latin American country home to Sandinistas and Contras.'
p3841
aS'Gil Gonzalez Davila attempted to conquer what is now this country, but was defeated by native forces led by this countrys namesake.'
p3842
aS'A U.S. led revolt overthrew President Jose Zelaya after Zelaya made entreaties with Japan, and the Bryan-Chamorro treaty prevented a competing canal from being built here.'
p3843
aS'In the late 17th century, Great Britain formed an alliance with the Miskito Indians of its Caribbean coastal region, and it seceded from the United Provinces of Central America in 1826.'
p3844
aS'In 1956, the poet Rigoberto Lopez Perez assassinated Tacho Somoza, dictator of, FTP, what country that experienced civil war between the Contras and Sandinistas in the 1980s'
p3845
aS'In 1944 this man gained notice for his radical article entitled "The United Front of Youth".'
p3846
aS'Two decades later this leader would issue a decree forcibly detaining homeless or disabled children at "psychiatric wards" in Siret and Cighid, at the same time banning all contraception in hopes of increasing his nation\'s working population by fifty percent.'
p3847
aS'Giving himself the title "Conducator", he also struck out against non-conformists via 1971\'s July Theses.'
p3848
aS'During WWII this leader spent time in the Tirgu Jiu concentration camp, where he met the man he would succeed as party secretary in 1965, Gheorghe Gheorghiu-Dej.'
p3849
aS'His downfall began with demonstrations in Timisoara, culminating with his execution alongside his wife Elena on Christmas Day of 1989.'
p3850
aS'For ten points, name this longtime Communist dictator of Romania. '
p3851
aS'This man purged Gaston Marin, who had served as Foreign Minister to this mans predecessor, and he may have ordered the assassination of Vasile Milea.'
p3852
aS'This mans regime ran the infamous Cighid Orphanage, in which orphans were kept in inhumane conditions.'
p3853
aS'He listed his Seventeen Points in the July Theses, in which he outlined his plan for a new social system inspired by the Juche philosophy of North Korea.'
p3854
aS'His regime suffered the defection of General Pacepa, the highest-ranking defector of the Cold War.'
p3855
aS'After this man imprisoned the Protestant minister Laszlo Tokes, a rebellion against him started in Timisoara.'
p3856
aS'For ten points, name this protg of Gheorghe Gheorghiu-Dej who was executed on Christmas Day 1989, the last Communist ruler of Romania.'
p3857
aS'He first rose to international prominence in 2002 when he was appointed to the first of two stints as Minister of the Interior where he called for public financing of Muslim institutions to encourage integration.'
p3858
aS'In 2005, his statements about rioters in a suburb of the national capital were widely panned.'
p3859
aS'Economic and fiscal policies of his include reducing maximum tax rates, downsizing the national bureaucracy through attrition, and scrapping the 35 hour workweek.'
p3860
aS'For 10 points, name this member of the UMP, former finance minister, and former mayor and councillor of Neuilly-sur-Seine, who, in 2007, defeated Segolene Royal to become current President of France.'
p3861
aS'During this event, Edmund Heines was found in bed with an eighteen-year-old.'
p3862
aS'One of the architects of this event was Viktor Lutze, who became the successor of the primary target of this event.'
p3863
aS'Another victim of this event was Kurt von Schleicher, the last Chancellor of the Weimar Republic.'
p3864
aS'Its aim was to eliminate supporters of (*) Franz von Papen and other critics of the Nazi regime.'
p3865
aS'For 10 points, name this purge that targeted Ernst Rohm and the SA and was led by Adolf Hitler.'
p3866
aS'During this event, Edmund Heines was found in bed with an eighteen-year-old.'
p3867
aS'One of the architects of this event was Viktor Lutze, who became the successor of the primary target of this event.'
p3868
aS'Another victim of this event was Kurt von Schleicher, the last Chancellor of the Weimar Republic.'
p3869
aS'Its aim was to eliminate supporters of Franz von Papen and other critics of the Nazi regime.'
p3870
aS'For 10 points, name this purge which targeted Ernst Rohm and the SA and was led by Adolf Hitler.'
p3871
aS'This event took its popular name from an event that saw only St. Abban the Hermit and Vortigern escape from a banquet crashed by a bunch of Saxons.'
p3872
aS'The central target of this event was captured, given a pistol, and told to shoot himself, but refused and was shot point-blank by Michel Lippert.'
p3873
aS'During its conception it was often referred to as Operation Hummingbird Those loyal to Franz von Papen were targeted, and the main objective was to end the independence of the SA under Ernst Rhm.'
p3874
aS'For 10 points, name this 1934 mass execution in which the Nazis killed at least 85 political opponents.'
p3875
aS'It was referred to in the initial planning stages as Operation Hummingbird, and was partially in response to a speech given at Marburg University by the Vice-Chancellor.'
p3876
aS'One pretext for it was the homosexuality of some of the leading Storm Troopers, but in actuality it was done to curtail a threat to both the army and the Fuhrers power.'
p3877
aS'Ernst Rohm, a member of Hitlers inner circle, was shot in his cell after being given the chance to commit suicide.'
p3878
aS'For 10 points, what is the name given to the June 30th purge of the SAs leadership and other opponents of the Nazi party'
p3879
aS'This term has been used to refer to the slaughter of men under Vortigern by Anglo-Saxon mercernaries, as well as for the 1962 sacking of seven Cabinet members by British Prime Minister Harold McMillan.'
p3880
aS'The most famous event of this name was aimed partly as a reaction the Marburg speech of vice-Chancellor Franz von Papen.'
p3881
aS'Kurt von Schleicher and Gustav Ritter von Kahr were other enemies of this events instigator killed by the Gestapo and the SS during it.'
p3882
aS'Centering on the removal of Ernst Rohm and the SA, for 10 points, give the name of this June 1934 purge of the Nazi party.'
p3883
aS'This man "and the Creation of a Superpower" and "Memories of" this man form the titles of two of his biographies written by his son.'
p3884
aS'He opened up new land in the Altay region for farming during his Virgin Lands Campaign, and created regional Economic Councils in an effort to decentralize.'
p3885
aS'After secretly giving a report entitled On the Personality Cult and Its Consequences to the so-called Congress of Victors, he advocated breaking the ice during his namesake thaw.'
p3886
aS'He also oversaw the military intervention during the Hungarian Revolution and formed the Warsaw Pact.'
p3887
aS'Also famous for overseeing the launch of Sputnik I, stationing nuclear weapons in Cuba, banging his shoe on a desk during a Security Council meeting, and holding the Kitchen Debate with Richard_Nixon, this is, FTP, which Soviet leader who was overthrown by Brezhnev and succeeded Stalin'
p3888
aS'man encouraged collective farms to expel their useless members while serving as Party Chief in Ukraine.'
p3889
aS'This man was mentored by Lazar Kaganovich, who with this man supervised construction of the Moscow Metro, and led to this man becoming Party Leader for Moscow.'
p3890
aS'Later, Kaganovich along with Malenkov and Molotov opposed this man as part of the Anti-Party group.'
p3891
aS'More famously, this man debated in a kitchen with (*) Richard_Nixon and demanded a peace treaty between the Germanies, but failed in that endeavor, leading to the construction of the Berlin Wall.'
p3892
aS'This man is best known for dealing with Kennedy in the Cuban Missile Crisis and for being succeeded by Brezhnev.'
p3893
aS'For 10 points, name this man who in the "Secret Speech" condemned his predecessor Stalin.'
p3894
aS'Two senators from this state who led the opposition to the creation of Martin Luther King, Jr.   Day were John Porter East and Jesse Helms.'
p3895
aS'Another senator from this state, who chaired the  Watergate Committee, was Sam Ervin.'
p3896
aS"In 1960, a series of sit-ins in this state led to the integration   of Woolworth's."
p3897
aS'The first English baby born in the Americas, Virginia Dare, was born in what is now  this state.'
p3898
aS'She was born in Roanoke Colony.'
p3899
aS'The Wright Brothers flew the first airplane in this state.'
p3900
aS'Name this state, the site of a lost colony settled by the namesake of its capital, Walter Raleigh.'
p3901
aS'In 1701, John Lawson visited the Catawba people while exploring the area that is now this state.'
p3902
aS'Its colonial delegates were the first to officially call for independence in a document called the Halifax Resolve, and battles on the territory of this state include a clash between Nathaniel Green and Cornwallis at Guilford Courthouse.'
p3903
aS'From 1711 to 1715, while it was still a colony, this state was racked by a war against the Tuscarora Indians, and the excesses of its governor William Tryon led to an uprising led by Herman Husband known as the Regulator Movement.'
p3904
aS'For ten points, identify this state which has recently been represented by such senators as Jesse Helms and Elizabeth Dole, and has its capital at Raleigh.'
p3905
aS'A political leader in this state was Herman Husband, who opposed Governor William Tryon.'
p3906
aS"A Supreme Court case associated with this state affirmed that Judge James McMillan's order for busing to achieve racial integration was constitutional."
p3907
aS'It was the home of the 1771 Battle of Alamance, which put down a rebellion against colonial taxation.'
p3908
aS'It saw a bloody Revolutionary War battle at Guilford Court House and was the site of the Swann case and the War of the Regulation.'
p3909
aS"In 1960, this state saw the first sit-in demonstration at a Woolworth's lunch counter."
p3910
aS'For 10 points, name this Southern state with such cities as Greensboro and Charlotte.'
p3911
aS"This state's Racial Justice Act of 2009 was used, before it was repealed, by Marcus Robinson to set aside his death sentence."
p3912
aS'This state is home to the "Moral Monday" protests.'
p3913
aS"Republicans in this state's legislature recently attached anti-abortion legislation to a motorcycle safety bill."
p3914
aS'During a 2008 US Senate election in this state, Elizabeth Dole called former Sunday school teacher Kay Hagan "godless."'
p3915
aS'This state hosted the 2012 Democratic National Convention.'
p3916
aS'For 10 points, name this state whose governor, Pat McCrory, lives in an executive mansion in Raleigh.'
p3917
aS'A politician from this state became the first Republican U.S. senator to support single-sex marriage   after his son came out as gay, before Mark Kirk became the second.'
p3918
aS'The governor of this state, who  seemed to criticize his own party in October 2013 by saying "I\'m concerned about the fact there   seems to be a war on the poor", is former Fox News Heartland  host John Kasich.'
p3919
aS'A U.S. congressman  from this state who recently said of Obamacare "There is no way to fix this monstrosity"; that man is  the Speaker of the House, John Boehner [BAY-nur].'
p3920
aS'Name this state where Ariel Castro kidnapped  three women in Cleveland.'
p3921
aS"This man's government was created by John Lambert's Instrument of Government."
p3922
aS'He commanded the Eastern Association Army, and this man crushed the Levellers in Burford.'
p3923
aS"This man's general Thomas Fairfax defeated Prince Rupert of the Palatine at a battle fought south of Leicester."
p3924
aS"This man's troops won at Marston Moor and [*] Naseby."
p3925
aS'Later, this man instituted the Barebones Parliament in opposition to the Long Parliament and Rump Parliament, before he got rid of Parliament altogether and ruled with the help of his Roundhead allies in the New Model Army.'
p3926
aS'For 10 points, name this conqueror of Ireland and Lord Protector of England.'
p3927
aS'This man was offered the crown of his country under the Humble Petition and Advice.'
p3928
aS'This man led the Siege of Drogheda (DROY-eh-duh).'
p3929
aS'John Lambert drafted the Instrument of Government, which gave this man considerable power.'
p3930
aS'This ruler led the Parliamentarian cavalry at the Battle of Marston Moor, and he was supported by the Thomas Fairfax-led New Model Army.'
p3931
aS'This man was briefly succeeded by his son Richard before the 1660 Restoration.'
p3932
aS'For 10 points, name this man who replaced Charles I as leader of England by becoming the first Lord Protector of England.'
p3933
aS"This man's criticism of the Earl of Manchester's lackluster motivation led to the passage of the Self-Denying Ordinance, which prevented members of Parliament from holding military posts."
p3934
aS'Since a debate at Putney proved inconclusive, this man had Levellers executed after several mutinies.'
p3935
aS'This man was second-in-command to Thomas (*) Fairfax in the New Model Army, which represented the Roundhead side and won against the Cavaliers at the Battle of Naseby.'
p3936
aS'He became head of the Barebones Parliament after the execution of Charles I.'
p3937
aS'For ten points, identify this man who became Lord Protector after winning the English Civil War.'
p3938
aS'He created a system of military rule by major generals, and his French alliance ended up giving his country Dunkirk.'
p3939
aS'This ruler, whose death was called for in the pamphlet "Killing no Murder", was given his highest position by a document drafted by James Lambert and based partly on the "Heads of Proposals".'
p3940
aS'This leader passed the Penal Laws during a campaign in which he gave no quarter to the defeated garrison of (*) Drogheda; that campaign was his invasion of Ireland.'
p3941
aS'He carried out a purge of the Rump Parliament to create the Barebones Parliament.'
p3942
aS'This leader was disinterred and posthumously beheaded for his part in a war during which he served under Lord Fairfax.'
p3943
aS'His son was so incompetent that Parliament voted to restore Charles II.'
p3944
aS'For 10  points, name this Puritan general of the New Model Army and Lord Protector of the Commonwealth of England.'
p3945
aS'In one speech, this man shouted, "In the name of God, go!", then called the Speaker\'s Mace a "fool\'s bauble", before expelling Henry Vane.'
p3946
aS'The Humble Petition and Advice was offered to this member of the "Grandees." The forces of this victor at the Battle of Worcester killed 3,500 people in a massacre at Drogheda.'
p3947
aS'Succeeded by his incompetent son Richard, this leader set up the Barebones Parliament after dismissing the Rump Parliament.'
p3948
aS'This ruler is despised for his 1649 invasion of Ireland, three years after he won the Battle of Naseby over Royalist forces.'
p3949
aS'For 10 points, name this leader of the New Model Army who became Lord Protector after winning the English Civil War.'
p3950
aS'He chaired the Putney debates where he supported Henry Ireton over groups which issued manifestos such as the Agreement of the People and Case of the Armie.'
p3951
aS'Penruddocks uprising occurred during this mans reign, and his campaign in Ireland also saw massacres at Drogheda and Wexford.'
p3952
aS'This man was given his most famous post through the Instrument of Government, and William Lenthall was the speaker of the first parliament during this mans reign.'
p3953
aS'He acquired the nickname Ironside at the Battle of Marsten Moor but he is better known for a victory at Naseby as a commander of the New Model Army.'
p3954
aS'For 10 points, identify this Lord Protector of England from 1653 to 1658.'
p3955
aS'This man argued that judges made decisions based on "felt necessities" in one text.'
p3956
aS'He declared that an intent to do harm was crucial in deciding libel cases in his pamphlet, "Privilege, Malice and Intent".'
p3957
aS'He wrote the majority opinion stating that Major League Baseball was exempt from the Sherman_Antitrust_Act.'
p3958
aS'A criticism of one of his opinions by Zechariah Chafee may have inspired him to dissent in a related case about a (*) pamphlet published in Yiddish, the Abrams v. US case.'
p3959
aS'He infamously declared that "three generations of imbeciles are enough" in his majority opinion in Buck v. Bell and also wrote for the majority in Debs v. US.'
p3960
aS'For 10 points, name this Supreme Court justice who wrote about shouting fire in a crowded theatre in the Schenck case.'
p3961
aS'They may have been the oldest ballgame players in the Western hemisphere, and are thought to have invented the zero way before the Indians did.'
p3962
aS'The name under which we know them is derived from the Aztec word for rubber people, referring to their and their descendants extracting of latex from trees.'
p3963
aS'Located roughly in what nowadays are the states of Tabasco and Veracruz, their culture flourished between 1200 and 400 BC, and served as basis for many of the middle-American pre-Columbian cultures, such as the Mayan.'
p3964
aS'The great pyramid in La Venta is attributed to them, as well as amazingly refined jade artwork.'
p3965
aS'FTP, who are these people, most famous for their colossal head statues'
p3966
aS'One side of these conflicts used the steam-warship Nemesis to great effect.'
p3967
aS'The authority of trials conducted by Charles Elliot was one issue in these conflicts; another was an outflow of silver from the invaded party.'
p3968
aS'The seizure of the pirate ship Arrow began the second of these wars.'
p3969
aS'The first "unequal treaty" resolved one of these conflicts after threats to bombard Nanking.'
p3970
aS'Lin Zexu [ze-SHOO] wrote an open letter to Queen Victoria about stamping out a popular vice prior to, for 10 points, which conflicts in which the United Kingdom fought over the Canton trade system in China and the smuggling of an addictive drug'
p3971
aS'The first of them saw the first of the so-called Unequal Treaties.'
p3972
aS'The second was joined by the French, who used the excuse of the murder of one of their missionaries.'
p3973
aS'The first was officially concluded with the Treaty of Bogue, and the second was known as the "Arrow" War because it began with the storming of the H.M.S Arrow.'
p3974
aS'That second one ended with the treaties of Tientsin, which were more decisive than the original treaty of Nanking.'
p3975
aS'FTP, name these mid-19th century trading wars fought between European nations and China.'
p3976
aS'pretentious) They are famed for their garra, or guts, which was never more on display than when they silenced 200 thousand hometown fans at Maracana Stadium by upsetting Brazil to claim the 1950 World Cup.'
p3977
aS'Known as Le Celeste for their skyblue jerseys, their al time leader in caps and goals is Diego Forlan.'
p3978
aS'For ten points, name this South American nation that in 1930 won the first World Cup.'
p3979
aS'VETO 2013  Pack by Michael R. Whitaker, Steph Wilson, Rob Freeman, Trevor Alexander'
p3980
aS"One leader of this polity died after being defeated by Jose Castelo Branco's forces at Tacuarembo, though that leader had earlier won a decisive victory in the Battle of Las Piedras."
p3981
aS'This polity saw a group of thirty-three men led by Antonio Lavalleja declare it to be part of the southern United Provinces, and it was previously annexed by its northern neighbor into the Cisplatine Province.'
p3982
aS'Colonia del Sacramento was the first major city founded in this country, which was led by Jose de Artigas.'
p3983
aS'This country gained independence through an 1828 treaty brokered by Britain, after which it saw a war between factions led by Fructuoso Rivera and Manuel Oribe.'
p3984
aS'For 10 points, identify this South American country which saw intermittent conflicts between the Blancos and Colorados and was originally named the Banda Oriental. '
p3985
aS'In the late 19th century, this country saw a civil war known as the Revolution of the Lances, and its 20th century history saw the rise of the Battlista party, founded by Jose Battle y Ordonez.'
p3986
aS"This country's independence was achieved as the result of the efforts of the Blandengues, led by Jose Artigas."
p3987
aS'Following indedpendence, this country saw a "Great War," a power struggle between supporters of Jose Rivera and Manuel Oribe known as the Colorados and the Blancos, respectively, and together with Argentina and Brazil, this nation formed the Triple Alliance that battled Paraguay in the war of the same name.'
p3988
aS'First explored by Juan Diaz de Solis and originally known as the Banda Oriental, for ten points, identify this South American country with capital at Montevideo.'
p3989
aS'This man was the first to institute retirement and disability benefits.'
p3990
aS'This man instituted the May Laws as part of his anti-Catholic program, kulturkampf (KOOL-toor-kahmf).'
p3991
aS'He manipulated the Schleswig-Holstein (SHLESS-vig HOLE-styne) question into war with Austria and doctored the Ems Telegram to instigate an 1870 war with France.'
p3992
aS'For 10 points, name this "Iron Chancellor" of Prussia and Germany from 1862 to 1890.'
p3993
aS"Freemasonry was blamed for one of this man's policies in the encyclical Etsi multa."
p3994
aS'He took money involving the newly-formed Guelph Legion into a "reptile fund" with which he bribed newspapers.'
p3995
aS'As prime minister, he convinced a neighboring nation, represented by the rather willing Count Blome.'
p3996
aS'to sign the Gastein Convention, and he negotiated the League of the Three Emperors.'
p3997
aS"When the terms of the Gastein Convention were violated, a conflict including the Battle of Kniggrtz, the Seven Weeks' War, resulted."
p3998
aS"One of this man's policies was enacted by the Kanzelparagraph and Adalbert Falk's May Laws; that attempt to reduce Catholic influence was the Kulturkampf, while he released out the Ems dispatch to provoke the Franco-Prussian_War."
p3999
aS'For 10 points, name this "Iron Chancellor" who helped unite Germany serving emperors like Wilhelm I.'
p4000
aS'One of the military commanders under his administration wrote Holland and Belgium in their Mutual Relations.'
p4001
aS'He appointed Adalbert Falk to be Minister of Education during one of his domestic programs, which was opposed by the Zentrum party.'
p4002
aS'He was more strenuously opposed by Eduard Kullman, who tried to assassinate him after he issued the May Laws.'
p4003
aS'He used a dispute over the succession to the Spanish throne to alter the Ems telegram, and he fought the influence of Catholicism in the kulturkampf.'
p4004
aS'For 10 points, name this engineer of the Franco-Prussian_War and first Chancellor of Germany.'
p4005
aS'man made a speech claiming "the great questions of the times will not be resolved by speeches and majority decidisions.'
p4006
aS'" A battleship named for him joined the Prince Eugen to sink the HMS Hood, after which the British Navy pursued it until they sank it.'
p4007
aS'He appointed Adalbart Falk to pass laws against Catholics called the May Laws.'
p4008
aS'His country joined Austro-Hungary in the Dual Alliance, which became the Triple Alliance once Italy joined.'
p4009
aS'The Franco-Prussian war started in part because this man edited the Ems Dispatch.'
p4010
aS'For 10 points, name this leader of Germany and proponent of Kulturkampf colloquially called the "Iron Chancellor.'
p4011
aS'"'
aS"In its early stages, this empire conquered Serbia at the Battle of Kosovo, and this empire's existence was officially ended by the Treaty of Lausanne."
p4012
aS'Later, it would undergo the Tulip Period and the Tanzimat reforms.'
p4013
aS'It won at the Battle of Mohacs but was later defeated by the Holy League at (*) Lepanto, and by Jan Sobieski at Vienna.'
p4014
aS'Skanderbeg and Alexander Ypsilantis both led rebellions against this empire, which modernized its army in the "Auspicious Incident." Leaders of this empire include ones nicknamed "the Thunderbolt," "the Grim," and "the Magnificent." For ten points, name this "sick man of Europe," once ruled by Suleiman, that conquered Constantinople in 1453 and was succeeded by modern-day Turkey.'
p4015
aS'This polity refused to carry out the recommendations of a conference it hosted ending in 1877, and as a result nobody supported it in a war against Russia that soon followed.'
p4016
aS'Much earlier, in 1718, it regained the Peloponnesus in the Treaty of Passarowitz after defeating Venice, though it ceded land to the Habsburgs in the same treaty.'
p4017
aS'It also won the Battle of Ridaniya, ending the Mamluk sultanate and gaining control of Egypt for Selim the First.'
p4018
aS'Its weakness showed by the late 19th century during the Herzegovina Rebellion and April Uprising in Bulgaria, and it eventually was nicknamed "the sick man." Name this polity that grew during the fifteenth century under the leadership of Mehmed II and was also headed by Suleiman_the_Magnificent.'
p4019
aS'Boris Sheremetev angered this polity by attempting to bring Dimitrie Cantemir to power in one of its territories, leading to the battle of Stanilesti, in which this polity prevailed.'
p4020
aS'Archduke Maximilian was defeated by this polity at Keresztes in a conflict that ended with the treaty of Zsitvatorok.'
p4021
aS"That conflict pitted Rudolf II and Michael the Brave against this polity, and is alternately called the Thirteen Years' War and the Long War."
p4022
aS"Istvan Dobo broke the Siege of Eger conducted by this polity, ending Hungary's Little War with it."
p4023
aS'This polity was the aggressor in a battle that killed Louis II of Hungary, and soldiers of this polity gave the title "Lion of Lechistan" to Jan III Sobieski for repeatedly stopping them.'
p4024
aS'This empire also besieged the Knights Hospitalier on Rhodes in 1565.'
p4025
aS'For 10 points, name this aggressor polity in the Battle of Mohacs, the Siege of Vienna, and the Battle_of_Lepanto.'
p4026
aS'This polity entered one war after it gave safe harbor to warships during the Breslau incident.'
p4027
aS"This polity's army forced the surrender of a British army during the Siege of Kut."
p4028
aS'This polity passed the controversial Tehcir Law of 1915, which authorized the deportation of certain minority populations.'
p4029
aS"This polity's constitution of 1876 was in effect for only two years, after which its author (*) Ahmed Midhat was executed."
p4030
aS"Such was the end of this polity's Tanzimat Era of reforms."
p4031
aS'Late in its existence, this polity was effectively ruled by Enver Pasha, whose policies have been called genocide against the Armenians.'
p4032
aS'For ten points, name this empire based at Istanbul.'
p4033
aS'The founders of this polity traced their descent from the Kayi tribe.'
p4034
aS'The Candar family of nobles was influential during the early years of this polity.'
p4035
aS'The second ruler of this polity appointed his younger brother Alaeddin as his chief minister, won the Battle of Pekekanon, and gave this polity its first seaport by capturing the city of Mudanya.'
p4036
aS"At its establishment, this polity's armed forces consisted primarily of (*) Ghazi raiders."
p4037
aS"This polity's capital was moved to Bursa during the rule of Orhan I, who was the son of this polity's founder, Osman."
p4038
aS'For ten points, name this Anatolian empire that eventually conquered Constantinople.'
p4039
aS'One ruler from this empire was captured and paraded in an iron cage.'
p4040
aS'Its victories led to land redistribution to Sipahi and Timariot cavalry under the Timar system.'
p4041
aS"An entrance to this empire's government buildings was the Sublime Porte."
p4042
aS"Although it failed to capture Diu, this empire conquered Egypt with Admiral Piri Reis' help."
p4043
aS"This empire's victory at Mohacs under Suleiman the Great was offset by a defeat at Lepanto by the Holy League."
p4044
aS'It recruited young Christians to fight as Janissaries.'
p4045
aS'For 10 points, name this empire which ended its European expansion after failed sieges of Vienna, founded by Osman I, that ruled the Mediterranean and became the nation of Turkey after WWI.'
p4046
aS"This party's 1988 presidential nominee Manuel Clouthier died in a mysterious car crash."
p4047
aS'This party was founded by one of the "Seven Sages," Manuel Gomez Morin.'
p4048
aS'In 2010, a former presidental candidate of this party, Diego Fernandez de Cevallos, was abducted and ransomed for thirty million dollars.'
p4049
aS'This party took power in coalition with the Ecological Green Party on the Alliance for Change platform, which elevated a former (*) Coca-Cola executive to the presidency.'
p4050
aS'For 10 points, name this party of Felipe Calderon and Vicente Fox, which in 2000 ended decades of PRI rule in Mexico.'
p4051
aS"[AR] Milton Freidman suggests that the economic Depression sparked by this event is the only one comparable in scope and severity to the Great Depression of the 1930's."
p4052
aS'In New York alone 250,000 businesses failed in one three-week period during this event.'
p4053
aS'The reckless credit policies of wildcat banks, coupled with the speculative fever for Western lands and the veto to renew the charter of the Second Bank of the U.S caused a massive increase in levels of paper currency in the market and an unstable economic situation.'
p4054
aS'Instability turned to crisis soon after the issuing of the Specie_Circular during the Jackson Administration, and subsequently banks could no longer exchange paper currency for gold and silver coinage.'
p4055
aS'For 10 points, name this major bank crisis that led to depression that occurred during the first year of the administration of Martin_Van_Buren.'
p4056
aS'One incident during this event saw New Yorkers break into stores to steal barrels of grain.'
p4057
aS'That incident was called the "Flour Riot.'
p4058
aS'" Poor farm conditions in Britain led up to this event, which included a 75 percent drop in the price of cotton.'
p4059
aS'It was instigated by an act issued by Levi Woodbury in an attempt to slow inflation and land speculation by requiring the purchase of land in gold or silver.'
p4060
aS'The granting of surplus government funds to pet banks may have contributed to this event along with that act, the Specie_Circular.'
p4061
aS'For 10 points, name this financial crisis that occurred during the presidency of Martin van Buren.'
p4062
aS"The chairman of this country's Communist Party was dismembered with a chainsaw while its military dictator listened on the phone, and a different military dictator of this country ordered his 70-year-old mother flogged in public after he learned he'd been born out of wedlock."
p4063
aS"Following civil unrest between tenant farmers and landowners and an extra-constitutional action in this country's senate, Fernando Lugo was overthrown as president of this country in 2012."
p4064
aS'The most vilified leader of this country was a paramour of Eliza Lynch who shouted "I die with my nation!"'
p4065
aS'at the Battle of Cero Cora.'
p4066
aS"The likely victory of Horacio Cartes in this country's upcoming presidential election would return power to the major 20th century party in this nation, once led by Alfredo_Stroessner."
p4067
aS'For 10 points, name this South American country which Francisco Solano Lopez led into the War of the Triple Alliance, with capital Asuncion.'
p4068
aS'In 1970 a former prostitute was disinterred and brought from Paris to be buried in this country, where she had left a hundred years before after digging the grave of one of its greatest criminals who was himself disinterred and buried in its Pantheon of Heroes by President Rafael Franco in 1936.'
p4069
aS'This latter was done to celebrate the military legacy of this country the country in the aftermath of a war it had fought to a stalement the year before of which Franco was a veteran serving under Marshal Jos Flix Estigarribia, and Estigarribia now also rests in the Pantheon alongside Francisco Solano Lopez, like him a former dictator who fought in an unsuccessful war.'
p4070
aS'For 10 points name this country, where the "hero of the Chaco_War" and where Alfredo_Stroessner interred Eliza Lynch a hundred years after she buried Lopez after the death in the Chaco_War, with all three graves located in Asuncion.'
p4071
aS'One ruler of this nation came to power following the February Revolution, and after passing Decree Law No.'
p4072
aS'152 was overthrown by the military, who installed General Estegarribia.'
p4073
aS'Higinio Morinigo ruled this nation during World_War_II, after which he allied himself with the Red Script paramilitary group.'
p4074
aS'Colonel Rafael Franco helped install another dictator in this country, which was later ruled by a man who was in turn overthrown by Andres (*) Rodriquez.'
p4075
aS"Another famous ruler of this nation was killed at the Battle of Cerro Corra at the end of the War of the Triple Alliance, which saw vast portions of this country's population perish."
p4076
aS'FTP, name this country ruled by Francisco Solano Lopez in the 1800s and Alfredo_Stroessner in the 20th century, a South American nation whose capital is Asuncion.'
p4077
aS'Ragnar Lodbrok decided not to destroy this place in 845 after a king paid a ransom, and the Holy Roman Emperor moved the capital of his empire from this place to Aachen in 768.'
p4078
aS'A provost of this location led a revolt of merchants and put forth an edict of reform in 1357, but John the Good refused to put it into effect.'
p4079
aS'Counts of this place include Beggo and Adalard, and the head of its police force led a massacre of nearly 30,000 Algerians in 1962.'
p4080
aS"The St. Bartholomew's Day Massacre it took place in this city, while taxis from this city helped stave off the Germans in the First Battle of the Marne."
p4081
aS'FTP, name this city, the location of several treaties such as those ending the French and Indian War and the American Revolution.'
p4082
aS'The explorer Zhang Qian referred to this region as Anxi, and this empire sent the Buddhist monk An Shih Kao to Luoyang.'
p4083
aS'A namesake history of it was written in 1893 by George Rawlinson.'
p4084
aS'An attempt to declare independence from this polity was made by the conqueror Gondophares, and in the process he displaced the northern Saka people.'
p4085
aS'It met its downfall with the defeat of Vologases V, and this empire had been founded when the satrap Andragoras was overthrown by Arsaces I.'
p4086
aS'Their mounted archers use of a reverse shot allowed Surena to win a key victory for this kingdom over Marcus_Licinius_Crassus at the Battle of Carrhae.'
p4087
aS'Lead at its height by Mithridates the Great, FTP, name this empire that ruled Iran and its surroundings between the 3rd century BC and the 4th century AD.'
p4088
aS"The capital of Turkmenistan is named for the founder of this kingdom's ruling dynasty."
p4089
aS'They came to power after overthrowing the ruler of their eponymous satrapy, who had recently declared his independence from the Seleucid Empire.'
p4090
aS'Soon thereafter, they proceeded to conquer Seleucid Persia and Mesopotamia, founding their capital, Ctesiphon, across the Tigris from it.'
p4091
aS"Today, they are known for their horsemen's tactics of firing arrows backwards at enemy infantry formations."
p4092
aS'FTP identify this Persian dynasty that defeated Crassus at Carrhae largely by using that eponymous tactic.'
p4093
aS'By one of its provisions the French fortifications of Dunkirk were to be razed, while another gave Charles VI all the land that he coveted on the right bank of the Rhine.'
p4094
aS'Another commercial part returned Savoy and Nice to Victor Amadeus II, and by the terms of the Asiento, Britain gained a virtual hegemony over the slave trade in the New World.'
p4095
aS'Its three major portions were the Third Barrier Treaty, the Treaty of Baden, and The Treaty of Rastat.'
p4096
aS'FTP, identify the name given to this series of treaties that, by 1715, ended the War_of_the_Spanish_Succession.'
p4097
aS'Due to the animosities between the Holy Roman Emperor and the French Monarch, this treaty could not take effect until the completion of additional negotiations in Madrid, Baden, and Rastatt.'
p4098
aS'Charles VI was recognized as ruler of Milan, Tuscany, Belgium, Sardinia, and Naples.'
p4099
aS'Meanwhile Victor Amadeus II of Savoy was recognized King of Sicily and Frederick I was named King of Prussia, while the French obtained Alsace and agreed to stop supporting the heirs of James II.'
p4100
aS'FTP, identify this collection of Treaties recognizing Philip V, which ended the War_of_the_Spanish_Succession.'
p4101
aS'One non-territorial concession of this agreement was the transfer of the Asiento to the power that also received undivided control over St. Kitts.'
p4102
aS'Another power had its control over the land between the Amazon and Oyapock rivers recognized by the power that also returned to it Colonia del Sacramento, a territory in Uruguay.'
p4103
aS'France agreed to destroy its fortifications at Dunkirk while Victor Amadeus II became king of Sicily and Nice.'
p4104
aS'The host country was told by the French delegate that that negotiations would be held "about you, in your country, without you," and indeed the host nation received little more than the Barrier Treaties.'
p4105
aS'Britain suzerainty over the Iroquois was recognized, and gained territories that increased the holdings of the Hudson Bay Company from France, who agreed to recognize the legitimacy of Queen Anne.'
p4106
aS'For 10 points, identify this series of treaties that concluded the War_of_the_Spanish_Succession.'
p4107
aS'John Wilkes once mockingly referred to it with a reference to Philippians 4:7, as according to him it passes all understanding.'
p4108
aS'Representatives included John Robinson and Thomas Wentworth, and temporary results included Savoy receiving the crown of Sicily and France recovering what are now Prince Edward Island and Cape Breton Island.'
p4109
aS'In addition to Saint Kitts and Nova Scotia, Britain acquired Minorca and Gibraltar.'
p4110
aS'Ending what was called Queen Annes War in the colonies, and associated with the Treaties of Madrid, Baden and Rastatt, FTP, name this treaty that put the Duke of Anjou on the Spanish Throne, ending the War of Spanish Succession.'
p4111
aS'During one of these events, Nicolaas Zannekin captured the Count of Flanders.'
p4112
aS'The League of Huttwil instigated one of these events in Switzerland and one in Germany was fought by the Swabian League.'
p4113
aS'Saxon rebels sought hunting rights during one of these actions.The leader of one of these events was killed during negotiations after storming the Tower of London.'
p4114
aS"That event was triggered by King Richard II's poll taxes and led by John Ball and Wat Tyler."
p4115
aS'For 10 points, identify these events in which poor, working people rise up against their overlords.'
p4116
aS'This event was triggered after Robert Belknap was attacked at Brentwood.'
p4117
aS'The passage of the Statute of Labourers led to this event, during which Robert Hales and Simon of Sudbury were executed.'
p4118
aS'One side in this event was assisted by Jack Straw and John Ball, and during this event, the palace of (*) John of Gaunt was destroyed.'
p4119
aS'The leader of this event was tricked into a meeting at Miles End, where he was murdered by John Cavendish and William Walworth, the mayor of London.'
p4120
aS'This event was caused by a poll tax levied by Richard II.'
p4121
aS'For ten points, identify this English revolt of 1381 which was led by Wat Tyler.'
p4122
aS'Henry le Despensers defeat of a group led by John Litster led to the conclusion of this event, which also resulted in the revocation of the Mile End grants.'
p4123
aS'The confiscation of all church property and the restoration of the Charter of Winchester was not agreed to at Smithfield, after which its leader was wounded in a fight with William Walworth, the mayor of London.'
p4124
aS'The passing of the Statute of Labourers helped start this event, which was quashed by the lords and knights of Richard II.'
p4125
aS'Jack Straw and John Ball took part in, FTP, which 1381 rebellion concerning an unpopular poll tax and also led by Wat Tyler'
p4126
aS'This movement was not put down until Henry le Despenser defeated John Litsters army, long after it had targeted Fleet prison and Savoy palace.'
p4127
aS'Some of its instigators grievances about the Statute of Laborers, but it executed Robert Hales and Simon of Sudbury for administering the one-shilling fee that nominally sparked it.'
p4128
aS'Shortly after it rose out of Essex and Kent to challenge Richard II, its leader was killed in a scuffle with William Walworth, the mayor of London.'
p4129
aS'For ten points, name this campaign against the poll tax of 1380 led by Wat Tyler.'
p4130
aS'Minor figures involved in this event include William Cadington and John Barbour, who were supporters of William Grindecobbe.'
p4131
aS'Richard of Wallingford unsuccessfully attempted to mediate this event, which saw John Litster defeated by Henry Dispenser.'
p4132
aS'Clergymen involved in this event include Jack Straw and John Ball, as well as Simon of Sudbury.'
p4133
aS'Three groats was the value of a poll tax that may have sparked this event, which saw the destruction of the Savoy Palace of John of Gaunt and the beheading of the Archbishop of Canterbury.'
p4134
aS"This event ended with a meeting between the parties at Smithfield, during which the King's bodyguards treacherously killed this event's leader."
p4135
aS'For ten points, name this rebellion against Richard II, which saw Wat Tyler lead a force of rural farmers.'
p4136
aS'One participant in this event supposedly ordered the killing of Simon Sudbury.'
p4137
aS'A more notable leader of this event was killed by Mayor William Walworth during an encounter in Smithfield.'
p4138
aS'Among its causes was an unpopular bill suppressing the wages of workers, passed in the aftermath of the Black Death.'
p4139
aS'John Ball and Jack Straw were two participants in this event aimed at an unpopular (*) poll tax levied by John of Gaunt, the regent for Richard II.'
p4140
aS'For 10 points, name this English uprising of 1381.'
p4141
aS'One participant in this event supposedly ordered the killing of Simon Sudbury.'
p4142
aS'A more notable leader of this event was killed by Mayor William Walworth during an encounter in Smithfield.'
p4143
aS'Among its causes was an unpopular bill suppressing the wages of workers, passed in the aftermath of the Black Death.'
p4144
aS'John Ball and Jack Straw were two participants in this event aimed at an unpopular poll tax levied by John of Gaunt, the regent for Richard II.'
p4145
aS'For 10 points, name this English uprising of 1381.'
p4146
aS'During the Trojan War, the Greeks brought his bones to Troy because of a prophecy that only by doing so could they conquer the city.'
p4147
aS'The grandson of Zeus and son of Tantalus, he was cut up, stewed, and served to the gods.'
p4148
aS'He was saved and re-assembled except for his shoulder, which had been partially eaten by Demeter, and which was replaced with a shoulder of pure ivory.'
p4149
aS'FTP, name this king, whose name was given to the southern area of Greece containing the cities of Sparta and Olympia.'
p4150
aS'This state\'s Whig and Democratic parties clashed in the ""Buckshot War.'
p4151
aS'"" A strike in this state led to the Lattimore Massacre.'
p4152
aS'A plant in this state experienced a partial core meltdown in the Three Mile Island accident.'
p4153
aS'""Lighthorse Harry"" Lee led troops into this state\'s west to end the Whiskey_Rebellion.'
p4154
aS'It was the location of the Battle of Brandywine and was founded by a namesake Quaker.'
p4155
aS'For 10 points, name this U.S. state whose capital houses Independence Hall and the Liberty Bell.'
p4156
aS'Three years earlier, deputy governor Roger Ludlow received gifts and formed a treaty with the eponymous group after the death of John Stone, but the treaty was not ratified.'
p4157
aS'A year before this event, Jonathan Brewsters announcement of information from Uncas led to a conference at Fort Saybrook.'
p4158
aS"The complete destruction of the namesake tribe's village of Mystic led to victory for the colonists, led by John Mason, who had allied with Uncas Mohegans as well as Miantomonos Narragansetts, and this war was ended by the Treaty of Hartford."
p4159
aS'FTP, name this early British-American colonial war in 1637 Connecticut.'
p4160
aS'The origins of this event include the death of John Stone, a smuggler and privateer, and the later killing of merchant John Oldham.'
p4161
aS'The latter death prompted Governor Henry Vane of the to send a force led by John Endecott to Block Island, where Endecott and his men attacked and burned a Niantic village to the ground.'
p4162
aS"A winter siege of Fort Saybrook and raids on local towns by this conflict's namesake led the Connecticut Colony to raise a force consisting of 90 militia and 70 Mohegans."
p4163
aS'Masons force conducted the Mystic Massacre in, for 10 points, what 1636-1637 war in which Plymouth and Massachusetts Bay colonies pretty much exterminated the namesake tribe'
p4164
aS"This man's wedding was interrupted by an army led by Agenor, and he exchanged kingdoms with Megapenthes in order to reign in Tiryns."
p4165
aS'Raised on the island of Seriphos, this figure was once asked to contribute a horse by a man who actually had no intention to marry Hippodameia.'
p4166
aS'He accidentally killed his grandfather with a discus; that man, King Acrisius, had earlier put him in a chest that was set adrift and was eventually found by the fisherman Dictys.'
p4167
aS'This son of Zeus and Danae saved Andromeda from a sea monster while on his way home from a quest in which he used a mirror-like shield to behead a figure with serpents for hair.'
p4168
aS'For 10 points, name this hero who slew Medusa.'
p4169
aS'Max Uhle was responsible for finding the remains of three cultures at one site in this country, the oldest culture of which was given its name by Julio Tello.'
p4170
aS'One ancient culture located in this modern country had a namesake Monumental style of ceramics that included designs with natural settings.'
p4171
aS'That culture in this country was also responsible for creating a series of images called Lines near Palpa that are well-known geoglyphs.'
p4172
aS"The oldest depiction of the Staff God was found in this country's Norte Chico region, and this country was also home to the Moche, Chimu, and Nazca."
p4173
aS'For 10 points, name this modern South American country that holds the one-time capital of an empire started by Manco Capac at Cuzco.'
p4174
aS"President Alberto Fujimori crushed the Maoist Shining Path guerrillas in, for 10 points, what South American country, where Fujimori's corrupt role caused him to flee in 2000 to his ancestral home of Japan"
p4175
aS'A political party in this country was supported by drug trafficker Carlos Langberg in a 1980 election in which that party was split between supporters of Armando Villanueva and Andres Townsend.'
p4176
aS"A socialist party was started in this country by Jose Carlos Mariategui after he broke with Victor Raul Haya de la Torre's APRA party."
p4177
aS'A president of this country was brought down after Channel N aired the first of the vladivideos, which showed a bribe being given to Alberto Kouri by national intelligence service chief Vladimiro Montesinos.'
p4178
aS'A Communist group in this country was led by Abimael Guzman, who was called Presidente Gonzalo while leading the Shining Path.'
p4179
aS'For 10 points, name this South American country led in the 1990s by its president Alberto Fujimori.'
p4180
aS"Eloy Burga's return to this nation sparked conflict with the Pizarro-Rubia casta, partially caused by the discontent Antero Aspillaga, who was cast down by the Partido Civil in favor of Guillermo Billinghurst."
p4181
aS"Billinghurst was in turn overthrown by the coup of Manuel Prado and Oscar Benavides, and major political parties in this nation's history include the AP of Fernando Belaunde Terry and Victor Raul Haya de la Torre's APRA."
p4182
aS'This nation was home to the La Cantuta Massacre under a leader who also instituted anti-terrorist policies against the followers of a man calling himself President Gonzalo.'
p4183
aS'For 10 points, name this country, home to the human rights abuses of both the Shining Path and Alberto Fujimori.'
p4184
aS'This ruler saw a number of his family members murdered during an army rebellion that, with a later rebellion by the same group, may have influenced him to disband that army, the streltsy.'
p4185
aS"This man worked as a ship's carpenter in the Netherlands during his journey west in the Grand Embassy."
p4186
aS"One method this leader used to force changes on his country's boyars was through a beard tax."
p4187
aS'This ruler built a ""window to the west"" on the Neva River called St. Petersburg.'
p4188
aS'For 10 points, name this westernizing tsar of Russia.'
p4189
aS'Those who obeyed this law wore medals that read ""paid.'
p4190
aS'"" Old Believers openly abided by this law, which was an attack on perceived symbols of backwardness and non-European attitudes.'
p4191
aS'This westernizing law was a part of reforms that also included the Table of Ranks and adoption of the Julian Calendar.'
p4192
aS'For 10 points, name this type of excise levied by Peter_the_Great against facial hair.'
p4193
aS"Its aftermath saw Lords Sidmouth and Liverpool push through Parliament the so-called Six Acts, which included a measure requiring a sheriff's permission to hold public meetings of over fifty people."
p4194
aS'Two year-old William Fildes was among the eleven killed as divisions of yeomanry and hussars cut through a crowd of 60,000 to arrest Henry "Orator" Hunt and various leaders of the Manchester Patriotic Union Society.'
p4195
aS"FTP, identify this 1819 massacre which derives its name from the fact that it took place at St. Peter's Field four years after the Battle of Waterloo."
p4196
aS'The chairman of the bench of magistrates ordered the 15th Hussars and the Cheshire Volunteers to aid the yeomenry in this incident.'
p4197
aS'Resulting from an attempt of the citizenry to petition against the Corn Laws, about 60,000 people had attended the August meeting including many women and children and within a span of minutes over 500 were injured and 11 killed and Henry Hunt, the speaker at the rally, was jailed for two years.'
p4198
aS"FTP, name this 1819 incident that saw the attack on a rally against high food prices and for parliamentary reform, held on St. Peter's Field in Manchester."
p4199
aS'It was begun as meetings at Healds Green and Dog Inn.'
p4200
aS'A poem written as a reaction to it described Lord Eldon as Fraud, a follower of a creepy skeleton who tries to establish the reign of Anarchy.'
p4201
aS"Blanketeer veteran Hugh Birley's alcoholism helped precipitate it, and a spelling error caused chants of the unsettling God Armeth the patriot!"
p4202
aS"A major influence on the Chartists and a precursor to the passage of the Six Acts, the presence of John Carlile, Joseph Johnson, and Henry Hunt so unnerved William Hulton that he ordered Yeoman Cavalry to attack the speaker's platform."
p4203
aS"James Wroe's nickname referring to a Napoleonic battle was applied to, FTP, what 1819 massacre of English reformists in Manchester's St. Peter's Fields"
p4204
aS"William Hulton sent the orders to George L'Estrange that eventually led to this, and his choice of his second-in-command to carry this out may have made matters worse."
p4205
aS'John Knight was arrested for his presence here, even though he did not actually fulfill his purpose for attending before he was arrested by troops led by Hugh Birley, who might have been drunk.'
p4206
aS"This incident also led to the founding of what is now The Guardian newspaper, as well as inspired a poem that imputes Castlereagh with Murder and Lord Eldon with Fraud, Percy Shelley's The Masque of Anarchy."
p4207
aS'What was this event in which fifteen people were killed after cavalry charged into a rally led, for 10 points, by Henry Hunt for parliamentary reform, held in Manchester in 1819'
p4208
aS'People killed during this event include the Dawson Brothers.'
p4209
aS"Those blamed for this event include Hugh Hornby Birley, Guy L'Estrange, and Major Thomas Trafford."
p4210
aS'This event arose out of a meeting that William Hulton was unable to stop, even after he was warned by Lord (*) Sidmouth, the Home Secretary, that it would be illegal.'
p4211
aS'This event took place during the ministry of Lord Liverpool and it resulted in the repressive Six Acts.'
p4212
aS'Occurring during a speech by Henry Hunt, a radical orator, it saw a charge of hussars into a crowd.'
p4213
aS'For ten points, name this 1819 massacre in which British soldiers attacked and killed protestors, whose name is a Napoleonic pun.'
p4214
aS'In 1969, Richard_Nixon implemented a plan named after this city that mandated federal employment quotas for minorities.'
p4215
aS"The Paxton Boys marched in this city to protest the government's policy towards Native Americans."
p4216
aS"Ten percent of this city's residents died in a 1793 yellow fever epidemic."
p4217
aS'During the First Barbary War, a (*) ship named after this city was burned by Stephen Decatur.'
p4218
aS"This site of the First Bank of the United_States also housed the Second Continental Congress and the Constitutional Convention, both of which met in this city's Independence Hall."
p4219
aS'For ten points, name this "City of Brotherly Love" that is now the largest city in Pennsylvania.'
p4220
aS"This city's society of journeyman cordwainers were prosecuted in the first American court case concerning a labor strike."
p4221
aS"The first Working Men's Party was founded here in 1828."
p4222
aS"A mayor of this city agreed to take a polygraph test to prove he had not offered patronage jobs to Peter Camiel, though the test didn't go very well."
p4223
aS"Herman Schwarzmann designed the grounds of a World's Fair held here in 1876, the Centennial Exposition."
p4224
aS'In this city, Absalom Jones and Richard Allen founded the Free African Society, many of whose members later joined the African Methodist Church and were key in helping this city through a yellow fever epidemic here in 1793.'
p4225
aS'This city was the first temporary capital, and the site of the Second Continental Congress.'
p4226
aS'For 10 points, name this city home to Independence Hall and site of the Constitutional Convention.'
p4227
aS'This city saw police actions against a mostly African-American radical group led by John Africa, culminating in a gel bombing of their headquarters that burned over 60 nearby homes.'
p4228
aS"Besides the bombing of the MOVE group, this city is home to the New Year's Day festival called the Mummer's Parade."
p4229
aS"Policeman Daniel Faulkner's killing in this city led to a murder conviction for ex-Black Panther Mumia Abu-Jamal."
p4230
aS"Ed Rendell was mayor of this city before becoming his state's governor, and Michael Nutter is current mayor."
p4231
aS'FTP what city is better known for early history, like hosting the first two Continental Congresses'
p4232
aS'This leader was rebuffed by the Act of Abjuration and had William the Silent killed.'
p4233
aS'He had to expel the Moriscos from Grenada because of their namesake revolt.'
p4234
aS"The debt this man's country incurred from imported bullion led him to declare his country's first bankruptcy."
p4235
aS'He sent his half-brother, Don Juan of Austria, to end Ottoman domination of the Mediterranean at the Battle_of_Lepanto.'
p4236
aS"This man's greatest military operation failed because the Duke of Parma encountered storms en route to England."
p4237
aS'Elizabeth I routed his Spanish Armada.'
p4238
aS'For 10 points, name this son of Charles V, ruler of Spanish Empire at greatest extent.'
p4239
aS"This ruler's advisor Antonio Perez murdered Juan de Escobedo, the secretary of this ruler's half-brother."
p4240
aS'Maurice of Nassau began the Eighty Years War in the Netherlands as a revolt against this ruler.'
p4241
aS'This ruler, who commissioned the construction of the Escorial, sent his half-brother John of Austria to support the Holy League at the Battle of (*) Lepanto.'
p4242
aS'A group of ships sent by this ruler with the intention of transporting the army of the Duke of Parma was defeated by the fire ships of Francis Drake.'
p4243
aS'For 10 points, name this Spanish ruler who deployed an armada that was defeated by the English in 1588.'
p4244
aS"This ruler's reputation was damaged by the stories spread by his secretary, Antonio Perez."
p4245
aS'El Escorial, where he is buried, was built during his reign, which was marked by a flourishing of culture.'
p4246
aS'This son of Charles V married Mary I of England.'
p4247
aS'Though his country defeated the Ottomans at Lepanto, it lost to the English when its Armada was defeated.'
p4248
aS'For 10 points, name this Spanish king who is the namesake of a country whose capital is Manila.'
p4249
aS'This ruler\'s forces took part in a ""Fury"" named for his country that resulted in the massacre of 7,000 civilians during the sack of Antwerp.'
p4250
aS'This king had a site built for him that was finished by Juan de Herrera and located about thirty miles north of his capital.'
p4251
aS"This creator of the Escorial (ESS-core-ree-ALL) fought the start of the Eighty Years' War against William the Silent and the Netherlands."
p4252
aS"This man's plan to take over England was spoiled by the Protestant Wind."
p4253
aS'For 10 points, name this king of Spain who organized the Spanish Armada.'
p4254
aS'His father created him King of Chile, but his ambitions on France were renounced in the Peace of Vervins.'
p4255
aS'His approval of the murder of Juan de Escobedo is one factor in the Black Legend of his cruelty.'
p4256
aS'His successor was not produced until his final marriage, to Maximilian IIs daughter Anna of Austria.'
p4257
aS'Following the death of King Sebastian, he annexed Portugal, but his childless marriage to Mary I led to disaster in his English ambitions, culminating in the 1588 failure of the Armada.'
p4258
aS'For 10 points, name this builder of the Escorial and successor to Charles V as King of Spain.'
p4259
aS'Alonso de Vargas suppressed a rebellion against this man, which saw Juan de Lanuza beheaded afterward.'
p4260
aS"Antoine Perrenot de Granvelle was one of this man's main advisors, and he signed the treaty of Vervins with France."
p4261
aS"His secretary, Antonio Perez, was involved in the murder of Juan de Escobedo, the private secretary of this man's half brother."
p4262
aS'Alexander Farnese would help this man reconquer the southern Netherlands after the Duke of Alba had failed to subdue the Dutch revolt, and Don Juan of Austria would help him defeat the Ottomans at Lepanto.'
p4263
aS'A son of emperor Charles V, he would rule from the Escorial palace.'
p4264
aS'FTP, who was this Spanish king who saw the Spanish armada defeated'
p4265
aS'monarch emerged victorious at the Battle of Alcntara, but the Ottomans thwarted his attempt to reconquer Tripoli at the Battle of Djerba.'
p4266
aS'He finally produced an heir with his last spouse, Anne of Austria.'
p4267
aS'He sent his half-brother to command the fleet of the Holy League at the Battle_of_Lepanto.'
p4268
aS'This brother of Don Carlos of Austria signed the Peace of Vervins with Henry IV.'
p4269
aS'He annexed Portugal in 1581, and built the Escorial.'
p4270
aS'Thomas Wyatt led a rebellion after this son of Charles V married Mary Tudor.'
p4271
aS'For 10 points, name this king who attempted to conquer Britain in 1588 by sending the Spanish Armada.'
p4272
aS'A one-time mayor of Bridgeport, Connecticut, this man built the fanciful mansion "Iranistan" in the city.'
p4273
aS'He was a prime benefactor of Tufts University, which honored him with its choice of mascot.'
p4274
aS'In one of the buildings he operated, this man hung the sign "This Way to the Egress," which simply led people to the exit.'
p4275
aS'He paid a $1,000 a night to the "Swedish Nightingale," singer Jenny Lind, to tour across America.'
p4276
aS"After purchasing Scudder's American (*) Museum, this man purchased a creature with the head of a monkey and the tail of a fish."
p4277
aS'Besides showing off "General Tom Thumb" and the "Feejee mermaid," he is credited with introducing the phrase "There\'s a sucker born every minute."'
p4278
aS'For 10 points, name this famous hoaxer and circus showman.'
p4279
aS'At his request a newspaper published his obituary in advance so that he might enjoy public reaction.'
p4280
aS'He served as mayor of Bridgeport, the same city where he made his home in the oriental mansion Iranistan.'
p4281
aS"He first gained fame by purchasing Scudder's American Museum and displaying such curiosities as the Feejee mermaid, the dwarf Charles Stratton, and the Siamese twins Chang and Eng."
p4282
aS'But he is probably most famous for his championing of Jenny Lind and his partnership with James Bailey with whom he displayed an elephant named Jumbo.'
p4283
aS'FTP identify this American showman who popularized the circus as "the greatest show on earth.'
p4284
aS'"'
aS"A person with this name was the subject of Rolf Hochhuth's play The Deputy."
p4285
aS'That man was reportedly the target of a Karl Wolff kidnap plot, although some have argued that was merely British propaganda.'
p4286
aS'During a 1942 Christmas radio address, the leader with this name stated humanity owed a vow to the thousands "consigned to deathbecause of their nationality or race."'
p4287
aS'In 1864, a man with this name denounced modern relativism by issuing the (*) Syllabus of Errors.'
p4288
aS'That ninth man with this name became a "prisoner" after his city was captured by Victor Emmanuel II and also defined the dogma of the Immaculate Conception of the Virgin Mary.'
p4289
aS'For 10 points, name this name held by twelve popes, the most recent of which was criticized for remaining silent during the Holocaust.'
p4290
aS'One pope of this name had all German churches read an encyclical written in German rather than Latin; that encyclical by a pope of this name was Mit brennender Sorge.'
p4291
aS'Another pope of this name declared Rome an ""open city"" and was criticized as being the ""Pope of (+) Silence"" for his lack of action against the Holocaust.'
p4292
aS'The longest-reigning pope had this name; that pope wrote the Syllabus of (*) Errors and was responsible for the dogma of the Immaculate Conception.'
p4293
aS'For 10 points, give this papal name used by the twelfth, who reigned during World_War_II, and the ninth, who organized the First Vatican Council that decreed papal infallibility.'
p4294
aS'King Konrad I allied with the Teutonic_Knights to eliminate the pagans of this country.'
p4295
aS'One ruler of this country referred to as "the Elbow High" was the father of the man who extended royal protection to the Jews of this country.'
p4296
aS'That king\'s reign also began the period known as the "Golden Liberty" of this country.'
p4297
aS'Centuries before this country was occupied under Case White, it was ruled by Casimir the Great.'
p4298
aS'Another king united this country with Lithuania, and was the founder of its Jagiellon dynasty.'
p4299
aS'During the 19th century, this country was partitioned by its neighbors multiple times.'
p4300
aS'For 10 points, name this country where the giant pen-wielding Lech Walesa formed the Solidarity labor union as part of the protests in the Gdansk shipyards.'
p4301
aS'After Mieszko helped to unify the tribes, his son Boleslaw became the first king of this country in 1024.'
p4302
aS"This country's legal code was developed under Casimir, and Poniatowski created this country's Committee of National Education."
p4303
aS'This nation was partitioned in an agreement set up by Frederick_the_Great in 1772.'
p4304
aS'The German-Soviet pact divided this country, which was the first nation invaded by the Nazis in World_War_II.'
p4305
aS'For 10 points, name this Eastern European country, the site of Auschwitz and the Warsaw Uprising.'
p4306
aS'Early monarchs in this country had nicknames like "Spindleshanks," "Tanglefoot," and "Elbow-High," the last of whom was a member of the Piast dynasty.'
p4307
aS'An organization in this country negotiated with the government in the Round Table Talks.'
p4308
aS'This country was joined with an eastern neighbor in the Union of Lublin.'
p4309
aS'This country was led by a shipyard electrician who founded the Solidarity trade union.'
p4310
aS'For 10 points, name this home country of Lech Walesa, which was once united with Lithuania.'
p4311
aS'The Bar Confederation fought for the independence of this nation.'
p4312
aS"The thirteenth of the Fourteen Points called for this country's establishment and its access to the sea."
p4313
aS'The Piasts were one line of kings from this nation, which was home to a parliament called the Sejm (""SAME"").'
p4314
aS'This thrice-partitioned nation was the birthplace of Pope John Paul II.'
p4315
aS"For 10 points, name this country whose first post-communist president was Lech Walesa, who started the Solidarity union in this nation's Gdansk shipyards."
p4316
aS'In this country, the principle of Liberum Veto allowed any representative to end a session of the Sejm.'
p4317
aS'John III of this country brought miraculous reinforcements to relieve the Second Siege of Vienna.'
p4318
aS'This country united with Lithuania in the Union of Lublin.'
p4319
aS'In the late eighteenth century, Prussia, Russia, and Austria agreed to (*) carve territory out of this country, resulting in the three partitions of this country.'
p4320
aS'For 10 points, name this central European country containing such cities as Krakow and Warsaw.'
p4321
aS'This nation saw a massacre of its citizens at Volhynia.'
p4322
aS'After the rule of Edward Gierek, an agreement in this country led to the formation of an independent trade union led by a former electrician.'
p4323
aS'That trade union in this country was formed in Gdansk and called Solidarity.'
p4324
aS'An invasion of this country occurred one week after two other countries agreed to the (*) Molotov-Ribbentrop Pact.'
p4325
aS'For 10 points, name this nation whose 1939 invasion marked the start of World_War_II when it was attacked on both fronts by Germany and Russia.'
p4326
aS'While in this country, Willy Brandt spontaneously knelt down and cried in front of a memorial in the Warschauer Kniefall.'
p4327
aS'Marek Edelmann was the only surviving commander of an uprising in this country that was put down by Jurgen Stroop.'
p4328
aS"The thirteenth of Wilson's Fourteen Points called for the (*) creation of this country."
p4329
aS"The first independent trade union in the Soviet Union began in this country's Gdansk shipyards."
p4330
aS"This country's second president was an electrician who had led the Solidarity movement."
p4331
aS'This birth country of John Paul II was led by Lech Walesa [vah-WEN-sah].'
p4332
aS'For 10 points, name this country in which the Warsaw Ghetto uprising occurred.'
p4333
aS'It\'s not Greece, but during the 1920\'s and 30\'s this country was controlled by the "Regime of the Colonels", which rigged this country\'s 1930 Parliamentary election at the Brest trials.'
p4334
aS"During that period, this nation's armed forces were commanded by Edward Rydz-Smigly."
p4335
aS'After a series of successful mass demonstrations in 1956, this country was led by First Secretary (*) Gomulka, who was succeeded by Edward Gierek.'
p4336
aS"This country's only Nobel Peace Prize winner was an electrician at a shipyard before leading a strike against General Jaruzelski."
p4337
aS'For ten points, name this Eastern European country home to Solidarity, whose capital is Warsaw.'
p4338
aS'Plutarch contrasts this man with Agesilaus II and claims he told defenders of a city "Stop quoting laws to us.'
p4339
aS'We carry swords." His son Sextus held off Octavian and Antony\'s forces in Sicily until 36 BC.'
p4340
aS'This man received accolades for defeating (*) Mithridates VI.'
p4341
aS'The eunuch Pothinus convinced Ptolemy XIII to behead this man after battles at Dyrrhachium and Pharsalus forced him to flee to Egypt.'
p4342
aS'For 10 points, name this Roman general who fought Julius_Caesar in a civil war.'
p4343
aS'Cinna was killed upon rumors of involvement in the death of this man, who turned out to be alive and went on to retake North Africa on behalf of Sulla.'
p4344
aS"His ally Aulus Gabinius appointed him commander of an anti-pirate force, though this man's son (*) Sextus later became a pirate himself."
p4345
aS'This defeater of Tigranes and Mithridates was eventually killed in Egypt after fleeing Pharsalus.'
p4346
aS'For 10 points name this ally, then rival, of Caesar.'
p4347
aS'This man used the help of Metellus Pius to defeat the revolt of Sertorius in Spain.'
p4348
aS'The Lex Gabinia gave this man near-unlimited authority on the Mediterranean to fight Cilician pirates.'
p4349
aS"This victor at Dyrrhacium was the last Roman general to fight and defeat Pontus's king Mithridates."
p4350
aS'This man irked an ally by bragging and exaggerating his own small role in putting down Spartacus.'
p4351
aS'He was murdered on Egyptian sand after fleeing from his defeat at Pharsalus in 49 BCE.'
p4352
aS'For 10 points, name this man who joined Crassus and Julius_Caesar in the First Triumvirate.'
p4353
aS"This country's Minister of Defense sent bags of sausages to its army after misinterpreting a coded request for grenades."
p4354
aS"A coup occurred here shortly after William Waterlow was tricked into printing thousands of this country's bank notes."
p4355
aS'Zeca, a dissident folk singer from this country, composed the song "Grandola."'
p4356
aS"The Aginter Press trained fascist terrorists in this country's capital, where Rhodesia established an independent diplomatic mission under Harry Reedman."
p4357
aS'Opposition leader Humberto Delgado was murdered by its secret police, the PIDE.'
p4358
aS'Once ruled by Marcelo Caetano, this country lost former colonies like Goa and Angola during its Colonial Wars.'
p4359
aS"For 10 points, name this country where the Carnation Revolution toppled Antonio Salazar's Estado Novo."
p4360
aS'This country was once ruled by a man who wrote a horseback treatise titled The Art of Riding on Every Saddle.'
p4361
aS'One of its rulers had children known as the "Illustrious Generation," the sons of Philippa of Lancaster.'
p4362
aS'This country decisively defeated a combined Venetian, Ottoman, and Egyptian fleet at the Battle of Diu.'
p4363
aS'It effectively began its empire by conquering Ceuta from the Muslims, and it gave various people the title "Duke of (*) Goa."'
p4364
aS'Another nobleman in this country is said to have formed a school on the Sagres peninsula to teach explorers and map-makers.'
p4365
aS'With its eastern neighbor, it signed the Treaty_of_Tordesillas, and it employed such explorers as Pedro Cabral and Vasco da Gama.'
p4366
aS'For 10 points, name this modern day European country, once the home to Prince Henry_the_Navigator.'
p4367
aS'This country experienced an interregnum during a crisis that took place between 1383 and 1385.'
p4368
aS'As a result, the Aviz (ah-VEEZ) Dynasty was installed as its ruling house, and that dynasty later gave rise to the Braganza (bruh-GON-zuh) Dynasty.'
p4369
aS'The Carnation Revolution brought democracy to this country, overthrowing the Estado Novo of Antonio Salazar.'
p4370
aS'This country was home to Henry_the_Navigator, who supported its explorers, and later explorers from this country include Vasco da Gama.'
p4371
aS'For 10 points, name this country which colonized Brazil.'
p4372
aS'An explorer from this country succeeded after making several attempts to sail around Cape Bojador.'
p4373
aS'One explorer from this country became the first to round the Cape of Storms, which was later renamed the Cape of Good Hope by the king of this country.'
p4374
aS'Another explorer from this country became the first to sail directly from Europe to India.'
p4375
aS'The explorer Gil Eanes was funded by Prince Henry_the_Navigator of this country.'
p4376
aS'For 10 points, name this country, which financed the explorers Bartolomeu Dias and Vasco da Gama.'
p4377
aS"Its monarchy started in 1139, after Count Henry's son had himself crowned after the battle of Ourique."
p4378
aS'That monarchy ended in 1580 when the country was unified with its eastern neighbor, but in 1640 Cardinal Richelieu sponsored a revolution that put King John IV on the throne and started the Braganza dynasty, later continued by Emperor Pedro in South America.'
p4379
aS"England's longest-standing continental ally is, FTP, what elongated country that is useful for its proximity to its only land neighbor, Spain."
p4380
aS'One of this country\'s most important leaders put down "the tippler\'s revolt," and two of its earlier rulers were known as "the Peopler" and the "Farmer King.'
p4381
aS'" This country signed the Treaty of Methuen in 1703, which hampered its industry, and its scandals included the Tavora Conspiracy and a civil war known as the War of the Two Brothers or the Liberal War.'
p4382
aS'After victory in the Battle of Aljubarrota came the establishment of the Aviz Dynasty, while its later rulers would include the Queen Maria da Gloria.'
p4383
aS'The Estado Novo was brought to an end here in 1974, most associated with the long-time rule of Antonio Salazar.'
p4384
aS'Led by the Braganza family, FTP, identify this Iberian country with a capital at Lisbon.'
p4385
aS"The Genoese admiral Emmanuele Pesagno was responsible for the buildup of this country's navy under King Dinis."
p4386
aS'The first major dynasty in this country was established after the defeat of the Count of Ourem, and one king of that dynasty gained a sobriquet after victories at Alcacer Ceguer and Arzila, before avenging a defeat of his father, King Edward.'
p4387
aS"Philip Massinger's play Believe as You List treated the subject of the some four false versions of a monarch of this country that appeared after that monarch's army was slaughtered at Larache."
p4388
aS"Establishing bases in Goa, Malacca, and Hormuz, the end of this country's Aviz dynasty greatly weakened their colonial ambitions."
p4389
aS'For 10 points, name this country associated with explorers such as Da Gama and Prince Henry_the_Navigator.'
p4390
aS'A compulsory youth group in this nation had a uniform of green shirts and khaki pants.'
p4391
aS'Antonio de Spinolas book about this country and the Future helped spark a coup here led by the Armed Forces Movement, which then set up the Junta of National Salvation.'
p4392
aS'The PIDE secret police was active in this country during a period where its legislature included a Corporative Chamber.'
p4393
aS'Oscar Carmona became president of this nation after the 1926 revolution.'
p4394
aS'Marcello Caetanos government here followed that of a former economics professor, and was ended by the Carnation Revolution.'
p4395
aS'The Estado Nova was created here under the leadership of Antonio Salazar.'
p4396
aS'For 10 points, name this country earlier ruled by the Braganza family, like its former colony of Brazil.'
p4397
aS'One of its former dynasties featured such kings as Edward the Philosopher, John the Pious, and Alfonso the African.'
p4398
aS"That dynasty took power from the Afonsine Dynasty, this country's branch of the House of Burgundy, after the 1383-1385 Crisis."
p4399
aS'Power in this country was usurped by the Hapsburgs, when they seized the throne in 1580, but its independence was regained when John II led a rebellion in 1640.'
p4400
aS'The dynasty he founded supplanted the House of Aviz and was named Braganza, and its later rulers named Pedro would hold power in Brazil.'
p4401
aS'FTP, name this country, whose more famous leaders included King John I and Prince Henry_the_Navigator.'
p4402
aS'One insurrection in this polity was led by General Guedes and succeeded in temporarily overthrowing a female ruler.'
p4403
aS'An invasion of this polity planned by the villainous Prime Minister Godoy resulted in the War of the Oranges.'
p4404
aS'One civil war in this country saw the naval battle of Praia Bay; that war was ended by the Peace of Evora, which followed the Battle of Asseiceira.'
p4405
aS'This countrys borders were set by the Treaty of Badajoz.'
p4406
aS'King Michael I of this country was defeated by his sister, Maria II, in this countrys Liberal War.'
p4407
aS'For ten points, name this country once ruled by the Braganza dynasty, also famous for colonizing Brazil.'
p4408
aS"This colonial power established the base of Hughli in Bengal, which was lost to the British in 1658, and this colonial power's other early Indian settlements include Cannanore, Diu, Cochin and Fort Anjediva."
p4409
aS'This colonial power was also the first to colonize Kerala.'
p4410
aS'This colonial power vanquished the Jaffna Dynasty and established the city of (*) Colombo during its occupation of Sri_Lanka, though they were unable to defeat the Kingdom of Kandy.'
p4411
aS'During Operation Vijay, this colonial power lost its last possession on the Subcontinent as India captured Goa.'
p4412
aS"This country's first outpost in India was established at Calicut in 1498."
p4413
aS'For ten points, name this homeland of Vasco da Gama, a European nation with capital Lisbon.'
p4414
aS'One bishop of this city was martyred while trying to convert the Old Prussians, and had previously converted a pagan king at Esztergom.'
p4415
aS'Apart from St. Adalbert, other early residents of this city include the ruler who won the Battle of Kressenbrunn and the semi-mythical founder Libuse.'
p4416
aS'The architect Matthias of Arras built several cathedrals in this city, such as Our Lady of Tyn and St. Vitus.'
p4417
aS'One treaty named after this city ended the Swedish phase of the Thirty Years War, and it was the site of an 1848 conference that wrote the song Hey, Slavs!, the anthem of the Pan-Slavic movement.'
p4418
aS'An uprising in this city resulted in a disagreement over whether angels or a pile of dung under the Hradcany had saved the lives of some Habsburg officials.'
p4419
aS'For ten points, name this city where locals sometimes throw people out of windows, the capital of the Kingdom of Bohemia and the Czech Republic.'
p4420
aS'The Action Programme promulgated by one leader led to this event.'
p4421
aS'Many of its leaders went on to found the group Charter 77.'
p4422
aS'Gustav Husak took power following this event, during which another leader promised ""socialism with a human face.'
p4423
aS'"" This event occurred during the presidency of (*) Alexander Dubcek and saw troops of the Warsaw Pact sent in by Soviet premier Leonid_Brezhnev.'
p4424
aS"This event is also the setting for Milan Kundera's The Unbearable Lightness of Being."
p4425
aS'For 10 points, name this 1968 uprising in the capital of the former Czechoslovakia.'
p4426
aS'The end of this event sparked the formation of the rock band Plastic People of the Universe.'
p4427
aS'A speech\\n by the leader of this movement condemned the broken promises of Klement Gottwald.'
p4428
aS'This event saw the\\n implementation of an "Action Program" which included greater freedom of speech and fewer restrictions\\n on travel outside the country.'
p4429
aS'"The Two Thousand Words" Manifesto was written by Ludvik Vaculik in an\\n attempt to influence elections during this event.'
p4430
aS'During this event, Alexander Dubcek called for greater\\n liberalization of the markets as well as "Socialism with a human face." For 10 points, name period of\\n political liberalization during 1968, centered in the capital of Czechoslovakia.'
p4431
aS'The end of this period saw the leader of the KSC demoted to the forestry service during "normalization." In this period\'s aftermath, Jan Palach immolated himself, and greater freedom to travel to western nations was proposed by this period\'s "Action Program." This period was stopped by the signers of the Bratislava Declaration.'
p4432
aS'This period began with the removal of Antonin Novotny and ended with the installation of [*] Gustav Husak by a Soviet invasion justified by the Brezhnev Doctrine.'
p4433
aS'For 10 points, name this period that tried to establish "socialism with a human face," instigated by Alexander Dubcek as a liberalization of Czechoslovakia.'
p4434
aS'After it was supressed, a band called The Plastic People of the Universe was arrested, and many prominent artists protested, forming the human rights watchdog group Charter 77.'
p4435
aS"One trigger for this event may have been the publication of Milan (*) Kundera's satire The Joke, and it followed the end of Anton Novotny's presidency."
p4436
aS'Its leader announced in Brno that there would be "the widest possible democratization," and introduced the idea of "socialism with a human face.'
p4437
aS'" FTP name this massive liberalization by Anton Dubcek in Czechoslovakia in 1968, crushed by the USSR and named for the capital of its country.'
p4438
aS'The beginning of this event was heralded in a speech on the twentieth anniversary of Victorious February which claimed that Klement Gottwald had failed in his handling of the trial of Rudolf Slansky.'
p4439
aS'Ota Sik\'s "third way" was the underlying economic policy of this period, and a meeting at Cierna nad Tisou failed to put an end to it.'
p4440
aS'The weakness of the Action Programme during this period led Ludvik Vaculik to publish a document which called for the resignation of inept leaders, the "Two Thousand Words".'
p4441
aS'This event began after the resignation of Antonin Novotny, and in response to the end of it, Jan Palach set himself on fire in protest.'
p4442
aS'Gustav Husak became President after this event was crushed by a Warsaw Pact invasion, which was justified by the Brezhnev Doctrine.'
p4443
aS'This period was led by Alexander Dubcek, who attempted to create "socialism with a human face".'
p4444
aS'For 10 points, name this period of liberal reforms in Czechoslovakia in 1968.'
p4445
aS'A forged letter of invitation ending this event was handed back to the government in the 1990s.'
p4446
aS'Symbolically tipped off with appearance of the so-called Two Thousand Words, this event got underway in earnest with implementation of the Action Program, Its aftermath saw promulgation of the Brezhnev Doctrine.'
p4447
aS'Ended without help from Romania on August 21st, this event had started with the ascendancy of Alexander Dubcek to General Secretary.'
p4448
aS'For ten points, name this brief period of political liberalization in Czechoslovakia in 1968, taking place in a certain city during a certain season.'
p4449
aS'Jehuda Cresques, better known as "Cresques the Jew", was imported from Catalonia to serve as an assistant to this man.'
p4450
aS'Other associates of this man included Gil Eanes, Gonalo Velho, and the Genoese Antonio de Noli.'
p4451
aS"This man's wealth came from his position as governor of the Order of Christ, a branch of the Knights Templar."
p4452
aS'From his base at (*) Teranabal on the Sagres peninsula, located near Lagos, this man organized the capture of Cueta but perhaps more notably the passing of Cape Bojador, a feat long thought impossible.'
p4453
aS'This man also oversaw the claiming of the Madiera Islands and the Azores.'
p4454
aS'For ten points, name this Portuguese prince who promoted exploration.'
p4455
aS'The Battle of Sainte-Foy was fought near a city in this region, which was also the site of the Oka Crisis.'
p4456
aS'One of the Intolerable Acts passed after the Boston Tea Party named after this region expanded it and allowed Catholicism within it.'
p4457
aS'Some tried to get this region to support the Constitution Act of 1982 by rejecting the Meech Lake Accord.'
p4458
aS"Pierre Laporte was murdered during this region's (*) October Crisis, which brought an end to its Quiet Revolution."
p4459
aS'The colony of l\'Habitation ["lahb-it-ash-eeon"] established by Samuel de Champlain was a precursor to this province.'
p4460
aS'The namesake of a political "bloc" pushing for secession is, for ten points, what French- speaking Canadian province home to Montreal'
p4461
aS'Many sources conflate this deity with the ruler of a legendary city known as Tollan.'
p4462
aS'This god poured his own blood over bones retrieved from the underworld in order to create humans for the fifth world era.'
p4463
aS'This god looked into a mirror after sleeping with his celibate priestess sister, prompting him to throw himself on a pyre in shame.'
p4464
aS'This god of the morning star had an aspect called Ehecatl who controlled the wind.'
p4465
aS'Under the fifth sun, this rival of Tezcatlipoca sailed east on a raft of serpents, which may have caused worshippers of this god to conflate him with Hernan Cortez.'
p4466
aS'For 10 points, name this Aztec "feathered serpent" god.'
p4467
aS'This person wrote "Nobody can advise you and help you.'
p4468
aS'Go into yourself.'
p4469
aS'confess to yourself   whether you would have to die if you were forbidden to write." At the advice of Rodin [roh-daan], this  poet spent time at a zoo and produced a poem about an animal that "paces in cramped circles, over   and over".'
p4470
aS'Another of his poems ends with the exhortation "You must change your life." He wrote a  collection of ten works while staying at a castle near Trieste.'
p4471
aS'That collection begins "Who, if I cried  out, would hear me among the Angelic Orders".'
p4472
aS'This poet of "The Panther" and "Archaic Torso of  Apollo" had his writings to Franz Xaver Kappus published as Letters to a Young Poet.'
p4473
aS'Identify this  German poet of The Duino Elegies.'
p4474
aS"An early act in this man's reign was to appoint Nebwenenef as high priest of Amon at Thebes."
p4475
aS'The poem Pen-ta-ur describes his early military experience, and a marriage stele depicts the king of Kheta explaining the advantages of giving his daughter as a wife to this man.'
p4476
aS'His name was found on a record at Nahr al-Kalb where he stopped a campaign one year before his forces marched to the Orontes River.'
p4477
aS'His principal wives were Asetnofret and Nefertari.'
p4478
aS'He may be best known for a battle he lost to Muwatalli and a Hittite force.'
p4479
aS'FTP, name this Nineteenth Dynasty king, who signed a treaty after losing the battle of Kadesh.'
p4480
aS'This thinker wrote about the effect of ""animal spirits"" upon the human mind in a work that delineates a type of emotion that is prompted from an external source, his Passions of the Soul.'
p4481
aS'He outlined his view of mind-body dualism in such works as his Meditations on First Philosophy.'
p4482
aS'For 10 points, name this French thinker who worked extensively in developing early geometry and proclaimed ""I think, therefore I am.'
p4483
aS'""'
p4484
aS'One social group originating in this country\'s culture is the burrnesha, or ""sworn virgins,"" women who\\n live their entire lives as men.'
p4485
aS'Its Malesia e Madhe district is a center of the gjakmarrja, a blood feud that\\n exacts honor under the code of Kanun.'
p4486
aS'The Shkodra area is another center of ritualized violence in this\\n country, whose economy collapsed in 1997 as the result of a pyramid scheme.'
p4487
aS'Its largest port was renamed\\n Durazzo during a World_War_II occupation by Italy.'
p4488
aS'For 10 points, name this eastern Balkan state, which is\\n found on the western borders of Macedonia and Greece.'
p4489
aS"This country's national hero resisted control by the Ottoman_Empire at the Battle of Torvioll, though he did not participate in the battle of Kosovo Field."
p4490
aS'This country, which was home to Skanderbeg, was later ruled by a king who took power from Fan Noli.'
p4491
aS'This nation, which was ruled by King Zog, was closely allied with Maoist China before becoming an isolated communist state under dictator Enver Hoxha (HOE-zhuh).'
p4492
aS'For 10 points, name this Balkan nation ruled from its capital, Tirana.'
p4493
aS'A besa, suspending all blood feuds in this nation, had to be called before the Congress of Lushnje could be held after World_War_I, declaring an end to the Durres Government.'
p4494
aS'Thousands of kilograms of gold were held by the British from this country following a mine attack on British ships in an event known as the Corfu Channel Incident, and this country saw the "Purge of the Liberals" and a purge of the military under Mehmet Shehu, whose family was killed after his suicide in 1981.'
p4495
aS"When this country's communist regime fell, its only remaining communist contacts were Laos, Vietnam, and North Korea, as relations with China had cooled over a proposed rapprochement with this country's neighbor, Yugoslavia."
p4496
aS'In 1997, anarchy spurred an Italian-led peacekeeping mission in, for 10 points, what formerly autarkic Balkan nation which was led until 1985 by Enver Hoxha'
p4497
aS'National heroes in this country include the gay Hungarian paleontologist Franz Nopcsa [nop-cha], who helped lead its independence movement and wanted to become its first king.'
p4498
aS'The 1924 "June Revolution" in this country was led by Bishop Fan Noli, who briefly served as Prime Minister.'
p4499
aS"Hundreds of concrete pillboxes were built by this country's Communist rulers, who included Ramiz Alia."
p4500
aS'These leaders were protected by the Sigurimi secret police.'
p4501
aS'For 10 points, name this once-Maoist Balkan country of Enver Hoxha and King Zog, whose languages are Gheg and Tosk and whose capital is Tirana.'
p4502
aS'During the 16th century, this country saw the establishment of its modern-day capital by Pedro de Valdivia, who died fighting the native Mapuche (mah-POO-chay) people.'
p4503
aS"Independence forces in this country were defeated at the Battle of Rancagua, but later prevailed against Spanish forces at the Battle of Chacabuco thanks to the efforts of Jose Carrera and Bernardo_O'Higgins."
p4504
aS"Mineral deposits in this country's Atacama Desert caused it to engage in the War of Pacific against Bolivia and Peru."
p4505
aS'For 10 points, name this narrow country with its capital at Santiago.'
p4506
aS'On January 11, 2000, Finance Minister Alfredo Arizaga announced that this nation would join Panama in adopting the U.S. dollar as its official currency.'
p4507
aS"The dramatic move couldn't stave off a coup against President Jamil Mahuad, but it did retired the nation's old currency, the sucre."
p4508
aS"FTP, what Latin American nation's capital is in Quito"
p4509
aS'After Admiral Poveda stepped down as dictator of this country, it was ruled by the Roldosist Party.'
p4510
aS'During World War Two, this country and its southern neighbor were forced to sign the Rio Protocol, which failed to prevent the Cenepa and Paquisha Wars.'
p4511
aS'One President of this country was overthrown by the Julian Revolution, while another was hacked to death by machete while leaving the national cathedral, after which the dissent journalist Juan Montalvo exclaimed "my pen has killed him!'
p4512
aS'" This country saw the rule of the liberal Eloy Alfaro and the conservative Gabriel Garcia Moreno, while the populist Jose Velaso Ibarra was elected President of this country five times.'
p4513
aS'Winning its independence during a battle on the slopes of the volcano Pichincha, this is, for ten points, what country whose cities include Guayaquil and Quito'
p4514
aS'Its population consisted of Soninke clans of Mande-speaking people who acted as intermediaries between the Arab and Berber traders of salt to the north and the producers of gold and ivory to the south.'
p4515
aS"Called Wagadu by its rulers, it derived its more familiar name from the king's title of warlord."
p4516
aS'It had become rich and powerful by 800, but in 1240 its capital was occupied by Sundiata, who incorporated it into his new and greater empire of Mali.'
p4517
aS'FTP, name this first of the great medieval trading empires of West Africa, which flourished during between the 9th and 13th centuries and whose name survives today in the modern country whose capital is Accra.'
p4518
aS"This people once ruled a vast trading empire first from the capital at K2, then from Mapungubwe, and Manyika was this people's first state to mine gold year-round, prompted by European traders."
p4519
aS'This people fought a series of wars in the late 17th century called the Changamire Wars, leading to the rise of Dombo as head of the Khami-based Rozvi Empire; Dombo was responsible for expelling Portuguese from among this people.'
p4520
aS'Maputu and Torva-ruled Butwa were successors of an earlier state of this people, which dominated gold and ivory trade to the Indian Ocean down the Zambezi, Limpopo, and other rivers, and which is most noted for a massive stone city.'
p4521
aS'For 10 points, name this southern African people, which built the city of Great Zimbabwe and which are the largest ethnicity of the modern state of Zimbabwe.'
p4522
aS"A leader of this country, according to Frederick Kempe's Divorcing the Dictator, was a fan of yellow patent-leather shoes."
p4523
aS'A book entitled Our Man in this Country was written by John Dinges.'
p4524
aS'A leader of this country organized the ousting of Nicolas Barletta, who was replaced by Eric Delvalle.'
p4525
aS'Harmodio Arosemena was ousted by a coup led by Arnulfo Arias in this country.'
p4526
aS'Operation Nifty Package sunk the boat of a leader of this country, who subsequently hid in its Vatican diplomatic mission.'
p4527
aS'Guillermo Endara was left in control of this country after an invasion that involved the incessant playing of rock music.'
p4528
aS'Operation Just Cause ousted Manuel Noriega from power in this country, which had been led by a man who died in a plane crash, Omar Torrijos.'
p4529
aS'For 10 points, Jimmy Carter signed a treaty returning a large canal to what Latin American country'
p4530
aS'A recently-created party in this country is known as the MOLIRENA.'
p4531
aS'This country was led on three separate occasions by Arnulfo Arias, who was deposed by a coup each time.'
p4532
aS"Thanks to figures such as Belisario Porras and Victoriano Lorenzo, this country gained its independence in the Thousand Days' War, which led to its separation from (*) Colombia."
p4533
aS'In 1903, it signed the Hay-Bunau-Varilla treaty with the United_States, creating an American territory within this country.'
p4534
aS'For 10 points, name this country home to the birthplace of John McCain, the location of a notable canal.'
p4535
aS'One part of this modern day country agreed to outlaw slavery as part of the Sand River Convention.'
p4536
aS'Leander Starr Jameson led a raid in this country, which was ruled by the National Party from 1948 until 1994.'
p4537
aS"The Sharpeville Massacre resulted from protests against this country's pass laws, which were also a factor in an uprising in its Soweto Township."
p4538
aS'For 20 points, name this country which has been led by the ANC since 1993.'
p4539
aS'This nation benefitted from the U.S. policy of "constructive engagement" as it was led by a politician called the "Big Crocodile".'
p4540
aS'While Daniel Francois Malan led this country, it established a system of internal ID checkpoints using "pass laws."'
p4541
aS'This country held the Rivonia trial for violent guerrillas affiliated with the "Spear of the Nation" group, and jailed Steve Biko for his role in starting the Soweto uprising.'
p4542
aS'This home of P. W. Botha used Robben Island as a prison for future leaders of its corrupt African National Congress party.'
p4543
aS'For 10 points, name this country which has used 11 official languages since dismantling a segregation system called apartheid.'
p4544
aS'One writer from this country wrote about how the "red one," Paddy Oshea, and Maisy\'s lover, Xuma, lead a strike.'
p4545
aS'In a novel primarily set in this country the protagonist gets put under surveillance and moves to France to stay with Katya where she falls in love with the married student Bernard Chabalier.'
p4546
aS'This country produced the author of Mine Boy, Peter Abrahams, and Etienne Leroux, a member of the literary movement (*) Die Sestigers.'
p4547
aS"In a novel set in this country, a man takes a copy of Lincoln's Gettysburg Address from his son's room after visiting John Harrison; in that novel set here, Mr. Carmichael takes up the defense pro deo for the murderer who killed Arthur Jarvis."
p4548
aS"For 10 points, name this country whose authors produced Burger's Daughter and Cry, the Beloved Country by Nadine Gordimer and Alan Paton."
p4549
aS"The removal of one ethnic group from this modern-day country's borders included the events on Red Sunday and a siege at Van."
p4550
aS'John F. Kennedy agreed to remove Jupiter missiles from this country to defuse the Cuban Missile Crisis.'
p4551
aS"This country's penal code includes a controversial Article 301 that has been used to crack down on dissidents who have discussed the (*) Armenian Genocide orchestrated by this country."
p4552
aS'This country invaded Cyprus in 1974 and set up a republic in the northern half of the island.'
p4553
aS'For 10 points, name this country that was once led by Mustafa Kemal Ataturk and includes cities like Ankara and Istanbul.'
p4554
aS"This country's districts of Kiboga, Nakaseke and other members of the Luwero triangle experienced heavy fighting during one war."
p4555
aS'A president of this country created the PRA, which merged with a group led by Yusufu Lule to create the NRA.'
p4556
aS"Supposedly to help the Banyamulenge people, this country invaded another to support the MLC's attempt to overthrow Laurent Kabila."
p4557
aS'In 2005, a president of this country repealed a constitutional ban on all political parties besides his Movement party.'
p4558
aS'The 1985 Nairobi Agreement was signed by Tito Okello, the then leader of this country, and its current president.'
p4559
aS"This country is led by Yoweri Museveni who has dealt with a man that was the subject of a viral video by Invisible Children Inc. For 10 points, the Lord's Resistance Army, led by Joseph Kony, originally operated in what African country"
p4560
aS'One leader of this country named himself the "Conqueror of the British Empire" but was deposed after he failed to invade a neighboring country\'s province of Kagera.'
p4561
aS"Edward Mutesa II was this country's first president, while Yoweri Museveni is its current president."
p4562
aS'In 1972, the Jews and Asians were expelled from this country, in which several hostages were rescued in a raid on (*) Entebbe.'
p4563
aS"In March 2012, Invisible Children released a video about a military leader from this country who is the head of the Lord's Resistance Army, Joseph Kony."
p4564
aS'For ten points, identify this African nation formerly ruled by Milton Obote and Idi_Amin.'
p4565
aS'In 2005, a referendum in this country voted for the end of its "Movement" system and a return to\\n multiparty politics.'
p4566
aS"The next year, Kizza Besigye lost his bid for the presidency, alleging corruption against\\n this country's twenty-five-year leader."
p4567
aS"Former rebel groups in this country included the People's\\n Democratic Army and the Holy Spirit Movement, which was subsumed into a group led by Joseph Kony.\\n The film and organization Invisible Children works to raise awareness of the activities of this country's\\n Lord's Resistance Army."
p4568
aS'It has been led by Yoweri Museveni since 1986.'
p4569
aS'For 10 points, name this country\\n which has suffered internal strife since the overthrow of Idi_Amin.'
p4570
aS"Galleons named for this modern-day country's capital city traded with Acapulco in New Spain."
p4571
aS'One politician from this country was assassinated upon arriving at the national airport after a three year exile; the man who ordered that assassination was ousted from the presidency of this country in the (*) People Power Revolution.'
p4572
aS'One conflict in this country saw a fleeing general declare "I shall return" before the forces he left behind suffered through the Bataan Death March, while another saw the capture of Emilio_Aguinaldo.'
p4573
aS'For ten points, identify this island nation formerly led by Ferdinand Marcos, where Benigno Aquino now rules from Manila.'
p4574
aS'One event in this country that took place on Epifanio de los Santos Avenue was the People Power Revolution.'
p4575
aS'Joseph Estrada was ousted from power here after a vote of no confidence.'
p4576
aS'One leader from this country had a wife who owned nearly 3,000 shoes.'
p4577
aS"One uprising in this country was led by (*) Emilio_Aguinaldo and the 1980's was marked by turmoil in this country during the fall of Ferdinand Marcos and subsequent rise of Corazon Aquino."
p4578
aS'For 10 points, name this Asian nation whose largest island of Luzon is home to its capital of Manila.'
p4579
aS"During one of this man's military campaigns, he left the government in the hands of Hubert Walter."
p4580
aS'Earlier, he had become embroiled in a campaign against the Gascons, who had revolted against his rule, while yet another conflict saw him conquering Messina and forcing a treaty that named Tancred the king of Sicily.'
p4581
aS'He died while besieging the castle at Chalus.'
p4582
aS'This victor over the Saracens at Acre was separated from his wife, Berengaria of Navarre, when he was captured by Duke Leopold, who handed him over to his enemy Henry VI.'
p4583
aS'For 10 points, name this British monarch, who went on the Third_Crusade, the brother of John noted for his lion-heartedness.'
p4584
aS'In a Senate campaign, this politician labeled his opponent, Helen Douglas, the ""Pink Lady.'
p4585
aS'"" His first Vice President was a Maryland governor who resigned after a tax scandal.'
p4586
aS'This president agreed to the Stennis Compromise after he dismissed Archibald Cox, an event that led to the resignations of Elliot Richardson and William Ruckelshaus and is known as the ""Saturday Night Massacre.'
p4587
aS'"" Gerald Ford pardoned this president.'
p4588
aS'For 10 points, name this president who resigned amidst the Watergate Scandal.'
p4589
aS'During this president\'s administration, a group known as ""the Plumbers"" was created by Egil Krogh.'
p4590
aS'His discomfort on camera is often said to have lost him the first televised presidential debate.'
p4591
aS'Charles Colson included Paul Newman and Ted Kennedy on this man\'s ""enemies list.'
p4592
aS'"" He ordered the ""aturday Night Massacre"" after a legal battle over some tape recordings which would have actions carried out by CREEP.'
p4593
aS'For 10 points, name this president who resigned in the wake of the Watergate scandal.'
p4594
aS'In one election, this man attacked Helen Gahagan Douglas by calling her ""the pink lady.'
p4595
aS'"" At the American National Exhibition in Moscow, this man engaged in the ""Kitchen Debate"" with Nikita_Khrushchev.'
p4596
aS"After losing a governor's race to Pat Brown, this politician erroneously said the press wouldn't have him to kick around anymore."
p4597
aS'In another election, this man defended his use of a slush fund with the ""Checkers"" speech.'
p4598
aS'For 10 points, name this former Vice President under Eisenhower, who lost the presidency to John F. Kennedy in 1960, but eventually was elected president in 1968.'
p4599
aS'The Supreme Court in Griggs v. Duke Power Company upheld this mans Philadelphia Plan, which required federal contractors to hire African-American workers.'
p4600
aS'His Supreme Court appointments included the man who wrote the Doe v. Bolton opinion, while military operations he launched included Menu, Freedom Train, and Linebacker, and he signed treaties banning chemical weapons and seabed nuclear weapons.'
p4601
aS'First elected to Congress against Jerry Voorhis, his discovery of the Pumpkin Papers allowed him to defeat Senator Helen Douglas, whom he termed the pink lady.'
p4602
aS'Victorious in the kitchen debate, this is, for ten points, what 37th US President, perhaps best known for Watergate'
p4603
aS"This man was promoted to brevet major after the same battle that saw Santa Anna ride off and abandon his false leg; he received that promotion for finding a trail that allowed Winfield_Scott's forces to flank and thus win the Battle of Cerro Gordo."
p4604
aS'Between those two posts, he assumed his most famous role by replacing Joseph Johnston and later won the Seven Days Battles, but only after spending a year serving as a senior military advisor to Jefferson_Davis.'
p4605
aS'For 10 points, name this son of "Light Horse Harry" who was a top graduate of West Point and went on to lead the Army of Northern Virginia for the Confederacy during the Civil War.'
p4606
aS'This man refused to succeed Lord Melbourne as Prime Minister unless Queen Victoria fired her ladies-in-waiting who supported Melbourne in the Bedchamber Crisis.'
p4607
aS'While serving as Secretary for Ireland, he was known as a staunch (*) anti-Catholic, though this Prime Minister did allow Catholics to serve in Parliament with the Emancipation Act of 1829.'
p4608
aS'His Tamworth Manifesto inspired the Conservative Party, and he repealed the Corn Laws in 1846.'
p4609
aS'For 10 points, name this British Prime Minister who founded the London Metropolitan Police Force.'
p4610
aS'This politician commissioned Lord Devon to investigate tenant-landlord relationships in Ireland, and saw his first government fail after the organization of the Lichfield House Compact.'
p4611
aS'Despite serving from two different rotten boroughs, he won early popularity after Perceval chose him to deliver a reply to a speech from the throne.'
p4612
aS"A common rule governing the insanity defense is named for a man who tried to kill this man, Daniel M'Naghten."
p4613
aS'This ardent opponent of Catholic Emancipation briefly refused to supplant Lord Melbourne in the Bedchamber Crisis and differentiated his philosophy from that of his patron, the Duke of Wellington, in his Tamworth Manifesto.'
p4614
aS'This man responded to the Potato Famine by repealing the Corn Laws, and is credited as the founder of the Conservative Party.'
p4615
aS'For 10 points, name this British PM whose founding of the Metropolitan Police inspired their nickname of "Bobbies".'
p4616
aS'This man was forced to lower taxes in response to the Gin Riots.'
p4617
aS'He managed to convince his hawkish\\n monarch not to engage in the War_of_the_Polish_Succession, and put the Lord Chamberlain in charge of\\n censoring the theatre with the Licensing Act.'
p4618
aS'After the death of his ally Queen Caroline, this man\\n experienced a decline in popularity caused by events like the Porteous Riots and the Cartagena Disaster,\\n which occurred during the War of Jenkins Ear.'
p4619
aS'Through his posts of First Lord of the Treasury and\\n Chancellor of the Exchequer, he controlled affairs during the reigns of George I and George II.'
p4620
aS'For 10\\n points, name this man often regarded as the first Prime Minister of England.'
p4621
aS'This leader attempted to prevent the lynching of John Porteous, a city guard captain, by rioters in Edinburgh.'
p4622
aS'Early in his career this man gained power when Lord Godolphin promoted him to Secretary of War, in which he succeeded longtime Tory rival Lord Bolingbroke.'
p4623
aS"The defeat of Edward Vernon at Cartagena during the War of Jenkins' Ear led to this man's resignation."
p4624
aS'He created the sinking fund to relieve national debt and saved Stanhope and Sunderland from prosecution for their roles in the South Sea Bubble.'
p4625
aS'For 10 points, name this man regarded as the first British Prime Minister.'
p4626
aS'His attempt to reform the excise tax by extending it to wine and tobacco failed miserably after generating riotous opposition.'
p4627
aS'He perfected the system of political patronage, putting "placemen" loyal to him in important positions in the government.'
p4628
aS'His rise to power peaked after he was appointed Chancellor of the Exchequer in 1721, in which capacity he restored confidence in the government following the South Sea Bubble.'
p4629
aS"Forced into declaring war against Spain over Jenkins' ear, he resigned in disgust in 1741."
p4630
aS"FTP, who is this man, considered Britain's first prime minister"
p4631
aS'This man became head of a special committee which impeached the Earl of Oxford and Viscount Bolingbroke, who had been responsible for sending this man to the Tower of London.'
p4632
aS'He grew unpopular when he pardoned John Porteous, and Robert Jacomb had earlier saved this man from financial disaster.'
p4633
aS"He reluctantly declared war on Spain to start the War of Jenkins' Ear."
p4634
aS'He also brought down the Peerage Bill, but rose to his most famous position due to his handling of the South Sea Bubble as First Lord of the Treasury, which led George II to make him leader of the House of Commons.'
p4635
aS'For ten points, name this first prime minister of the United Kingdom.'
p4636
aS"This politician was persuaded to enter a costly public battle, culminating in his banning of Henry Brooke's play Gustavus Vasa under his recently-passed Licensing Act, by numerous satirical comparisons to Jonathan Wild and the publication of The Craftsmen by long-time opponents William Pulteney and Lord Bolingbroke."
p4637
aS'Other literary attacks on this Prime Minister, who uncovered the Atterbury Plot, included Drapier\'s Letters, a pamphlet used by John Carteret to assail this man\'s administration over the use of inferior coins known as "Wood\'s Halfpence.'
p4638
aS'" Tolboth Prison was stormed in response to one crisis during this man\'s administration, which saw the (*) hanging of smuggler Andrew Wilson trigger a series of riots culminating in the lynching of John Porteous.'
p4639
aS'Supported heavily by the Duke of Newcastle and Queen Caroline, his negotiation of the Treaty of Vienna secured his position over the aging Townshend, years after he had vigorously prosecuted men like James Craggs as First Lord of the Treasury in the wake of the South Sea Bubble.'
p4640
aS'Forced to engage Spain after an incident aboard the Rebecca in the War of Jenkins Ear, FTP, identify this longtime Whig statesmen who held power until 1742, considered the first British Prime Minister.'
p4641
aS'One leader of this nation and its Muscovite faction was Ana Pauker.'
p4642
aS'Another leader of this nation, Iuliu Maniu, resigned as prime minister in 1930 to protest the return of King Carol II.'
p4643
aS'This nation was also led by a man who promoted neo-Stalinism with his 1971 July Theses.'
p4644
aS'That leader of this country caused unrest in part by appointing his wife Elena deputy prime minister and by his plan to bulldoze thousands of villages and convert them to (*) ""agrotechnical centers.'
p4645
aS'"" For 10 points, name this nation that was once ruled by the communist regime of Nicolae_Ceausescu.'
p4646
aS"The first history of this country was written by Dimitrie Cantemir, who reigned as ruler of one of this country's predecessors."
p4647
aS'This country was briefly united by a man who triumphed over Ieremia Movila and Andrew Bathory before being assassinated by Giorgio Basta.'
p4648
aS'This country\'s foreign minister Ana Pauker opposed the construction of the "Death Canal" and was in turn opposed by the leader of the "prison faction," who had helped oust its last king, (*) Michael I.'
p4649
aS'Another leader of this country outlawed abortion and laid out his communist precepts in the July Theses before protests in Timisoara led to his televised trial and execution alongside his wife Elena on Christmas, 1989.'
p4650
aS'For 10 points, name this European country once ruled by Nicolae_Ceausescu.'
p4651
aS'According to a presumably apocryphal story, one leader heard about the destruction of this city and thought that his favorite chicken, who shared its name with this city, had died.'
p4652
aS"Pope Vigilius sent shipments of grain to aid this city, but they were intercepted by Totila's forces, which captured this city twice during the Gothic War."
p4653
aS'Pope Leo IV ordered the construction of some walls in this city to protect it from Saracen pirates, who attacked its port city of Ostia in 849.'
p4654
aS'After the Battle of Allia, Brennus entered this city and famously declared "Woe to the vanquished!"'
p4655
aS'In 455, it was attacked by the Vandals under Genseric, shortly after being sacked in 410 by the Visigoths under Alaric.'
p4656
aS'For 10 points, name this capital of an empire based in Italy.'
p4657
aS'highest point in this city is Monte Mario hill, which has been used for research on erosion that occurs during urban expansion.'
p4658
aS"Just north of this city are the mouths of the Cremera and Allia rivers; the latter was the site of an important battle in this city's early history."
p4659
aS"An early bridge built in this location using an island in the middle of this city's central river was the Pons Sublicus, a location now near the center of the city."
p4660
aS'This city contains the mouth of the Aniene river, which was the source of the Anio Vetus and Anio Novus.'
p4661
aS'A notable piece of architecture in this city links the Trinit dei Monti and the Piazza di Spagna, a set of stairs called the Spanish Steps, whose base is near the Barcaccia Fountain designed by Bernini.'
p4662
aS'For 10 points, name this city, home to the Trevi fountain, which lies on the bank of the Tiber River.'
p4663
aS"This country's company ARMZ bid to take over the Canadian company Uranium One, and South Sudan refuses to return one of this country's helicopters after it was shot down."
p4664
aS"This country's Illegals Program included Vicky Pelaez and Anna Chapman, who were accused of espionage against the United_States, and this country is the primary shareholder of (*) Gazprom."
p4665
aS"Its president recently signed a bill preventing the US from adopting orphans from here, and this country's Communist Party holds the second-most seats in its Duma."
p4666
aS'For ten points, identify this country home to Dmitri Medvedev and Vladimir Putin.'
p4667
aS"As a colonel, this president led a brigade that followed White's West Virginians in a frontal assault at Cloyd's Mountain."
p4668
aS'This president appointed William Woods and John Harlan to the Supreme Court, and faced the Shamokin Uprising and labor unrest in Martinsburg, West Virginia during a large railroad strike in his first year in office.'
p4669
aS'His Treasury Secretary John Sherman launched the Jay Commission, leading this man to remove Alonzo Cornell and (*) Chester Arthur from their positions with the Port of New York.'
p4670
aS'Horace_Greeley\'s fabricated story about an opponent\'s "Cipher Dispatches" helped this man win an election resolved by Thomas A. Scott.'
p4671
aS'This President saw his veto on the Bland-Allison Act overridden, delighting his foe Roscoe Conkling.'
p4672
aS'For 10 points, name this President whose victory over Samuel Tilden in 1876 led to the end of Reconstruction.'
p4673
aS'This president sent federal troops into Baltimore and Pittsburgh to put down the ""Great Railroad Strike.'
p4674
aS'"" This man\'s First Lady was known as ""Lemonade Lucy"" for her support of temperance.'
p4675
aS'Despite his veto, the Bland-Allison Act was passed during his presidency, as were bills weakening the Force Acts passed to crack down the Ku_Klux_Klan.'
p4676
aS'During his only presidential election, he actually received less electoral and popular votes than opponent Samuel Tilden.'
p4677
aS'For 10 points, name this president who took office by promising to end Reconstruction in the controversial ""Compromise of1877.'
p4678
aS'""'
p4679
aS'This President sent Winfield_Scott Hancock to handle the Great Railroad Strike.'
p4680
aS'Although this man sent his Secretary of State William Evarts to the International Monetary Conference, he brought America back to the gold standard.'
p4681
aS"This president's wife was committed to keeping the White House alcohol-free, leading to her nickname of Lemonade Lucy."
p4682
aS'Florida, Louisiana, and South Carolina were won by this man according to an Electoral Commission that granted him victory over Samuel Tilden.'
p4683
aS'For 10 points, name this victor of the election of 1876, whose ascension led to the end of Reconstruction.'
p4684
aS'In his Inaugural Address, this President recommended extending the term length to six years and forbidding re-election.'
p4685
aS"A section of the Chaco was named after this President after he arbitrated a territorial dispute between Argentina and Paraguay in Paraguay's favor."
p4686
aS'When informed of his running mate, he allegedly quipped, ""Who is Wheeler"" This man\'s wife established the Easter egg roll on the White House lawn and was known as ""Lemonade Lucy"" for her refusal to serve alcohol at White House Parties.'
p4687
aS'He was known as (*) ""His Fraudulency"" after a party-line vote of an Electoral Commission gave him a victory over Samuel Tilden.'
p4688
aS'For 10 points, name this nineteenth President of the United_States who ended Reconstruction.'
p4689
aS"The Wormley House Agreement was made concerning this man's election."
p4690
aS'Congress overrode a veto by this man to pass a law that would later be replaced by the Sherman Silver Purchase Act, and he was engaged by Argentina to act as an arbitrator following the War of the Triple Alliance.'
p4691
aS"Following this man's presidency, he campaigned vigorously for his army buddy (*) William_McKinley in this man's home state of Ohio, and when this man died in 1893, his home became a state park in Fremont."
p4692
aS'After appointing the Justice who would decide, Plessy v. Furguson, this president ordered troops to fire upon participants of the Great Railroad Strike in 1877.'
p4693
aS'For ten points, name this 19th president of the United_States who narrowly defeated Samuel Tilden in the election of 1876.'
p4694
aS'During his lame-duck period, he appointed Nathan Goff, Jr., as Secretary of the Navy to replace Richard Wigginton Thompson, and other members of his cabinet included Secretary of the Interior Carl Schurz and Attorney General Carl Devens.'
p4695
aS'Pozo Colorado is the capital of a department named after him in Paraguay, where he is a national hero, having arbitrated in their favor while president after the War of the Triple Alliance.'
p4696
aS'Congress overrode his veto of the (*) Bland-Allison Act, and he promised not to run for a second term after a supposed bipartisan committee rewarded him 20 disputed electoral votes.'
p4697
aS'FTP, name this 19th president who won a controversial election in 1876 against Democrat Samuel Tilden.'
p4698
aS'One group that took part in this event had a name that translates to ""Those Who Have the Same Goal.'
p4699
aS'"" That group, the Impuzamugambi worked with the Interahamwe.'
p4700
aS'The French intervened in it through (+) Operation Turquoise.'
p4701
aS'Some of the things that sparked this event were the assassination of Agathe Uwilingiyimana and the shooting down of the plane carrying President Habyarimana.'
p4702
aS'Radio broadcasts during it instructed the perpetrators to kill what were dubbed the (*) ""cockroaches.'
p4703
aS'"" One film about this event told the story of a hotel manager who tried to save the lives of those targeted by it.'
p4704
aS'For 10 points, name this 1994 massacre of the Tutsi in a certain African country.'
p4705
aS'This conflict saw Prime Minister Agathe Uwilingiyimana killed, despite the protection by UNAMIR UN peacekeeping forces.'
p4706
aS'The role of the Radio des mille collines in this conflict has been very controversial, as is the withdrawal of part of the peacekeeping force after the death of several of its members.'
p4707
aS'Started after the plane with both the president of the namesake country, Habiyarimana, as of its southern neighbor, Ntariyamira, was shot down, it saw the Interahamwe militias cause death and destruction, until the RPF under Paul Kagame invaded from the north.'
p4708
aS'This intervention itself then led to a gigantic exodus to Zaire by people, who feared revenge from the RPF.'
p4709
aS'FTP, what is this conflict, which saw almost a million Tutsi and moderate Hutus killed in 1994'
p4710
aS'Its first conquest, under the Sufi head of Ardabil, dispossed the Uzbek horde known as the "white sheep" of its future capital.'
p4711
aS'It came to power in Azerbaijan with the aid of the "Red Heads" or Qizilbash and the official language was Azeri during the rule of Ismail I.'
p4712
aS'Its most powerful ruler hired an English military adventurer to train his ghulam slaves in modern musketry, take the offensive against the Ottomans, and expel the Portuguese traders who had settled at Hormuz.'
p4713
aS'Interrupted briefly by Nadir Shah, then finally supplanted by the Zand and Qajar dynasties, it saw the movement of the capital from Tabriz to Isfahan.'
p4714
aS"FTP, Shah Abbas I was a member of this Shi'ite Iranian dynasty that lasted from 1501 to 1760."
p4715
aS'It was during this dynasty\'s reign that the "illuminationist" Ishraqi school of philosophy reached its peak under figures such as Mulla Sadra.'
p4716
aS'Its last member who wielded actual power was myopically devoted to recapturing Bahrain.'
p4717
aS'After that man, Shah Husayn, this dynasty continued for until the establishment of the Afsharid dynasty.'
p4718
aS'Its peak was under a ruler who relied on the military advice of Sir Robert Sherley and who imported the residents of Jolfa to build his capital.'
p4719
aS'The Treaty of Qasr-e Shirin ended a series of wars with its neighbor, which had defeated it at Chaldiran.'
p4720
aS"Ruled by luminaries such as Tahmasp I, Abbas the Great, and Ismail I, for 10 points, identify this Shi'ite dynasty of Persia."
p4721
aS'One rebellion against this dynasty included a group entering a shrine claiming Dervish Reza would bring Mir Faghfur back to life, while another revolt during this dynasty was led by the Nuqtavi Darvish Khusraw.'
p4722
aS'Another Nuqtavi, the Mulla Qasim, called for the abdication of one ruler of this dynasty.'
p4723
aS'That ruler of this dynasty gave control of the royal guard to the Shaykhavand cabal, and that ruler modernized his army with the aid of Robert Sherley.'
p4724
aS"The second ruler of this dynasty signed the Treaty of Amasya with an enemy which had earlier defeated that ruler's father at the battle of Chaldiran."
p4725
aS'This dynasty was founded by a group known for wearing red hats, the Qizilbash.'
p4726
aS'For 10 points, name this dynasty whose rulers included Tahmasp I, its founder Ismail I, and Abbas the Great.'
p4727
aS'The English adventurer Sir Anthony Shirley became a diplomat for this polity.'
p4728
aS'This dynasty came to power after winning the Battle of Merv against Muhammad Shaybani, and it fell after an invasion by the Hotaki people.'
p4729
aS'This dynasty was nicknamed the Qizilbash or "redheads" because of their headgear of choice.'
p4730
aS"This polity's longest-serving ruler was (*) Tahmasp the Great, who allied with and protected the exiled Humayun."
p4731
aS'This polity was defeated by Selim the Grim at the Battle of Chaldiron and it reached its height under Abbas I.'
p4732
aS'Its capital was Isfahan and its founder was Ismail I.'
p4733
aS'For ten points, name this Shia dynasty that rivaled the Ottomans in Persia.'
p4734
aS"The architect Bartolomeo Francesco Rastrelli designed much of this city, including the Smolny Monastery on this city's outskirts."
p4735
aS"This city's suburb of Lomonosov was founded by Prince (+) Menshikov, this city's first governor, as a summer retreat."
p4736
aS'The foundation of this city was made possible by the capture of Noteburg and Nienshants, and this city was protected by the fortress at Kronstadt.'
p4737
aS'This city is located on the (*) Neva River at the Gulf of Finland.'
p4738
aS'For 10 points, name this onetime capital of Russia that was founded by Peter_the_Great as his ""window to the west.'
p4739
aS'""'
p4740
aS"Shortly after this man's election as president, cotton mill workers took over the Yarur factory."
p4741
aS'This man came into office as part of the newly formed Popular Unity Party, which increased its share of parliament months before this man was killed inside La Moneda Palace during a military coup.'
p4742
aS'For 10 points, name this socialist president who was elected in 1970 and removed in 1973 by Augusto Pinochet as leader of Chile.'
p4743
aS"This man won election to office when his nation's congress chose him over the former president Jorge Alessandri, and shortly afterwards the head of his country's military, Rene Schneider, was kidnapped by terrorists."
p4744
aS"One of this man's most notable actions in office was the nationalization of his country's copper industry, at the time its leading export and he saw a prolonged strike by truck owners hamper his attempts to govern."
p4745
aS'Carlos Prats put down the Tanquetazo coup attempt against this man in 1973, but later that year this man was found dead from a gunshot wound during the coup that replaced him.'
p4746
aS'For ten points name this Socialist president of Chile from 1970-1973 who preceded Augusto Pinochet.'
p4747
aS'A plan to prevent this man from taking office was known as Track 1.'
p4748
aS'His economic policy was outlined in the Vuskovic Plan, which included a computer network known as Project Cybersyn.'
p4749
aS'He was a member of the Popular Unity coalition, and defeated Jorge Allesandri to win his highest office.'
p4750
aS'His country was the first on its continent to recognize Cuba, and he "committed suicide" in La Moneda after giving a speech that was broadcast on radio.'
p4751
aS'For 10 points, name this president of Chile, who was overthrown in a U.S.-backed coup by Augusto Pinochet.'
p4752
aS'This man assaulted William Stanbery with a cane on Pennsylvania Avenue.'
p4753
aS'As a Senator, he and John Bell were the only southerners to vote against the Kansas-Nebraska_Act.'
p4754
aS'A close ally of Andrew_Jackson, he served as the governor of Texas until he was removed for his refusal to support the Confederacy.'
p4755
aS'For 10 points, name this politician, who also lead the victorious forces at the Battle of San Jacinto.'
p4756
aS'This man unsuccessfully attempted to force Thomas_Jefferson Rusk to disband his vigilante army, leading to the end of the Cordova Rebellion.'
p4757
aS'While lobbying in Washington D.C., he beat senator William Stanberry with a cane and hired Francis Scott Key as his lawyer in the ensuing trial.'
p4758
aS'This man won one battle by utilizing two artillery guns known as the Twin Sisters.'
p4759
aS'He served two non-consecutive terms in another office, creating a Mirabeau B. Lamar sandwich.'
p4760
aS'He had earlier served as Congressman from Tennessee\'s ninth district, and worked to expose frauds practiced upon the Cherokee, who had adopted this man and named him "The Raven.'
p4761
aS'" For 10 points, name this victor of the Battle of San Jacinto and two-time President of Texas.'
p4762
aS'This man hammered William Stanberry with his hickory cane, an action for which was defended a House trial by Francis Scott Key.'
p4763
aS'The founder of the first school in Tennessee, this man received the Indian name Colleneh, The Raven, from the Cherokee.'
p4764
aS'Heavily wounded in the battle of Horseshoe Bend, he was later a representative from Nacogdoches to the 1833 convention at San Felipe.'
p4765
aS'His most famous military exploit involved the 1836 victory over Santa Anna at San Jacinto.'
p4766
aS'For ten points, identify this first president of the Republic of Texas and namesake of its largest city.'
p4767
aS'man, who was nicknamed "the Big Drunk," withdrew from his residence among the Cherokees after he had beaten up the man who adopted him, Chief John Jolly.'
p4768
aS'He also replaced William Carroll as the Governor of Tennessee, but he was ousted from his position as the governor of another state after he refused to swear allegiance to the Confederacy.'
p4769
aS'Mirabeau Lamar succeeded this man in another position.'
p4770
aS'He forced an enemy to sign the Treaty of Velasco after defeating that enemy, Santa Anna, at the Battle of San Jacinto.'
p4771
aS"For 10 points, identify this man who served as the first president of the Republic of Texas, and who names Texas' largest city."
p4772
aS'Walter Williams and Thomas Sowell organized the Fairmont Conference in a hotel in this city, where black conservatives like Clarence Thomas first gained national attention.'
p4773
aS"This city hosted a 1915 World's Fair which celebrated the completion of the Panama Canal."
p4774
aS"This city housed the headquarters of the Peoples Temple, and in the 1960s it was the site of Compton's Cafeteria Riot."
p4775
aS'Frederick Funston helped save lives during an event in this city that prompted Mayor Eugene Schmitz to decree that police kill any looters on sight.'
p4776
aS'One prominent politician in this city was killed by Dan White, who tried to use the Twinkie defense.'
p4777
aS'George Moscone was its mayor from 1976 until 1978, and it was home to Harvey Milk.'
p4778
aS'For 10 points, name this city which experienced a devastating earthquake in 1906.'
p4779
aS'In this city, attempts to catch a serial killer resulted in the distribution of special "check cards" to citizens matching a description, which could be used to avoid a second police stop.'
p4780
aS"This city's former mayor Art Agnos was wounded during an gun attack by a group of men who first used a machete to kill Quita Hague."
p4781
aS'Manuel Moore, Jesse Lee Cooks, Larry Green, and J.C.X.'
p4782
aS'Simon were convicted of serial killings in this city, where the police dedicated radio channel (*) Z to the case of fourteen killings that occurred along Divisadero Street between October 1973 and April 1974 and were racially charged attacks by black gunmen on random white victims.'
p4783
aS'For 10 points, name this city where the Zebra Murders took place five years before the White Night Riots protested the light sentence given to Dan White for killing George Moscone and Harvey Milk.'
p4784
aS'The Committees of Vigilance organized in this location were later broken up voluntarily after self-declared success, and the Tower of Jewels was built here to celebrate the completion of the Panama Canal.'
p4785
aS'Charles Ellis is attributed with pushing through the construction of one landmark in this city, where Emperor Norton once reigned.'
p4786
aS'Hetch Hetchy Valley was flooded as a result of a project to provide water for this city following one event, and many mansions used to exist on its Nob Hill district.'
p4787
aS'It was where the UN Charter was signed.'
p4788
aS'For 10 points, identify this city rebuilt after a 1906 fire and home to a bright orange structure, the Golden Gate Bridge.'
p4789
aS'Six months after this case, the Supreme Court modified its ruling in Abrams v. US.'
p4790
aS'This case overturned the "bad tendency test" which had been introduced in Patterson v. Colorado twelve years prior, but the court returned to that concept later in Whitney v. California.'
p4791
aS'This case was overturned fifty years later by Brandenburg v. Ohio, which began the policy of "imminent lawless action".'
p4792
aS'The plaintiff in this case, the general secretary of the Socialist Party, was charged with violating the Espionage Act for distributing anti-draft leaflets during World War One.'
p4793
aS'For 10 points, name this 1919 Supreme Court case in which Oliver Wendell Holmes provided the majority opinion in which he used the "shouting fire in a crowded theatre" analogy and placed limitations on the First Amendment with the "clear and present danger" test.'
p4794
aS'One speech in this trial included the remark ""there is never a duel with the truth"" made by Dudley Field Malone.'
p4795
aS'This trial saw questions like ""do you think about things you do think about"" asked during the famous examination of prosecutor William_Jennings_Bryan by the defense attorney Clarence Darrow.'
p4796
aS'For 10 points, name this trial of a high school teacher who taught about evolution.'
p4797
aS'One argument during this event concerned whether the length of a word on a ten-foot-long sign measured one and a half feet long or merely one foot long.'
p4798
aS'The central figure of this event had planned to work as a Ford salesman during the time of this event, and told reporter William Hutchinson that "I was doing something else" the day he was alleged to have violated the Butler Act.'
p4799
aS'H.L.'
p4800
aS'Mencken claimed that "we killed the son of a bitch" upon learning of William_Jennings_Bryan\'s death following this event, which he presumed was due to the constant harassment from defense attorney Clarence Darrow.'
p4801
aS'For 10 points, name this 1925 case in which a Dayton, Tennessee schoolteacher was accused of teaching evolution.'
p4802
aS'This country was known as the Kingdom of Alba for much of the Middle Ages.'
p4803
aS'Its ancient alliance with France was known as the ""Auld Alliance.'
p4804
aS'"" It was known as Caledonia to the Romans, and it was on the losing side at the Battle_of_Culloden in the last of the Jacobite Rebellions.'
p4805
aS'It won independence at the Battle_of_Bannockburn under Robert the Bruce after an unsuccessful rebellion led by William Wallace.'
p4806
aS'For 10 points, name this component of the United Kingdom found north of England with a capital at Edinburgh.'
p4807
aS'An Indian attack on this city in 1856 was thwarted by the sloop Decatur.'
p4808
aS'This city\'s timber boom was centered on a street called Skid Road, possibly the origin of the term "Skid Row.'
p4809
aS'" John Back, a worker at this city\'s Victor Clairmont cabinet company, started its great 1889 fire in a tragic gluing accident.'
p4810
aS'It was shaken by 2001\'s Nisqually Earthquake, and protests surrounding its 1999 World Trade Organization conference were dubbed its namesake "Battle.'
p4811
aS'" This city was Jimi Hendrix\'s childhood home, and it houses the Gehry-designed Experience Music Project.'
p4812
aS"For 10 points, name this home of the 1962 World's Fair, which erected its Space Needle."
p4813
aS"This city's Chinatown was the site of the Wah Mee massacre, and its suburbs include Bainbridge Island and Mercer Island."
p4814
aS"Its neighborhood of First Hill is nicknamed Pill Hill due to a large number of hospitals, while Capitol Hill and the Denny Regrade are two of this city's seven hills."
p4815
aS"Its entire central business district was burnt down in 1889 and it hosted America's first city-wide general strike."
p4816
aS'Boasting a public library designed by Rem Koolhaas, it is also the home of the Bumbershoot Music Festival and has a notable Science Fiction Museum.'
p4817
aS'Surrounded by Kirkland, Bellevue, and Redmond, this seat of King County is situated on Puget Sound.'
p4818
aS'For 10 points, name this birthplace of Starbucks and largest city in Washington State.'
p4819
aS"The greatest Doubletree hotel in the world occupies this city's Arctic Club building, whose facade is lined with terra cotta walrus heads."
p4820
aS"It's not New York, but a flatiron-shaped building in this city is called the Times Square Building."
p4821
aS"Elevator operators still work at this city's oldest skyscraper, the pyramid-capped Smith Tower."
p4822
aS'A library in this city includes a four-story [*] "Book Spiral" that houses its collection along a continuous line.'
p4823
aS"The 1962 World's Fair, was held in this city, prompting the construction of an observation tower that is now located near a Paul Allen-sponsored building resembling a smashed Stratocaster."
p4824
aS"This city's Central Library was designed by Rem Koolhas, and Frank Gehry designed its Experience Music Project."
p4825
aS'For 10 points, name this home of the Space Needle.'
p4826
aS"After this conflict, Milner's Kindergarten oversaw redevelopment."
p4827
aS"At the beginning of this war, Kaiser Wilhelm II sent the Kruger telegram to congratulate defeating the Uitlanders, and the Fawcett Commission investigated Lord Kitchner's concentration camps."
p4828
aS'This war ended with the Treaty of Vereeniging.'
p4829
aS'Causes of this war include the discovery of [*] diamonds at Kimberley, the Great Trek, and the Jameson_Raid.'
p4830
aS'For 10 points, name this war between the United Kingdom, the Orange Free State, and the Transvaal Republic, taking its name from the ethnic Dutch of South_Africa.'
p4831
aS'The first major battle in this war was the Battle of Talana Hill, and one side in this war achieved a pyrrhic victory at the Battle of Modder River under the command of Lord Methuen.'
p4832
aS'One side in this war besieged the garrison of (*) Ladysmith.'
p4833
aS'Another siege in this battle was lifted thanks to the actions of Robert Baden-Powell and took place at Mafeking.'
p4834
aS'Precipitating factors in this war included the Jameson_Raid and ultimatums sent by Joseph Chamberlain and Paul Kruger.'
p4835
aS'For 10 points, name this turn-of-the-century war which took place in South_Africa.'
p4836
aS'One slogan during this war was "remember Majuba Hill".'
p4837
aS'The Battle of Colenso occurred during Black Week before Lord Roberts took command, and the later founder of the Boy Scouts, Robert Baden-Powell, defended Mafeking during this war.'
p4838
aS'The Jameson_Raid helped lead to this war, and Lord Kitchener used a scorched earth policy to combat the guerrila warfare of Generals Jan Smuts and Louis Botha.'
p4839
aS'Ending the independence of the Transvaal and the Orange Free State, For 10 points, name this war between the namesake farmers of Dutch descent and the British in South_Africa.'
p4840
aS'This war is credited as having given birth to the Scorched Earth policy used to combat guerrilla fighters.'
p4841
aS'Once the aggressors nominally controlled most of the territories fought over, the widespread enemy commandos continued harassing their occupants for two hard-fought years before being forced to surrender.'
p4842
aS'The guerrilla phase of the war began in 1900 when President Paul Kruger was forced to flee to Europe.'
p4843
aS'FTP name this South_African war in which Britain annexed the Orange Free State and Transvaal Republic.'
p4844
aS'One incident during this conflict saw Redvers H. Buller ordering troops into regions such as Colenso and the Stormberge mountains, only to see them soundly whipped in a period referred to as "Black Week.'
p4845
aS'" After Bullers\' replacement by Frederick S. Roberts, one side began a string of military victories which culminated in the defeat of Piet Cronje.'
p4846
aS'A precipitating event of this conflict included the actions of Leander Jameson, while another issue of tension revolved around the discovery of gold in the Witwatersrand region.'
p4847
aS'The wrap up to this war saw Horatio Kitchener setting up concentration camps while fending off guerrilla attacks led by men like Jan Botha and Jan Christiaan Smuts.'
p4848
aS'For 10 points, identify this conflict that lasted from 1899 to 1902 that pitted the British against the Dutch-descended Afrikaners in what is now South_Africa.'
p4849
aS'The twelfth resolution at this event, for "the overthrow of the monopoly of the pulpit," was passed on the evening of its second day.'
p4850
aS'A local Hicksite Quaker family, the McClintocks, whom an organizer knew from abolitionist activities, was the inspiration for this event.'
p4851
aS'Though she did not endorse its product, Amelia [*] Bloomer attended this event.'
p4852
aS'Frederick Douglass and Elizabeth Cady Stanton managed to convince Lucretia Mott that the document produced by this event should include a call for suffrage.'
p4853
aS"For 10 points, name this convention held in upstate New York which drafted the Declaration of Sentiments concerning women's suffrage."
p4854
aS'Only the ninth resolution was passed narrowly.'
p4855
aS'Advertised only with an unsigned notice in a county newspaper, it was held in a Wesleyan Methodist church with about 300 attendees.'
p4856
aS'It was convened partly as a result of the World Anti-Slavery meeting in London eight years earlier, and was attended by Frederick Douglass.'
p4857
aS'It was given press by New York Herald editor Gordon Bennet, who in ridicule, published the entire Declaration of Sentiments.'
p4858
aS"Presided over by none other than Lucrecia Mott's husband, FTP name this convention of feminists organized by Elizabeth Cady Stanton in 1848."
p4859
aS'Many of the delegates to this event had previously caused a schism at a Society of Friends meeting, which motivated them to form the core of this events participants.'
p4860
aS'Prior to this event, its organizers had been turned away from a worldwide anti-slavery conference, prompting them to organize it, and it produced a notable Declaration of Sentiments and Resolutions, which among other things, stated that all men and women are created equal.'
p4861
aS'It also produced eleven demands, the ninth of which was the right to vote.'
p4862
aS'For ten points, identify this gathering to discuss womens rights, which was organized by Lucretia Mott and Elizabeth Cady Stanton, and held in the latters New York home.'
p4863
aS'Thomas McClintock helped chair this meeting, which sparked a National Convention two years later in Worcester, Massachusetts and saw speeches by Samuel Tillman and Ansel Bascom.'
p4864
aS'Newspaper editor Gordon Bennet ridiculed this meeting by publishing its proceedings in the New York Herald, and it was sparked by an extension of the state property tax.'
p4865
aS"This meeting was organized at Richard Hunt's tea table in the nearby village of Waterloo and took place in a Wesleyan church."
p4866
aS'The Declaration of Independence was modified to form its namesake Declaration of Sentiments.'
p4867
aS"For ten points, Lucretia Mott and Elizabeth Stanton organized which 1848 convention on women's rights"
p4868
aS'Herodian denounced this man\'s nearly doubling of a soldier\'s pay as pandering to the army, a view which is reinforced by the spread of the title "Mother of the Camps" for his wife and his lifting of a two-century ban on active soldiers getting married.'
p4869
aS'He may have studied under Quintus Cervidius Scaevola alongside his lifelong friend and prominent jurist Papinian.'
p4870
aS'He was accompanied to his place of death, York, by his wife Julia Domna, and had earlier seen military successes at Lugdunum and Issus.'
p4871
aS'This man defeated his rivals Didius Julianus, Pescennius Niger and Clodius Albinus, and deified his predecessor Pertinax to win public support after the chaos of the Year of the Five Emperors, as described by Cassius Dio.'
p4872
aS'For 10 points, name this Roman Emperor who was succeeded by his sons Geta and Caracalla and founded a namesake dynasty.'
p4873
aS'This man defeated such rival claimants as Pescennius Niger and Clodius Albinus after coming to power, and he attempted to forestall palace coups by replacing the entire Praetorian Guard.'
p4874
aS'After the death of this man, his wife Julia Domna exercised great power over his successors.'
p4875
aS'He bade his time as governor of Upper Pannonia during the chaos following the murder of Commodus, eventually using the unavenged death of Pertinax as a pretext to overthrow a rich man who had won the Imperial throne at an auction, Didius Julianus.'
p4876
aS'For 10 points, name this Roman emperor who ruled from 193 to 211 and was the namesake of a group that included Elagabalus, Geta, and Caracalla, the Severan Dynasty.'
p4877
aS'This emperor employed the lawyers Papinian, Paul, and Ulpian, and military reforms under this emperor included a 50% pay increase and the disbanding of the Praetorian Guard.'
p4878
aS'This man led campaigns in Mesopotamia against the Osrhoeni and Adiabeni, and he divided Syria into two provinces in response to a challenge to his rule.'
p4879
aS"He's not Alexander_the_Great, but this man won a Battle of Issus, defeating Pescennius Niger at that site."
p4880
aS'He fought one rival at Tinurtium before finally defeating that man, Clodius Albinus, at Lugdunum.'
p4881
aS'He took power after those two rivals had Pertinax murdered.'
p4882
aS'This emperor, whose family hailed from Africa, was born at Leptis Magna.'
p4883
aS'For 10 points, identify this Roman emperor and founder of a namesake dynasty, who was the father of Geta and Caracalla.'
p4884
aS'Some of the victims of persecutions enacted by this man have come to be known as the martyrs of Madaura.'
p4885
aS'This man served as quaestor on Sardinia after it briefly became a Senatorial province, aiding in a rapid ascent this man achieved thanks to skipping out while the Antonine Plague ravaged Roman bureaucracy.'
p4886
aS'He secured a lasting peace with the Picts and secured control of the Empire after his opponent broke the German legions of Virius Lupus but fell to this man at (*) Lugdumum.'
p4887
aS"Dio Cassius criticized this man's policy of expanding the army and offering them better pay, and after defeating Pescennius Niger and Clodius Albinus, this man became sole survivor after the Year of the Five Emperors."
p4888
aS"Taking control of Rome after the death of Didius Julianus, this man's rise to power began in the wake of the assassination of Pertinax."
p4889
aS'Notably born in Leptis Magna in Libya, FTP, identify this father of Caracalla and Geta, who founded a namesake dynasty of Roman Emperors which lasted until the Crisis of the Third Century.'
p4890
aS'This mans innovations included the buffalo horns formation, and he gradually phased out the use of the assegai.'
p4891
aS'Henry Flynn and Nathaniel Isaacs became acquainted with him and recorded many of his exploits.'
p4892
aS'He instituted a conscription policy known as Impi and first obtained prominence at the Battle of Gqokli Hill.'
p4893
aS'Moshoeshoe was his chief rival, and in addition to proclaiming a three-month fast, he ordered seven thousand people executed upon the death of his mother Nandi, and he was later murdered and succeeded by his half-brother Dingaan.'
p4894
aS'Responsible for the turbulent Mfecane, FTP, name this man whose name translates as "intestinal parasite," an iconic Zulu chieftain.'
p4895
aS"This man's mother lived too close to his father Senzangakona for him to be considered legitimate, and he was exiled after allowing a sheep to die."
p4896
aS'In one instance, he reportedly slaughtered forty oxen and 7000 people, including two girls who were buried alive with his mother, Nandi.'
p4897
aS'He required his army to jog barefoot over thorny ground, introduced the weapons known as the iklwa and the assegai, a formation which involved the "chest," the "loins," and "horns" of the buffalo, and regiments with color-coded shields known as impi.'
p4898
aS'For 10 points, name this man largely responsible for the mfecane in southern Africa, the ruler of the Zulu.'
p4899
aS"Sprigs of hemlock distinguished participants of this event, four of whom died while attempting to attack an arsenal guarded by William Shepard's forces."
p4900
aS'Earlier, its participants, who were known as Regulators, had stopped several court hearings, including one in Springfield.'
p4901
aS'Its aftermath saw John Hancock become Governor.'
p4902
aS'This event demonstrated the weakness of the Articles of Confederation, leading to the drafting of the Constitution.'
p4903
aS'For 10 points, name this 1786 rebellion of poor Massachusetts debtors led by its namesake farmer.'
p4904
aS'Moses Sash was an African-American participant in this event, which was preceded by the Uxbridge Riot, and attorney Caleb Strong defended Jason Parmenter against charges incurred in this event.'
p4905
aS'John Bly and Charles Rose were hanged for participating in this event, which ransacked the home of Theodore Sedgwick, and participants in this event wore sprigs of hemlock in their hats.'
p4906
aS'General William Shepard led the initial resistance to this event, and Luke Day led a militia that joined this uprising.'
p4907
aS'Many of its participants were captured at Petersham and this event doomed the re-election chances of James Bowdoin.'
p4908
aS'For ten points, name this farmer revolt that tried to capture the Springfield Arsenal in Articles of Confederation-era Massachusetts.'
p4909
aS'John Bly and Charles Rose were hung after this event, which one leader stated would lead to a "state of anarchy, confusion, and slavery".'
p4910
aS'Samuel Adams, in response to this event, stated that rebellions in republics should be ended by execution.'
p4911
aS'Its leader was once awarded a ceremonial sword by Lafayette.'
p4912
aS'William Shepherd managed to head off the participants, while Benjamin Lincoln was authorized by Governor John Bowdoin to stop it.'
p4913
aS'Co-lead by Luke Day, this uprising attacked the Springfield Armory.'
p4914
aS'Calling for paper currency and mostly consisting of poor farmers, for 10 points, name this rebellion that resulted in calls for revising the Articles of Confederation, lead by a namesake Massachusetts veteran.'
p4915
aS'One of its goals was to overturn the results of the Gela conference, where Hermocrates had won support for expelling foreigners.'
p4916
aS'Gylippus joined with local horsemen to oppose this initiative, eventually destroying its members at a naval battle in the Great Harbor.'
p4917
aS'Eurymedon and Demosthenes replaced Lamachus and Nicias as the leaders of its 160 ships, which were sent to fortify the Ionians.'
p4918
aS'A faction led by Androcles recalled one of its leaders, who then escaped to Sparta and avoided trial for mutilation of the hermae.'
p4919
aS'FTP, Alcibiades was one of the generals originally in charge of what planned assault on Syracuse, an Athenian fiasco of the Peloponnesian War'
p4920
aS'One side sought the allegiance of Camarina during this event, and locations of this conflict include the Lysimeleian Marshes, the cliffs of Epipolae, and the Great Harbor.'
p4921
aS'Toward the end of this event, one side was attacked while resting at the Assinarus River, and it was sparked by the appeal from Segesta.'
p4922
aS'This event was opposed by the general Hermocrates and the arrival of Demosthenes was negated by the arrival of Gylippus at Himera, and this event was preceded by the mutilation of the hermai the night before.'
p4923
aS'Breaking the Peace of Nicias and lead by Nicias, Lamachus, and Alcibiades, for 10 points, identify this ill-fated attempt to take Syracuse by the Athenians during the Peloponnesian War.'
p4924
aS"The Elymians were early settlers, but not natives, of this location, and they tried to contain Megara Hyblaea's colony of Selinus."
p4925
aS"Once they realized their strife was opening themselves to domination by this location's hegemon, both parties to civil conflict in Leontini together sought an alliance with Athens, as did the Elymians of Segesta, where the Second Servile War began three centuries later."
p4926
aS'Sextus Pompey was based in this location during his war with Octavian, and the Battle of the (*) Aegates Islands was fought over control of this location.'
p4927
aS"One text that concerns this location alludes to the abandonment of the countryside that followed violations of a 10% limit on tenant taxation, the Law of Hiero, reducing Roman revenue in the long run; that allegation is brought forward in Cicero's prosecution of this island province's governor Gaius Verres."
p4928
aS'The tyrants Gelon and Theron together kept this island free of Carthaginian intervention at the Battle of Himera.'
p4929
aS'For 10 points, name this island that became a province following the First Punic War.'
p4930
aS'that Emperor Constans II would move the capital from Constantinople to this island led to his death.'
p4931
aS'Although not Egypt, its Aghlabid Dynasty was replaced by the Fatimids.'
p4932
aS'A civil war in this place ended via the Treaty of Caltabellota, while Muslim rule of this place ended with the invasion of a man who would fight Alexius Comnenus at Dyrrhachium and had Bohemund as his son.'
p4933
aS'In addition to Robert Guiscard, in 1282, this place experienced its namesake (*) Vespers.'
p4934
aS'Featuring cities such as Messina and its capital Palermo along with Syracuse, for 10 points, name this island south of Italy.'
p4935
aS"After this man's death, his personal papers were organized by his aide, Daniel O'Leary, who also wrote a thirty-four volume history of this man's military career."
p4936
aS'This man received weapons from Alexandre Petion and allied himself with the Belgian merchant Luis Brion, who supplied this man with ships.'
p4937
aS'That support allowed this man and a band of exiled soldiers to make a successful amphibious landing at Los Cayos.'
p4938
aS"General Soublette was one of this man's most important deputies."
p4939
aS'This man\'s first military offensive is called the "Admirable Campaign", which failed.'
p4940
aS'This man\'s "Decree of War to the Death" helped him defeat Field Marshal de la Torre after returning from Jamaica, where he wrote a notable letter.'
p4941
aS'For ten points, name this victor of the Battles of Carabobo and Boyaca, the liberator of South America.'
p4942
aS'This leader called for citizens to "avenge the dead" after his general Francisco de Miranda had surrendered.'
p4943
aS"This leader's Panamanian congress failed."
p4944
aS'He was opposed by Jose Tomas Boves, whose group of llaneros was known as the "Legion of Hell." This author of the Cartegena ["carta-hena"] Manifesto  met with Jose de San Martin at Guayaquil ["gua-ya-keel"], inspiring him to win the battle of Ayacucho.'
p4945
aS'This man was victorious at both Carabobo and Boyaca, where he surprised Spanish troops by crossing the Andes Mountains.'
p4946
aS'For 10 points, name this "Liberator" of South America.'
p4947
aS"One of this man's works, written after an earthquake, detailed his opposition to the Council of Regency."
p4948
aS'This author of the Cartagena Manifesto won the Battle of Los Horcones during his Admirable Campaign, in which he also issued the Decree of War to the Death.'
p4949
aS'This man met with Jose de San Martin at the Guayaquil Conference, and his lieutenant, Jose de Sucre, won the Battle of Ayacucho, after this man won the Battle of Carabobo.'
p4950
aS'For 10 points, name this president of Gran Columbia, South America\'s "Liberator."'
p4951
aS'21 (Tiebreaker).'
p4952
aS'This man was put in charge of the prison fort of Puerto Cabello [cah-BEY-oh] by Francisco de Miranda.'
p4953
aS'This man appealed for help with his most famous cause in his Letter from Jamaica.'
p4954
aS"Earthquakes and Catholicism were cited as causes for the fall of his country's First Republic in his(*) Cartagena [CAR-tah-HAY-na] Manifesto, and he broke with Jose de San Martin at the Guayaquil [guay-ah-KEEL] Conference."
p4955
aS'This man won the Battle of Boyaca, liberating Colombia, and he won the Battle of Carabobo in his own country.'
p4956
aS'For 10 points, name this Venezuelan revolutionary, namesake of a country with capitals at Sucre and La Paz.'
p4957
aS'As a result of the prevention of revisions to the Cucuta constitution, he declared himself dictator, and Manuela Saenz saved him from assassins soon after.'
p4958
aS'He argued that one should not adopt the best government, but the most likely to suceeed and elaborated on his fear of pardocracy in the Jamaica Letter, and in Guayaquil he met up with Jose de San Martin.'
p4959
aS'His forces were betrayed at the port of Puerto Cabello, which saw the capture of Francisco de Miranda, but he later garnered victories at Boyaca, Pichincha, and Ayacucho.'
p4960
aS'FTP, identify this South American Liberator.'
p4961
aS'This man returned his country to the gold standard while Chancellor of the Exchequer under Stanley Baldwin.'
p4962
aS'Herbert Asquith appointed this man First Lord of the Admiralty, though he later resigned from that position after the disastrous Gallipoli campaign.'
p4963
aS'This man promised to "fight them on the beaches" and proclaimed that (*) "this was their finest hour" during the Battle of Britain.'
p4964
aS'During a speech in Fulton, Missouri, this man claimed that an "iron curtain" had descended over Europe.'
p4965
aS'He was preceded in his highest position by Neville Chamberlain and succeeded by Clement Attlee.'
p4966
aS'For ten points, identify this Prime Minister who led the UK through World_War_II.'
p4967
aS'This man wrote the definitive biography of the duke of Marlborough.'
p4968
aS'He introduced labor exchanges and industry-specific minimum wages as president of the Board of Trade.'
p4969
aS'That led to his promotion to First Lord of the Admiralty, where he orchestrated the disastrous Gallipoli campaign.'
p4970
aS'During his ""wilderness years,"" he denounced the Munich Pact, which lent him credibility when he promised to ""fight them on the beaches.'
p4971
aS'"" For 10 points, name this Prime Minister who succeeded Neville Chamberlain and led the U.K. for most of World_War_II.'
p4972
aS"This man's first cabinet post was as President of the Board of Trade, where he instituted his country's first minimum wage."
p4973
aS'Late in his life, he concentrated on writing a History of the English-Speaking Peoples.'
p4974
aS'He was disgraced when he counseled his friend Edward VIII during the Abdication Crisis.'
p4975
aS'This attendant of the Yalta Conference gave the "finest hour" speech.'
p4976
aS'He replaced the signer of the Munich Pact, Neville Chamberlain, in his highest post, in which capacity he oversaw the Battle of Britain.'
p4977
aS'For 10 points, name this Prime Minister of the UK during World_War_II.'
p4978
aS'The rule of a dynasty in this modern-day country was interrupted for more than sixty years by a revolt started by the Mac family.'
p4979
aS'Christoforo Borri observed the dynamic in this country between two rival ruling families, which both agreed to a 100-year truce in 1673.'
p4980
aS'Both of those families in this country were defeated a little over a century later in a rebellion started by three brothers.'
p4981
aS"The Jesuit missionary Alexandre de Rhodes developed this country's Latin-based script."
p4982
aS'A dynasty in this country was ended by the Tay Son rebellion.'
p4983
aS"During China's Han_Dynasty, Ma Yuan defeated an uprising in this country led by the Trung sisters."
p4984
aS'For 10 points, name this Southeast Asian country where Bao Dai served as the final emperor of the French-supported Nguyen Dynasty.'
p4985
aS'One of this nations early epics was The Legend of the Magic Crossbow, and this nation was temporarily ruled by a pair of rebellious sisters in the first century.'
p4986
aS'The Twelve Lords Uprising occurred after the death of one ruler of this nation, while the Champa kingdom existed here until its conquest by the Ly dynasty.'
p4987
aS'This nations second war with the Song ended with an amphibious assault at Cau, and it nation repelled its third Mongol invasion at the Battle of Bach Dang River.'
p4988
aS'This countrys final period of dynastic rule began after the defeat of Tay Son rebels by Gia Long.'
p4989
aS'Also the subject of the Paris Peace Accords, this countrys final emperor was Bao Dai, who was succeeded by Prime Minister Ngo Dinh Diem.'
p4990
aS'FTP, name this country with capital at Ho Chi Minh City.'
p4991
aS'The Au Lac kingdom, creator of the Co Loa Citadel, is one of the earliest known powers in what is now this nation.'
p4992
aS'Two heroes of this nation are the Trung sisters, who repelled for three years the dominance of the regional power to the north.'
p4993
aS"That power was again ousted by the Khuc family in the tenth century, pushing the Tang_Dynasty rulers out of the Annam region, now part of this nation's north."
p4994
aS'It was eventually colonized by the French in the mid-19th century, with their control lasting until a 1954 siege.'
p4995
aS'Dien Bien Phu saw the end of French power in, FTP, what Southeast Asian nation with capitol at Hanoi'
p4996
aS'This nation\'s leaders included a man who received the mythical sword "Heaven\'s Will" from a golden turtle.'
p4997
aS'This nation repeatedly sacked the city of Vijaya, the capital of the Champa.'
p4998
aS'At the battle of Bach Dang River, this nation repelled a Mongol invasion.'
p4999
aS'This nation looks back to the rebellion of the Trung sisters for inspiration.'
p5000
aS'A monk in this country was photographed setting himself on fire a few years after it defeated French colonial forces at the battle of Dien Bien Phu.'
p5001
aS'For 10 points, name this Southeast Asian nationality once ruled by the Nguyen ("ngWIN") dynasty, whose communist north captured Saigon and renamed it Ho Chi Minh City.'
p5002
aS'During this dynasty, Qunzhu replaced Gungzhu as the major seaport.'
p5003
aS'The second emperor of this dynasty conquered W Yu before capturing Ti yun to end the Northern Hn dynasty.'
p5004
aS'The Chinese first used paper money and Zh X founded Neo-Confucianism during this dynasty, which also featured the first extensive use of the Imperial civil service to pick qualified bureaucrats and the reform minded chancellor Wng nsh.'
p5005
aS'Originally troubled by the Khitans under the Lio, the Jurchens soon proved to be a much greater threat.'
p5006
aS"The Jurchen Jn dynasty's sack of Bin jng or Kifng forced the evacuation of the capital to Hngzhu, which chronologically divides this dynasty into a Northern and a Southern part."
p5007
aS'For 10 points, name this dynasty founded by Tiz that followed the Tng Dynasty and was destroyed by the Mongols.'
p5008
aS'In this modern-day country, aristocratic scions were devoted to the Buddha Miruk while learning Five Precepts for Laity at the "Way of Flower Youth" school.'
p5009
aS'In the fifteenth century, seven schools of Buddhism in this country were outlawed, leaving only the "doctrinal" and "meditational" schools.'
p5010
aS'In the twentieth century, its Association for the Study of Buddha-Dharma, or Won, attracted many popular adherents, though academics tended to stay in the Chogye school.'
p5011
aS'This country\'s theologians offer a synthesis known as "interpenetrated Buddhism," and its recent leaders have converted many Buddhist temples into vacation resorts or museums as Christianity has become the plurality religion here.'
p5012
aS'For 10  points, name this country whose independence leaders often painted Buddhism as a tool of Japanese colonization, and where the Unification Church was founded.'
p5013
aS"The son of a leader of this country sued the makers of the film The President's Last Bang, which depicts that leader as a libertine."
p5014
aS'This country used criminals as "Unit 684," which was a black ops team trained to assassinate an enemy leader.'
p5015
aS"In October 1979, a president of this country was killed by his security chief while inside the Blue House compound; that man's daughter leads the Saenuri Party."
p5016
aS'One president\'s peaceful foreign policy was known as the "Sunshine Policy."'
p5017
aS"First led by (*) Syngman Rhee, this country's Third Republic was started by Park Chung-hee."
p5018
aS"Former president Kim Dae-Jung won the Nobel Peace Prize for his efforts to reconcile with this country's northern neighbor."
p5019
aS'For 10 points, name this Asian country separated by the DMZ from its Communist northern neighbor.'
p5020
aS"George Steer's reporting for The Times helped foster international outrage for an incident during this conflict."
p5021
aS'A key siege during this war saw a woman called "Passionflower" give the non-French "They shall not pass!"'
p5022
aS'speech.'
p5023
aS'One side in this war sent 510 tons of gold to Moscow soon after its outbreak, saw one of its cities destroyed in Operation RA1/4gen, and lost the bloody Battle of Teruel.'
p5024
aS'A clandestine faction working against that side within its cities was given the name "fifth column" by a general in this war who soon died in a plane crash, Emilio Mola.'
p5025
aS"This war, in which Republican forces were crushed at the Battle of the Ebro, also included the Condor Legion's bombing of the Basque city of Guernica."
p5026
aS"For 10 points, name this 1930s conflict won by Francisco Franco's fascists."
p5027
aS'One leader in this conflict became was a woman who always dressed in black and became known as "The Passionflower," who described her sloganeering campaigns in the autobiography They Shall Not Pass.'
p5028
aS'Disunity on one side of this clash was exemplified by the recalcitrant POUM movement, and some of its largest battles were at Teruel and Jarama.'
p5029
aS'Starting as a political dispute between the Popular Front and the Falangists, this war was the source of the phrase "fifth column" and included the American Abraham_Lincoln Brigades.'
p5030
aS'For 10 points, name this conflict of the 1930s which brought Francisco Franco to power.'
p5031
aS'Despite having knowledge of the exact start time of this event, 5 AM on July 19, a police chief decided to lie about it rather than distribute arms.'
p5032
aS'Felix Morrow wrote the first American study of one part of it, and Hugh Thomas and Philip Knightly argued against George Steers interpretation of another part of it.'
p5033
aS'A group led by Robert Merriman first saw action at the Jarama Valley in this war, that Abraham_Lincoln Brigade was one of several International Brigades organized by Comintern to fight the Falange.'
p5034
aS'For 10 points, name this 1936-1939 war in which the Popular Front government was overthrown by Franco, which included the bombing of Guernica.'
p5035
aS'Among the volunteers who fought in it were a group of Americans known as the Abraham_Lincoln Battalion, which made up a portion of the International Brigades.'
p5036
aS'A Popular Front government bent on keeping Fascists out could not prevent rebels from taking the Balearics and Santander, and at the end, Premier Juan Negrin was exiled.'
p5037
aS'The Republicans received aid from the Soviet Union, but with tanks and troops from Italy and Nazi Germany, the forces of General Francisco Franco were victorious.'
p5038
aS'FTP, identify this conflict fought entirely within a country that borders Portugal and France.'
p5039
aS"Eoin O'Duffy sent his Irish Blueshirts to aid one side in this conflict, while the insumisos resisted this conflict."
p5040
aS'The Battle of Teruel was an important turning point in this conflict, which also saw the fortification of the XYZ Line in the south of the territory of one combatant.'
p5041
aS'Slightly before Bilbao fell in this conflict, General Mola was killed, and his side retaliated with the brutal taking of Santander.'
p5042
aS'The other side on this conflict had its territory separated and tried to reconnect it with the Battle of the Ebro.'
p5043
aS'One nation sent the Corpo Truppe Volontarie to aid one side in this conflict, while Germany sent its Condor Legion, which led to the bombing of a town in the Basque Country, Guernica.'
p5044
aS'For ten points, identify this conflict between the Nationalist and the Royalists, which ended with the establishment of Francisco Franco as a dictator.'
p5045
aS'A story about this war featured a "messenger from God" praying for enemy soldiers to be torn "to bloody sheds" and is titled "The War Prayer."'
p5046
aS'Before war was declared, Vermont Senator Redfield Proctor declared his travels had shown him "the worst misgovernment" and "barbarity" he had seen.'
p5047
aS'A cartoon mocking it featured two men pushing blocks labeled "War" while wearing the smocks of the Yellow Kid.'
p5048
aS'Prior to this war, (*) newspapers labeled Valeriano Weyler the "Butcher," and the Teller Amendment promised the U.S. would not annex land.'
p5049
aS'Called "a splendid little war" by John Hay, its decisive battle was won by George Dewey at Manila Bay.'
p5050
aS"For 10 points, name this 1898 war sparked by the explosion of the Maine, in which Teddy Roosevelt's Rough Riders won the Battle of San Juan Hill."
p5051
aS'During this war, an amphibious invasion at Apra Harbor was successfully executed by Captain Henry Glass.'
p5052
aS'Alyn Capron and Hamilton Fish were officers killed early in this war, before the United_States adopted its successful "fireteam" tactics.'
p5053
aS'This war followed the (*) "Ten Years War", in which "reconcentration camps" were controversially used by General Weyler, nicknamed "The Butcher.'
p5054
aS'" General Nelson Miles led a successful invasion during this war.'
p5055
aS"Commodore Dewey won this war's Battle of Manila Bay, while the Battle of San Juan Hill saw a charge by the Rough Riders."
p5056
aS'For ten points, name this war in which the United_States liberated Guam, Cuba, and other colonies of a country with capital at Madrid.'
p5057
aS'The western theatre of this conflict saw Wesley Miller become a military governor after the opposing fleet was wiped out by Commodore George Dewey.'
p5058
aS'"Fightin\' Joe" Wheeler led an attempted charge on Santiago during this "splendid little war.'
p5059
aS'" William Randolph Hearst\'s "yellow journalism" inflamed support for this conflict after the explosion of the Maine.'
p5060
aS'Theodore_Roosevelt led the Rough Riders at San Juan Hill during this war.'
p5061
aS'For 10 points, name this 1890s war that led to the American annexation of the Philippines, Puerto_Rico, and Cuba.'
p5062
aS'A territory invaded during this war asked to borrow gunpowder to salute a ship that had come to conquer it.'
p5063
aS'One island invaded in this war had been overseen by the "Butcher" Weyler.'
p5064
aS'An admiral in this war stated "You may (*) fire when you are ready," prior to beginning the Battle of Manila Bay.'
p5065
aS'One battle in this "splendid little war" saw San Juan Hill charged upon by the Rough Riders and Teddy Roosevelt.'
p5066
aS"Hearst's and Pulitzer's yellow journalism as well as the explosion of the USS Maine helped instigate this war."
p5067
aS'For 10 points, name this war which led to the capture of the Philippines, Puerto_Rico, and Cuba by the United_States.'
p5068
aS"This territory's Eurypontid dynasty included Agesilaus II, who was one of the commanders at the second Battle of Mantinea."
p5069
aS'That dynasty included several rulers named Archidamus.'
p5070
aS'This city-state practically ceased to exist following the loss of its ruler Cleomenes III at the Battle of Sellasia to the forces of an Achaean League.'
p5071
aS'The law-giver of this city-state was Lycurgus.'
p5072
aS'Another ruler of this city-state was Leonidas, who died at the Battle of Thermopylae.'
p5073
aS'For 10 points, name this Greek city-state that fought Athens in the Peloponnesian War.'
p5074
aS"Youths armed with knives were instructed to kill anyone found outside at night as part of this city's annual tradition of Krypteia."
p5075
aS'In one conflict, Syracuse was defended by Gylippus, a general from this city whose governing bodies included a council of elders known as the gerousia.'
p5076
aS'Its two (*) jointly ruling kings were overseen by the five ephors.'
p5077
aS'A force from this city lost to Epaminondas and Sacred Band of Thebes at Leuctra, and its admiral Lysander won at Aegospotami.'
p5078
aS"This city's most notable battle saw Leonidas hold off an army of Persians at Thermopylae."
p5079
aS'For ten points, identify this Greek city-state that fought against Athens in the Peloponnesian War.'
p5080
aS'Land redistribution in the later days of this polity was led by Agis IV and Cleomenes III, who was defeated at the Battle of Sellasia.'
p5081
aS'A general from this state, Pausanius, defeated Xerxes I at the Battle of Plataea.'
p5082
aS'Its legendary first king was Lacedaemon, and elected officials in this state were known as the ephors.'
p5083
aS'Reforms by the perhaps-fictional lawgiver Lycurgus instituted its militant society.'
p5084
aS'For 10 points, name this Greek city-state and rival of Athens in the Peloponnesian war, the hometown of Leonidas and the 300 men who defended Thermopylae.'
p5085
aS'This event, which was funded by the United_States Office of Naval Research, had 24 participants who were divided into two groups.'
p5086
aS'The chief organizer of this event provided wooden batons, mirrored sunglasses, and uniforms to its participants.'
p5087
aS'The man who ran this event reflected upon it in writing The Lucifer Effect, which uses lessons from this event to discuss the atrocities at Abu Ghraib.'
p5088
aS'For 10 points, name this infamous experiment that attempted to investigate causes of abuse in penitentiaries, the brainchild of Philip Zimbardo.'
p5089
aS"In 2007, this country's president resigned following rape allegations."
p5090
aS"The current prime minister of this nation is the brother of a man who died during a 1976 hostage operation at Uganda's Entebbe Airport."
p5091
aS'Diplomatic talks involving this nation have recently stalled following an increase in settlement construction.'
p5092
aS'In May 2010 this nation was at the center of controversy following a botched raided on a Turkish organized flotilla.'
p5093
aS'For 10 points, name this nation currently led by Benjamin Netanyahu.'
p5094
aS'This man claimed that the doctrine of popular sovereignty could coexist with the Dred Scott decision during an explanation of his Freeport Doctrine.'
p5095
aS'This man led a faction of a party whose other faction was led by John C. Breckenridge in the 1860 presidential election.'
p5096
aS'Known as ""The Little Giant,"" this politician was instrumental getting the Kansas-Nebraska_Act passed.'
p5097
aS'For 10 points, name this Democratic Illinois Senator who engaged in a famous series of debates in 1858 with Abraham_Lincoln.'
p5098
aS"This man's Presidential campaign was the first managed by the Jew August Belmont."
p5099
aS"This man's first political office was as prosecutor of Morgan County, and he was first elected to Congress while serving on his state's Supreme Court."
p5100
aS'In the Galesburg (*) declaration, this man stated his belief that the Declaration of Independence did not mean to include blacks.'
p5101
aS'This man was responsible for breaking the Compromise_of_1850 into separate bills.'
p5102
aS'This articulator of the Freeport Doctrine also authored a proposal that was mocked as "squatter sovereignty", the Kansas-Nebraska_Act.'
p5103
aS'For ten points, name this "Little Giant" from Illinois, who lost the 1860 Presidential Election and famously debated Abraham_Lincoln.'
p5104
aS'This Vermont native\'s political positions included head of House and then Senate committees on territories, in which capacity he gave a speech telling opponents of expansion that "you cannot fetter the limbs of this young giant.'
p5105
aS'" His support for expansion led him to favor repeal of the Missouri Compromise and he answered the Dred Scott decision by supporting popular sovereignty in what became known as the Freeport Doctrine.'
p5106
aS'For 10 points, name this man who ran for president against John Bell, John C. Breckenridge and Abraham_Lincoln, against the last of whom he had held a famous series of debates in Illinois.'
p5107
aS'An army from this country won the 1513 Battle of Novara, giving this country temporary control of\\n Milan.'
p5108
aS"The Field of Rutli is considered the place where this country was founded, and was also the site of a\\n 1940 rally led by General Henri Guisan, who commanded this country's forces during World_War_II."
p5109
aS'Early\\n in its history, this country won the Battle of Mortgarten, preventing its annexation by the Habsburgs.'
p5110
aS'The\\n Kapel Wars were fought between Catholics and Protestants in this country, which is home to several\\n valleys where Romansch is spoken.'
p5111
aS'This country is currently composed of 26 cantons.'
p5112
aS'For 10 points, name\\n this Alpine country in Europe, known for its neutrality.'
p5113
aS"Arthur Hoffman was forced to resign from this country's government after Robert Grimm claimed he was acting on this country's authority."
p5114
aS'This country brokered an agreement concerning where artillery fire could be aimed around the Stelvino Pass.'
p5115
aS'The deliverer of the Rutlirapport speech, Henry Guisan designed its fortification systems, including the Fortress Saint-Maurice and an initial line along its northern border.'
p5116
aS'One plan for invading this country was named Operation Tannenbaum, and this country was accused of aiding Germany by continuing to trade jewel sights and gold during World_War_II.'
p5117
aS'Defensive plans for this country included falling back to the St. Gotthard pass and a massive mobilization in 1940 to deter Nazi invasion.'
p5118
aS'For 10 points, identify this country that, nonetheless, remained neutral during both World Wars.'
p5119
aS'One author from this country wrote a work about a sculptor attempting to maintain the identity of James White, and another work about UNESCO engineer Walter Faber.'
p5120
aS'Another author from this country wrote a novel whose title painter falls in love with both the widow Judith and the Counts daughter Dorothea.'
p5121
aS'The home of the authors of Im Not Stiller and Green Henry also produced the author of a play in which Dr. von Zahnd looks over patients who call themselves Newton and Einstein.'
p5122
aS'It is also the setting of a work whose title character, the son of Walter Furst, helps Baumgarten escape and saves his son from prison for refusing to bow to Gesslers cap.'
p5123
aS'For 10 points, name this country, the home of Max Frisch, Gottfried Keller, Friedrich Durrenmatt, and the local hero William Tell.'
p5124
aS'A civil war within this country, known as the Raron Affair, resulted in the plundering of Sion via the Sanetsch Pass.'
p5125
aS'This country enhanced its autonomy with victories over the Hapsburgs at Morgarten and Sempach, and it attained roughly its current size in the 1500s by annexing Ticino.'
p5126
aS"It survived the Thirty_Years'_War in part because all sides hired its mercenaries, and during that time it converted to Protestantism under the leadership of Huldrych_Zwingli."
p5127
aS'For 10 points, name this country whose canton of Uri was home to William Tell.'
p5128
aS"This country's early railways include the spiral tunnels of the Gotthard line, and its Glacier Express railroad has a terminus at St. Moritz."
p5129
aS'This home of the vineyard terraces at Lavaux ("luh-VOE") is home to a castle where Lord Byron\'s poem "The Prisoner of Chillon" is set.'
p5130
aS'This country hosts the yearly World Economic Forum at Davos.'
p5131
aS'This country includes about eighty thousand speakers of Romansh, its fourth official language.'
p5132
aS'For 10 points, name this landlocked European country home to Lake Lucerne, whose Alps include the north face of the Matterhorn.'
p5133
aS'During the Expedition of the Ten Thousand, Sosis led three hundred hoplites from this city, whose lower class, known as the Killichiroi, expelled its ruling Gamoroi.'
p5134
aS'A Deinomenid leader of this city won a battle partly by sending troops to pose as allies from the city of Selinus; that leader was Gelo.'
p5135
aS'Gylippus was enlisted to defend this city, which was besieged by Marcus Claudius Marcellus in 214 BCE.'
p5136
aS'A Corinthian named (*) Timoleon became a ruler of this city that sparked the First Punic War by defeating the Mamertines.'
p5137
aS'This city was once led by Hiero II and won the battle of Himera against Hamilcar I.'
p5138
aS'This city, home to two tyrants named Dionysius, was the main target of an expedition led by Nicias which ended in a crushing defeat for Athens during the Peloponnesian War.'
p5139
aS'For 10 points, name this Corinthian colony, a large city on Sicily.'
p5140
aS'A ruler of this city tortured prisoners in a cave known as his "ear" and drank himself to death after his play Ransom of Hector won a prize.'
p5141
aS'Citizens of this non-Athens city could be banished by a system of votes written on leaves, called petalism.'
p5142
aS"This city's celebration of a festival for Artemis allowed Romans under Marcus Claudius Marcellus to infiltrate and capture it."
p5143
aS'This city defeated Asdrubal at the Crimissus under the command of Timoleon, decades after beating Carthage at the battle of Himera.'
p5144
aS'Tyrants of this city included Agathocles, Dionysius the Elder, and Hiero II, who legendarily commissioned a resident of this city to build a death ray and a mechanical claw to resist the Romans.'
p5145
aS'For 10 points, name this Sicilian city that was home to Archimedes.'
p5146
aS'The citadel of this city was known as the Island.'
p5147
aS'Its approach was defended by fortifications on the Epipolae Plateau.'
p5148
aS'A man considered a savior of this city defeated Hicetes and had earlier killed his brother Timophanes.'
p5149
aS'A ruler of this city besieged Motya and captured Rhegium.'
p5150
aS'Timoleon fought to free this city, which won the Battle of Himera under the tyrant Gelon.'
p5151
aS'The Spartan general Gyllipus defended this city from Athenians under Nicias during an expedition in the Peloponnesian War, and it was originally a Corinthian colony.'
p5152
aS'It was also ruled by two tyrants named Dionysius.'
p5153
aS'After the death of its ruler Hieron II, it was captured by Marcus Claudius Marcellus, whose forces killed its resident, Archimedes.'
p5154
aS'For 10 points, name this important Greek city located on Sicily.'
p5155
aS'Colonists from this city founded the town of Kamarina in Epirus.'
p5156
aS'A mob of aristrocrats from this city killed Tyndarion, who was attempting to become its tyrant with the support of the poor.'
p5157
aS'One ruler of this city expelled a foreign tyrant named Hicetas before winning the Battle of the Crimissus River; that man, Timoleon of Corinth, brought democracy to this city.'
p5158
aS"This city won the Battle of Himera under Gelon, who became ruler of this city after intervening in a civil war between its Killichiori and Gamoroi factions, the latter of which traced themselves to this city's founder, Archias."
p5159
aS'Hermocrates was a general from this city who organized an alliance to defend it from Athens, and its other rulers include two Hierons and two Dionysiuses.'
p5160
aS'For ten points, name this home of Archemedes, a Greek city-state on Sicily.'
p5161
aS'It was damaged by earthquakes in the 16th and 17th century, and by Operation Husky.'
p5162
aS'It was home to Ibn Hamdis, who was born there during a period of Muslim occupation.'
p5163
aS'Under the leadership of Gelo and later, Hieron, arts flourished, and his theater attracted the "tenth muse" and a tragedian who wrote The Women of Aetna in his honor.'
p5164
aS'A colony of Corinth, it waged war with Carthage, only to ally with Carthage against Rome in the Second Punic War.'
p5165
aS"It withstood a Roman siege due, in part, to an inhabitant's Claw, who was killed when the city was finally taken."
p5166
aS'For 10 points, name this city, where Sappho lived in exile, and home to Archimedes, located on the island of Sicily.'
p5167
aS'Like Morocco, this country saw nationwide protests on its March 2011 "Day of Dignity." In June, this nation\'s town of Jisr al-Shughour [Jiss-ER AL shu-GH-ur] was attacked by rebel gangs who killed 120 people.'
p5168
aS"This country's security forces responded by encircling the city with tanks and killing civilians."
p5169
aS'In November, the Arab League (*) levied harsh economic sanctions on this country.'
p5170
aS"Violent protests currently are taking place in this country's cities of Hama, Daraa, and Homs."
p5171
aS'For ten points, name this country run by the dictator Bashar al-Assad, the capital of which is Damascus.'
p5172
aS'Its leader is still revered in the tradition of the Hakka, the migratory people from which he came.'
p5173
aS'Its latter stages were initially suppressed by Frederick Ward, who was succeeded by a more famous individual.'
p5174
aS'After stalling as a result of imperial resistance organized by the scholar Guofan, it came to an end at the hands of the "Ever-Victorious Army" and Charles Gordon.'
p5175
aS'It was led by Hong Xiuquan, who was inspired by Protestant missionary tracts and proclaimed a "Heavenly Kingdom of Great Peace.'
p5176
aS'"  FTP, name this religious rebellion that began in 1852 in China.'
p5177
aS'Issachar J. Roberts, the Southern Baptist who inspired this movement, refused to baptize its leader, though he had been the first missionary to depart Macau, one year after the British arrived nearby.'
p5178
aS"When Yang Xiuqing, its minister of state, threatened to usurp the leader's title, he was killed by General Wei Changgui, who was then himself assassinated."
p5179
aS'It was put down by Tsing Kuofan, who took Nanking after Frederick Townsend Ward, Charles Gordon, and the Ever-Victorious Army had kept its adherents out of Shanghai.'
p5180
aS'FTP, name this "Heavenly Kingdom of Great Peace," an uprising against the Qing dynasty led by Hong Xiuquan.'
p5181
aS'One of this movements leaders was slowly dismembered on the banks of the Dadu River; that leader had earlier plotted with the North King Wei Changhui to kill its military commander Yang Xiuqing.'
p5182
aS'Areas it controlled saw even married couples separated by sex, as well as the banning of foot-binding.'
p5183
aS'This conflicts Battle of Cixi saw the death of Frederick Ward, and Zeng Guofans Xiang Army took its capital of Nanjing.'
p5184
aS'It was led by the supposed younger brother of Jesus, Hong Xiuquan, but was not able to dislodge the Qing Dynasty from power.'
p5185
aS'For 10 points, identify this Chinese rebellion, notably featuring Charles Gordons Ever Victorious Army.'
p5186
aS'It attempted to implement such changes as the banning of private property and the shift to a solar calendar, and one theory holds that the game of Mah-jongg was created during it by bored army officers.'
p5187
aS'Its king was eventually dethroned by the Xiang Army led by Zeng Guofan and Zuo Zongtang, a man more famously known as General Tso.'
p5188
aS'Its leader, a member of the Hakka ethnic group, added a third book to its official Bible.'
p5189
aS"FTP, name this rebellion whose leader, Hong Xiuquan, believed he was Jesus Christ's younger brother, an uprising that was finally suppressed in 1871 by forces including Charles Gordon's Ever-Victorious Army."
p5190
aS'Based at Thistle Mountain, its leaders included Shi Dakai.'
p5191
aS'Dakai wanted to preserve this movements ideological base, a mixture of traditional myths like the Jade Emperor and the tracts of Issachar Roberts, as well as the identity of the Hakka people from whom the movements leader sprung.'
p5192
aS'After its capture of Nanjing, the segregation of the citys population by sex and the reform of society along nominally Christian lines began, but slowed as endemic warfare limited the regimes actions for the rest of the 1850s.'
p5193
aS'For 10 points, name this most potent rebellion against the Qing [CHING] Dynasty, led by Hong Xiuquan, which killed tens of millions in the name of the Heavenly Kingdom of Great Peace.'
p5194
aS'Its natives, of Malay-Polynesian descent, once called it Pakan, but these "Hakka" are dominated by the 15% of the population from the mainland.'
p5195
aS'Its modern history goes back to the day when Jan van Linschoten exclaimed "what a beautiful island!'
p5196
aS'" Now, its relations with the US are maintained through TECRO.'
p5197
aS'In 2000, it underwent a peaceful transfer of power to the Democratic Progressive Party.'
p5198
aS"The Pescadores islands aren't part of its province of Fujian, but  Quemoy and Matsu are."
p5199
aS'FTP, name this island nation "temporarily occupied on behalf of the Allied forces" after World War two, which lost its UN seat to China in 1971, and whose capital is Taipei.'
p5200
aS'This ruler won the Battle of Balkh, and his tomb was discovered by Mikhail Gerasimov.'
p5201
aS"This ruler destroyed Sarai and Astrakhan after he was betrayed by Tokhtamysh's Golden_Horde, and this man's son Shah Rukh helped him defeat Bayezid I at the Battle of Ankara."
p5202
aS'He died before he could fulfill his plans of conquering (*) China.'
p5203
aS"He sacked Delhi in 1398, and after conquering Damascus and Baghdad, he allegedly built a pyramid with his enemy's skulls."
p5204
aS'His descendant Babur later founded the Mughal_Empire.'
p5205
aS'For ten points, identify this crippled Central Asian conqueror who ruled from Samarkand.'
p5206
aS"This man defeated Mahmoud Khan's war elephants by setting camels on fire."
p5207
aS'This conqueror drove out or converted most of the Assyrian Christians in Iraq, and his youngest son, Shah Rukh, succeeded him.'
p5208
aS"This ruler supported Tokhtamysh's invasion of Moscow but later destroyed Sarai and Astrakhan, crushing the Golden_Horde when it turned against him."
p5209
aS'This ruler was known to build piles of [*] skulls outside cities he conquered.'
p5210
aS'He captured Bayezid I at the 1402 Battle of Ankara, and this sacker of Delhi was nicknamed for his hip injury.'
p5211
aS'For 10 points, name this ruler of central Asia who attempted to revive the Mongol empire from his capital at Samarkand.'
p5212
aS"Ruy Gonzalez de Clavijo was sent on an embassy to this man's court by Henry III of Castile."
p5213
aS'He attacked the Ismailis in the village of Anjudan, possibly for religious reasons.'
p5214
aS"This man's tomb was opened by a Soviet archaeologist two days before Hitler launched Operation Barbarossa, leading some people to believe he had laid a curse."
p5215
aS'He achieved major victories at the Battle of the Kondurcha River and the Battle of the Terek River against his enemy Tokhtamysh.'
p5216
aS"This man's mausoleum, the Gur-e Amir, is located in the same city as an observatory built by his grandson Ulugh Beg."
p5217
aS'This ruler, who established his capital at Samarkand, built towers of heads after violently putting down a tax revolt in Isfahan.'
p5218
aS'For 10 points, name this crippled Mongol conqueror.'
p5219
aS'This leader, whose mausoleum is called Gur-e Amir, began his military career by joining his brother-in-law Amir Husayn to defeat Ilyas Khoja and conquer Transoxania.'
p5220
aS'During the next three decades, he used his mounted archers to subdue Persia, Georgia, the Tatar Empire, Damascus, and Syria, and in 1402 he captured Bayezid I at the Battle of Ankara and won Anatolia, thus establishing a vast Asian empire with capital at Samarkand.'
p5221
aS"FTP, name this great-great-grandson of Genghis_Khan, the subject of Marlowe's first play, famous for the injuries he sustained in battle."
p5222
aS'Born circa 1336 of obscure origins, by 1357 this man was already a general of some repute who was made vizier to the khan Tughlaq Temur of Transoxania before turning against him and setting himself on the throne.'
p5223
aS'He then embarked on a series of conquests which encompassed Persia, Fars, Iraq, Azerbaijan, Armenia, Mesopotamia, and Georgia, as well as parts of India while making his capital, Samarkand, a center of architectural splendor and culture.'
p5224
aS'For 10 points name this Tartar ruler, whose life was dramatized by Christopher Marlowe.'
p5225
aS'He ousted Ilyas-Khoja and Tughlugh, the Jagataite khans of the Ili River region.'
p5226
aS'A duumvirate formed with his brother-in-law, Mir Husain, proved short-lived, as he assassinated Husain after besieging the city of Balkh to secure his control over the rebellious Afghans.'
p5227
aS'Successive victories followed over Mogholistan, the Kipchak khanate, and the Egyptian Mamlukes.'
p5228
aS'After capturing the Ottoman sultan Bayezid the Lightning-bolt at Ankara, he massacred the Knights of Rhodes at Smyrna.'
p5229
aS'Vowing to undertake the conquest and conversion to Islam of Ming China, he died of disease near Otrar before his departure.'
p5230
aS'FTP, name this Central Asian leader, whose warlike exploits inspired a blank verse drama by Christopher Marlowe.'
p5231
aS'His name was Chagatai for iron, and he died in Shmykent while leading a military expedition against China.'
p5232
aS'Of his sons, Jahangir and Umar Shaykh pre-deceased him, while Miran Shah was mentally deficient, leaving his youngest, Shah Rukh to succeed him.'
p5233
aS'He destroyed the Assyrian Christian majority in northern Iraq, and he defeated Tokhtamysh in a series of campaigns culminating in his sack of Sarai.'
p5234
aS'He defeated Sultan Nasir-u Din Mehmud of Delhi in 1398, and at the Battle of Ankara in 1402 defeated and captured the Ottoman sultan Bayezid I.'
p5235
aS'Ruling from his capital at Samarkand, FTP, name this 14th century warlord, often thought to be the last Mongol conqueror.'
p5236
aS'Early in his career, this man took an epithet symbolized by three circlets forming a triangle.'
p5237
aS"Anthropologist Mikhail Gerasimov exhumed this man's corpse three days before the Nazis launched Operation Barbarossa, reflecting the supposed curse of his mausoleum Gur-e Amir."
p5238
aS'This man joined forces with his brother-in-law Husayn to defeat Ilyas Khoja, but then betrayed him and besieged him in Balkh.'
p5239
aS'He later defeated Mahmud Tughluq and laid waste to Delhi in the Battle of Panipat.'
p5240
aS'In his final expedition, he killed 20,000 inhabitants of Baghdad, en route to smashing Bayezid I before returning to his capital in present-day Uzbekistan.'
p5241
aS'FTP, name this Turko-Mongol conqueror who ruled from Samarkand.'
p5242
aS'This man defeated the Golden_Horde at the Terek River and the Kondurcha River, where he clashed with his rival, Tokhtamysh.'
p5243
aS'He died during a campaign against the Ming dynasty in China.'
p5244
aS'He ordered the massacre of the inhabitants of Isfahan after they revolted against his rule.'
p5245
aS'His son Shah Rukh helped him to defeat and capture Bayezid I at the battle of Ankara.'
p5246
aS"This brutal conqueror allegedly made pyramids out of his enemy's skulls."
p5247
aS'For 10 points, name this great-great grandfather of Babur, a crippled Central Asian warlord who ruled from Samarkand.'
p5248
aS'This man caused the Ottoman Interregnum as a result of one battle, and his lands were inherited by Shah Rokh.'
p5249
aS'He supposedly kept a prisoner in an iron cage, destroyed a rival completely at the Battle of Terek River.'
p5250
aS'He won at the Battle of the Kondurcha River over the massive army of the Toktamysh-led Golden_Horde, but died on an expedition to China.'
p5251
aS'Besides capturing Bayezid I at the Battle of Ankara, this conqueror was known for sacking cities and creating pyramids of skulls.'
p5252
aS'For 10 points, name this 14th century conqueror who used Samarkand as his base, known for being partially crippled.'
p5253
aS'In November 1941, Dr. Seuss depicted this organization as a tiger in a bowler hat leaning on a sack of trash, and this group suffered a major setback upon the election of Seth Lowe.'
p5254
aS'Taking its name from a leader of the local Lenape tribe, its leader was called a Grand Sachem.'
p5255
aS'Using its influence among the Irish and other immigrants to reach into national politics, its greatest accomplishments include the election of Al Smith as New York governor.'
p5256
aS'Variously opposed by the Loco-Focos and Thomas Nast, it was finally brought down by Fiorello LaGuardia.'
p5257
aS'For ten points, name this New_York_City Democratic political machine, most famously led by William Marcy Boss Tweed.'
p5258
aS'This organization was revived by Carmine de Sapio in the 1950s.'
p5259
aS'This organization was investigated by the Lexow Committee because of pressure from Reverend Charles Henry Parkhurst.'
p5260
aS'Heads of this organization included Richard Connolly, John Kelly, and Charles Murphy, while another of its leaders, George_Washington Plunkitt, distinguished between honest graft and dishonest graft.'
p5261
aS'This organization met at the Wigwam, and its most notable sachem was arrested in Spain after being convicted of embezzlement by Samuel Tilden.'
p5262
aS'Named for a chief of the Delaware Indians, FTP, name this New_York_City machine led by Boss Tweed.'
p5263
aS'organization had the support of Irish immigrants, and among its notable leaders were Charles Francis Murphy.'
p5264
aS'For 15 points, identify this New York political machine that supported the Democratic Party, one of whose members was Boss Tweed.'
p5265
aS'This dynasty conquered the Eastern Gokturk and implemented the Jimi system.'
p5266
aS'Its Emperor Xianzong waged wars against the military governors Jiedushi, and Buddhism was suppressed during its Hu-chiang period.'
p5267
aS'Wu Zetian interrupted this dynasty until the rise of Emperor Shang, and a great decline occurred when Luoyang was captured in the An Lushan Rebellion.'
p5268
aS'This dynasty produced the poets Du Fu and Li Po.'
p5269
aS'For 10 points, name this Chinese dynasty established by Emperor Gaozu, which succeeded the Sui Dyansty.'
p5270
aS'This dynasty continued a system in which one month out of every five was given to military service by those who lived within 500 li of the capital; that was the Fubing system.'
p5271
aS'A Buddhist savings bank stocked by donations was liquidated during this dynasty and was called the "Inexhaustible Treasury."  Governors known as "jiedushi" first sprang up during this period under emperor (*) Xuanzong.'
p5272
aS'A major insurrection during this dynasty ended after Shi Chaoyi killed himself.'
p5273
aS'This dynasty was  interrupted by the second Zhou dynasty when Ruizong announced that his mother, Wu Zetian, would be  emperor.'
p5274
aS'For 10 points, name this Chinese dynasty that lasted from 618 until 907 and faced the An  Lushan rebellion.'
p5275
aS'Noted for its expansionistic aims, by 750 it controlled Kabul and Kashmir, but its expansion was halted with defeat the next year at the Talas River.'
p5276
aS"Founded amidst civil unrest in 618, T'ai Tsung served as a general in the rebellion and after deposing his father became the dynasty's second ruler."
p5277
aS"On the death of T'ai, a former court concubine took power and consolidated the dynasty's power which reached its peak just prior to the unsuccessful An Lu Shan uprising."
p5278
aS'Renowned at its height for cultural achievements, FTP, name this ruling dynasty of China which preceded the Sui and followed the Sung.'
p5279
aS'One notable ambassador to this dynasty was Kibi no Makibi, and this dynasty was founded partly by the chancellor Li Shimin.'
p5280
aS'It was ended by a rebellion lead by Huang Cho, and was weakened by the rise of military governors known as jiedushi.'
p5281
aS'One ruler of this dynasty required visitors to perform oral sex on her as a sign of respect, and briefly interrupted this dynasty with the Second Zhou.'
p5282
aS'That ruler, Empress Wu, was usurped by Zuanzhong.'
p5283
aS'This dynasty saw the rise of the civil service exam system, as well as the rebellion of a Sogdian Turk, An Lushan.'
p5284
aS'With its capital at Changan, FTP, name this Chinese dynasty that preceded the 5 dynasties and 10 kingdoms period and lasted from 618 to 907 AD.'
p5285
aS'The planning of this event occurred at the Little Green House on K Street, and this event resulted in the resignation of Edwin Denby.'
p5286
aS'This event led to the McGrain v. Daughtery decision by the Supreme Court, and John Kendrick was the first to call for an investigation of it.'
p5287
aS'Robert La Follette led that investigation, which revealed that the properties at Elk Hills were leased to Edward Doheny.'
p5288
aS'Harry Sinclair bribed the Secretary of the Interior Albert Fall in, For 10 points, what scandal during the Harding administration, concerning a Wyoming oil reserve'
p5289
aS'The Supreme Court case McGrain v. Daugherty resulted from congressional investigation of this event, which was led by Thomas Walsh.'
p5290
aS'Edward L. Doheny was one people implicated in this scandal.'
p5291
aS'The story broke when it was reported that Harry Sinclair had received a lease without fair bidding.'
p5292
aS'That lease was to Elk Hills.'
p5293
aS'Albert Fall was sentenced to prison as a result as it was shown that he had received kickbacks.'
p5294
aS'Fall had been the Secretary of the Interior under Warren G. Harding.'
p5295
aS'For 10 points, name this 1920s scandal in which government lands containing oil were leased to certain companies through unethical deals.'
p5296
aS'The investigation into this event was spearheaded by Montana Democrat Thomas J. Walsh.'
p5297
aS'Attorney General Harry M. Daugherty resigned as a result of the subsequent press coverage.'
p5298
aS'Businessmen Edward L. Doheny and Harry F. Sinclair were the perpetrators of the "loans" doled out to Secretary of the Navy Edwin Denby and the infamous Secretary of the Interior Albert Fall.'
p5299
aS'FTP, identify this scandal that involved petroleum reserves under the administration of Warren Harding.'
p5300
aS'The central figure in this event was a former Senator from New_Mexico who bore the unusual middle name of Bacon.'
p5301
aS"It was exposed thanks to the man who would become Franklin Roosevelt's first Attorney General, Thomas Walsh, and it benefitted such figures as Edward Doheny."
p5302
aS'Involving the Elk Hills reserves, it led to the resignation of Interior secretary Albert Fall.'
p5303
aS'For 10 points, name this scandal of the Harding administration which began with the leasing of naval oil reserves.'
p5304
aS'The Supreme Court ruled that Congress had the power to issue its contempt order, as it was an "attribute of the power to legislate," in McGrain v. Daugherty with regards to this event.'
p5305
aS"Atlee Pomerene and Owen Roberts heard M. T. Everhart's story about carrying Liberty bonds to the Wardham Park Hotel, which facilitated the results of this event."
p5306
aS'John B. Kendrick proposed a resolution which led to the formation of a group led by Thomas J. Walsh, whose discoveries led to the resignation of Navy Secretary Edward Denby.'
p5307
aS'Eventually, it was revealed that Edward Doheny was leased Elk Hills, while Secretary of the Interior Harry Sinclair received a $100,000 loan and other fields.'
p5308
aS'FTP, identify this scandal, named for its namesake Wyoming oil fields, which took place during the presidency of Warren G. Harding.'
p5309
aS"The Washington Post's Edward McLean lied to Congress about this affair, and Owen Roberts was special counsel for the prosecution."
p5310
aS'Secretary of the Navy Edwin Denby was cleared of all charges despite signing the releases, and Harlan Fiske Stone reformed the justice department following it.'
p5311
aS'Edward L. Doheny of Pan American Petrol was granted the Buena Vista and Elk Hills reserves in California, while Harry F. Sinclair of Mammoth Oil received rights to reserves at Caspar, Wyoming.'
p5312
aS'Secretary of the Interior Albert B.'
p5313
aS'Fall went to prison for receiving no-interest loans and gifts for leasing, for ten points, the titular oil reserves in this scandal of the Harding presidency.'
p5314
aS'The first two nominees to investigate this event were Silas Strawn and Thomas Gregory, but their names were withdrawn.'
p5315
aS'Later, a team of Pomerene and Roberts were appointed to investigate this event, which led to the Supreme Court case of McGrain v. Daugherty.'
p5316
aS'The initial Senate investigation was led by Thomas Walsh.'
p5317
aS'People involved in this affair were Edward Doheny, who escaped criminal prosecution, and Harry Sinclair.'
p5318
aS'One person implicated was Edwin Denby, the Secretary of the Navy, and this event partially involved land in Elk Hills, California.'
p5319
aS'FTP, name this scandal that led to the jailing of Secretary of the Interior Albert B.'
p5320
aS'Fall, which involved the leasing of oil fields in Wyoming, and was the chief scandal of the Harding administration.'
p5321
aS'Civil War clashes that were fought in this state include the Battle of Mossy Creek, which resulted in the holding of Talbotts Station, and was part of a generally successful Union campaign that concluded at the Battle of Fair Garden under Samuel Sturgis.'
p5322
aS'Sites of other battles here included Beans Station, Hatchies Bridge, Spring Hill, and Wauhatchie.'
p5323
aS'A more famous battle in this state saw the capture of Orchard Knob and Lookout Mountain and the storming of Missionary Ridge.'
p5324
aS'Home to Fort Pillow and Fort Donelson, FTP, name this state which also saw the Battle of Stones River or Murfreesborough as well as the Battle of Chattanooga.'
p5325
aS'These people centrally administered their territory by appointing three Landmasters , and they were opposed in Culmerland by the Lizard Union.'
p5326
aS"Their taxes and customs were at issue before they lost the Thirteen Years' War, and they lost a battle on the frozen Lake Peipus to Aleksandr Nevsky."
p5327
aS'The Golden Bull of Rimini confirmed some land holdings of this group, which absorbed the Livonian Order.'
p5328
aS'Their master Ulrich von Jungigen lost to Poland-Lithuania at the 1410 battle of Grunwald, also called First Tannenberg.'
p5329
aS'Originally founded to help central European pilgrims go east, for 10 points, name this military order founded by Germans during the Crusades.'
p5330
aS'They gave up the Nieszawa and Samogitia in the Treaty of Melno, which concluded the Gollub War.'
p5331
aS'.'
aS'Founded during the siege of Acre in the Third_Crusade, they later moved their capital to Marienberg.'
p5332
aS'They reached their greatest height under Winrich von Kniprode and were fleeced by the Treaty of Torun after Emperor Louis IV gave permission to them to take over Poland and Lithuania.'
p5333
aS'Wladyslaw II Jogaila defeated them decisively, and they also lost the Thirteen Years War and the "Massacre on Ice," to Alexander Nevsky.'
p5334
aS"Their Grand Master Albert of Brandenburg's conversion to Lutheranism ended their influence."
p5335
aS'For 10 points, name this German crusading order.'
p5336
aS"This group's ultimate defeat came as a consequence of the 13 Years War, and they were opposed by the Lizard League."
p5337
aS'Despite fighting the Cumans under Andrew II, they were cast out of Hungary and made their way to the Vistula to help Conrad of Mazovia.'
p5338
aS'They acquired the Order of the Brothers of the Sword in 1237.'
p5339
aS'Originally formed as a hospital for the sick during the Third_Crusade by some merchants from Lubek and Bremen, they were famously defeated at the First Battle of Tannenberg.'
p5340
aS'For 10 points, name this medieval German crusading order.'
p5341
aS'They helped defend the Vistula river valley against the Hussites during the Hussite war, and the Lizard League was created to oppose this groups ambitions in Culmerland.'
p5342
aS'It gained many powers under Frederick IIs Golden Bull of Rimmi, and also absorbed the Order of Dobrin.'
p5343
aS'It gained Estonia and Semigalia after it assimilated the Livnonian order, but its invasion of Russia failed after its defeat at Lake Peipus by Alexander Nevsky.'
p5344
aS'FTP, name this organization that was forced to sign the Peace of Torun after its defeat at Tannenberg, a 12th century German catholic religious order.'
p5345
aS"Among this organization's enemies were the Lizard Union, and it was led by Hermann of Dorpatt at one of its defeats."
p5346
aS"This organization's original purpose was eliminated following the marriage of Jogaila and Jadwiga."
p5347
aS'It was headquartered in Marienburg for the most successful part of its history, and was notably defeated at (*) Lake Peipus by Alexander Nevsky.'
p5348
aS'Its larger success ended after the Battle of Tannenberg, where the organization was defeated by the combined forces of Poland and Lithuania.'
p5349
aS"For 10 points, name this crusading order intended to Christianize the pagan Baltic, and named for its members' German ethnicity."
p5350
aS'In 1230, the Golden Bull of Rimini allowed this group to invade the Chelmno lands, and over the next century it conducted wars against Novgorod, Lithuania, and Poland.'
p5351
aS'Founded in the 12th century in Acre, it later moved to Transylvania to help Hungary defeat the Cumans.'
p5352
aS'This group was headed by the Hapsburg family between the early nineteenth century and World_War_I, and it now exists primarily as a charitable organization.'
p5353
aS'Althoguh they were unable to take this groups headquarters at Marienberg, in 1410, a joint Polish-Lithuanian force defeated this group at the Battle of Tannenberg.'
p5354
aS'For 10 points, name this crusading military organization based in modern day Poland and the Baltic States.'
p5355
aS'One politician from this state noted the difference between the 1832 Democratic Convention and the one at which she gave the keynote address in 1976.'
p5356
aS'In addition to Barbara Jordan, another politician from this state said George H.W.'
p5357
aS'Bush was ""born with a silver foot in his mouth"" at the 1988 Democratic Convention.'
p5358
aS'That governor of this state was Ann Richards.'
p5359
aS'Another person from this state started the (*) ""War on Poverty"" as a part of his Great_Society.'
p5360
aS'For 10 points, name this home state of President Lyndon Baines Johnson.'
p5361
aS'One racially charged incident in this state, that arose from a squabble that claimed the life of Frank Natus, led Joseph Foraker to lose his re-election when he heatedly criticized the President at a Gridiron Dinner.'
p5362
aS'Early in the Civil War, many "Forty Eighters" from this state\'s Hill Country fled the U.S. after Hamilton Bee led a massacre of Germans.'
p5363
aS'In another incident in this state, townspeople produced gun cartridges that they falsely claimed belonged to the 25th Infantry.'
p5364
aS'In 1860, the public fretted over a slave insurrection in this state after a series of fires charred cities in its north.'
p5365
aS'Booker T. Washington cried foul after Teddy Roosevelt issued dishonorable discharges to 167 "buffalo soldiers" to resolve a racially charged incident after the murder of a white bartender in this state\'s city of Brownsville.'
p5366
aS'Edward Clark became governor of this state after its governor refused to take an oath of loyalty to the Confederacy.'
p5367
aS'For 10 points, name this state once governed by Sam_Houston.'
p5368
aS'Though the Buffalo Soldiers were formed in Kansas, much of their service was done at Fort Davis   and Fort Clark in this state.'
p5369
aS'Part of its eastern border is formed by the Sabine River, and a region of  its southern border is called the Big Bend.'
p5370
aS'The southernmost point of this state, the location of the   Battle of Resaca de la Palma, is the city of Brownsville.'
p5371
aS'The town of Lubbock is just south of its  panhandle, which includes Amarillo [aa-muh-RIL-oh].'
p5372
aS'Its largest metropolitan area contains Plano,  Irving, and Fort Worth.'
p5373
aS'Name this state that, in addition to Dallas, contains the city of San Antonio,  home of the Alamo.'
p5374
aS'A non-referee named Phil Luckett was Quartermaster General for this state in the Civil War, and its folklore celebrates servant Emily West distracting an enemy general by having sex with him.'
p5375
aS'This state was where James Fannin and his men were massacred, and it was the site of the infamous brothel known as the Chicken Ranch.'
p5376
aS'The end of slavery in this state is commemorated with the holiday (*) Juneteenth, and General John Bell Hood left Kentucky to fight for it in the Civil War.'
p5377
aS'This modern-day state was the site of the Goliad Massacre, which was avenged in the 1836 Battle of San Jacinto.'
p5378
aS'A popular folk song describes its "yellow rose."'
p5379
aS'For 10 points, name this southern state that once existed as an independent republic led by Sam_Houston.'
p5380
aS'A 2008 Supreme Court case originating in this state and named for Medellin extended Sanchez-Llamas v. Oregon in invalidating the Vienna Conventions and decisions of the International Court of Justice as "binding domestic law".'
p5381
aS'In another case named for this state and White and regarding the payment of "indemnity bonds", Salmon Chase redefined statehood and declared secession unconstitutional.'
p5382
aS"Another case originating in this state saw a Stevens's dissent argue for the absolute uniqueness of the object in question overruling concerns of symbolic communication, while another case originating in this state overturned Bowers v. Hardwick."
p5383
aS'For 10 points, name this state notable for a case overturning sodomy laws co-named for Lawrence.'
p5384
aS"members of this state's powerful Railroad Commission have already announced for the 2012 Senate election."
p5385
aS'The current governor of this state announced that he supports House Concurrent Resolution 50.'
p5386
aS'One governing body in this state, led by dentist Don McLeroy, passed language to change references to the United_States government to a "constitutional republic," rather than "democratic," and "imperialism" to "expansionism.'
p5387
aS'" Debra Medina was a Tea Party candidate in this state\'s 2010 Republican gubernatorial primary, which saw a rare clash between a sitting (*) governor and sitting US Senator.'
p5388
aS"Current Democratic gubernatorial candidate Bill White was formerly mayor of this state's largest city, which is currently led by Annise Parker, its first openly gay mayor."
p5389
aS'Politicians intervened to help keep the Big 12 together in, for 10 points, what US State where Senator Kay Bailey Hutchison is retiring and Governor Rick Perry has spoken fondly of secession'
p5390
aS'This battle ended with the loser asking for death and having his wish granted by being unhorsed and killed in a bog.'
p5391
aS'Early on August 22nd, the eventual losing army gained a superior position on Ambien Hill, but the tide turned when John Howard was killed in the initial skirmish.'
p5392
aS'One army had landed at Milford Haven and marched toward the other, which was near Leicester [lester].'
p5393
aS'The key was the betrayal of Sir William Stanley, whose forces attacked the Yorkist flank, causing them to melt away.'
p5394
aS'FTP, identify this 1485 victory for Henry Tudor, which brought the Wars_of_the_Roses to an end.'
p5395
aS'[AR] In this conflict, one side landed in Pembrokeshire, located in the home country of the commander, to begin the invasion.'
p5396
aS'Deciding to meet the invading army just outside of Leicester, the king deployed his troops on Ambion Hill.'
p5397
aS"Forcing the king's troops from the high ground Henry Percy failed to offer support to the invading rebel army."
p5398
aS'Featuring the last king of England to die in battle, the victor subsequently dated his reign from one day before the engagement so that all of the enemy combatants could be claimed rebels and their property seized.'
p5399
aS'For 10 points, name this 1485 battle which saw the death of the Yorkist Richard III and the ascension of the Lancastrian Henry VII the last battle in the War of the Roses.'
p5400
aS'The body of the losing commander in this battle was accidentally crushed in the ramparts of the bridge over the River Soar during a victory parade, and the pressure of Viscount Lovells fleet forced one commander to land his army at Milford Haven.'
p5401
aS'The early death of John Howard, Duke of Norfolk was a blow to the eventual loser who had the superior position on Ambion Hill.'
p5402
aS'The Earl of Northumberland and Lord Stanley deserted at the end of this battle, which made William Stanleys charge devastating to the vulnerable Yorkist forces.'
p5403
aS'FTP, name this 1485 battle in which Richard III was defeated by Henry VII, the conclusive battle of the War of the Roses.'
p5404
aS'The losers standard-bearer, Sir Percival Thirwall, did not let the banner fall, even though both of his legs had been cut off.'
p5405
aS'Some historians believe that the battle was fought closer to the villages of Dadlington and Stoke Golding.'
p5406
aS'One of the more important casualties was Thomas Howard, 1st Duke of Norfolk, while real command on the winners side rested with John de Vere, 13th Earl of Oxford.'
p5407
aS'Though the battle began well for the loser, the tide turned when Sir William Stanley led his troops into the fray on the side of the winner.'
p5408
aS'FTP identify this battle that saw the end of the house of York when Henry Tudors forces defeated Richard III.'
p5409
aS'Speculation about the actual location of this battle has arisen due to the fact that it used to be called the Battle of Redemore, and there is a reedy moor near Ambien Hill, where the battle supposedly occurred.'
p5410
aS'The outcome was caused by the betrayal of William Stanley, whose son had been taken by the losers as insurance of his loyalty, while other instances of betrayal occurred as Henry Percy, the Earl of Northumbria refused to aid the losers, despite promising to do so.'
p5411
aS'The leader of the losing army was killed in a bog after having been knocked off his horse in, for 10 points, what 1485 battle, which saw Henry VII defeat Richard III, thus allowing victory of the House of Lancaster over the House of York in the Wars_of_the_Roses'
p5412
aS'Its third section discusses various kinds of its namesake "literature," and compares certain German writers to monks who wrote "silly lives of Catholic saints" over ancient manuscripts.'
p5413
aS'That section mentions Karl Grn as the classical type of a kind of "foul and enervating literature," and derides as "duodecimo editions of the New Jerusalem" such concepts as the "Home Colonies" and "Little Icaria.'
p5414
aS'"  Its second section claims that upper class marriage is merely a "system of wives in common" in which men amuse themselves by seducing each others\' wives, and offers ten applications of its philosophy, including confiscation of the land of emigrants and rebels.'
p5415
aS'In its fourth and last section, it describes temporary alliances with Polish agrarians and French Social Democrats, though it notes that its immediate interests are in a projected German revolution.'
p5416
aS'FTP, name this 1848 pamphlet which claims that a specter is haunting Europe, a work written by Marx and Engels.'
p5417
aS'When five of the perpetrators were hanged, the ropes frayed and broke before they died, but in lieu of tradition the five were hanged again.'
p5418
aS'This event arose from the machinations of the Union of Salvation, a derivative of the Semyenov Guard.'
p5419
aS'After the election of Prince Trubetskoy as interim dictator, and his failure to show to give a speech and Mikhail Miloradovich was assassinated by Peter Kakhovsky, sparking this event.'
p5420
aS"Sergey Muravyov-Apostol was able to convert Vasilkov's soldiers, and this event saw the capture of St. Petersburg before it was suppressed."
p5421
aS'FTP, name these Russian revolters who took their name from a winter month.'
p5422
aS'Despite Mikhail Miloradovichs death during this event, there have been allegations that he was actually a leader, and that his death was an accident.'
p5423
aS'Another leader, knyaz Sergei Trubetskoy, took refuge in the Habsburg embassy until he was arrested the following day.'
p5424
aS'In the aftermath of this event, Aleksandr Griboyedov managed to wriggle his way out of culpability, though he had had significant associations with Kchelbecker.'
p5425
aS'A key cause of failure was that the Northern and Southern Societies failed to cooperate, and many of their potential allies deserted them, including General Aleksei Yermolov.'
p5426
aS'The grand plans made by Pavel Pestel and others to free the serfs and end autocracy were damaged, partly by the abdication of their original choice for tsar, Konstantin.'
p5427
aS'For ten points name this abortive 1825 revolution in St. Petersburg against Nikolai II.'
p5428
aS'Count Miloradovich was murdered while attempting to negotiate with leaders of this event.'
p5429
aS'Lieutenant Panov led an unsuccessful assault on the place during this event.'
p5430
aS'This event was planned by the Union of Salvation.'
p5431
aS"Pavel Pestel and Prince Troubetzkoy led this event's southern and northern factions."
p5432
aS'The northern leaders were attacked by artillery and forced to flee to the icy Neva River.'
p5433
aS'For 10 points, name this 1825 Russian rebellion whose participants demanded a constitution, in which numerous army officers pledged allegiance to Constantine instead of Nicholas I during a certain month.'
p5434
aS'The southern branch of this movement erroneously identified the Magyars as Slavs.'
p5435
aS'Their leader, Colonel Paul Pestel, proposed Jacobin-style dictatorship but departed from his French model in advocating communal land ownership as a solution to the deprivation of the peasants.'
p5436
aS'The competing Northern Society proposed instead emancipation and a democratic system in the constitution of Nikita Muraviev, while radicals coalesced around Kondraty Ryleev.'
p5437
aS'The military officers who met in Senate Square were dispersed and exiled to Siberia.'
p5438
aS'FTP, name this movement which, upon the abdication of Constantine, resisted the accession of Nicholas I as Tsar in the last month of 1825.'
p5439
aS'Employers and unions in this country made the Wassenaar Agreement in 1982, leading to a political   consensus called the Polder model that was criticized by Pim Fortuyn until he was assassinated.'
p5440
aS'During World War Two, the Nazis stopped food shipments in this country, causing the Hunger Winter.'
p5441
aS' Part of a kingdom that includes Aruba, Curacao, and Sint Maarten, this country considers its first  king to be William the First of Orange, and it was recently headed by Queen Beatrix.'
p5442
aS'During the  1830s, Belgium separated from this country.'
p5443
aS'Name this country often referred to as Holland.'
p5444
aS'During one invasion, this country transferred some of its possessions to an ally by the terms of the Kew Letters.'
p5445
aS'During another war, patriotic maps of this country stressed its supposed resemblance to a lion.'
p5446
aS'The Thorbecke Reforms weakened the power of the king in this country, which signed the Treaty of Nonsuch.'
p5447
aS'Balthasar Gerard killed an early leader of this country, which during World War Two was ruled by the Austrian Nazi Arthur Seyss-Inquart; earlier, bands of poor soldiers from this country were known as "the beggars".'
p5448
aS'One former province of this polity became independent by the terms of the London Convention of 1839.'
p5449
aS'For ten points name this scene of Operation Market Garden, a country whose current monarch is Queen Beatrix, with capital at Amsterdam.'
p5450
aS"This country's navy provoked one war by refusing to salute the HMS Merlin as a regular warship."
p5451
aS"This country's navy burned the town of Sheernes as part of an operation in which it captured HMS Unity and HMS Royal Charles."
p5452
aS'This country\'s navy, which launched the "Raid on the Medway," also repulsed an invasion at the Battle of Texel.'
p5453
aS'It received assistance from the (*) "Sea Beggars" in another conflict.'
p5454
aS"Maarten Romp emerged as an early star admiral of this country's navy, which clashed with the English navy in four wars, two of which were ended by a Treaty of Westminster."
p5455
aS'The leadership of Michiel de Ruyter allowed this country to fend off invasion following the rampjaar of 1672.'
p5456
aS'For 10 points, name this country whose navy dominated the seas during the 17th century and sailed from ports like Rotterdam.'
p5457
aS'At one point, this literary character meets a man looking for flowers, who boasts of a happy time in his life spent in the madhouse.'
p5458
aS'This character forms a relationship with a woman called "Miss B," but her aunt and societal pressures force the couple to break up.'
p5459
aS'Near the end of the novel in which he appears, this character reads of the fates of people like Salgar and Morar.'
p5460
aS'This occurs during his recitation off a poem by Ossian to his love.'
p5461
aS"He is friends with Albert, but is enchanted with his friend's wife, Charlotte."
p5462
aS"This character's eventual suicide with a pistol reportedly kicked off waves of copycats throughout Europe."
p5463
aS'For 10 points, name this title character whose "sorrows" were described in an epistolary novel by Johann Wolfgang von Goethe.'
p5464
aS'Accounts of this conflict were written by Roger of Howden and Giraldus Cambrensis.'
p5465
aS'Before one of  the main combatants could reach the area of conflict, some of his ships as well as his fiance were  seized by Isaac of Cyprus.'
p5466
aS'Another Isaac, the Byzantine Emperor, made a secret alliance to impede the progress of the German armies during this conflict, but after sacking (*) Iconium, that army retreated anyway because its commander fell off his horse and drowned.'
p5467
aS'Following a successful capture of the city  of Acre, Leopold V of Austria left this conflict.'
p5468
aS"For 10 points, name this military venture led by Frederick I Barbarossa , Phillip II of France, and Richard_I_of_England to retake the Holy Land from Saladin's control."
p5469
aS'During this conflict, an invading force imprisoned the deposed Isaac Dukas Comnenus in chains of silver.'
p5470
aS'A participant brutally executed women and children in the Massacre at Ayyadieh.'
p5471
aS'Before he could be crowned king during this conflict, Conrad of Monferrat was assassinated.'
p5472
aS'After it, a ruler was captured by Leopold V while returning home.'
p5473
aS"During it, the elderly Holy Roman Emperor (*) drowned wearing armor in the Saleph River, and another ruler's brother, John, would scheme in his absence."
p5474
aS'This conflict ended when an English ruler signed the Treaty of Jaffa with Saladin, guaranteeing Christians entrance into Jerusalem.'
p5475
aS'For 10 points, name this 1189 to 1192 crusade originally led by Philip II of France, Frederick Barbarossa, and Richard_I_of_England.'
p5476
aS'One of its three leaders died of drowning while crossing Anatolia.'
p5477
aS'Another was taken prisoner in Austria and ransomed by Emperor Henry VI.'
p5478
aS'Called in response to the Battle of Hittim, its major accomplishment was the conclusion of an agreement whereby the safety of pilgrims was safeguarded in the Holy Land.'
p5479
aS'It failed, however, in its goal to retake Jerusalem.'
p5480
aS'FTP name this 1189-1192 effort led by Frederick I, Richard I, and Philip II.'
p5481
aS'Theobald V of Blois died during a siege in this conflict, and Frederick VI of Swabia attempted to preserve the body of a ruler who died en route to this conflict using vinegar.'
p5482
aS'That Holy Roman Emperor allegedly died of a heart attack upon entering the cold water of the Cillica river en route to it, and a late victory in it saw the heroic rescue of Christians garrisoned at a Citadel in Jaffa.'
p5483
aS'Cyprus was captured while its main commander was en route to the siege of Acre.'
p5484
aS"Prompted by the fall of Jerusalem after the defeat of Guy of Lusignan and Raymond III at Hattin to Saladin, FTP, identify this crusade led by Phillip Augustus and Richard I, also known as the King's Crusade."
p5485
aS'During this conflict, Danish and Frisian troops helped Sancho I capture Alvor, and Iconium was taken by a force that had earlier captured Adrianople; however, the momentum of the latter force was lost when its leader died near the Salif River.'
p5486
aS'Another force had to detour to Cyprus in order to free Berengaria, the fiancee of one of its leaders.'
p5487
aS'Finally united at (*) Acre, the attacking forces won the city and then fought a pitched battle at Arsuf.'
p5488
aS'It failed to take Jerusalem, and in 1192 Saladin agreed to allow pilgrims access to the city, thus ending the conflict.'
p5489
aS'For 10 points, name this crusade which saw the peacemaking efforts of Philip II, the death of Frederick Barbarossa, and the quick return to England by Richard the Lion-Hearted.'
p5490
aS'Isaac II Angelus made a secret treaty to impede the attacking side of this conflict, which William II was the first to join.'
p5491
aS'Anglo-French relations during this conflict improved at Vezelay after succession disputes between King Guy and Conrad of Montferrat, who was killed by the Nizari Ismailiyyah.'
p5492
aS'One of its leader was succeeded by his son Henry VI after drowning in the Saleph River.'
p5493
aS'Duke Leopold V and King Philip II returned home after the siege of Acre during this conflict that saw the death of Frederick Barbarossa.'
p5494
aS'For 10 points, name this campaign, ended by the Treaty of Jaffa, where Richard the Lionheart led English troops against his Muslim rival Saladin but did not retake Jerusalem.'
p5495
aS'A general from this city named Pagondas led the victorious forces over Athens at the battle of Delium.\\n This city allied with Sparta during the Peloponnesian War, partly because of the support Athens gave its\\n regional rival Plataea.'
p5496
aS'It later turned on Sparta, killing Lysander at the Battle of Haliartus.'
p5497
aS"This city's\\n victory over Sparta at Mantinea proved costly, as it lost Epaminondas, who had raised this city to new\\n heights by winning at Leuctra and leading the Sacred Band."
p5498
aS'For 10 points, name this Boeotian city which\\n was conquered by Philip of Macedon at Chaeronea and which was the mythological city founded by\\n Cadmus.'
p5499
aS'When a leader of this city was put on trial, he asked that if he was executed, the inscription read that he was being punished for "securing liberty" in a speech that caused his jury to laugh and drop the charges.'
p5500
aS'Pausanias wrote that it built a gigantic lion statue at the site of one of its greatest losses, and the land near this city was called "the dancing floor of Ares."'
p5501
aS'Its greatest power came under leaders such as Pelopidas.'
p5502
aS"This city had a leader slain by Agesilaus II's forces at the Battle of (*) Mantinea."
p5503
aS'It employed a troop of 150 pairs of male lovers, which was thrashed at the Battle of Chaeronea by Philip II.'
p5504
aS'Under Epaminondas, this city won the Battle of Leuctra against Sparta, and it possessed an elite force called the Sacred Band.'
p5505
aS'For 10 points, name this Greek city mythically founded by Cadmus.'
p5506
aS'Juan de Urtubia led the sacking of this city by the Navarrese Company 68 years after it was captured by the Catalan Company following the battle of Halmyros.'
p5507
aS'It is generally assumed that this city gained control of two additional districts in a confederacy following its 427 BCE capture of Plataea.'
p5508
aS'Cassander repaired the damage this city suffered following its unsuccessful revolt against the League of Corinth, which came 3 years after its defeat alongside Athens at Chaeronea.'
p5509
aS'Philip II of Macedon spent time as a captive in this city, giving him an opportunity to study the improved phalanx tactics developed by Epaminondas.'
p5510
aS'FTP name this polis which enjoyed a few decades of hegemony on the strength of its Sacred Band.'
p5511
aS'This city was the original capital of a duchy ruled by Otto de la Roche, and along with Orchomenos, it was once inhabitated by the Minyan people.'
p5512
aS'One commander from this city unprecedentedly used a reserve contigent of cavaliers in one battle and was named Pagondas.'
p5513
aS'Another general from this city led a 1000 man force to defend the construction site of Megalopolis and later took care of a notable hostage to this city.'
p5514
aS'It lost the battles of Coronea but was responsible for the killing of Lysander at the earlier battle of Haliartus, and three of its generals were killed despite its victory at the Battle of Mantinea.'
p5515
aS'The most famous general from this polity gave Pelopidas control of the Sacred Band and fought in the Battle of Leuctra.'
p5516
aS'Home of Epaminondas, for 10 points, name this Greek-city state that gained hegemony prior to the Macedonian conquest.'
p5517
aS'This city sided with the Persians during their second invasion, sending auxiliaries to the Battle of Plataea, an action for which it was punished afterward.'
p5518
aS'One of these punishments was depriving it of its leadership over the Boeotian League, which it had founded.'
p5519
aS'Later it became an ally of Sparta against Athens, its southern neighbor.'
p5520
aS'At the Battle of Mantinea, its hegemony over Greece was secured by its most talented general, Epimanondas.'
p5521
aS'FTP identify this city centered around the Cadmea that shares its name with an ancient Egyptian city.'
p5522
aS'One statesman from this polity was a son of Hippoklus who was revered for his kindness to the poor Nikodemos, and that man occupied Larissa as part of his attempt to frustrate Alexander of Pharae.'
p5523
aS'Lysis of Tarentum was a philosopher who settled in this city, which generally elected four of the seven boeotarch, and another leader from here brought down a garrison at Cadmeia.'
p5524
aS'It maintained a regiment composed of boys and their lovers called the "sacred band" which aided them in victories like Leuctra.'
p5525
aS'For ten points, name this Greek city-state which under Epaminondas defeated Sparta and was the mythical home of Oedipus.'
p5526
aS"A prophecy declared that this city would be safe if the king's son Menoeceus sacrificed himself."
p5527
aS'The walls of this city were built by a man who used a lyre to lift rocks, Amphion, and his brother Zethus.'
p5528
aS"Adrastus was the leader of a group that attacked the gates of this city, and though they were defeated, the Epigoni's sack of it caused the death of a blind prophet who spent seven years as a woman."
p5529
aS'A king of this city was killed by the father of (*) Eteocles and Polynices; the son of that king, Laius, married his mother Jocasta.'
p5530
aS'For ten points, name this Boeotian city founded by Cadmus that was home to Tiresias and Oedipus.'
p5531
aS'dispatched several warships to Morocco after the bandit Raisuli kidnapped the Greek-American Ion Perdicaris.'
p5532
aS'This politician railed against the "doctrine of ignoble ease" in a speech titled "The Strenuous Life.'
p5533
aS'" As president, his foreign policy initiatives included sending out the Great White Fleet and dispatching naval forces to support an independence movement against Colombia.'
p5534
aS'He signed the (*) Elkins and Hepburn Acts, which enforced the limitation of large companies as an aspect of his Square Deal.'
p5535
aS'This man became the only third party candidate to place second in a presidential election when he ran on the Bull Moose ticket in 1912.'
p5536
aS'For 10 points, name this American president who fought with the Rough Riders during the Spanish American War and who popularized the phrase "Speak softly and carry a big stick.'
p5537
aS'"'
aS'According to Sidonius Apollinaris, this ruler held banquets in which the only thing that was weighty was the conversation.'
p5538
aS"The primary source of his reign is given by the author of Variae and Chronicon, who served as this ruler's secretary."
p5539
aS"This man's illegitimate daughter by a Moesian prostitute, Arevagni, married Sigismund of Burgundy as part of an alliance with the Burgundians."
p5540
aS"He assisted his allies in putting down Leonitus's revolt and came to power after putting down a fellow clansman surnamed Strabo."
p5541
aS"Procopius's Secret History suggests that Justinian had his daughter Amalasuntha murdered in a bathtub after she succeeded this ruler."
p5542
aS'This man, who was served by Cassiodorus, was memorialized in legend as Dietrich of Berne.'
p5543
aS'At the behest of Emperor Zeno, he assassinated Odoacer to become ruler of Italy.'
p5544
aS'For 10 points, identify this powerful king of the Ostrogoths, sometimes given the title "the Great."'
p5545
aS'Sent as a hostage to Constantinople at the age of seven, he quickly became involved in the court intrigues of Byzantine emperor Zeno.'
p5546
aS'After becoming consul, he won a succession of decisive victories, including engagements at Isonzo and the Adda.'
p5547
aS"His reign was troubled by conflicts with Pope John I, primarily because of Justin I's edicts against Arianism, of which this ruler was a believer."
p5548
aS'Earlier, he had solidified his claims by besieging and taking Ravenna and orchestrating the death of Odoacer.'
p5549
aS'FTP, name this man who also executed Boethius, the Ostrogoth king of Italy from 493 to 526 AD.'
p5550
aS'This man died when Lycomedes pushed him off a cliff.'
p5551
aS'Though he is not Paris, he abducted Helen with the help of his friend Pirithous, who was stuck with him to the Seat of Oblivion in the underworld until Heracles rescued this figure by ripping his thighs off a chair.'
p5552
aS'This man pushed (*) Sciron into a chasm with a turtle.'
p5553
aS'This figure used a pine tree to kill Sinis, and he killed a man who fit people to beds, the bandit Procrustes.'
p5554
aS"This man's father Aegeus killed himself after this man failed to lower black sails after performing his most famous action with the help of Ariadne."
p5555
aS'For 10 points, name this Athenian king who killed the Minotaur.'
p5556
aS'In this conflict, Christian of Anhalt\'s forces were defeated at the Battle of White Mountain, marking the end of the "Bohemian" period of this war.'
p5557
aS'The Holy Roman Emperor Ferdinand II tried to retroactively enforce the Peace of Augsburg and replace Protestant leaders in German states with Catholic leaders during this war.'
p5558
aS'Although the Protestant forces were victorious at the battle of Lutzen in this conflict, they lost their leader, Gustavus II Adolphus of Sweden.'
p5559
aS'For 10 points, identify this war that was ended by the Peace_of_Westphalia and lasted from 1618 to 1648.'
p5560
aS'The War of the Mantuan Succession was part of this conflict that saw Ambrosio Spinola capture Breda.'
p5561
aS"The Battle of White Mountain was a defeat for Frederick V's forces in this war."
p5562
aS'One event at the beginning of this conflict saw two diplomats thrown out a window, which was called the Second Defenestration of Prague.'
p5563
aS'This war included the brutality of the general (*) Albrecht von Wallenstein.'
p5564
aS'The Battle of Breitenfeld was a victory for Gustavus Adolphus.'
p5565
aS'For 10 points, name this religious war ended by the Peace_of_Westphalia that lasted from 1618 to 1648.'
p5566
aS"This war was the subject of Pope Urban VIII's failed general council at Cologne."
p5567
aS'Ferdinand III reconvened the Imperial Diet to try to end this war.'
p5568
aS'The second phase of this war began after the Battle of Stadtlohn with the so-called "Kejserkrigen" of Danish king Christian IV.'
p5569
aS'Envoys from Ferdinand of Styria were thrown out of a second- floor window in Prague, sparking the first phase of this war, the Bohemian Revolts.'
p5570
aS'For 10 points, name this war in Central Europe, which ended with the Peace_of_Westphalia and lasted from 1618 to 1648.'
p5571
aS'During this war, Jorg Jenatsch took control over a controversial court in Valtellina and sentenced the head of the Planta family to be pinned to the floor with an axe, which he then eagerly carried out personally.'
p5572
aS'The resulting Bundner Wirren, or Confusion of the Leagues, had to be put down by Henri de Rohan, whose own revolts during this conflict forced the Treaty of Montpellier.'
p5573
aS'One general in this war was hacked to death in bed by Scotsmen under Walter Leslie.'
p5574
aS"Southern Europe's last major bubonic plague outbreak occurred after the death of three Gonzaga brothers triggered the War of the Mantuan Succession."
p5575
aS'It saw Spanish tercios win at Nordlingen but fail disastrously at Breitenfeld, leading to the death of the County of Tilly.'
p5576
aS'Wallenstein lost at its Battle of Lutzen, which claimed the life of Gustavus Adolphus.'
p5577
aS'For 10 points, name this massive European conflict resolved by the Peace_of_Westphalia.'
p5578
aS'During this war, the Heilbronn Alliance was defeated at Nordlingen.'
p5579
aS'One country withdrew from this war with the Treaty of Lubeck.'
p5580
aS'One phase of this war was ended by the Treaty of the Pyrenees, and the forces of Christian of Anhalt were routed at the Battle of White Mountain by [*] Count Tilly during it.'
p5581
aS'Wallenstein was defeated at Lutzen by Gustavus Adolphus during this war.'
p5582
aS'Sparked by the Bohemian Revolt caused by the Defenestration of Prague, for 10 points, name this war ended by the reaffirmation of the Peace of Augsburg with the Peace_of_Westphalia that lasted from 1618 to 1648.'
p5583
aS'One cause of this conflict was the violation of the terms of the Letter of Majesty, and Ferdinand of Hungary won a great victory during this war at Nordlingen.'
p5584
aS'Frederick V was defeated at the Battle of White Mountain, and one commander in this conflict was advised by Axel Oxenstierna.'
p5585
aS'That commander won at the Battle of Breitenfeld, and General Tilly was a chief commander for one of the sides in this war.'
p5586
aS'Wallenstein retreated at the Battle of Lutzen following the death of Gustavus Adolphus in this war, which was sparked by the Second Defenestration of Prague.'
p5587
aS'For 10 points, name this war lasting from 1618 to 1648.'
p5588
aS"The Battle of Lutter occurred during Denmark's invasion of Thuringia during this conflict, but Denmark withdrew with the Treaty of Lubeck."
p5589
aS'The Battle of Wolgast occurred during this war, in which Frederick V of the Palatinate was defeated by Ferdinand II at the Battle of(*) White Mountain.'
p5590
aS'Gustavus_Adolphus_of_Sweden won many victories for Protestant forces in this war, which began after two Catholic councilors were thrown out of a window in Prague.'
p5591
aS'For 10 points, name this war, ended by the Treaty of Westphalia in 1648.'
p5592
aS'Among of the winners of this conflict one might number Poland, who briefly obtained a dictatorship in Moscow under Vladislav and a favorable treaty with Russia in the Peace of Polyanov.'
p5593
aS'Losers might include Denmark, whose king Christian IV lost an eye at the battle of Kolberger Heide and later had to sign the humiliating Peace of Lubeck that stripped it of international power.'
p5594
aS'Spain was also a loser as it resulted in the indepenence of the United Provinces.'
p5595
aS'FTP, name this decades long war whose big winners included France, Spain, and Protestants, who were granted major concessions by the Peace_of_Westphalia'
p5596
aS'This American proposed using units of length based on pendulums in his Plan for establishing uniformity in the Coinage, Weights, and Measures of the United_States.'
p5597
aS'In a letter about bridge building, this man was the first to use the English word catenary.'
p5598
aS'This man was the first to use the word Megalonyx to describe a certain genus of ground sloth.'
p5599
aS'He created a namesake wheel cipher and many of his scientific ideas can be found in his (*) Notes on the State of Virginia .'
p5600
aS"During this man's presidency, Zebulon Pike explored part of a new addition to the United_States."
p5601
aS'For 10 points, name this man during whose presidency the Lewis and Clark Expedition took place.'
p5602
aS'This man authorized the construction of the military academy at West Point.'
p5603
aS"One of this man's policies was the subject of a cartoon featuring a turtle named Ograbme biting a man."
p5604
aS'He removed the "midnight judges" from Federal Courts, and supported the(*) Embargo Act.'
p5605
aS'This president nearly doubled the size of the United_States by purchasing the Louisiana Territory from France.'
p5606
aS'For 10 points, name this third president who designed Monticello and is considered the head author of the Declaration of Independence.'
p5607
aS'This politician responded to Francois Barbe-Marbois in his Notes on the State of Virginia.'
p5608
aS'This man founded the University of Virginia and designed the mansion of Monticello..'
p5609
aS'This president sent the Lewis and Clark expedition and authorized the (*) Louisiana Purchase.'
p5610
aS'He was the principal author of the Declaration of Independence.'
p5611
aS'For 10 points, name this third president of the United_States.'
p5612
aS'This man ordered the construction of the West Point military academy, and one of this president\'s foreign policy actions was mocked in the "O-grab-me" political cartoon featuring a snapping turtle biting at a man.'
p5613
aS"This supporter of the Embargo Act also authored the Kentucky Resolutions, stating that the Alien and Sedition Acts were unconstitutional, and many of this man's scientific ideas can be found in his Notes on the State of Virginia."
p5614
aS'Perhaps his greatest contribution, however, is stating that "we hold these truths to be self-evident," as the chief author of the Declaration of Independence.'
p5615
aS'For 10 points, name this third President of the United_States.'
p5616
aS'This Presidents administration negotiated the King-Hawkesbury Treaty, which was scrapped when the Senate added amendments that were unacceptable to Great Britain.'
p5617
aS'His Supreme Court appointments include the author of the dissent in Pierson v. Post, Henry Livingston, as well as William Johnson, the first great dissenter.'
p5618
aS'Massachusetts governor Levi Lincoln became his Attorney General but was later replaced by Ceasar Rodney.'
p5619
aS'As Commander-in-Chief he sent Commodore Edward Preble to fight the Battle of Derne.'
p5620
aS'Events during the reign of this former Chairman of the Committee of Five include the violation of the USS Chesapeake by the HMS Leopard.'
p5621
aS'For ten points, name this lover of Sally Hemmings, the third President of the United_States.'
p5622
aS"This man's book The New Freedom argued for a revision of the tariff system."
p5623
aS"This President's administration saw the passage of the Clayton_Antitrust_Act."
p5624
aS'This President won reelection on the campaign slogan ""He kept us out of war,"" but the U.S. soon entered into that war anyway.'
p5625
aS'This man was a proponent of the League of Nations, which was a part of his Fourteen Points.'
p5626
aS'For 10 points, name this President who won the election of 1912 and served throughout World_War_I.'
p5627
aS'This President began the modern tradition of giving the state of the union address in front of Congress, rather than sending it as a letter.'
p5628
aS'He signed the Underwood Tariff, which lowered tariff rates, as well as the Clayton Anti-Trust Act, a modification of the Sherman Anti-Trust Act.'
p5629
aS'Henry Cabot Lodge prevented this man from accomplishing his last goal.'
p5630
aS'For 10 points, name this U.S. President during World_War_I.'
p5631
aS"This man's election bid was managed by his friend William McCombs, and during the National Convention in which he was nominated, he was supported by William_Jennings_Bryan."
p5632
aS'This man supported bills such as the Underwood Tariff, the Clayton Anti-Trust Act, and the Federal Reserve Act.'
p5633
aS"Henry Cabot Lodge objected to this man's proposed mutual defense clause, Article X, which failed to be ratified in the U.S. Senate."
p5634
aS'This president asked Congress to declare war in response to unrestricted submarine warfare conducted by Germany.'
p5635
aS'For 10 points, name this man who proposed the Fourteen Points and led the United_States during World_War_I.'
p5636
aS'As an academic, this man published an American history entitled Division and Reunion and argued for a parliamentary system in his book, Congressional Government.'
p5637
aS'He prevented a railroad strike by proposing the Adamson Act, and he also pushed the Clayton_Antitrust_Act through Congress.'
p5638
aS'While governor of New Jersey, he established state primaries, reducing the influence of party bosses.'
p5639
aS'He secretly provided money to the White Army in Russia, and suffered a partial stroke while seeking public support for the Treaty_of_Versailles.'
p5640
aS'For 10 points, name this American president who served during World_War_I and advocated a League of Nations in his Fourteen Points.'
p5641
aS'Nicholas Patler wrote about Jim Crow in this presidents administration, which provoked strong protests from the William Monroe Trotter-led National Independent Political League after it resegregated the civil service.'
p5642
aS'He appointed John Clarke and James McReynolds to the Supreme Court, as well as a man known for his landmark brief in Muller v. Oregon.'
p5643
aS'His administration saw the passage of the Underwood Tariff, while other laws passed include the Espionage Act, which encouraged the Palmer Raids, and the Federal Reserve Act.'
p5644
aS'FTP, name this New Jersey Democrat, the successor to Taft, who was president during World_War_I.'
p5645
aS'This painter depicted a left-facing dog, a center-facing lion, and a right-facing dog at the bottom of a painting showing three heads of different ages, his Allegory of Prudence.'
p5646
aS'He showed a spear-bearing emperor exiting a forest at left in his Equestrian Portrait of (+) Charles V. A cherub rides on the back of a fish in the bottom left of a painting by this man that shows a woman clutching the horn of wide-eyed cow.'
p5647
aS"A cherub reaches into a well between a clothed and a naked woman in this painter's (*) Sacred and Profane Love."
p5648
aS'For 10 points, name this Venetian painter who executed a Rape of Europa and the Venus of Urbino.'
p5649
aS'One person with this surname was supported by the Northern Alliance and the Aizu domain, and was allied with the Matsudaira clan.'
p5650
aS'One leader with this surname was defeated by Takeda Shingen, but later won a major battle at Nagashino, in alliance with a man who was betrayed and killed by Akechi Mitsuhide, Oda_Nobunaga.'
p5651
aS'One man with this surname was defeated by the Choshu and Satsuma domains in the Boshin War, leading to the Meiji_Restoration.'
p5652
aS'For 10 points, what is this surname of the winner of the Battle of Sekigahara, which names the last Japanese shogunate'
p5653
aS"In his retirement, this man managed his country's diplomatic relations with Spain and the Netherlands in the position of ogosho."
p5654
aS'He ordered his eldest son to commit suicide because that son conspired with Takeda Katsuyori.'
p5655
aS'Among his later acts was the exclusion of all Kirishitans from Japan and the removal of the power of the daimyos in the Kuge Shohatto.'
p5656
aS'This man took up the mantle of his mentor, Oda_Nobunaga, after opposing Toyotomi_Hideyoshi for rulership of all Japan and crushing all who opposed him in the Battle of Sekigahara.'
p5657
aS'For 10 points, name this founder of a Japanese shogunate which lasted until the Meiji_Restoration.'
p5658
aS'Hayashi Razan was an influential scholar at his court, whose rise occurred after refusing to follow Hideyoshi on two disastrous attempts to invade Korea, and culminated in the construction of his castle, the largest ever built.'
p5659
aS'As a youth he was sent to live in Sumpu, as the hostage of a rival family, where he learned the military arts that would later help him to subjugate the Hojo clan and take control of Eastern Japan.'
p5660
aS'But true mastery of the country was not achieved until victory in 1600 at Sekigahara.'
p5661
aS'FTP identify this man who established his capital at Edo and whose shogunate would rule Japan from 1603 until 1867.'
p5662
aS'His early life was dominated by a family feud that saw one branch of his family support the Imagawa Clan and the other the Oda Clan.'
p5663
aS'This struggle directly effected him when his father, after being told that this man, his son, would be killed unless he dropped his support of the Imagawa, simply pointed out it would show his loyalty to that clan if he was willing to sacrifice his son.'
p5664
aS'Obviously, this man was not killed and went on to become the leader of the Matsudaira clan.'
p5665
aS"He became important in national politics, and in 1584 supported Hideyoshi's attempt at national hegemony, and in the process exchanged his family's lands for lands in the Kanto region."
p5666
aS"This trade obviously paid off, as at the time of Hideyoshi's death, this man was the most powerful of his vassals."
p5667
aS'For ten points, name this man whose forces were victorious at the Battle of Sekigahara and then went on to rule as the first Shogun of the Edo Period.'
p5668
aS'This period saw the pinnacle of production of erotic art called shunga.'
p5669
aS'It was preceded by a period of strife called the Sengoku period.'
p5670
aS'This government was established after the Battle of Sekigahara by a namesake founder with given name Ieyasu.'
p5671
aS'It was ended by the start of the Meiji_Restoration.'
p5672
aS'This government ruled from a capital whose name lent itself to another name for this period, (*) Edo, which is now named Tokyo.'
p5673
aS'For 10 points, name this final shogunate of Japan, that ruled from 1603 to 1868.'
p5674
aS'This period saw the pinnacle of production of erotic art called shunga.'
p5675
aS'It was preceded by a period of strife called the Sengoku period.'
p5676
aS'This government was established after the Battle of Sekigahara by a namesake founder with given name Ieyasu.'
p5677
aS'It was ended by the start of the Meiji_Restoration.'
p5678
aS'This government ruled from a capital whose name lent itself to another name for this period, Edo, which is now named Tokyo.'
p5679
aS'For 10 points, name this final shogunate of Japan, that ruled from 1603 to 1868.'
p5680
aS'This government legalized a system of alternate attendance among feudal lords, where they were required to spend one year within their domains and one in the capital.'
p5681
aS'One challenge to it came from disgruntled ronin lead by Yui Shotetsu, who attempted a coup called the Keian Uprising.'
p5682
aS'Its downfall came during the Bakamatsu, during which popular sentiment called for expelling the barbarians, leading to the Boshin War and resignation of Yoshinobu.'
p5683
aS'It was founded after its namesakes victory over Ishida Mitsunari at Sekigahara, and it also signed of the Treaty of Kanagawa with Matthew Perry.'
p5684
aS'Immediately followed by the Meiji restoration, FTP, name this Shogunate, founded by Ieyasu, that ruled Japan from 1600 to 1868.'
p5685
aS'Under this government, the dismissal of the Confucian advisor Arai Hakuseki prompted the transformation of rice markets into security exchanges with the appointment of nengyoji.'
p5686
aS"Price controls were lifted under Mizuno Tadakuni's Tenpo Reforms, and the beginning of this polity saw the passage of the sakoku, or exclusion edict."
p5687
aS'This government set up an system of alternating attendance among feudal lords, and was brought down by a movement that sought to "revere the emperor and expel the barbarians".'
p5688
aS'The Sakuradamon Incident saw the assassination of Ii Naosuke for his signing of the Treaty of Amity and Commerce, an extension of the Convention of Kanagawa pushed forward by Matthew Perry.'
p5689
aS'For 10 points, name this Japanese government that existed before the Meiji_Restoration.'
p5690
aS'leader of the fief of Kii who led the country during this period introduced sweet potato and sugarcane cultivation and began the compilation of the Kansei law code.'
p5691
aS'Scholarly endeavors in this era were divided into the schools of Ancient Learning, National Learning, and Dutch Learning.'
p5692
aS'This era included the artistic flourishing of the "original happiness period.'
p5693
aS'" Another ruler\'s attempt to stamp out Christianity during this era led to the (*) Shimabara Rebellion.'
p5694
aS'During the disintegration of its namesake government, this period saw the establishment of the Ezo Republic and the Boshin War.'
p5695
aS'Ended by the proclamation of the Charter Oath and rallying behind Emperor Meiji, for 10 points, identify this final Japanese shogunate which lasted from 1600 to 1858.'
p5696
aS'During this man\'s rule, the San Felipe wrecked in his country, and the resulting incident lead to the crucifixion of the ""26 martyrs"".'
p5697
aS'He won the battle of Yamazaki where the rebellious Akechi Mitsuhide was defeated.'
p5698
aS'He and his nephew were the only non-Fujiwaras to hold the title Kampaku.'
p5699
aS'He ordered the death of his advisor Sen no Rikyu and he ordered a noted (*) sword hunt.'
p5700
aS'He invaded Korea and started construction on Osaka Castle.'
p5701
aS'His rise to power began while he was a solider of Oda_Nobunaga.'
p5702
aS'For 10 points, name this unifier of Japan and predecessor of Tokugawa_Ieyasu.'
p5703
aS'After being promoted from the position of sandal-bearer, he built Sunomata Castle in Mino Province and discovered a secret passage into Inabayama Castle, though which he led a successful attack against the Saito Clan after using his legendary talent for bribery to strip them of supporters.'
p5704
aS'After coming to power, he banned peasants from carrying weapons and defeated two of his rivals at the Battles of Yamazaki and Shizugatake while co-opting a third at the Battle of Komaki-Nagakute, but his control would not be complete until the defeat of the Hojo Clan at Odawara.'
p5705
aS'After acquiring the title of Regent from Emperor GoYozei, this builder of Osaka Castle would be frustrated at the Battle of Noryang and by the turtle ships of Admiral Yi Sun-sin in his abortive attempts to conquer Ming China through Korea.'
p5706
aS'For ten points, name this second unifier of Japan.'
p5707
aS'After the death of his de facto predecessor, he escaped an assassination attempt by jumping naked into a bath of priests after being ambushed near Nishinomiya by agents sent by Akechi.'
p5708
aS"Shortly after this incident, he would defeat Akechi at the battle of Yodo and place that man's head in front of Honnoji Temple, the spot where his predecessor, the grandfather of Samboshi, was killed."
p5709
aS'As kampaku he instituted land surveys or kenchi in addition to instituting the policy of shi-no-ko-sho which rigidly separated the classes.'
p5710
aS'He unsuccessfully engineered two invasions of Korea, dying during the middle of the second one in 1598.'
p5711
aS"Helping end the Momoyama period, FTP, identify this man who continued Oda_Nobunaga's quest to unify Japan, which was completed when Tokugawa_Ieyasu took over ruling for his son."
p5712
aS'One part of this treaty called for the removal of troops from the Aaland Islands and the demolition of\\n fortresses that had been built on them.'
p5713
aS'One section of this treaty specified the return of Kars, Batumi, and\\n Ardahan to the Ottoman_Empire.'
p5714
aS'Another section provided for the creation of a Democratic Republic of\\n Armenia, which was nullified when the Ottomans invaded it several months later.'
p5715
aS'Invalidated by both\\n signatories within a year, much of the content in this treaty was reworked by the later Treaty of Rapallo.'
p5716
aS"In\\n it, one side renounced claims to Finland, the Baltic states, and Poland, and agreed to pay a large sum to\\n compensate the other side's business interests."
p5717
aS'For 10 points, name this treaty between Germany and Russia\\n that ended the eastern front of World_War_I.'
p5718
aS"Negotiations for this were opened by Lieutenant Senneur and a volunteer named Meren while one side's naval interests were represented by Altflater."
p5719
aS'Article IV concerns the districts of Erdehan, Kars and Bactum while Article VI defines borders by Lake Peipus and the Narwa River.'
p5720
aS"One of this treaty's lead negotiators Max Hoffmann also was involved in negotiating the Treaty of Rapallo that superseded this treaty."
p5721
aS'Richard von Kuhlmann ultimately forced peace with Ukraine and territorial concessions in Livonia and Finland from the lead negotiator for the other side, Leon Trotsky.'
p5722
aS'FTP, identify this treaty that ended Russian involvement in World_War_I.  '
p5723
aS'One treaty by this name included an alleged Secret clause to this agreement involved the transfered the provinces of Cholm and Podalia to the side that withdrew from the conflict.'
p5724
aS'The more famous treaty by this name defined the boundary of Livonia to cross lakes Peipus, Pskow, and Luben, and also required withdrawal of all Russian troops from that region.'
p5725
aS'This treaty was followed by a Treaty between the Central Powers and Romania negotiated at Bucharest, and the provisions of this agreement were reverted by the treaty of Rapallo.'
p5726
aS'For 10 points, identify this treaty not attended by the remainder of the allied powers, which signaled the end of Russian involvement in the first World War.'
p5727
aS'[AR] Article VII of this treaty demanded that the contracting parties respect the independence of Persia and Afghanistan.'
p5728
aS'The line agreed upon by the parties in Article III, the west of which one party had to give up control ran through the islands of Dago and Worms and around the city of Riga.'
p5729
aS'Frustrated by the demands for territory, one delegation suspended negotiations, encouraging a policy of "no war, no peace.'
p5730
aS'" However, an agreement was eventually reached between German Foreign Secretary von Kuhlmann and Russian Foreign minister, Leon Trotsky.'
p5731
aS'The site of a treaty signed less than a month earlier with the Ukraine, for 10 points, name this March 1918 treaty signed in a city in modern day Belarus that allowed for the early exit of Russia from World_War_I.'
p5732
aS'15 points, identify the treaty signed in March 1918 between Russia and the Central Powers which marked Russias exit from World_War_I.'
p5733
aS'One provision of this agreement allowed for Lithuania to annex Memmel, and another gave Rwanda and Burundi to Belgium.'
p5734
aS"This treaty limited one signatory's army to 15,000 men, and China rejected it because it did not receive(*) Shandong."
p5735
aS'Vittorio Orlando was not able obtain Fiume, causing resentment in Italy.'
p5736
aS'The terms of this treaty were resisted by a coalition led by Henry Cabot Lodge, leading to its rejection in the United_States.'
p5737
aS'For 10 points, identify this treaty in which Georges_Clemenceau forced war guilt and unreasonable reparations on Germany, that ended World_War_I.'
p5738
aS'The major achievement of Polish diplomat Roman Dmowski occurred contemporaneously with this agreement.'
p5739
aS'Article 156 of this agreement prompted a famous stand by diplomat Wellington Koo, and prompted a call in one country for the withdrawal of the 21 demands and a solution to the Shandong Problem, eventually prompting the New Culture Movement.'
p5740
aS"In addition to provoking (*) China's May 4 movement, it created the Polish corridor and isolated East Prussia, and was later modified by plans named for Young and Dawes."
p5741
aS'The most famous creation of this treaty was targeted by Henry Cabot Lodge, leading the US senate to vote against ratification, dooming the League of Nations.'
p5742
aS'Negotiated by Vittorio Orlando, Georges_Clemenceau, David Lloyd George, and Woodrow_Wilson, FTP, identify this treaty signed in the wake of World_War_I at a palace outside Paris.'
p5743
aS'During this treaty\'s negotiation, one famous participant wrote a letter to his son stating "behold, with how little wisdom the world is ruled!" As part of this treaty, France gained suzerainty, but not actual rule, over an alliance of ten cities called the "Decapole," which corresponds to modern Alsace.'
p5744
aS'This treaty was ambiguous as to whether the city of Bremen was included in the Bishopric of Bremen, which would lead to another war.'
p5745
aS'This treaty confirmed the Duke of Bavaria as an Imperial elector, but restored the electoral rights of the Palatinate.'
p5746
aS'This treaty would be followed a decade later by the Peace of the Pyrenees.'
p5747
aS'The agreements of Munster and Osnabruck jointly made up this treaty, which ended a war involving Wallenstein and Gustavus Adolphus and helped establish the notion of sovereign nation-states.'
p5748
aS'For ten points, name this 1648 agreement that ended the Thirty Years War.'
p5749
aS'This event led to the resignation of Rhinelander Waldo and the growth of the ILGWU.'
p5750
aS'Coming in wake of the Uprising of Twenty Thousand, this event sparked a trial at which Kate Alterman was asked to repeat her testimony many times, indicating that she had perhaps been told what to say by the prosecution.'
p5751
aS'Thusly, attorney Max Steur won the case for Isaac Harris and Max Blanck, who were acquitted of manslaughter because the jury found that they did not know that the (*) exit doors of the Asch building were locked.'
p5752
aS'Investigated by Frances Perkins, for 10 points, name this March 25, 1911 event in which 146 workers burned to death in a New_York_City clothes factory.'
p5753
aS'While Hisham was ruler of this empire, it suffered a defeat from the Byzantines at the Battle of Akroinon, causing Hisham to be succeeded by his brother Yazid II.'
p5754
aS"Under the rule of Marwan II, this empire moved its capital to Harran, and this dynasty's rule ended after the Battle of Zab."
p5755
aS"Charles_Martel defeated this dynasty's Abdul Rahman at the Battle of (*) Tours, but this empire still kept Cordoba, and it ruled from Spain all the way to the western tips of India."
p5756
aS'For ten points, name this first Islamic caliphate with capital at Damascus that was followed by the Abbasids.'
p5757
aS'One ruler of this family put down a rebellion led by Jai Singh; another expelled a group of rebels who would later conquer Crete from Byzantium.'
p5758
aS'Yet another ordered the killing of St. Pelagius, and a fourth temporarily moved their capital to Ramla.'
p5759
aS'They fought to a draw at the Battle of Siffin, but this tribe would have more success at a conflict remembered on the Day of Ashura, the Battle of Karbala.'
p5760
aS'Their rule would see its end come at the Battle of the Zab under Marwan II, nearly a century after their founding by Muawiyah.'
p5761
aS'Ruling from Damascus from 660 to 750 A.D., FTP, name this Islamic Caliphate succeeded by the Abbasids.'
p5762
aS"Racist policies by border governors serving this empire culminated in the Battle of the Nobles, which came in the wake of Hisham's loss to Leo II at Akroinon and triggered the Berber revolt."
p5763
aS"Al-Mukhtar's revolt was another blemish on this polity, whose biggest disgrace was the damage to the Kabba under Yazid I during the second fitna."
p5764
aS'Language and currency were unified by an opponent of Justinian_II, (*) Abd al-Malik, who also constructed the Dome of the Rock.'
p5765
aS'Ethnic strife with Sogdians and other non-Arab Muslims plagued this state, ruled at times by the Marwanids, which fell after a victory at the Battle of the Zab by Abu Muslim.'
p5766
aS'Failing to expand into Europe after falling to Charles_Martel at Tours, FTP, identify this Islamic empire whose final ruler fled to Iberia after the capture of its capital Damascus, the predecessor of the Abbassid Caliphate.'
p5767
aS'Only one ruler of this group was later recognized as a caliph and not merely a secular king; that ruler is Abd al-Aziz.'
p5768
aS"His father dealt with the rebellions by al-Mukhtar in Kufa and the combined forces of the Kharijites, Shi'ah, and Abd Allah ibn az-Zubayr in Iraq."
p5769
aS'This group was split between the Sufyanids, whose first leader attempted the first siege of Constantinople, and the Marwanids, whose last ruler, Marwan II, died at the Battle of the Great Zab River.'
p5770
aS'They "won" the first Muslim civil war, beating out Muhammad\'s son-in-law, Ali, and Mu\'awiyah, the son of Abu Sufyan, was the first ruler of this polity.'
p5771
aS'Ruling out of Damascus, for 10 points, what is this second Islamic caliphate'
p5772
aS'Reforms by one leader of this dynasty benefited the mawali by ignoring nationalities, and one organization that led to its downfall was the Hashimiyah.'
p5773
aS"Al-Hajjaj defeated the anti-caliph az-Zubayr during the rule of another of this dynasty's leaders, Abd al-Malik."
p5774
aS"A revolt by (*) Husayn was put down by Yazid I, a member of this dynasty's Sufyanid branch, at the Battle of Karbala."
p5775
aS'Abd al-Rahman I moved it to Cordoba after the Battle of the Zab, lost under the leadership of Marwan II.'
p5776
aS"The first leader of this dynasty, Mu'awiyah I, established his capital at Damascus."
p5777
aS'For 10 points, identify this Muslim dynasty that ruled from 661 to 750 CE and was replaced by the Abbasid dynasty.'
p5778
aS'According to Baladhuri, one ruler of this dynasty minted the first aniconic coins after a dispute over papyrus and anti-Islamic coins; that ruler was the initiator of the Marwanid Restoration.'
p5779
aS"Another story says that a Jewish sorceror's promises of long-life prompted the anti-Christian iconoclastic law of another ruler of this dynasty, Yazid II."
p5780
aS'Another ruler of this dynasty ended the jizya tax of the mawali; that ruler, Umar II, also began collecting the hadith.'
p5781
aS"Yazid I, son of this dynasty's founder Muawiyah, defeated Husayn at Karbala."
p5782
aS'This dynasty was halted from further advances into western Europe by Charles_Martel at Tours.'
p5783
aS'For 10 points, name this first Islamic caliphate, which was succeeded by the Abbasids.'
p5784
aS'A feminist lecture in this country argued that "the master\'s tools will never dismantle the master\'s house."'
p5785
aS'Another thinker from here tried to dissolve the mind-body problem as a "pseudoproblem" in Philosophy and the Mirror of Nature.'
p5786
aS'Audre Lorde and Richard Rorty challenged academic norms in this country, where "live" and "dead" options for belief were discussed in "The Will to Believe."'
p5787
aS'An experimental "lab school" was founded in this country by the author of Democracy and Education, John Dewey.'
p5788
aS'For 10 points, name this home country of pragmatism, where William_James taught philosophy at Harvard.'
p5789
aS'The two main branches of these people were the Hasdingi and the Salingi.'
p5790
aS'St. Augustine died during their siege of the city of Hippo.'
p5791
aS'Their leader Huneric was usurped by Gelimer, who was defeated by Byzantine general Belisarius.'
p5792
aS'These Arians took Carthage from the Romans.'
p5793
aS'Under (*) Geiseric (GAHY-zur-rik), they sacked Rome in 455.'
p5794
aS'For 10 points, name this East Germanic tribe whose name is synonymous with anyone who destroys property such as a graffiti artist.'
p5795
aS'The bishop Deogratias purchased and then freed slaves captured by these people, according to Victor of Vita, who was one chronicler of the persecution of their Christian subjects.'
p5796
aS'One of these people quoted the Hebrew scripture "Vanity of vanities, all is vanity" upon being led into the hippodrome in Constantinople as part of a triumph.'
p5797
aS'That occurred after he sent his brother Tzazo to put down the rebellion of Goddas and was subsequently left without enough of an army to successfully defend Ad Decimum.'
p5798
aS"A more famous act of these people was supposedly motivated by the pleas of Licinia Eudoxia, who requested their aid following Maximus' murder of her husband Valentinian III."
p5799
aS"Pope Leo's negotiations with these people were not as effective as they had been with the Huns, however."
p5800
aS'For 10 points, name these Germanic people led by Gelimer and Gaiseric, who established a kingdom in Africa and led a particularly destructive sack of Rome in 455 AD.'
p5801
aS'In 406, they crossed the Rhine and ravaged Gaul, before settling in Spain in 409.'
p5802
aS'There, the Asdingi group under Gunderic became the ascendant faction after the Romans dissipated the Silingi and Alani.'
p5803
aS'In 439 Gaiseric established an independent autocracy in North Africa, and from there he led this people to sack Rome in 455.'
p5804
aS'FTP these barbarians and militant Arian Christians.'
p5805
aS"One of this people's two major groups was led by Godegisel until he was killed in battle by the Franks, after which they united with King Respendial and the Alans and Suebi to plunder Gaul before being driven out by British troops under Constantine III."
p5806
aS'Their two main groups, the Asding and Siling, occupied Gallaecia and Baetica before being pushed further south by the Romans and Visigoths.'
p5807
aS'In 429, they sailed to a territory in the west from which, 25 years later, they would attack Italy.'
p5808
aS'Belisarius would eventually defeat Gelimer, the last king of, FTP, this East Germanic people which ruled North Africa for 100 years and under Gaiseric sacked Rome in 455, doubtless committing many of their namesake acts of wanton property destruction.'
p5809
aS'Having achieved independence in 992 CE, this city began the thirteenth century by taking the leading role in the Fourth_Crusade, accumulating further wealth through a century-long glassblowing monopoly.'
p5810
aS'It fought the forces of Pope Clement V in the War of the Ferrarese Succession and settled another longtime rivalry with the 1454 Peace of Lodi.'
p5811
aS'Falling to Austria under the Treaty of Campo Formio, it was later ceded to France, then quickly to the Kingdom of Italy, in the aftermath of the Seven Weeks War.'
p5812
aS'FTP, name this city whose independent rulers included the Council of Wisdom, the Council of Ten, and the doges.'
p5813
aS'Kras, Slovenia, was deforested to supply foundations for the buildings in this location, which is connected to Porto Marghera by the Ponte della Libert.'
p5814
aS'Neighbored by Lido to the southeast and Murano to the northeast, this comune is divided into six sestiere.'
p5815
aS'The acqua alta phenomenon results in flooding of Chioggia and this area, but is not related to the 20th century subsidence of this settlement.'
p5816
aS'Though it includes an island called Giudecca, Cannaregio in the north was the site of its famous Jewish ghetto.'
p5817
aS'For 10 points, what city on the Adriatic is home to historic sites such as the Rialto Bridge and the Grand Canal'
p5818
aS'By the terms of a treaty signed in this city, Stanislaw Leszczynski accepted the rule of Augustus III, who had been the Duke of Saxony; that treaty ended the War_of_the_Polish_Succession.'
p5819
aS'Wilhelm von Roggendorf defended this city from an attack that included large numbers of ineffective Sipahi cavalry, while Jan III Sobieski aided in the 1683 defense of this city from an assault ordered by Mehmet IV.'
p5820
aS'Twice besieged by the Ottomans, for 10 points, name this European city, the capital of Austria.'
p5821
aS'By the terms of a treaty signed in this city, Stanislaw Leszczynski accepted the rule of Augustus III, who had been the Duke of Saxony; that treaty ended the War_of_the_Polish_Succession.'
p5822
aS'Wilhelm von Roggendorf defended this city from an attack that included large numbers of ineffective Sipahi cavalry, while Jan III Sobieski aided in the 1683 defense of this city from an assault ordered by Mehmet IV.'
p5823
aS'Twice besieged by the Ottomans, for 10 points, name this European city, the capital of Austria.'
p5824
aS"This city's walls were paid for with a ransom acquired by Leopold the Virtuous, and the constellation Scutum honors events at this city."
p5825
aS"It's not in France, but bakers in this city apocryphally invented the croissant during a battle."
p5826
aS'It was the site of a battle where the winning side utilized Polish "Winged Hussars" in one of the largest cavalry charges in history.'
p5827
aS'Jan (*) III Sobieski led the Holy League in a battle near this city, after which Kara Mustafa Pasha was executed.'
p5828
aS"That battle occurred over a hundred years after Suleiman_the_Magnificent's drive was stopped here."
p5829
aS'In 1529 and 1683, this city was twice the subject of failed conquest by the Ottoman_Empire, stopping their expansion into Europe.'
p5830
aS'For 10 points, name this city that became the capital of the Austrian Empire.'
p5831
aS'A 1606 treaty named for this city recognized the Protestant prince Stephan Bocskay [botch-kay] as ruler of his home country.'
p5832
aS'A 1980 conference in this city resulted in the CISG [SIS-gee], the treaty governing international contracts, and this city lends its name to the international treaty on how to agree to a treaty.'
p5833
aS'A 1961 Kennedy-Khrushchev summit was held at its rococo palace.'
p5834
aS'A 1940 arbitration held in this city awarded control of Transylvania to Hungary.'
p5835
aS'This city was home to the unsuccessful pro-fascist July Putsch, which resulted in the death of Chancellor Englebert Dollfuss.'
p5836
aS'Another treaty agreed to here sought to create a sentinel on the Rhine by giving land to Prussia.'
p5837
aS'Notable mayors include Karl Lueger, known for his anti-semitism.'
p5838
aS'For ten points, name this city home to an 1815 Congress, the capital of Austria.'
p5839
aS"This city is the headquarters of the scandal-ridden Bawag bank, and President Bush's order for states to uphold conventions made in this city was the focus of the recent Supreme Court case of Medellin v. Texas."
p5840
aS'Its International Centre houses the International Atomic Energy Agency and the headquarters of OPEC.'
p5841
aS'This world capital is also home to Chancellor Alfred Gusenbauer and Federal President Heinz Fischer and formerly to rulers like Bruno Kreiskly.'
p5842
aS'For 10 points each, identify this site of a famous Congress held by Metternich, the capital of Austria.'
p5843
aS'bishop of this city who was converted from Protestantism was Melchior Klesl.'
p5844
aS"Napoleon's troops under Jean Lannes and Joachim Murat took this city by convincing its defender, Prince Auersperg, that there was an armistice."
p5845
aS'(*) This city was defended from the Ottomans for a second time in 1683 by Jan Sobieski.'
p5846
aS'Home to a meeting attended by Alexander I, Viscount Castlereagh, and Klemens von Metternich, for 10 points, name this capital of Austria.'
p5847
aS'This city houses the headquarters of OPEC as well as the International Atomic Energy Agency.'
p5848
aS"In 1857, this city's ancient walls were demolished in favor of a Ringstrasse_,_ now lined by many notable buildings such as the Rathaus, the Hofburg Palace, and the State Opera."
p5849
aS"This city's St. Stephen's Cathedral features a distinctive tiled roof characterized by its colored zigzag pattern and prominent double-headed eagles."
p5850
aS"This city's Schonbrunn Palace was the summer residence of rulers like Maria_Theresa and Franz Joseph."
p5851
aS'For 10 points, name this former center of Habsburg power and current capital of Austria.'
p5852
aS'One man from this city hosted political meetings known as "Duck Evenings" from the name of the hotel they took place at.'
p5853
aS'One inhabitant of this city called his philosophical ideas "objective phenomenalism" and co-founded this city\'s Sociological Society.'
p5854
aS'Another man from this city founded the Los von Rom movement and created a political platform with Viktor Adler and Heinrich Friedjung.'
p5855
aS'One man from here founded the Christian Social Party and won a controversial mayoral election via the personal intercession of Pope Leo XIII and was known as "Handsome Karl".'
p5856
aS"Despite claims of anti-Semitism, that politician's rule was deemed fair by the Jewish author of Beware of Pity, The Royal Game, and Letter from an Unknown Woman, fellow city occupant Stefan Zweig."
p5857
aS'Another occupant of this city for many years wrote the novel Altneuland and founded the First Zionist Congress.'
p5858
aS'For 10 points, name this European city, home to Rudolf Eisler, Georg von Schonerer, Karl Lueger, Theodor Herzl, as well as the author of Beyond the Pleasure Principle, Sigmund Freud.'
p5859
aS'This war saw airborne initiatives code named Flaming Dart, Rolling Thunder, and Arc Light.'
p5860
aS'It escalated after an attack on the Maddox and the Turner Joy, which led to a resolution named for the body of water in which they were stationed.'
p5861
aS'This war saw a campaign fought in and around the province of Binh Gia.'
p5862
aS'One side in this war used the pretense of a holiday truce to launch an unexpected attack known as the Tet Offensive.'
p5863
aS'William Westmoreland was the commander of U.S. troops during part of this war.'
p5864
aS'For 10 points, name this war fought in a namesake Asian nation during the 1960s and 70s.'
p5865
aS'One siege in this war occurred at Khe Sanh, while another was at An Loc, where the Easter Offensive of one of the combatants failed to defeat the ARVN forces.'
p5866
aS'Another offensive by the same belligerent occurred during a holiday in 1968.'
p5867
aS'During the same year, a massacre of civilians occurred at My Lai.'
p5868
aS'In the U.S. Operation Rolling Thunder, bombing missions attempted to destroy the morale of the north in this war.'
p5869
aS'FTP, name this conflict in Southeast Asia in which the communist north was victorious.'
p5870
aS'One contingent of these people were defeated by the Earl of Orkney at the Battle of Clontarf.'
p5871
aS"A leader of these people descended from Mieszko I of Poland and won the Battle of the Holy River, although he'd later face a rebellion from his regent, Ulf Jarl."
p5872
aS'Prominent warriors among these people were called beserkers.'
p5873
aS'For 10 points, name these seafaring people who launched numerous invasions of Europe during the Middle Ages.'
p5874
aS'A chief of these people named Rollo was the first ruler of Normandy, and their leader Rurik founded the state of Kievan Rus and gave his name to a Russian dynasty.'
p5875
aS'The Varangian Guard was named after and primarily composed of a group of these people, who established the Danelaw and attacked the monastery at Lindisfarne in 793 AD.'
p5876
aS'(*) Canute the Great led an empire of these people that fell apart after the death of Harold_Godwinson.'
p5877
aS'Vinland was discovered by a group of these people led by Leif Erikson, while his father Erik the Red colonized Greenland.'
p5878
aS'For ten points, identify these Scandinavian raiders of the early Middle Ages.'
p5879
aS'These people pioneered a construction technique called "clinker building."'
p5880
aS'They formed bases known as longphorts in a country where they lost at Clontarf.'
p5881
aS'The larger of the Jelling stones was created by one of these people with notably bad teeth.'
p5882
aS'In the East, these people were known as Varangians.'
p5883
aS'These people include Oleg of Novgorod, who founded Kievan Rus, and Rollo, who founded the Duchy of Normandy.'
p5884
aS"These people fought Skraelings at their colony of Vinland, in what's now Newfoundland."
p5885
aS'For 10 points, name these Germanic peoples who used longships to raid northern European villages, exemplified by Leif Erikson.'
p5886
aS'After one event, these people were blasted by Alcuin in a letter addressed to Bishop Hygbald.'
p5887
aS"These people hid Edmund the Martyr's head in a hedge under the command of Ivar the Boneless."
p5888
aS'They comprised the personal bodyguard of Basil_II as the Varangian Guard, and regularly collected preventative tributes called the Danegeld.'
p5889
aS'These people formed the Great Heathen Army after razing Lindisfarne.'
p5890
aS'They explored Newfoundland under Leif Ericson using their characteristic longships.'
p5891
aS'For 10 points, name these Scandinavian people who carried out devastating namesake "raids" and are erroneously depicted wearing horned helmets.'
p5892
aS'This man sought to replace "utility" with "ophelimity" in a work which changed the focus of the Lausanne School founded by Leon Walras, his Cours d\'conomie politique.'
p5893
aS'Another work of his spoke of how people were divided into six kinds of "residues", or illogical sentiments justified post-hoc via "derivations".'
p5894
aS'However his most famous ideas are the distribution log N = log A + m log x, a related principle regarding the concentration of wealth also known as the principle of factor sparsity, or the 80-20 rule, and a condition that is more stringent than a similar one named for Kaldor and Hicks.'
p5895
aS"FTP, name this author of Trattato di sociologia generale and The Mind and Society who lends his name to a situation in game theory where no actor can unilaterally make themselves better off without harming the other actor, this man's optimality."
p5896
aS'This man led a vigorous campaign to exonerate a Protestant named Jean Calas.'
p5897
aS'He recorded how the Count of Auteroche said to the English, "Gentlemen, we never fire first, fire yourselves" in a poem on the Battle of Fontenoy that won him a spot as royal historiographer.'
p5898
aS'This "Innkeeper of Europe" helped renovate a church in Ferney at which he gave a sacrilegious sermon praising stealing.'
p5899
aS'This man got into a spat with the (*) Chevalier de Rohan and later wrote the history, The Age of Louis XIV.'
p5900
aS'He wrote the History article for the Encyclopedia and an epic poem about Henry IV.'
p5901
aS"In another work, he wondered whether London or Paris were more worthy subjects for God's wrath than Lisbon in a poem about a 1755 earthquake."
p5902
aS'For 10 points, name this author of Candide.'
p5903
aS'In a court case brought against the Virginia Electric Company, this law was strengthened on First Amendment grounds.'
p5904
aS'This law modified the NIRA, which had been declared unconstitutional, and it was later amended by the Taft-Hartley Act.'
p5905
aS"Among the notable consequences of this piece of legislation was the legal recognition of collective bargaining, although agricultural employees aren't covered, and the establishment of the National Labor Relations Board."
p5906
aS'FTP, identify this very important piece of 20th century labor legislation, named for a New York Senator.'
p5907
aS'The Rebecca Riots were a rural protest against high tolls in this polity, and occurred shortly after John Frost led an uprising in Newport.'
p5908
aS'This polity was forced to accept the Statute of Rhuddlan after being defeated by a strategy involving an "iron ring" of fortification.'
p5909
aS'A civil war began as a consequence of unpaid troops switching sides in a city here, and troops under Thomas Horton routed a force led by John Poyer in this polity.'
p5910
aS"Penal Laws passed against this state in 1402 pushed residents here in a rebellion led by the last native ruler of this land, a figure appearing in Shakespeare's Henry IV, Part 1, Owen Glendower."
p5911
aS'The Battle of St. Fagans was fought in, for 10 points, what British region whose eponymous prince is the male heir to the British throne.'
p5912
aS'During this war, Robert Ross led one side in a landing at Benedict before winning the Battle of Bladensburg.'
p5913
aS'During a naval battle in this war, one commander composed the message ""We have met the enemy and they are ours.'
p5914
aS'"" In addition to Oliver Hazard Perry, other commanders during this war included Edward Pakenham, who lost to a group of pirates and Andrew_Jackson at New Orleans after the conclusion of the Treaty_of_Ghent.'
p5915
aS'For 10 points, name this war between the US and Britain, named for the year it began.'
p5916
aS'During this war, Andrew_Jackson defeated the Creek at the Battle of Horseshoe Bend.'
p5917
aS'Tecumseh died during the Battle_of_the_Thames in this war.'
p5918
aS'The White House was burned by the British Army during this war.'
p5919
aS'Francis Scott Key composed the (*) "Star Spangled Banner" during this conflict.'
p5920
aS'Impressment of U.S. sailors was a major cause of this war.'
p5921
aS'For 10 points, what 19th-century war between the U.S. and Britain was named for the year it began'
p5922
aS"This war's battles of Chateauguay and Crysler's Farm caused one side to give up on an attempt to invade their northern neighbor."
p5923
aS"Edward Pakenham died during one of this war's battles, whose winning side was assisted by the pirate Jean Lafitte."
p5924
aS"One skirmish in this war resulted in the sinking of the Guerriere, and one side's capital was (*) burned after they lost at Bladensburg."
p5925
aS'Francis Scott Key composed "The Star-Spangled Banner" while watching the shelling of Fort McHenry during this war.'
p5926
aS'For ten points, name this war between Britain and America which resolved by the Treaty_of_Ghent and fought about thirty years after the Revolutionary War.'
p5927
aS'The treaty ending this war required the dismantling of French fortifications at Dunkirk, and ceded Savoy and Nice to Victor Amadeus II.'
p5928
aS'The main treaty ending this war was supplemented by the treaties of Rastadt and Baden.'
p5929
aS"Its corresponding war in America was known as Queen Anne's War."
p5930
aS'The Duke of Marlborough won the Battle of Blenheim (BLEN-em) during this war.'
p5931
aS'This war started after Charles II died and left his throne to a member of the House of Bourbon.'
p5932
aS'For 10 points, name this early eighteenth-century war that was ended by the Peace of Utrecht.'
p5933
aS'The Hague Partition Treaty was an unsuccessful attempt to prevent this war.'
p5934
aS"This war's most notable\\n naval battle was fought at Malaga."
p5935
aS'This war resulted in the asiento, an agreement that gave England the\\n right to supply slaves to South America.'
p5936
aS'Many battles in this war were won as the result of cooperation\\n between the Austrian General Eugene of Savoy and the English General Duke of Marlborough, including\\n the Battle of Blenheim.'
p5937
aS'England gained control of Gibraltar because of this war.'
p5938
aS'This war began with the\\n death of Charles II and ended with a French prince becoming King Philip V. For 10 points, name this war\\n ended by the Treaty_of_Utrecht, fought over who should rule the namesake country with capital Madrid.'
p5939
aS'Louis Boufflers and Claude de Villars lost the Battle of Malplaquet during ths war, and the Treaties of Baden and Rastatt partially ended this war.'
p5940
aS'The signing of the Asiento was one result of this war, which later precipitated the War of the Quadruple Alliance.'
p5941
aS"Queen Anne's War was an extension of this war, and during this war, the Battle of Ramillies was won by the Duke of (*) Marlborough, who also won at the Battle of Blenheim."
p5942
aS'This war began after the Bourbon Philip V inherited the throne of a certain country from Charles II.'
p5943
aS'For ten points, name this early eighteenth century war which was ended by the Treaty_of_Utrecht and was fought over the throne of a certain Iberian country.'
p5944
aS'This conflict broke out one year after the death of Joseph Ferdinand and was indirectly caused by the demands of Leopold I that his son Charles receive unpartitioned lands.'
p5945
aS'One battle in this conflict took place as one side was getting ready to beseige a village near the Schelde River, while another battle two years prior to that one took place near modern-day Namur and was a defeat for the Duke de Villeroi; those battles were Oudenarde and Ramellies.'
p5946
aS'The immediate cause of this conflict was the death of Charles II and the subsequent attempt to place the future Philip V on the throne of a certain nation.'
p5947
aS"One of this war's decisive battles occurred when a Franco-Bavarian force under Tallard was defeated by Eugene of Savoy and the Duke of Marlborough."
p5948
aS'For ten points, identify this war between France and a coalition led by England which featured such battles as Malplaquet and Blenheim and was ended by the Treaty_of_Utrecht.'
p5949
aS'The growing influence of Henry St. John led to the end of this conflict, especially after his secret meetings with Torcy.'
p5950
aS'George Rooke capture a massive amount of wealth during one of its battles, while another saw the French Earl of Galway command English troops against French troops under the command of an Englishman, the Duke of Berwick.'
p5951
aS'Seeing clashes at Almansa, Vigo Bay, and (*) Ramillies, its final chapter was marked by the defeat of the Duke of Burgundy at Oudenarde and of Villars at Malplaquet.'
p5952
aS"Eugene of Savoy and the Duke of Marlborough led armies for the victors in, FTP, what conflict that saw the Battle of Blenheim, a war ended by the Treaty_of_Utrecht and named for Philip V's ascension to the throne of a certain Iberian country"
p5953
aS'phase of this war was a revolt by a group sometimes called "Cadets of the Cross" against the policy of Dragonnade, and was sparked by the assassination of Franois Langlade before being quenched with the Pacification of the Camisards.'
p5954
aS'Following this conflict, the Dutch were given the right to build a line of fortresses in the Barrier Treaties.'
p5955
aS'The most successful naval commander in this war was George Rooke, who tried to raid a treasure fleet at Vigo Bay.'
p5956
aS'The British won the right to supply 4800 slaves yearly to Spanish colonies and Rooke later won a strategic victory at Velez-Malaga before capturing Gibraltar from Philip V of Spain.'
p5957
aS'One side was commanded by generals like Duc de Villars, who lost the battles of Bouchain and Malpaquet to the Duke of Marlborough and Eugene of Savoy.'
p5958
aS"This war was sparked when Louis XIV's grandson was named heir to Charles II."
p5959
aS'For 10 points, name this war ended by the Treaty_of_Utrecht fought over control of an Iberian throne.'
p5960
aS'This war is considered to include the first of a series of wars fought over Madras in India called the Carnatic Wars.'
p5961
aS'It included the Battle of Dettingen, the last time an English king led troops into battle.'
p5962
aS"Its North American phase included the Siege of Louisbourg and was called King George's War."
p5963
aS"Also including the War of Jenkins' Ear, it was sparked by (*) Frederick_the_Great disobeying the Pragmatic Sanction of 1713."
p5964
aS'Ended by the Treaty of Aix-la-Chapelle, for 10 points, name this war fought over the ascension of Maria_Theresa to a throne in Vienna.'
p5965
aS'This war included the naval victory of Anson at Finisterre Cape and saw the defeat of the king of Sardinia at Madonna del Olmo.'
p5966
aS"In the successive battles of Rottofreno, Piacenza, and Colle dell'Assietta, the French were frustrated by the Savoyards but managed to capture Bergen op Zoom during peace negotiations."
p5967
aS"The Prussians were victorious at the Battle of Chotusitz and defeated Marshal Neipperg again at Mollwitz, but the best-known battles are Maurice de Saxe's victory at Fontenoy and the last battle involving an English king, Dettingen."
p5968
aS"Beginning with the invasion of Silesia, this is, FTP, what war that included the War of Jenkins' Ear and King George's War, a conflict in the 1740's over the throne of Maria Teresa, concluded by the Treaty of Aix-la-Chappelle"
p5969
aS'This conflict began when the eldest daughter of Emperor Charles VI attempted to take the throne but was opposed because of Salic law.'
p5970
aS'The later stages of this European counterpart to King Georges War saw several victories by the Prussians including the battles of Hohenfriedberg and Kesselsdorf and it ended with the Treaty of Aix-la-Chapelle of 1748.'
p5971
aS'FTP name this conflict that began when Maria_Theresa attempted to take the Habsburg throne in keeping with the Pragmatic Sanction.'
p5972
aS'This conflict saw the Battle of Madonna dellOlmo fought near Cuneo.'
p5973
aS'Three years into it, the Peace of Abo ended a separate war sometimes called the Lesser Wrath or the Hats War, and a notable naval skirmish saw the fleet of Thomas Mathews defeated at Toulon.'
p5974
aS'Also featuring the Battle of Soor, it began in earnest with an alliance proposed by the Marshal Belle-Isle which soon after led to the Battle of Dettingen, a victory for George II two years before its most central action, the Battle of Fontenoy.'
p5975
aS'It stemmed from the invasion of Silesia in response to Maria_Theresas rule under the Pragmatic Sanction.'
p5976
aS'FTP, name this European conflict from 1740 to 1748, a certain war of succession.'
p5977
aS'Count Khevenhuller, who had previously served at the Battles of San Pietro and Guastalla, was able to subdue the city of Munich in this conflict.'
p5978
aS'Khevenhuller was also instrumental in defeating the French at Linz.'
p5979
aS"One contemporaneous conflict of this war was Sweden's War of the Hats."
p5980
aS'This war included the last battle in which a (*) British monarch personally led an army, when George II defeated the duc du Noailles at Dettingen.'
p5981
aS'It arose out of conflict between the Salic Law and the Pragmatic Sanction of 1713.'
p5982
aS"For 10 points, identify this war that included an invasion of Silesia by Frederick_the_Great of Prussia and confirmed Maria_Theresa's place on the throne."
p5983
aS'An attempt to end this war with a twenty million dollar indemnity failed at the Lackawanna conference.'
p5984
aS"According to Wikipedia, weekly editorials in one country's leading newspaper still press for a reversal of this war's outcome."
p5985
aS'During the first phase of this war, the naval battle of Inquique resulted in the death of Arturo Prat and the destruction of the frigate corvette Esmeralda.'
p5986
aS'The victor at that battle was defeated in the Battle of Angamos, allowing the invaders to land troops at Pisagua.'
p5987
aS"Miguel Grau's ship Huascar was a key player in those battles."
p5988
aS'The Tarapaca province was ceded at the end of this war over saltpeter deposits, in the Treaty of Ancon.'
p5989
aS'For 10 points, name this war, fought fought between Chile and a Peruvian-Bolivian alliance, in which Bolivia lost its access to the ocean.'
p5990
aS'One of the losing parties of this saw its naval superiority collapse after its ironclad Huscar was destroyed at the Battle of Angamos; this event was sparked by Hilario Dazas decision to raise taxes on the activities of the Antofagasta Company.'
p5991
aS'The Treaty of Ancon required the provinces of Tacna and Arica to determine their sovereignty within ten years.'
p5992
aS'Its winner gained substantial mineral-rich parts of the Atacama desert, and Bolivia became a landlocked country as a result of this conflict.'
p5993
aS'FTP, identify this war fought between Chile and the alliance of Bolivia and Peru, named after a large nearby ocean.'
p5994
aS'years before this conflict, Aniceto Vergara Albano signed a treaty allowing the other side to collect all the tax revenue between the 23rd and 24th parallels at a rate fixed for 25 years.'
p5995
aS'This conflict began with the Battle of Topater and at the appropriately named Battle of the Halt of the Alliance.'
p5996
aS'Prior to the beginning of this war, Antofagasta had already been occupied.'
p5997
aS'However, this war was decided in (*) naval battles such as Punta Greusa, which saw the loss of the Independencia, and the Battle of Iquique, which was the first of many raids from Miguel Grau.'
p5998
aS"Grau's fortune ended at the Battle of Angamos, where his ship, the Huascar, was captured."
p5999
aS'Ended via the Treaty of Ancon, this war was fought over nitrite resources in the Atacama Desert and saw Bolivia allied with Peru.'
p6000
aS'For 10 points, name this war where Chile emerged victorious, named after a body of water.'
p6001
aS"One battle in this war saw Captain Meza attempt to destroy the enemy's fleet by sailing past them and firing a barrage and then anchoring his fleet to block them from moving down the (+) Parana River."
p6002
aS'The Duke of Caxias commanded troops for one side in this war, and he ordered the capture of cities such as Humaita and Piquissiri.'
p6003
aS'The Battle of Riachuelo occurred during this conflict that is also associated with the (*) Argentine Bartolome Mitre and the Paraguayan Francisco Solano Lopez.'
p6004
aS'For 10 points, name this South American war named after an organization between Argentina, Brazil, and Uruguay.'
p6005
aS"During this war, a veteran of a Morocco campaign, the Count of Eu, was recalled from his honeymoon to fight for his father-in-law's side."
p6006
aS'The leader of the losing country ordered his 70-year-old mother publicly flogged and had an Irish mistress named Eliza Lynch.'
p6007
aS'A boundary dispute after this war was resolved by Rutherford_B._Hayes.'
p6008
aS"The victorious side in this war initially named Bartolome Mitre as supreme commander, and a turning point saw the losing country's fleet destroyed at the naval battle of Riachuelo."
p6009
aS"This war ended with the death of the losing country's flamboyant leader Francisco Solano Lopez."
p6010
aS'For 10 points, name this 1864 to 1870 conflict, the bloodiest war in South American history, which saw Paraguay get defeated by Argentina, Brazil, and Uruguay.'
p6011
aS"One country in this war was forced to use many children as soldiers in a battle where they were killed by the Count d'Eu's men."
p6012
aS'The region known as "Presidente Hayes" is named for Rutherford_B._Hayes, who helped arbitrate a dispute after this war took place.'
p6013
aS'One leader in this war died at the Battle of Cerro Cora, although his mistress Eliza Lynch survived.'
p6014
aS"The Duke of Caxias was one of the winning sides' commanders, while the initial supreme commander was President (*) Bartolome Mitre."
p6015
aS'This war featured the key naval battle of Riachuelo.'
p6016
aS'It resulted in the loss of about 60% of the population of the country ruled by Francisco Solano Lopez.'
p6017
aS'For 10 points, name this South American war in which Paraguay lost to a coalition of Argentina, Brazil, and Uruguay.'
p6018
aS'This conflict began after the overthrow of Atanasio Aguirre.'
p6019
aS'One leader in this conflict, after learning that he was an illegitimate child, flogged and executed his own mother.'
p6020
aS'Francisco Barroso won a major battle in this war by ramming enemy ships at Riachuelo.'
p6021
aS'One side sought the support of Justo Jose de Urquiza by invading Corrientes, after an attempted diversionary attack on Mato Grosso.'
p6022
aS'The last part of this war saw Francisco Solano Lopez killed by the forces of Emperor Pedro II, and most of the male population of Paraguay was killed.'
p6023
aS'For 10 points, name this conflict named for an alliance of Uruguay, Argentina, and Brazil.'
p6024
aS'In 1864 Brazil invaded and occupied Uruguay.'
p6025
aS'Paraguayan leader Francisco Lopez planned to attack southern Brazil and reach Uruguay by going through Argentina; instead he met with hostility on the part of Argentina, who would not let Lopez pass through.'
p6026
aS'In January 1865, Lopez crossed the Argentine border, and an all-out conflict ensued.'
p6027
aS'FTP, name this war, in which Uruguay and Brazil teamed up with Argentina to defeat Lopez and his troops.'
p6028
aS'The first naval battle in this war was fought at Riachuelo, near the city of Corrientes, while ironclads were later used to destroy the fortress at Humaita and bombard the suffering capital of the losing party.'
p6029
aS'Bartolome Mitre was replaced as commander-in-chief by the Duke of Caxias, who was forced to enroll slaves to increase the size of his armies.'
p6030
aS'Land cessions in the Mato Grosso and Gran Chaco resulted from this war, which was sparked by Brazilian intervention in the Uruguayan factional struggle of the Blancos and Colorados.'
p6031
aS'FTP, identify this disastrous war fought by Francisco Solano Lopez, which decimated the male population of Paraguay.'
p6032
aS"In this engagement's fourth year, one of its central figures was replaced by the duque de Caxias and a key turning point was the destruction of a flotilla near Corrientes, at Riachuelo."
p6033
aS'After the fall of Humait, this conflict culminated with the Campaign of Lomas Valentinas in which the army assembled by Bartolom Mitre forced Francisco Solano Lpez to run to the hills in the North, where he was killed in 1870.'
p6034
aS'FTP, name this 1864-1870 conflict, the bloodiest in the history of South America; a war fought between Paraguay and the namesake entity consisting of Argentina, Brazil, and Uruguay.'
p6035
aS'Minor battles in this conflict include the battles of Jatai, Tuyuti, and Curupaity.'
p6036
aS'However, the unwillingness of general Diaz after the latter victory to counterattack without explicit orders from his president would prove fatal, and his side would pay dearly for initiating this war.'
p6037
aS'Initially starting out favorably for one side in this conflict, with gunboats like the Tacuari destroying much of the riverbanks in the Mato Grosso, this conflict would take a turn with the appointment of Bartolome Mitre as joint commander of the other side.'
p6038
aS'The battle of Riachuelo saw the destruction of the attacking navy, and would secure the River Plate basin for the victorious side.'
p6039
aS'Initiated after the Uruguyan Blancos had requested help from one of the parties in this conflict in order to cope with the overthrow of Atanasio Aguirre, FTP, what is this conflict that saw Paraguyan president Francisco Solano Lopez lead more than half his country into death in a worn-out guerrilla'
p6040
aS'Many of the weapons used by the eventual losers were manufactured at the Ibicui foundry, while the official causus belli was the overthrow of Atanasio Aguirre by foreign supporters of Venancio Flores.'
p6041
aS'Its first action saw the gun boats Tacuari and Anhambai lay waste to the Mato Grosso province, but Admiral Francisco da Silva struck back and annihilated the attacking navy at the Battle of Riachuelo, securing control of the River Plate -- as well as Colorado control of Uruguay -- and forcing Francisco Solano Lopez to fight a guerilla conflict against Argentina and Brazil.'
p6042
aS'For ten points, name this 19th century war in which Paraguay lost to a coalition with a specified number of members.'
p6043
aS'This war was directly preceded by the actions of the Tacuari, which attacked the Marqus de Olinda.'
p6044
aS'Barrosa de Silva won a naval conflict at Riachuelo, although the other side in this conflict enjoyed consecutive victories at Nioaque and Miranda, and continued on the take Coxim.'
p6045
aS'This war ended after one side was ambushed at Cerro Cor, although it had begun with an important battle at Mato Grosso.'
p6046
aS'Some troops in the Concordia region were commanded by Bartolome Mitre, while his oppponents troops were commanded by Solano Lopez, and the most major engagement of this war was the Battle of Tuyuti.'
p6047
aS'For ten points, identify this war between Paraguay and the title compact, which was composed of Argentina, Brazil, and Uruguay.'
p6048
aS'One side in this war was surprised by the Piquissiri maneuver, and the battle of Acosta Nu was the last major event in this war.'
p6049
aS'Humaita was a stronghold for one side in this conflict, though it was weakened by bombardments from ironclads and a siege that culminated in a battle where Caballero was defeated by the Marquis de Caxias.'
p6050
aS'Besides the Battle of Tatyiba, Bartolome Mitre scored one of the bloodiest victories of this war at Tuyuti, defeating the forces of a country led by Francisco Solano Lopez.'
p6051
aS'For 10 points, identify this conflict that saw the decimation of the Paraguayan population after being defeated by the combined forces of Brazil, Argentina and Uruguay.'
p6052
aS"One figure in this war had his power cemented by his victory at Mortimer's Cross."
p6053
aS'This war began with the First Battle of St. Albans.'
p6054
aS'One leader in this war was Richard Neville, known as the kingmaker.'
p6055
aS'The origins of this war go back to the overthrow of Richard II.'
p6056
aS'The Battle of(*) Bosworth Field saw the death of Richard III and the rise of Henry Tudor at the end of this war.'
p6057
aS'For 10 points, name this war between the House of Lancaster and the House of York named for the different colored flowers representing the houses.'
p6058
aS'This war was a vehicle for personal disputes between the Duke of Somerset and "the Kingmaker," Richard Neville, Earl of Warwick.'
p6059
aS"A sun dog was witnessed before this war's Battle of Mortimer's Cross."
p6060
aS'One battle of this war saw the forces of Edward IV defeat those of Margaret of Anjou.'
p6061
aS"Including the Battle of Tewkesbury, this war began when [*] Henry VI was captured at St. Alban's."
p6062
aS"Ending with Henry Tudor's defeat of Richard III at the Battle_of_Bosworth_Field, for 10 points, name this English war fought between the Houses of Lancaster and York, which were represented by red and white versions of its namesake flower."
p6063
aS'A sub-conflict in this war featured Pierre Landais trying to capture the leader of the eventual winning side.'
p6064
aS'A naval leader for one side was the so-called "Bastard of Fauconberg."'
p6065
aS'A monarch gained power during it through the Titulus Regius.'
p6066
aS'Shortly after this war, the winning side won the Battle of Stoke Field to defeat a failed uprising meant to place (*) Lambert Simnel on the throne.'
p6067
aS'During it, the "Princes in the Tower" were controversially imprisoned and various schemes were implemented by Richard Neville, the "Kingmaker."'
p6068
aS'It included such battles as First St. Albans and Tewkesbury.'
p6069
aS'This war effectively ended with the Battle_of_Bosworth_Field, where Henry VII defeated Richard III.'
p6070
aS'For 10 points, name this English war fought between the Houses of York and Lancaster.'
p6071
aS"One figure in this war had his power cemented by his victory at Mortimer's Cross."
p6072
aS'This war began with the First Battle of St. Albans.'
p6073
aS'One leader in this war was Richard Neville, known as the kingmaker.'
p6074
aS'The origins of this war go back to the overthrow of Richard II.'
p6075
aS'The Battle_of_Bosworth_Field saw the death of Richard III and the rise of Henry Tudor at the end of this war.'
p6076
aS'For 10 points, name this war between the House of Lancaster and the House of York named for the different colored flowers representing the houses.'
p6077
aS'During this war, the Earl of Warwick became known as the Kingmaker for his services to both sides.'
p6078
aS'The first battle in it occurred at St. Albans in 1455, after Henry VI regained his sanity and removed Richard, a duke, from the post of regent.'
p6079
aS'The conflict was brought to France when Charles the Bold of Burgundy allied with the Yorks.'
p6080
aS'FTP name this thirty-year war ending with the defeat of Richard III by Henry Tudor at Bosworth Field.'
p6081
aS'This conflict included the signing of the Act of Accord.'
p6082
aS'Enmity between the Percy and Neville families was high during this conflict.'
p6083
aS'The Earl of Warwick led forces to victory at the First Battle of St. Albans and later got the epithet "Kingmaker" for successfully crowning Edward IV during this war, which included battles at Northampton and Tewkesbury.'
p6084
aS'During this conflict, Henry VII defeated Richard III at the Battle_of_Bosworth_Field.'
p6085
aS'For 10 points, name this series of British wars that pitted the houses of Lancaster and York against each other.'
p6086
aS"One member of this party founded the Massachusetts Board of Education before attempting to ban corporal punishment in school, while another spoke for two hours before Lincoln's Gettysburg Address."
p6087
aS'Horace Mann\'s "Conscience" faction of this party was opposed by Edward Everett\'s "Cotton" faction, and this party\'s founder designed the American [*] System.'
p6088
aS'This party was succeeded by the Free Soil and Republican parties.'
p6089
aS"For 10 points, name this American political party which ran war heroes for president, including Winfield_Scott, Zachary Taylor, and William Henry Harrison, and which formed thanks to Henry_Clay's opposition to Jacksonian Democracy."
p6090
aS'This party once called for a "well-regulated currency", "protective tariff", and "single term for the president".'
p6091
aS'Willie Person Magnum and Hugh Lawson White were among the presidential candidates of this party who ran in a 1836 attempt to deny Martin_Van_Buren the presidency.'
p6092
aS'Later members of this party would oppose the Compromise_of_1850, and in the Election of 1856, this party ran Millard Fillmore.'
p6093
aS'Their name came from a term associated with Americans who supported the Revolution, and they championed concepts like Congressional supremacy over the Executive Branch.'
p6094
aS'Formed in opposition to Andrew_Jackson, FTP, identify this political party that elected Zachary Taylor and William Henry Harrison.'
p6095
aS'One member of this party, nicknamed the "Cato of the United_States", was Hugh Lawson White.'
p6096
aS'It included a "Silver Gray" faction named for the hair of Francis Granger which opposed the Sewardites, whose members joined with former Know-Nothings to form a ticket whose vice-presidential candidate was Edward Everett as the Constitutional Union Party.'
p6097
aS'One leader of this party declared "Liberty and Union, now and forever, one and inseparable!'
p6098
aS'" in a debate with Robert Hayne.'
p6099
aS"Unsuccessfully nominating Winfield_Scott in 1852, for 10 points, name this political party formed in opposition to Andrew_Jackson's antebellum Democrats, whose leading figures included Henry_Clay, Daniel_Webster, and Zachary Taylor."
p6100
aS"This conflict saw a march led on John Neville's home before it was put down by the Watermelon Army."
p6101
aS'During this event, David Bradford escaped from from his would-be captors.'
p6102
aS'After Governor Robert Mifflin refused to get involved, this event, which occurred in the Monongahela Valley, was put down by ""Lighthorse"" Harry Lee and Alexander_Hamilton.'
p6103
aS'For 10 points, name this 1794 rebellion in Pennsylvania in response to an excise tax on the namesake alcoholic beverage.'
p6104
aS'After John Neville had his house surrounded, his men killed Oliver Miller, touching off this incident.'
p6105
aS'The next day saw the shooting death of John McFarlane, which when coupled with a lack of cooperation from Governor Thomas Mifflin, resulted in a national crisis.'
p6106
aS'It temporarily interrupted the political career of "Light-Horse" Harry Lee, who was given the military command and ordered to end it.'
p6107
aS"The primary cause of the incident was Alexander_Hamilton's excise tax passed into law three years earlier."
p6108
aS'Quashed by George_Washington, FTP, identify this 1794 revolt in western Pennsylvania caused by dissatisfaction with a certain liquor tax.'
p6109
aS"The supposed murder of Oliver Miller was one of the events that precipitated it, inspiring the rise of the Mingo Creek Militia and the assault on John Neville's house."
p6110
aS'Its leader, David Bradford, claimed to have been blackmailed into joining the insurgents, and when Governor Thomas Mifflin refused to get involved, Harry Lee led 13,000 militiamen called by President Washington to restore order in Washington County, Pennsylvania.'
p6111
aS'For 10 points -name this 1794 rebellion that protested a new tax on distilleries.'
p6112
aS'Vowing to "obstruct the operation of the law," its supporters formed committees of correspondence in Fayette, Westmoreland, Bedford, and Allegheny counties.'
p6113
aS"When federal marshals and General John Neville attempted to enforce order, a mob burned Neville's house and tarred and feathered his subordinates."
p6114
aS'Although Alexander Dallas and Governor Thomas Mifflin suggested that judicial authority was enough to restore order, a force of fifteen thousand militia from Virginia, Maryland, and New Jersey gathered under the leadership of Harry Lee and Alexander_Hamilton to suppress it.'
p6115
aS'FTP, name this 1791-94 rebellion in western Pennsylvania caused by an excise tax on a certain spirit.'
p6116
aS'Albert Gallatin and Hugh Henry Brackenridge were among those who met with William Bradford, James Ross, and Jasper Yeates in an attempt to prevent this event, which pitted the "White Indians" against the "Watermelon Army," according to the derisive nicknames created by both sides.'
p6117
aS"Herman Husband and Robert Philson were the only people arrested due to this event, which had been instigated with Oliver Miller's death when John Neville's house was marched on."
p6118
aS'"Lighthorse Harry" Lee and Alexander_Hamilton commanded forces in it, which required the first use of the Militia Law of 1792.'
p6119
aS'FTP, name this 1794 uprising in the Monongahela Valley of Pennsylvania due to the impositions of a tax on the namesake distilled drink. '
p6120
aS'Leaders of this event stole mail and held it at the Blackhorse Tavern, and a failed mediation of this event was led by Hugh Henry Brackenridge.'
p6121
aS"David Bradford's coerced role in this event led to his acquittal in its aftermath, and people involved in this skirmish attacked John Neville's slaves."
p6122
aS'Its leader eventually fled to Louisiana after he was crushed by the so-called "Watermelon Army," and Meriwether Lewis fought for Daniel Morgan\'s Virginia militia that helped put down this rising.'
p6123
aS"For 10 points, name this revolt quashed by Lighthorse Harry Lee and George_Washington, fought in Pennsylvania and spurred by Hamilton's high tax on alcohol."
p6124
aS'This event inspired a musical farce called The Volunteers by Susanna Rowson.'
p6125
aS"The first shots in this event were fired at Oliver Miller's Homestead in South Park Township, and a man named Philip Vigol was pardoned from being hanged."
p6126
aS'Early in this event, an anonymous rabble-rouser named Tom the Tinker urged participation.'
p6127
aS'The militia that put down this event was led by "Lighthorse Harry" Lee, Alexander_Hamilton, and George_Washington.'
p6128
aS'FTP, name this rebellion whose participants were mostly western Pennsylvania Farmers who objected to the namesake tax on a certain alcoholic beverage.'
p6129
aS'Nine years after it was quashed, affiliates of its fomenters captured Hua during the Eight Trigrams Uprising.'
p6130
aS'Several years before it, Wang Lun led a precursor to this revolt.'
p6131
aS"Internal strife during it stemmed from the massive corruption of the Qianlong Emperor's favorite, Heshen, whose ouster at the hands of the Jiaqing Emperor helped put this rebellion down."
p6132
aS'The agitators of this uprising believed in the coming of the Maitreya and led a secret organization.'
p6133
aS'It was centered in mountains between Hubei, Shaanxi, and Sichuan provinces.'
p6134
aS'For 10 points, name this uprising against the Qing Dynasty, a rebellion that occurred from 1796 to 1804 and is named for a Buddhist society.'
p6135
aS'It was precipitated by the revival of a 12th century religious group.'
p6136
aS'Largely uncoordinated roving bands waged guerilla warfare against the ruling dynasty and the corrupt army was frustrated until peasants organized into local militias to defeat them.'
p6137
aS'If they had a true leader, he or she was never found, and they in turn inspired the Nian Rebellion of 1852 and possibly the Boxer Rebellion.'
p6138
aS'FTP, name this 1796-1804 rebellion in central China against the Manchus named for a flower beloved of Buddhists.'
p6139
aS'This event occurred primarily in the Sichuan region; about 50 years later, the related Nien arose in Shandong.'
p6140
aS'The funds intended for the suppression of this rebellion were embezzled by Ho-shen, and soon after his removal, the prosecution began in earnest.'
p6141
aS"The organization behind this insurgency originated in the 1200's, and to motivate the populace, they promised the return of the Maitreya Buddha at the conclusion of their rebellion, which began to be crushed around 1799."
p6142
aS'For 10 points, identify this rebellion against the Qing dynasty, ended in 1804, which was symbolized by the flower used as a symbol by its backing religious sect.'
p6143
aS'A later offshoot of this movement was put down by the death of Chang Loxing after arising in Shandong in 1842 under the name of the (*) Nien.'
p6144
aS"A favored bodyguard who married the Jiaqing emperor's daughter, Hoshen, allowed this movement to flourish while skimming from the treasury."
p6145
aS'For 10 points name this 1796 to 1804 uprising from a Buddhist secret society which sought to revive the Ming and displace the Manchus.'
p6146
aS'A protg of anti-Jacksonian editor Thurlow Weed, he began his career as an antislavery Whig, serving as governor of New York.'
p6147
aS'In the Senate, he opposed the Compromise_of_1850 because of its tough Fugitive Slave Law, warning his opponents that the issue of slavery was governed by a "Higher Law".'
p6148
aS'Joining the new Republican Party, he emerged as the front runner in 1860, only to be passed over for the more moderate Lincoln.'
p6149
aS"FTP, name this Republican leader that served as Lincoln's secretary of state, and was responsible for the purchase of Alaska from Russia."
p6150
aS'This man served two terms as the governor of New York, where he promoted progressive policies like prison reform, and better treatment for the mentally ill. As leader of the anti-slavery wing of the Whig party, this man voted against the Compromise_of_1850 and declared that civil war would ensure if slavery was not abolished.'
p6151
aS'Although he was not able to arrange for the annexation of the Danish Virgin Islands or Panama, this man was aided in his greatest achievement by Eduard de Stoeckl, though Lewis Powell is also associated with this man.'
p6152
aS'A year after he joined the Republican Party, this man lost the presidential nomination to John C Fremont.'
p6153
aS'He also opposed the Fugitive Slave Act, and frequently defended runaway slaves in court, invoking the higher law he believed superseded the Constitution.'
p6154
aS'FTP, name this purchaser of Alaska and Lincolns Secretary of State.'
p6155
aS'He served in the New York State Senate from 1830 to 1834 as part of the Anti-Masonic_Party, then switched to the Whig Party as governor of New York from 1839 to 1843.'
p6156
aS'As a member of the Cabinet, he resolved the Trent_Affair and made a full recovery after being stabbed in the throat by Lewis Powell as part of a larger conspiracy.'
p6157
aS'His Cabinet post was due to his leadership of his last political party after the collapse of the Whigs, whose nomination he lost in 1856 and 1860.'
p6158
aS'This came a few years after he switched to the new (*) Republican party, and he served in the Cabinets of Abraham_Lincoln and Andrew Johnson as Secretary of State.'
p6159
aS'FTP, name this man perhaps best known for his "Folly", the 1867 purchase of Alaska.'
p6160
aS'He negotiated the Burlingame Treaty with Anson Burlingame, ensuring most favored nation status between the U.S. and China.'
p6161
aS'By allying himself with Thurlow Weed he was able to gain the support of the newly formed Whig party and soon gained the governorship of New York from 1839 to 1843.'
p6162
aS'While recovering from a carriage accident, he was stabbed in the neck by Lewis Powell the same night his boss was killed.'
p6163
aS"FTP, identify this man, Lincoln's Secretary of State, best known for his purchase of Alaska."
p6164
aS'This son of Robert the Devil began construction on the White Tower in London.'
p6165
aS"This ruler's claim to the throne was backed by Pope Alexander II."
p6166
aS'This man ordered the creation of the Domesday Book.'
p6167
aS'His queen was Matilda and Henry I was his son.'
p6168
aS"This man's victory over Harold II began the Norman rule of England."
p6169
aS'For 10 points, name this ruler who won the Battle_of_Hastings and became King of England in 1066.'
p6170
aS'He allied with Henry II of France to defeat a rebellion at Val-s-Dunes, and this king patronized the scholar Lanfranc of Pavia, who later replaced Stigand in an important post.'
p6171
aS'This man signed the Treaty of Blancheland with Fulk the Surly, ensuring the secession to the countship of Maine for his son, Robert Curthose.'
p6172
aS"After this man's birth, his mother married Viscount Herluin and gave birth to his half-brother Odo of Bayeux."
p6173
aS'Much like Charlemagne, he was crowned on Christmas Day, though his ceremony took place in Westminster Abbey after his victory over Harold_Godwinson at the Battle_of_Hastings.'
p6174
aS'For 10 points, name this duke of Normandy who seized England in 1066.'
p6175
aS'This man half-jokingly suggested that he would teach his wife to read Amadis de Gaul instead of the Bible, and later wives included the runaway nun Charlotte de Bourbon and a daughter of Admiral Coligny.'
p6176
aS'Among this mans co-conspirators was Floris de Montmercy, who was executed before Anne of Austria could ask her husband to spare him.'
p6177
aS'This man offered the kingship of his country to Francis, Duc dAlenon et dAnjou, after a series of victories by Alessandro Farnese forced him to turn to France for support.'
p6178
aS'This man was assassinated by Balthasar Gerard in 1584, before the liberation of his nation was complete.'
p6179
aS'For 10 points, identify this Dutch freedom fighter, whose heirs were Stadtholders of the United Provinces and whose great-grandson of the same name ruled England with his wife Mary II.'
p6180
aS'His botched funeral saw his relatives forced to pay sixty schillings for his gravesite on the spot, and may have been marred with a fire or his bowels exploding when he was shoved into his sarcophagus.'
p6181
aS'His marriage to a cousin required that they donate the Mens and Womens abbeys, dedicated to St. Stephen.'
p6182
aS'His loyal advisers included his half-brothers Robert and Odo, who was instrumental in putting down a revolt led by Ralph de Guader.'
p6183
aS'He forced the nobles of his kingdom to swear allegiance at the Oath of Salisbury, and he faced resistance from the pretender Edgar Aetheling.'
p6184
aS'He elevated the Archbishop of Canterbury over York in the Accord of Winchester, put down the Revolt of the Earls, and married Matilda of Flanders.'
p6185
aS'For 10 points, name this Domesday-Book-authoring, Battle-of-Hastings-winning first Norman king of England.'
p6186
aS'This ruler won victories at Varaville and Mortemer over Geoffrey Martel.'
p6187
aS'He established Roger of Montgomery as the first Earl of Shrewsbury, creating the Welsh Marches.'
p6188
aS'This ruler faced a rebellion from the earls of Norfolk, Hereford, and Northumberland.'
p6189
aS'Another rebellion against this ruler was led by the men who had earlier lost the Battle of Fulford, Edwin and Morcar.'
p6190
aS'This patron of Lanfranc of Pavia ordered the Harrying of the North.'
p6191
aS'This half-brother of Bishop Odo and husband of Matilda of Flanders was succeeded by his sons Roger Curthose and William Rufus.'
p6192
aS'Originally known as the Bastard, this ruler won another title by defeating Harold II.'
p6193
aS'For 10 points, name this commissioner of the Domesday Book and winner of the Battle_of_Hastings, the first Norman king of England.'
p6194
aS'The combined force of the Act of Seclusion and the Perpetual Edict threatened to hold back the advancement of this man, whose tutelage under Johan de Witt stressed skills of negotiation.'
p6195
aS'He was thrust into national leadership after the invasion of the mainland by Louis XIV and after winning the battle of Narden he succeeded in making peace.'
p6196
aS'But it was his actions during the Glen Coe massacre, such as his victory at the Battle_of_the_Boyne in 1690, that would later solidify his claim to the English throne.'
p6197
aS'FTP identify this Dutchman, wed to Mary, and declared King of England by the Convention Parliament after the ousting on James II.'
p6198
aS"This man's father took six important regents captive at Loevestein castle and had earlier opposed the Treaty of Muenster, actions leading to this man being the target of the Perpetual Edict of Gaspar Fagel and Johan de Witt."
p6199
aS"The builder of the Het Loo palace, this man's popularity grew after the imprisonment of the Seven Bishops."
p6200
aS'Henry Sidney wrote a letter to this man on behalf of the Immortal Seven, and the Treaty of Ryswick recognized his rule, ending the War of the Grand Alliance.'
p6201
aS'His reign saw the passage of the Act of Settlement and the Bill of Rights.'
p6202
aS'For 10 points, name this victor at the Battle_of_the_Boyne, a Dutch stadtholder who became king of England following the Glorious Revolution.'
p6203
aS'He was appointed to one position despite the "Eternal Edict," in direct response to his nation\'s "disaster year" and that position would again be temporarily abolished at his death.'
p6204
aS'This appointment would lead to the murder of Cornelius and Johan de Witt by his supporters.'
p6205
aS'A separate position would see him subject to the Triennial Act and reliant on the fighting of his (*) Blue Guards.'
p6206
aS'This man\'s accomplishments while in his most famous position include fighting the War of the Grand Alliance, ending in the Treaty of Ryswick, and he attained that position after accepting the "Declaration of Rights" from Parliament in 1689.'
p6207
aS'FTP, name this English king who came to power following the Glorious Revolution and co-ruled with Queen Mary.'
p6208
aS'One work by this thinker responds to Kant\'s innatist view of time with the concept of the ""specious present,"" of which all longer periods of time are mere extrapolations.'
p6209
aS"This thinker expounded the idea that illusions are merely habitual responses in a work that discusses the title discipline's methods of (+) analysis, introspection, experiment, and comparison."
p6210
aS'He claimed that we do not run from a bear because we are scared, but that we are scared because we run, in his theory of emotions.'
p6211
aS'He likened George Fox to El Greco in his Gifford Lectures, which discuss the (*) Varieties of Religious Experience.'
p6212
aS'For 10 points, name this philosopher who wrote Principles of Psychology and Pragmatism.'
p6213
aS'This politician emphasized religion as the basis of morality in his lecture "The Prince of Peace." He founded the Progressive newspaper The Commoner, and he resigned as Secretary of State following Woodrow_Wilson\'s handling of the Lusitania affair.'
p6214
aS'This politician was famously cross-examined in court by Clarence Darrow, and although he ended up losing to William_McKinley, he received the Democratic presidential nomination in 1896 after giving a speech espousing bimetallism.'
p6215
aS'For 10 points, name this populist from Nebraska who participated in the Scopes trial and delivered the "Cross of Gold" speech.'
p6216
aS'As Secretary of State, he sent a paperweight in the shape of a plowshare to everyone with whom he negotiated a treaty.'
p6217
aS'His "thirty treaties" were discussed in his "A Message from Bethlehem," in an attempt to end war for all time.'
p6218
aS'His opposition in a presidential election printed notes with his face and the phrase "In God we Trust .'
p6219
aS'.'
aS'.'
aS'for the other 53 cents.'
p6220
aS'" This politician\'s platform, however, as expressed in his 1896 convention speech got him the nomination to go against the Republican candidate, with running mates Thomas Watson and Arthur Sewall.'
p6221
aS'For 10 points, name this orator who was the Democratic and Progressive candidate for the 1896 election and famously railed against a "cross of gold".'
p6222
aS'This president appointed Joseph McKenna as his attorney general and William Day as Secretary of State, after the brief tenure of John Sherman in that office His wife Ida suffered from epilepsy, and during state dinners he would cover her face during seizures.'
p6223
aS'He supported the Dingley Tariff after taking office by way of a campaign funded by Mark Hanna.'
p6224
aS'Following the death of his first vice president Garrett A. Hobart, the position remained vacant for two years.'
p6225
aS'For 10 points , name this Republican in power during saw the explosion of the USS Maine and much of the Spanish-American_War, before being assassinated by Leon Czolgosz.'
p6226
aS"During this Prime Minister's rule, the arrest and death in Ireland of Lord Edward FitzGerald helped spark the United Irishmen Rebellion."
p6227
aS"Also during this man's ministry, a Board of Control was established to supervise the East India Company, and he also pushed for an (+) impeachment trial against one of that company's governors general, Warren Hastings."
p6228
aS'While serving as Chancellor of the Exchequer under Lord Shelburne, he developed a rivalry with Charles James Fox.'
p6229
aS'Men like John Thelwall were tried for treason by his government and habeas corpus was suspended in reaction to the (*) French Revolution that began under his first ministry.'
p6230
aS'For 10 points, name this British prime minister whose first ministry lasted from 1783-1801, and whose father was the First Earl of Chatham.'
p6231
aS"Henry Dundas was impeached for mis-appropriation of public money while serving as First Lord of the Admirality in this man's government, a charge he could not defend since it would have required revealing payments to French spies."
p6232
aS'This man delayed the Regency Bill, so preventing royal power from passing to the Prince of Wales, who would likely have elevated Charles James Fox over this man.'
p6233
aS'This man supported George III, but fell out with him over the issue of Catholic Emancipation after passing the Act of Union, so he resigned.'
p6234
aS"The fall of this man's first government, which had staunchly opposed the French revolution and succeeding regimes, was a central reason for the Treaty of Amiens, and the return of this man to power in 1804 hastened the resumption of war with France."
p6235
aS'For ten points, name this Prime Minister whose father also governed Britain during a long and expensive war with France.'
p6236
aS"During this man's period in office, he convinced the members of his party to cut off their queues and enact a tax on hair powder."
p6237
aS"His ministry saw the Bank of England's first issuance of 1 and 2 banknotes under his friend Thomas Raikes, as well as the introduction of Great Britain's first income tax."
p6238
aS"His resignation preceded Henry Addington's rise to power, and his ministry saw the treason trials of the radicals John Thelwall, John Horne Tooke, and Thomas Hardy."
p6239
aS'His first major act was the introduction of the India Bill, and his time in office saw the Act of Union with Ireland along with his support for Catholic emancipation.'
p6240
aS"He offered a position in his ministry to his rival Charles James Fox, but not to Lord North, and his death precipitated Grenville's creation of the Ministry of All the Talents."
p6241
aS'His ministry saw Great Britian join the Triple Coalition as well as handling the madness of George III.'
p6242
aS'For 10 points, name this British prime minister whose two ministries saw the French Revolution, the Napoleonic Wars, the son of a man who became the Earl of Chatham.'
p6243
aS'man passed the Constitutional Act to split Quebec into Lower and Upper Canada.'
p6244
aS'After he was appointed by the King, this man suffered a defeat in a motion of no confidence because of a coalition formed after the death of the Marquis of Rockingham, but he refused to resign and won the following election handily.'
p6245
aS'He united Ireland with Britain via the Act of Union and forced Spain to give up claims to the Pacific Northwest in the Nootka Crisis.'
p6246
aS'This man delayed the first attempt at the passage of the Regency Bill in order to thwart his rival Charles James Fox.'
p6247
aS'However, this man, who gained power after the failed North-Fox coalition, later joined the opposition with Fox against Henry Addington.'
p6248
aS'His final ministry was followed by the Ministry of All the Talents, which formed after his death shortly after the Battle_of_Austerlitz.'
p6249
aS'For 10 points, name this Tory Prime Minister who served under George III.'
p6250
aS'This general moved the Cherokees along the Trail of Tears to New Echota (eh-CHO-tuh).'
p6251
aS"In the Niagara front of the War_of_1812, he was captured at Queenstown Heights and won at Lundy's Lane in 1814, two years after his release."
p6252
aS'He notched subsequent victories at Cerro Gordo (SAIR-oh GOR-doh), Churubusco (chur-oo-BOOS-koo), and (*) Chapultepec (chuh-PUHL-tuh-pek) after landing at Veracruz (vair-uh-KROOZ) to capture Mexico City during the Mexican-American War.'
p6253
aS'After losing the 1853 Presidential election to Franklin_Pierce on the Whig ticket, he devised the Anaconda Plan to win the Civil War as the General-in-Chief in 1861.'
p6254
aS'For 10 points, name this general nicknamed "Old Fuss and Feathers."'
p6255
aS'This man received the undesirable assignment of guarding Black Rock.'
p6256
aS'William B. Giles got this man a commission to an artillery corps early in his career, and in another post, this man replaced John Wool.'
p6257
aS"He was captured on the Niagara front, but fought successfully at Lundy's Lane."
p6258
aS"Later, this man won three victories in quick succession at Molina del Rey, Churubisco, and Chapultapec, after earlier getting fed up with Zachary Taylor's progress and capturing Veracruz."
p6259
aS'Later, he drafted the Anaconda Plan, but ran in an election against Franklin_Pierce and was the unsuccessful Whig candidate.'
p6260
aS'For ten points, identify this excessively formal general nicknamed "Old Fuss and Feathers.'
p6261
aS'"'
aS'This state was where the author of Sand County Almanac, Aldo Leopold, taught for many years.'
p6262
aS'The 1924 Progressive Party candidate for President was from this state, where as governor, he had previously introduced such progressive policies as direct election of senators.'
p6263
aS'That governor of this state was Robert La Follette.'
p6264
aS"This state's current governor survived a 2012 gubernatorial recall election and is staunchly opposed to public employees' collective bargaining rights."
p6265
aS'For 10 points, name this state governed by Scott Walker, whose largest city is Milwaukee.'
p6266
aS'One historian of this period argues that we must ask the question "why not" rather than "why" in seeking to understand it, citing the role of "uncontrollable forces" in it.'
p6267
aS'That man, Paul Schroeder, has analogized this period to a "Galloping Gertie".'
p6268
aS'Arno Mayer cites the rise of radical groups in characterizing this period as "counterrevolutionary" and arguing for "The Primacy of Domestic", rather than international, "politics".'
p6269
aS'This period is characterized as the beginning of the "Age of Catastrophe" in The Age of Extremes; in that work Eric Hobsbawm argues that the beginning of this period was also the beginning of the > "Short Twentieth Century".'
p6270
aS'Factors traditionally cited as contributing to the beginning of this conflict include rigid war plans, militarism, alliances, imperialism, and nationalism.'
p6271
aS"For 10 points, identify this conflict, which was sparked by Gavrilo Princip's assassination of Franz Ferdinand."
p6272
aS'In his early career, this man repeatedly lost to the forces of Muhammad Shaybani.'
p6273
aS'This man took advantage of the scheming of Alam Khan and Dualat Khan to defeat Ibrahim Lodi in battle.'
p6274
aS'Shortly after that battle, this man defeated the Rajput army of Rana Sanga at the Battle of Khanua.'
p6275
aS'This descendant of (*) Tamurlane made several unsuccessful attempts to capture Samarkand and was forced to capture Kabul instead.'
p6276
aS'This man was succeeded by his son Humayan and defeated the Delhi sultanate at the first Battle of Panipat.'
p6277
aS'For 10 points, name this founder of the Mughal_Empire.'
p6278
aS'The nephew of Sultan Mahmud Mirza, he took advantage of the death of Sikandir Lodi to launch his military campaign.'
p6279
aS'With a strategy involving the deployment of matchlockmen and mobile field guns against an enemy whose notions of military honor tended to spurn firearms, he defeated Ibrahim Lodi at Panipat in 1526 with a relatively small force.'
p6280
aS'FTP, name the ruler who by 1530 had founded the Mughal regime in India.'
p6281
aS"When his son was dying, this ruler offered his life instead, walking around his son's bed seven times in prayer."
p6282
aS'Later that year, his son recovered, and he took ill, dying shortly thereafter.'
p6283
aS'Following his decisive defeat at Sar-e-Pol, he lost much of his territory and was forced to run from the forces of Muhammad Shaybani Khan, ruler of the Uzbeks beyond the Syr Darya.'
p6284
aS'He consolidated his forces for more than twenty years before raiding into the kingdom of Malwa and then capturing Gujarat and Udaipur in one swift stroke.'
p6285
aS'This ruler of Fergana and descendant of Tamerlane would finally come into his own when he defeated Ibrahim Lodi at Panipat in 1525.'
p6286
aS'FTP, name this Muslim ruler who founded the Mughal empire.'
p6287
aS"This man's advisors included Ustat Ali, who helped him reform the military."
p6288
aS'Shortly before his death, this man won the Battle of Ghaghra against an alliance of rebels that included King Nusrat Shah of Bengal.'
p6289
aS'Early in his career, this man suffered dual defeats when Farghana successfully rebelled against him during his unsuccessful invasion of Uzbek territory.'
p6290
aS"This man later won a battle because of the defection of General Silhadi to his side; that battle was the Battle of Khanwa, in which this man defeated (*) Rana Sanga, the leader of the Rajputs, this man's southern neighbors."
p6291
aS'This man came to power after defeating Ibrahim Lodi at the First Battle of Panipat.'
p6292
aS'For ten points, name this founder of the Mughal dynasty.'
p6293
aS"This man's father was a noted pigeon enthusiast who died while in a pigeon house as it fell off a cliff."
p6294
aS'This man also pioneered the mubayyin verse form, which can be seen in his book of the same name.'
p6295
aS"When the astrologer Muhammad Sharif predicted that this man would decisively lose a battle at Khanua, this man vowed not to touch wine and ordered all his booze to be dumped down a well to boost his troops' morale."
p6296
aS'After the defeat of the kingdom of Herat by the Uzbeks, this Timurid established a weak kingdom in Kabul.'
p6297
aS'Dilawar Khan and Alam Khan had approached this man to seek his help in defeating Ibrahim of the Lodi dynasty, which he easily accomplished at the Battle of Panipat.'
p6298
aS'For 10 points, identify this father of Humayun and founder of the Mughal dynasty.'
p6299
aS'Fletcher Brown was mayor during this event.'
p6300
aS"Local Nation Lawyers' Guild president Robert Kenney led one investigation of this event, while Jack Tenney, the head of HUAC, led another investigation to uncover any links to the Axis powers."
p6301
aS'It was sparked by war time restrictions on the amount of fabric that could be used for a (*) style of clothing that featured high waist pants, a long coat, and a pork pie hat, all of which was favored by recent Mexican immigrants.'
p6302
aS'For 10 points, name this series of 1943 riots in Los_Angeles.'
p6303
aS'Tension in the buildup to this even was caused by an expos about "baby gangsters" authored by Clem Peoples.'
p6304
aS'A trial that helped to instigate this event saw the defendants represented by George Shibley.'
p6305
aS'One of the causes of this event was the stabbing of Joe Dacy Coleman, whose death inspired a wave of violence facilitated by a convoy of hired taxicabs.'
p6306
aS'Tensions before this event were high because of a murder case the year before in which six hundred youths were arrested and twenty-two indicted; the seventeen convicted later had those convictions overturned in a retrial of the case People v. Zammora, which was initially tried in the year before this event.'
p6307
aS'Louie Encinas was probably the true perpetrator of the Sleepy Lagoon murder, which preceded this event in which hundreds of Navy sailors and Marines invaded a Los_Angeles barrio looking for pachucos.'
p6308
aS'For 10 points, name these riots of 1943 in which U. S. soldiers attacked Mexican-Americans wearing the titular type of clothing.'
p6309
aS'His uncle enraged St. Dunstan by leaving his coronation feast to cavort with his foster-mother and foster-sister.'
p6310
aS'His mother Elfrida, in her quest to put him on the throne, killed his half-brother, who was later considered a martyr, and during his reign his theigns defeated the Norwegians at Maldon.'
p6311
aS"According to William of Malmesbury, he defecated in the font at his baptism, and he brought disaster to England on St. Brice's Day when he ordered a massacre of the Danes."
p6312
aS'In response to this, Sweyn Forkbeard launched a campaign to conquer England, but died several weeks after achieving his goal, allowing this man to retake his throne in 1014.'
p6313
aS'FTP, name this father of Edmund Ironsides and Edward_the_Confessor, a pre-Norman English king whose epithet means "without counsel.'
p6314
aS'"'
aS'The Enham regulations were drawn up by Wulfstan II, who served as an advisor to both this man and his successor.'
p6315
aS'His reign saw Byrhtnoth lose the Battle of Maldon to the Vikings, and this king also paid a gigantic Danegeld to stop the armies of Thorkell the Tall.'
p6316
aS"He was saved from an attacking army by Ulfcytel after ordering the St. Brice's Day massacre and enraging his rival Sweyn Forkbeard."
p6317
aS'Eventually supplanted as King of England by Sweyn\'s son Canute, for 10 points, identify this father of Edward_the_Confessor whose nickname comes from his "ill counsel" rather than his unpreparedness.'
p6318
aS"During this man's reign, Archbishop Alphege was taken hostage during an invasion."
p6319
aS'This monarch issued the Edicts of Enham and Bath to promote nationwide fasting.'
p6320
aS"His ascendance to the throne was aided by Elfrida's murder of his half-brother, and this king's reign was characterized by turbulence with a certain group, culminating in the St. Brice's Day Massacre."
p6321
aS"After this man's death and the short reign of his son Edmund Ironsides, the throne would not return to the kingdom of Wessex until Edward_the_Confessor in 1042."
p6322
aS'For 10 points, name this Anglo-Saxon king whose unfortunate nickname signified that he was poorly counseled, not unprepared.'
p6323
aS'Originally a freemason, he joined The League and gained his first political appointment after the passage of the Maura statute.'
p6324
aS'After seizing power from his predecessor at the Tejeros Convention he and his 34 followers bargained for an escape.'
p6325
aS'His followers killed potential rival General Antonio Luna to insure that he would lead them into such battles as the one at Tirad Pass.'
p6326
aS'Accompanied by his right hand man Apolinario Mabini he presented a new Constitution in the town of Malolos in 1898, but soon ran afoul of American forces and was captured by Frederick Funston.'
p6327
aS'FTP, name this Filipino revolutionary leader.'
p6328
aS"One of this man's grand-nephews, Cesar Virata, was prime minister of his country from 1981 till 1986."
p6329
aS'A native of the province of Cavite, he would come to preside over the Tejeros convention after shrewdly outmanoeuvering his rival Andres Bonifacio, whom he would have executed afterwards.'
p6330
aS'After initial successes, relentless pressure by the colonial forces would lead him to sign the treaty of Biak-na-bato, ending the Katipunan rebellion, and exiling himself to Hong Kong as part of the settlement.'
p6331
aS'In 1901, after the death of his most trusted general, Gregorio de Pilar, at the Battle of Tirad Pass, he was captured by US General Frederick Funston with the help of Macabebe trackers.'
p6332
aS'FTP, name this man who lost to Manuel Quezon in his bid for presidency after the passage of the 1935 Tydings-McDuffie Act, a general instrumental in the Philippines war for independence from Spain and the resistance of American occupation.'
p6333
aS'Along with his supporters Isabelo Artacho, Antonio Montenegro, and Mariano Trias, he agreed to go into voluntary exile at the Treaty of Biak-na-Bato.'
p6334
aS'This member of the Kaipunan brotherhood had been selected leader at the Tejeros Convention, over his rival Andres Bonifacio, whom he had killed.'
p6335
aS'Prior to being defeated at the Battle of Tirad Pass, he had used a meeting at Cabanatuan Church to kill another rival, Antonio Luna.'
p6336
aS'Captured by Frederick Funston after losing his loyal general Gregorio del Pilar, he was forced to swear fealty to the United_States.'
p6337
aS'For ten points, name this first President of the Philippines, who led resistance to both Spanish and American rule.'
p6338
aS'The son of either Ikunum or Laibum, his humble origins included his service as cup-bearer to Zababa.'
p6339
aS"His intervention in a merchant's dispute in Pur-sha-handa brought him to the height of his career, which included an invasion of Cyprus."
p6340
aS'Kassala and Subartu fell to him after his victory at the Battle of Nippur, leading him to become the first ruler of his people to govern a multi-ethnic state, which included the Elamites, whose capitol city of Susa he burned.'
p6341
aS"FTP, name this successor of Lugal-za-gesir who established the world's first historical empire in Mesopotamia."
p6342
aS'This statesman began as a soldier and rose to become commander-in-chief by 1951.'
p6343
aS'As part of the Colorado party, he deposed Federico Chavez in 1954 and stabilized his country, but had to spend half the national income on the military that kept him in power.'
p6344
aS'The longest serving head of state in twentieth century Latin America, for ten points was what man, until 1989, the president of Paraguay'
p6345
aS'man earned the nickname "Colonel Trunk" after he had to be smuggled to the Brazilian embassy during a failed coup attempt.'
p6346
aS'His supporters, known as the "Barefoot Ones," were known for their brutality, and, combined with the actions of his minister Edgar Ynsfran, led to his unpopularity by 1959.'
p6347
aS'He responded by pledging to reform his nation\'s 1940 Constitution and ushered in a democratic "spring" movement, which was short lived due to rioting over bus fare increases and the reinstatement of the "state of siege" decree that he had promulgated upon first coming to power.'
p6348
aS'He was deposed by Andres Rodriguez after a visit by Pope John Paul II incited Catholic unrest, ending his 44 year rule over the Colorado Party that had begun when he overthrew Federico Chavez.'
p6349
aS'Known for constructing the Itaipu Dam, for 10 points, name this dictator of Paraguay.'
p6350
aS'Silvio Pettirossi airport was formerly named for this man, who endorsed Luis Mara Argaa in the elections of 1993 in an attempted to rebuild his power base.'
p6351
aS'His longtime second-in-command was the colorful drug smuggler and stock manipulator Andrs Rodrguez Pedotti, who nonetheless had an attack of conscience and led the coup to depose this dictator.'
p6352
aS'Durign his rule, he knowingly harbored Josef Mengele and helped patronize the construction of the Itaip dam, after coming to power by means of a coup against Federico Chvez in 1954.'
p6353
aS'For 10 points, name this Colorado Party leader who ruled until 1989 in Paraguay.'
p6354
aS'This rulers right-hand men included intelligence chief Pastor Coronel and minister of the interior Edgar Ynsfran, whom he later dismissed.'
p6355
aS'He was opposed by a coup of Mendz Fleitas, the president of the Central Bank, whose supporters were dubbed epafanistas, and also by the Renovation Movement and the Febreristas, who had also fought against the earlier government of his mentor Higinio Morngo.'
p6356
aS'Just like Charles Meigs, this ruler spent a formative part of his life in the trunk of a car  he was captured in a coup and taken to a foreign embassy, which led him to be known as Colonel Trunk.'
p6357
aS'After taking power, he proclaimed a constitutional state of siege and renewed it every three months.'
p6358
aS'Ousted in a coup led by Andres Rodrigues, FTP, name this man who came to power by overthrowing Federico Chavez in 1954, and was the head of the Colorado Party until 1989, the whole time serving as dictator of Paraguay.'
p6359
aS'His experience defending the Santa Fe Trail led him to improve the old muzzle-loading carbines, so in 1853, he resigned his commission to manufacture guns near Edghill, his estate.'
p6360
aS'At the outbreak of the Civil War, he was appointed colonel of the First Rhode Island Regiment, and by 1862 he oversaw the First and Ninth Corps.'
p6361
aS'Had his attack on the Rohrbach Bridge been more effective, the Battle_of_Antietam might not have been so costly.'
p6362
aS'His military career ended with the Battle of the Crater, but his most famous mistake culminated in the Mud March after a failed attempt to cross the Rappahannock River.'
p6363
aS'FTP, name this Civil War Union general replaced by Joseph Hooker after the Battle of Fredericksburg and known for his eponymous whiskers.'
p6364
aS'As the leader of the Army of Ohio this man led a campaign in East Tennessee which successfully defended Knoxville from the forces of James Longstreet.'
p6365
aS'This man led a campaign in 1862 which captured most of the coast of North_Carolina as part of the Anaconda Plan.'
p6366
aS"This man's Mud March, a failed attempt to surprise Lee's forces from behind after a crossing of the Rappahannock River, led to his replacement by Joseph Hooker."
p6367
aS'This man was permanently relieved of duty for his botched efforts in the Battle of the Crater which failed to end the Siege of Petersburg.'
p6368
aS'This man was offered command of one army following the failure of the Peninsular Campaign and again after the Second Battle of Bull Run, but he only accepted the position after a battle in which he took hours trying to cross a bridge defended by Confederate sharpshooters which now bears his name, the Battle_of_Antietam.'
p6369
aS'For 10 points, name this Union general who is best remembered for his disastrous attempt to take Richmond in 1862 after replacing George McClellan as commander of the Army of the Potomac which ended with the Battle of Fredericksburg.'
p6370
aS'It was exacerbated by the death of a Mrs. Sherwood and was preceded by Miles Irving arresting two vocal nationalists, Drs.'
p6371
aS'Kitchloo and Satyapal.'
p6372
aS'Partly caused by the reshuffling of domestic politics after the end of the war codified by the Black or Rowlatt Acts, it only took about fifteen minutes but was more deadly since there were no easy avenues to escape.'
p6373
aS'Taking place in the Garden or Jallianwallah Bagh, it saw the death of more than four hundred Hindus.'
p6374
aS'FTP, identify this event that saw the British General Dyer fire into an unarmed crowd in 1919 in the namesake capital of the Sikhs.'
p6375
aS'A controversial order given in the aftermath of this event required people to walk on all fours every time they passed through Crawling Lane.'
p6376
aS'This event was investigated by the Hunter Commission, and the Morning Post raised over twenty-six thousand pounds for the person responsible for it after his censure.'
p6377
aS'The arrests of Satyapal and Kitchlew were the basis of the riots that took place three days prior, and led to the prohibitory orders of the instated martial law, which were violated by a peaceful gathering for Baisakhi Day.'
p6378
aS'FTP, identify this April 13, 1919 event in which British troops under Brigadier-General Reginald Dyer opened fire on an unarmed gathering of Indians at Jallianwala Bagh.'
p6379
aS'This event was preceded by the actions of a committee led by a relative of the promulgator named Sydney, which led to the passage of a namesake act designed to quell sedition, while one participant in this event lamented that his machine guns were mounted on cars.'
p6380
aS'Another commission dealing with this event was the Hunter Comission.'
p6381
aS'Michael ODwyer retroactively condoned this event, which was investigated at the insistence of Edwin Montagu.'
p6382
aS'Pundham Singh assassinated ODwyer in vengeance for this event.'
p6383
aS'This event occurred on the Baisakhi holidy, and one side in this event participated using the Beluchi and Gurkha regiments.'
p6384
aS'For ten points, identify this event that occurred in the Jallianwala Bagh gardens in the northern part of its namesake city, in which Reginald Dwyer ordered the death of around 400 Indian citizens.'
p6385
aS'the aftermath of this event, a hysterical speech by Lord Montague led to open expressions of anti-Semitism from Tories and was only salvaged when the War Secretary gave a speech stating that "Frightfulness is not a remedy known to the British pharmacopeia.'
p6386
aS'" This event was investigated by the Hunter Commission, which found that one of its causes was legislation which would make permanent a temporary law that would allow some political suspects to be tried without juries or held without trials.'
p6387
aS"One participant stated that vehicles were only excluded due to the narrowness of an entrance, and Lieutenant Governor Michael O'Dwyer was assassinated in reaction to this incident 21 years later."
p6388
aS"The passage of the Rowlatt Acts caused a demonstration at a public garden, at which Reginald E. H. Dyer opened fire on peaceful protesters, killing almost 400 and sparking Gandhi's non-cooperation movement in the 1920s."
p6389
aS'For 10 points, name this 1919 massacre in Punjab.'
p6390
aS'One leading political group in this country signaled its changing affinity for Communism by adding and then dropping the phrase party of labor from its name.'
p6391
aS'Militant groups in this country were founded by Holden Roberto and Agostinho Neto in the 1950s, though the National Front for Liberation became less relevant by the 1990s, ceding the leftist position in national politics to the MPLA.'
p6392
aS'Its civil war was briefly ended by a pact signed in another country, the Lusaka Accord, but clashes resumed and in 2002, government troops killed Jonas Savimbi, the leader of UNITA.'
p6393
aS'A proxy war between Cuba and South_Africa had previously raged in, for 10 points, what former Portuguese colony on Africas south Atlantic coast'
p6394
aS'They nominated a man who went by the pseudonym "Henry Homespun" for a major office, and Solomon Southwick later published the National Observer to expound their views.'
p6395
aS"One of their leaders gained support for his Chenango Canal Bill, but that wasn't enough to get Francis Granger elected governor."
p6396
aS'One of them, William A. Palmer, was elected governor of Vermont.'
p6397
aS'They were concerned about a man who may have collaborated with David A. Miller on the republication of Jachin and Boaz, and who was last seen in the Canandaigua jail in 1826.'
p6398
aS'Their views were set forth in an Enquirer published by Thurlow Weed, and their leaders included William_H._Seward.'
p6399
aS'In 1831, they nominated former Attorney General William Wirt to run against Andrew_Jackson.'
p6400
aS'FTP, name this first American third party, which was opposed to secret societies.'
p6401
aS'One party of this name ran Jonathan Blanchard for President in 1884.'
p6402
aS'Lesser known representatives of another party by this name are Bates Cooke and Benjamin Deming, and in one election it had a vice-presedential candidate who had been appointed Pennsylvania attorney general by Andrew Schulze.'
p6403
aS'Joseph Ritner and William Palmer were both elected governor as members of this party, and it ran Amos Ellmaker as vice-president.'
p6404
aS'The formation of this party was catalyzed by the mysterious disappearance of William Morgan.'
p6405
aS'This party was the first to use a national convention, and in its most successful election, it won only the seven electoral votes of Vermont.'
p6406
aS'FTP, name this party which ran William Wirt in 1832, and was formed to combat a fraternal organization.'
p6407
aS'One member of this organization was defeated as the incumbent governor of Pennsylvania by David Porter, a result which sparked the Buckshot War, started by partisans of Joseph Ritner.'
p6408
aS'Another one of their candidates for higher office in a later incarnation was the first president of Wheaton College, Jonathan Blanchard.'
p6409
aS'This party relied on a support base in the form of several (*) New York newspapers, most notably the Enquirer and the Albany Evening Journal, both edited by Thurlow Weed.'
p6410
aS"The founding of this group may have been catalyzed by the disappearance of William Morgan, who was bailed out of debtor's prison by unknown people and never seen again."
p6411
aS'William Wirt was nominated in 1828 by, FTP, what political party at the first United_States presidential nominating convention, a group aimed at negating the allegedly nefarious influence of a certain secret society'
p6412
aS'This federal law was presaged by state legislation in primarily Western and Southern states, but Delaware and New Jersey were notorious for having loopholes that made this law necessary.'
p6413
aS'This legislation was first used five years after it was passed to serve an injunction to a striking railroad union, which affirmed the purpose that George F. Edmunds, the Senate Judiciary Chair, saw in it.'
p6414
aS'It was later weakened by US v. E.C.'
p6415
aS'Knight Co., and was passed by nearly unanimous vote.'
p6416
aS'Succeeded by the Clayton Act, for ten points, identify this 1890 law, which prohibited any contract, combination or conspiracy in restraint of trade or commerce.'
p6417
aS"The case Rice v. Norman Williams Co regarded the ability of this act to invalidate a California law that prohibited liquor import, and it immediately followed the passage of the Valentine Act in its proposer's home state."
p6418
aS'Violations of this law can be sorted into "per se" and "rule of reason" violations.'
p6419
aS'It was upheld by a case that held that a contract violates this law if it results in undue restraint, known as Standard Oil Company vs. United_States.'
p6420
aS'One of its first applications was settling the Pullman Strike, and it was also used to break up the Northern Securities Company and the American Tobacco Company.'
p6421
aS'Named for a senator from Ohio and followed up by an act that targeted price discrimination, for 10 points, name this act followed up by the Clayton_Antitrust_Act, which restrained monopolies.'
p6422
aS"A poorly-executed rebellion against this man at the garrison at Beja was led by a man who had earlier masterminded the hijacking of the SS Santa Maria during this man's rule."
p6423
aS'This man exclaimed "Famine is but a figment of Bantu imagination" during famine that plagued his colonies, and his reign also saw many movements to bring Humberto Delgado back to power.'
p6424
aS'His secret police force was known at different times as the PVDE and PIDE.'
p6425
aS'Early in his reign, he outlawed an organization formed by Francisco Preto called the National Syndicalists and his rule also saw the promotion of the cult of Fatima.'
p6426
aS"This man's rule saw the transfer of colonial possessions such a Goa and Damao e Diu, both of which were taken by India in Operation Vijay."
p6427
aS'Replaced by Marcelo Caetano in 1968, he is best remembered for establishing a state that ended in the "Carnation Revolution.'
p6428
aS'" For 10 points, identify this longtime dictator of Portugal who founded the "Estado Novo".'
p6429
aS'One opponent of this policy made the ""I am prepared to die"" speech during the Rivonia Trial.'
p6430
aS'Aspects of this policy included the Group Areas Act and the Terrorism Act, the latter of which led to the arrest and death of Stephen Biko.'
p6431
aS'It resulted in the creation of Venda, Ciskei (SIS-kay), and other Bantustans.'
p6432
aS'Opposition to this policy resulted in the Sharpeville massacre and the Soweto uprising in (*) Johannesburg.'
p6433
aS'It ended in 1994, allowing for the election of Nelson Mandela.'
p6434
aS'For 10 points, name this policy of racial segregation in South_Africa.'
p6435
aS'This civilization used a system of local government administered by obirempon .'
p6436
aS'In an alliance with the Ga people, this civilization fought against the Fante, Akwapim and Akim.'
p6437
aS'Joseph Dupuis was the first British Consul for the region under this civilizations control, and this civilization came to prominence under the leadership of Oti Akenten, who defeated the Denkiyra.'
p6438
aS'General Woolsley famously fought against this civilization, and in 1900, this people had a notable uprising.'
p6439
aS'Osei Tutu was the first leader of the confederation that became this people, and a relic holy to this people fell out of the sky into his lap.'
p6440
aS'For ten points, identify this empire which venerated the Golden Stool and which had a center at Kumasi.'
p6441
aS'polity fought a war against Asafu Ejei, ruler of Juaben, and it narrowly averted another conflict caused by the misinterpretation of the symbol of an axe carried by ambassadors of this polity, which was forced to sign the Treaty of Fomena.'
p6442
aS'Another conflict broke out with allegations of grave robbing against the Assin, and resulted in this polity fighting the Fante, while this polity conquered Bono under its king (*) Opoku Ware.'
p6443
aS'The death of Charles MacCarthy ended one conflict involving this polity, while another followed the exile of Prempeh I to the Seychelles and was fought by the Queen Mother against Frederick Hodgson.'
p6444
aS'Garnet Wolseley led a campaign against this empire, which threw off control by Denkyera under Osei Tutu.'
p6445
aS"It was centered at Kumasi, and its kings' authority came from an object that supposedly fell from the heavens, the Golden Stool."
p6446
aS'For 10 points, name this empire found in modern Ghana.'
p6447
aS'This empire used a system of local government in which an obirempon or "Big Man" served as a regional ruler, and it employed a communication system called "talking drums".'
p6448
aS'This kingdom rose to prominence with its victory over Ntim Gyakari at the Battle of Feyiase, which cemented their dominance over the Denkyira people.'
p6449
aS"This empire's last resistance was led by Queen Yaa in 1900, and their capital had earlier been burned by the British general Garnet Wolseley."
p6450
aS"This empire's cofounders were Osei Kofi Tutu, who wielded political power, and his chief priest Okomfo Anokye, who made the Golden Stool descend from the heavens."
p6451
aS'With its capital at Kumasi, for 10 points, name this African empire centered in present-day Ghana.'
p6452
aS'One ruler of it had to put down the Eikyo Rebellion started by his adviser Yoshimitsu, and was in the Kakitsu Rebellion, while another had to defeat his rival Nitta Yoshisada before taking full control.'
p6453
aS'One tradition among its rulers was taking homosexual lovers from the Akamatsu family, and because its first ruler installed the puppet Komyo on the throne, its early period saw two different imperial courts.'
p6454
aS'Having its own court at Kyoto, it had its origins when its founder used the Genko Rebellion as an excuse to betray the Hojo clan and supported Emperor GoDaigo during the Kemmu Restoration.'
p6455
aS'For ten points, name this second Japanese shogunate, which descended into the Warring States Period.'
p6456
aS'Early military success by this ruler came at the battle of Chimborazo, and he at last defeated his first enemy at Quipaipan.'
p6457
aS'This ruler split his kingdom with Huascar, which led to a civil war, the victor of which was this ruler, and he therefore succeeded his father Huyana Capec .'
p6458
aS'One anecdote concerning this ruler is that he was strangled instead of burned upon accepting Christianity, which happened after he offered to fill a room with 24 tons of gold for his captors as ransom, and this ruler saw his greatest defeat at the less-than-an-hour long battle of Cajamarca.'
p6459
aS'For ten points, identify this loser to Francisco Pizzaro, the last emperor of the Incans.'
p6460
aS'The priest Valverde reports that upon reading the requerimiento to this ruler and giving him a prayer book, this ruler threw the prayer book to the ground, which led to his seizure.'
p6461
aS"This ruler had taken full control of his empire after defeating his brother's forces at the Battle of Chimborazo."
p6462
aS'His father, Huayna Capac, died of smallpox in 1527, this ruler accepted baptism as Juan Santos in exchange for execution by garrote rather than by burning.'
p6463
aS'FTP identify this brother of Huscar and emperor of the Incans, who was killed by Francisco Pizarro.'
p6464
aS'At one point, it was ruled by the brothers Abreha and Atsbeha, who were notably visited by Frumentius.'
p6465
aS'Athanasius recorded a letter which was sent to its king Ezana by Constantius II, while Procopius noted its struggle with a Yemeni ruler named Abreha.'
p6466
aS'Its King Bazen has been claimed to be one of the Three Magi, while its last great ruler was known as Kaleb.'
p6467
aS'Endubis was the first of its rulers to oversee the minting of coins, and Gedara is mentioned in its language, Ge\'ez, as the "king of kings," a title inherited by all of its rulers, including one whose fourth-century invasion of Meroe made it the most powerful empire in Nubia.'
p6468
aS'FTP, name this empire, centered at a namesake capital on the Tigray Plateau, which flourished between 100 and 700 CE.'
p6469
aS'Its hegemony was destroyed around the 10th-century by Yodit and the subsequent ascension of the Zagwe dynasty.'
p6470
aS"The language Ge'ez marks this kingdom's South Arabian cultural roots, that during the reign of emperors like Kaleb, saw the port city of Adulis and its namesake capital dominate the ivory trade with Sudan."
p6471
aS"Yet it is most famed for Ezana's decision to follow Frumentius' advice and convert to Christianity."
p6472
aS'FTP, name this kingdom that warred with Meroe, dominated Ethiopia for six centuries, and is supposedly the resting place for the Ark of the Covenant.'
p6473
aS'In the 6th century, this kingdom reduced the Yemen to vassals, while three centuries earlier it invaded and conquered the neighboring Meroe kingdom.'
p6474
aS'Renowned for its huge obelisk tombs, it used its port at Adulis to dominate trade on the Red Sea.'
p6475
aS"It saw the minting of coins under its greatest king, Ezana, whose alliance with Byzantium started the kingdom's conversion to Christianity."
p6476
aS'For 10 points - what was this trading kingdom of northeastern Africa that eventually developed into Ethiopia'
p6477
aS'According to Cosmas Indicopleustes, the ruler of this kingdom lived in a palace decorated by unicorn statues.'
p6478
aS'A merchant guidebook called the Periplus of the Erythrean Sea describes this polity and its miserly ruler King Erythrean and says that its major port was Adulis.'
p6479
aS'Justinian sent an ambassador named Julian to this kingdom, who reported that its ruler wore a loincloth of gold fiber.'
p6480
aS'During the reigh of King Afilas, this kingdom defeated King Shammar Yuharish, and later this empire crushed the Himyarites, a sect of fanatical Jews.'
p6481
aS'Frumentius, a Syrian monk, brought Christianity to this kingdom during the reign of King Ezana.'
p6482
aS'At its height, this kingdom ruled Yemen and its northern neighbor, the Kingdom of Kush.'
p6483
aS'For 10 points, name this early Christian Ethiopian state.'
p6484
aS'The winning side in this battle took up position at the New Park, while a significant contingent of "camp-followers" stayed in secret reserve at Coxet Hill.'
p6485
aS'Six years after the battle came the issuance of the Declaration of Arbroath, which was sent to Pope John XXII.'
p6486
aS"It occurred after a pact between the brother of the winning side's king and Philip Mowbray, the local commander of a castle under siege, after which a force of Thomas Randolph was victorious in skirmish with Robert Clifford and Henry Beaumont."
p6487
aS'More famous for the heroic slaying of Henry de Bohun, the victors forced a hasty retreat by Edward II.'
p6488
aS'FTP, name this 1314 battle which secured Scottish independence, a victory for Robert de Bruce.'
p6489
aS"Ingram de Umfraville fought for the losing side of this battle that John Coyme the Younger participated in to avenge his father's murder by its victorious commander at Dumfries."
p6490
aS'Sir Philip Mowbray commanded the besieged forces during this battle, and Thomas of Lancaster contributed the minimum legal number of troops.'
p6491
aS'Robert Keith led a 500-man cavalry charge around a swamp that scattered archers during this battle, and the losing forces were jointly commanded by the Earls of Gloucester and Hereford, who failed to break the siege of Stirling Castle.'
p6492
aS"FTP, name this 1314 battle in which Edward II's English forces lost to Robert the Bruce, strengthening his claim to the Scottish throne."
p6493
aS'He gave his sister Anna in marriage to Vladimir I of Kiev and received 6000 soldiers who formed the core of the Varangian guard.'
p6494
aS'Early in his reign he suppressed a revolt by the landowners of Asia Minor and reclaimed much of Syria.'
p6495
aS"Though he was crowned his father's co-emperor when he was three, after Romanus II's death the empire was ruled by generals Nicephoras II Phocas and John I Tzimisces."
p6496
aS'Most famous for ordering his prisoners to be blinded after the battle of Kleidion, this is, for 10 points, what Byzantine emperor whose dealings with Tsar Samuel of Bulgaria earned him a famous nickname'
p6497
aS'This man would be buried in the Saint John the Theologian church by his successor, and his grave would be later on ravaged by crusaders.'
p6498
aS'With the aid of his brother-in-law, he relieved the siege of Abydos by one of his rebellious generals.'
p6499
aS'That general, Bardas Phocas, had helped this man put down a rebellion ten years earlier by defeating Bardas Sclerus at Pankalia.'
p6500
aS'This man aimed to expand his empire to the East, fighting against the Fatimids in Syria and ultimately annexing Armenia.'
p6501
aS'He also tried to extend his sovereignty to the North and in 1003, he successfully invaded Macedonia, taking Skopje in the process.'
p6502
aS'Eleven years later, he approached Achris and surrounded Samuels army at the Battle of Kledion.'
p6503
aS'After this battle, he blinded the entire opposing force, only leaving one eye on every hundredth man.'
p6504
aS'For ten points, name this Byzantine emperor who was given the nickname Boulgaroktanos or Bulgar-Slayer.'
p6505
aS'The attacking army was forced to come to the eventual site of this battle, near the towns of Urhai and Harran, due to a maneuver by the General Mazaeus, and lacked expected reinforcements which had been tied down in a war against King Agis III.'
p6506
aS'The defending army may have been demoralized by a lunar eclipse shortly before this conflict, and its commanders included the satrap Bessus.'
p6507
aS'The attacking general arrayed his flanks in an awkward manner, so as to encourage the enemy to attack them, resulting in a gap in the defending center, into which the Companion Cavalry charged, eventually capturing Queen Sisygambis and causing Darius to flee.'
p6508
aS'For ten points, name this third and final of Alexander_the_Great against the Persians.'
p6509
aS'The winning commander of this battle initially charged with a unit of Agrianians, and the losing side of this battle resorted to looting instead of rescuing Sisygambis.'
p6510
aS'During this battle, the winning commander broke left to aid Parmenion, who was outnumbered by a unit under Mazaeus.'
p6511
aS'Following this battle, all of the losers war elephants were captured, and the Bactrian cavalry caught up to the fleeing commander of the losing side, who was murdered by the general Bessus.'
p6512
aS'Sometimes called the Battle of Arbela, it followed the siege of Tyre and preceded the Battle of the Hydaspes River.'
p6513
aS'For 10 points, identify this 331 B.C.'
p6514
aS'battle which saw the defeat of the Persian Empire under Darius_III by Alexander_the_Great.'
p6515
aS'A first-hand account of this battle credits the quick thinking of Agrianians under Balacrus with preventing a possible catastrophe.'
p6516
aS"The attacking commander at this battle had his men's weapons extended to 6."
p6517
aS'5 meters just prior to it, while the defending commander was busy marching his army 50 miles east of (*) Mosul.'
p6518
aS'It saw a flank advance at 30 degree angles, eliciting an attack before Philotas led his contingent forth and leading to a famous wedge charge at this battle.'
p6519
aS'Queen Sisygambis was captured after this clash, although her husband, the losing commander, had already been slain in its aftermath by Bessus.'
p6520
aS'.'
aS'Also called the Battle of Arbela, this is, FTP, what 331BC final, decisive victory of Alexander_the_Great over Darius_III, which led to the fall of the Persian Empire'
p6521
aS'I of Hungary married the daughter of one Duke of this region, which was ruled by the Wittelsbachs and reunited by Duke Albert IV.'
p6522
aS"One conflict fought over the succession of this region called the Potato War was ended with the Peace of Tetschen, and was caused by Joseph II's attempts to control it."
p6523
aS'The Duke of Marlborough fought the Battle of Blenheim in this region during the War of Spanish Succession.'
p6524
aS'Henry the Lion was the Duke of Saxony and this state, and other rulers of this state included Ludwig II, also called Ludwig the Mad.'
p6525
aS'For 10 points, name this South Western German state, with capital at Munich.'
p6526
aS"One period of this polity's history is known as the Prince Regent Years because Prince Luitpold was forced into power by the madness of his nephew Otto."
p6527
aS"This polity was restored by the Treaty of Baden after Maximilian II Emanuel's decision to join the French at Blenheim led to its elimination in the Treaty of Ilbersheim."
p6528
aS'In this region, Anton Arco-Valley assassinated Kurt Eisner, who had set up a republic here in 1918.'
p6529
aS'After Charles Theodore allowed Austria to annex much of this state, Frederick_the_Great of Prussia forced a return to the status quo at the Treaty of Teschen.'
p6530
aS'Its first king named Ludwig had a dalliance with Lola Montez and its second Ludwig built the castle Neuschwanstein and patronized Wagner.'
p6531
aS'For 10 points, name this German state which hosted the Beer Hall Putsch in its capital Munich.'
p6532
aS'One of these named Wotjek carried ammunition at the battle of Monte Cassino, and in an 1887 Thomas Nast cartoon, one of these animals replies to a turkey with "Gobble, gobble, you bet".'
p6533
aS'A Punch cartoon titled "As Between Friends" shows the British Lion looking on as this animal sits on the Persian Cat, while a sick one of these animals is captioned "California Republic" in a Cagle cartoon.'
p6534
aS'A famous one of these was rescued in the Capitan Mountain, and they are often used to symbolize Russia.'
p6535
aS'For 10 points, name this animal depicted on the cover of "The Great Wall St. Game" next to a bull, one of which is the mascot of the US Forestry Service.'
p6536
aS'This man was the subject of a 1949 Henry Cowell opera designed as a satire against Dwight Eisenhower.'
p6537
aS'He died in exile after a conservative coup led by his successor, Ramn Freire.'
p6538
aS'When his father became viceroy of Peru, he was sent to London, where he met Francisco de Miranda and joined the independentist Lautaro Lodge.'
p6539
aS'He began his public life as a deputy to the Cabildo from La Laja.'
p6540
aS'His cavalry charge at the battle of Chacabuco allowed him to enter Santiago in triumph along with Jose de San Martin in March 1818.'
p6541
aS'FTP, name this descendant of Irish officers in Spanish service, the first ruler of an independent Chile.'
p6542
aS'This mans father Ambrosio served as the Viceroy of Chile.'
p6543
aS'For ten points each: [10] Identify this independence fighter, who joined the Logia Lautardo and served as the second Supreme Director of Chile after the Chilean War of Independence.'
p6544
aS'Technically, this conflict can be divided into two phases, with the first half being settled at the Peace of Berwick.'
p6545
aS'A year later, the second phase ended after a battle that saw Lord Conway and Thomas Fairfax defeated by Alexander Leslie, Earl of Leven.'
p6546
aS'Following the battle of Newburn-on-the-Tyne and the capture of Newcastle four days later, the Treaty of Ripon effectively ended it all.'
p6547
aS'With the English defeat primarily resulting from the refusal of funds by the Short Parliament, the conflict was a Scottish victory over Charles I, forcing him to call the Long Parliament and precipitating the English Civil War.'
p6548
aS'FTP, name this war which took its name from the Scottish refusal of certain Anglican clergymen.'
p6549
aS'During this conflict, the Marquis of Hamilton failed to mount an amphibious invasion after his own mother threatened to shoot him if he took part.'
p6550
aS'One side first camped at Birkhill and was then humiliated during a skirmish at Kelso.'
p6551
aS'The initiative of Jacob Astley preserved control of Carlisle for the attackers, who secured a momentary truce called the Pacification of Berwick.'
p6552
aS'The Short Parliament met between two of these events, which were instigated by a 1637 riot in St. Giles Cathedral, Edinburgh.'
p6553
aS'For ten points, what failed attempt to impose Laudianism on Scotland was known by the name of the religious authorities to be reintroduced there'
p6554
aS"The parasite in Shane Carruth's Upstream Color turns orchids this color."
p6555
aS"Derek Jarman's final film consists of narration over a single shot of this color."
p6556
aS'This is the hair color of an art student named Emma in a film based on a graphic novel by Julie (*) Maroh.'
p6557
aS'In a film with this color in the title, the composer Patrice de Courcy dies in a car accident, making a widow out of Julie, played by Juliette Binoche.'
p6558
aS'This color also appears in the title of the second film about Lena Nyman, a Swedish film famous for its sexual explicitness.'
p6559
aS"The title of an Abdellatif Kechiche film which won the 2013 Palme d'Or calls this the warmest color."
p6560
aS"For 10 points, name this color which is paired with yellow in the I Am Curious series and with red and white in Kieslowski's Three Colors trilogy."
p6561
aS'Rulers who converted to this faith included Kulin, who was forced to renounce it in a meeting at the White Plain.'
p6562
aS'Adherents to this faith fought on the Muslim side at the Battle of Usora.'
p6563
aS'The cleric Cosmas wrote a polemic against this group, and its founder may have been a student of St. Clement of Ohrid.'
p6564
aS'One of their texts called The Secret Book claimed that the Virgin Mary was born from a goose and that Jesus emerged from her ear.'
p6565
aS'Emerging during the reign of Peter I, it may have been inspired by an earlier heresy whose members had been exiled by John Tzimisces to Thrace from Anatolia, the Manichean-like Paulicians, and today they are mostly remembered for inspiring the Albigensians.'
p6566
aS'For ten points, name this Christian heresy from Bulgaria.'
p6567
aS'One of its members, Joe Angelo, had previously won the Distinguished Service Cross for saving the life of a soldier who would later attack it.'
p6568
aS'Organized and led by Walter Waters, its main encampment contained many mock burials symbolic of the perceived governmental indifference towards its members.'
p6569
aS'Its resistance to Attorney General William Mitchells evacuation order caused soldiers including George Patton to attack it with tear gas, causing its members to retreat across the Anacostia River.'
p6570
aS'Douglas MacArthur then set fire to its main camp after ignoring a direct order from Herbert_Hoover.'
p6571
aS'FTP, name this veterans organization that marched on Washington in 1932 to ask for monetary compensation.'
p6572
aS'This battle prompted the coronation of Frederick II as Holy Roman Emperor and the signing of the Magna_Carta.'
p6573
aS'Fought on one side between coalition forces led by Ferdinand, count of Flanders, King John of England, and his nephew Holy Roman Emperor Otto IV, this battle was fought southeast of Lille and saw thousands of casualties on both sides.'
p6574
aS'The superiority of the French cavalry and the support of the Hohenstaufens carried the day for the French king.'
p6575
aS'FTP, identify this battle of 1214 that saw European domination of France under Philip II Augustus.'
p6576
aS'At the end of this battle, Reginald of Boulogne and his 700 pikemen made a heroic last stand that allowed the losing army to retreat.'
p6577
aS'The Portuguese-born Count of Flanders, Ferdinand, was captured at this battle.'
p6578
aS'Eudes III, the Duke of Burgundy, fought for the winning side, while the losing force was commanded by the Earl of Salisbury.'
p6579
aS'The losing army at this battle included a force under Holy Roman Emperor Otto IV and was vanquished by Philip Augustus.'
p6580
aS'For ten points, name this 1214 battle in which King John lost Brittany and Normandy to France, whose name suggests cattle.'
p6581
aS'Some of those arrested and executed for their participation in this event include John Thomas Brunt, Richard Tidd, and William Davidson.'
p6582
aS"The king's grandson, Frederick FitzClarence, commanded troops to respond to it, and one police officer Richard Smithers was killed by its leader, who had been arrested four years earlier for involvement at Spa Fields."
p6583
aS'The plan was spoiled by George Edwards, an agent-provocateur working for the government, while one member, James Ings, proclaimed that he would display the decapitated head of Lord Sidmouth, indicating his anger with the Six Acts characteristic of the Spenceans who perpetrated this event.'
p6584
aS'Led by Arthur Thistlewood, FTP, name this plot to assassinate the British cabinet in 1820, whose name comes from the meeting place where its members convened.'
p6585
aS'Some of its members belonged to a society of philanthropists that met at a tavern called the Cock, which had been previously implicated in the Spa Fields Riots.'
p6586
aS'Richard Smithers was killed while attempting to seize its leader Arthur Thistlewood in Grosvenor Square near Lord Harrowbys House, which had drawn this interest of this group via a false advertisement in The New Times placed by George Edwards which claimed that Lord Liverpool would be present, and where James Ings, citing unhappiness with the Six Acts, planned to decapitate Lord Sidmouth and Lord Castlereagh.'
p6587
aS'For ten points, name this foiled 1820 attempt to kill the British cabinet, named after the street where it was hatched.'
p6588
aS'One of the participants in this conflict had fighters flown by Walter Gwynn and Vladimir Porfenenko.'
p6589
aS'That side also used White Russian tactics, as they received help from Russian generals named Belaieff and Ern.'
p6590
aS'The other side was heavily advised by Czech mercenaries and the General Hands Kundt.'
p6591
aS'The Italians provided a new machinegun carrier called the CV33 tankette, but it proved to be useless in the terrain.'
p6592
aS'The greatest soldier of this war is generally regarded as the French-trained strategist, Marshal Jose Felix Estigarribia.'
p6593
aS'President Ayala and Estigarribia were overthrown in a military coup and their country became a police state under General Stroessner.'
p6594
aS'A ceasefire signed in 1935 eventually led to the signing of a treaty in 1938 in Buenos_Aires.'
p6595
aS'FTP, name the War that was fought by Bolivia and Paraguay over the namesake region that was believed to be rich in oil.'
p6596
aS'This man was known to have masqueraded under the names Orontes, Moeris, and Diodotus of Erythrae, and Arrian calls him the governor of Assakenois.'
p6597
aS'as well as by the Achaemenid dynasty.'
p6598
aS'He successfully repelled an invasion by Seleucus I Nicator, but retired after the onset of a 12-year famine and fasted to death.'
p6599
aS"Heavily influenced by his mentor Canakya's text Arthasastra, in his earlier years he defeated the Nanda kingdom after taking the throne of the Magadha kingdom, and established his center of power at Paliputra."
p6600
aS'FTP, name this grandfather of Ashoka and founder of the Mauryan empire.'
p6601
aS'This man, the recipient of the ambassador Megasthenes, had his rise to power described in the play The Signet of the Minister.'
p6602
aS'The tract Arthashatra was composed by his advisor Chanakya, and some stories claim that late in his life this man abdicated to follow the Jain sage Bhadrabahu.'
p6603
aS'This man consolidated his power by defeating such (*) Alexandrian satraps as Eudemus and Peithon, which allowed him to vanquish the armies of Bhadrasala and besiege Kusumapura, thus conquering the Nanda Empire, after which he won the eastern territories of Seleucus Nicator.'
p6604
aS'For 10 points, identify this father of Bindusara and grandfather of Ashoka, who became the first emperor of the Maurya dynasty.'
p6605
aS'He would have been elected President if he had only received 4,000 additional votes in California, but he was unable to win the support of Governor Hiram Johnson.'
p6606
aS"In 1884, he received the highest score ever given on the bar examination in New York, and he went on to write opinions in Stromberg v. California and Near v. Minnesota, as well as to lead the opposition to Roosevelt's court-packing scheme, in his time on the Supreme Court."
p6607
aS'FTP, identify this governor of New York, secretary of state, and Chief Justice.'
p6608
aS'As governor, this politician was allowed to examine any board, department, bureau, or commission after the passage of the Moreland Act.'
p6609
aS"As chief justice, this politician overturned Adkins v. Children's Hospital by upholding minimum wage legislation in West Coast Co. v. Parrish."
p6610
aS'This politician also supported the freedom of the press in Near v. Minnesota but ruled against regulation in (*) Schechter Poultry Corp. v. U. S. This politician led the American delegation at the Washington Naval Conference.'
p6611
aS'Charles W. Fairbanks and this future chief justice were defeated by Thomas R. Marshall and Woodrow_Wilson in the 1916 presidential election.'
p6612
aS'For 10 points, name this chief justice who served from 1930 until 1941.'
p6613
aS'One king of this name and number allied with Ludwig the German with the Oath of Strassbourg, and received the western portions of the Frankish territory in the 843 treaty of Verdun; that king was nicknamed "the bald.'
p6614
aS'" The death of one nicknamed the sufferer saw the start of the War_of_the_Spanish_Succession, and the Rye House plot saw an assassination attempt a king with this name and number along with his heir James.'
p6615
aS'For 10 points, identify this name and number held by the Stuart who was restored to the British throne after Cromwells protectorate.'
p6616
aS'Compelled to go into hiding after the Battle of Worcester, this leader was eventually aided by George Monck.'
p6617
aS'Important laws passed during his reign include the Corporation Act and the Test Act, which his successor violated; that reign began with the Declaration of Breda.'
p6618
aS'Religious tensions during this kings reign were inflamed by the Secret Treaty of Dover, which he entered into with Louis XIV, and by the Titus Oates invention of the Popish Plot.'
p6619
aS'For ten points, identify this king who returned to rule England in the Restoration.'
p6620
aS'He saw the passage of bills that would prohibit clergymen from coming within five miles of parishes that they had been banished from as well as a bill that required municipal officeholders to swear allegiance.'
p6621
aS'In addition to the Five Mile Act and the Corporation Act, he also saw the foundation of an alliance with Portugal, since the Portuguese were abandoned by the French after the Treaty of the Pyrenees.'
p6622
aS'He also awarded eight Lord Proprietors land that would become Carolina.'
p6623
aS'Titus Oates\' false confession greatly increased anti-Catholic sentiment with what would be called the "Popish Plot.'
p6624
aS'" This anti-Catholic sentiment would be further tested when Parliament attempted to prevent his brother from succeeding to the throne with the Exclusion Bill.'
p6625
aS'For 10 points, name this English monarch who rose to power because of the Restoration.'
p6626
aS'The Ashbourne Act, also called the Purchase of Land Act, was an attempt to get this man to switch political affiliation.'
p6627
aS'This man was released from prison after signing the so-called "Kilmainham Treaty".'
p6628
aS"This man authored the No Rent Manifesto and the Tenant's Relief Bill, and at the height of his power he was a coalition partner of William Gladstone."
p6629
aS'The Piggott forgeries attempted to link this man to extremists.'
p6630
aS"This man was driven from politics because of his scandalous affair with Kitty O'Shea."
p6631
aS'For ten points, name this leader of the Home Rule League, who represented Ireland in Parliament in the late 19th century.'
p6632
aS'A smear campaign was conducted against him by Richard Pigott, who linked him with the murder of Thomas Henry Burke.'
p6633
aS'For his opposition to the Coercion Bill, he was ejected from the House along with 34 of his followers.'
p6634
aS'Shortly thereafter, the "No Rent" manifesto proclaimed his Land League illegal.'
p6635
aS"Ironically, he was then forced, by Lord Salisbury's majority, to ally himself with Gladstone."
p6636
aS"However, it all came crashing down when his affair with Kitty O'Shea was revealed."
p6637
aS'FTP, name this Irish statesman who fought for Home Rule throughout the 1880s.'
p6638
aS'This man once received twenty-five dollars from an American, "five for bread and twenty for lead," and he suggested Captain Charles Boycott should be "isolated from his kind as if he were a leper.'
p6639
aS'" This man was arrested under the Coercion Act along with John Dillon and others, but was released in 1892 as a result of the Kilmainham Treaty.'
p6640
aS'His use of obstruction in Parliament was described by Isaac Butt as "simply revolutionary.'
p6641
aS'" Richard Piggott sold The Times a forged letter ascribed to this man that approved the killing of Frederick Cavendish and Thomas Henry Burke, which was known as the Phoenix Park murders.'
p6642
aS"This man was later ruined politically as a result of his relationship with the married woman Kitty O'Shea."
p6643
aS'For 10 points, name this Irish nationalist who led the Home Rule movement.'
p6644
aS'Great-grandfather: Charles the Bold, duke of Burgundy.'
p6645
aS'Paternal grandfather: Maximilian I.'
p6646
aS'Father: Philip I, king of Castile.'
p6647
aS'Maternal grandparents: Ferdinand and Isabella.'
p6648
aS'FTP, what Habsburg used all of these beneficial relations to become king of Spain and Holy Roman Emperor by 1519'
p6649
aS'To rebuke Luther, he appeared before the Diet_of_Worms.'
p6650
aS'In 1522, his teacher Adrian of Utrecht became pope -- not surprising, since this man had used funds from the Fugger bankers to secure the throne as Holy Roman Emperor over his main rival Francis I.'
p6651
aS'He claimed to speak "Spanish to God, French to men, Italian to women, and German to my horse," and captured Halq al-Wadi and Tunis, but could not defeat the pirate Barbarossa.'
p6652
aS'FTP, name this Hapsburg monarch, the son of Philip the Handsome and Joanna the Mad.'
p6653
aS'Along with his secretary of the navy William Chandler he recommended appropriations to improve the U.S. fleet and it was during his presidency that the coaling station at Pearl Harbor was acquired.'
p6654
aS'He won the Lizzie Jennings case resulting in New York forbidding segregation on public transport.'
p6655
aS'This one time Director of the New_York_City Customhouse vetoed a bill excluding Chinese immigration for 20 years, but signed the Chinese_Exclusion_Act that banned them for 10 years.'
p6656
aS'Expected to be a defender of the Stalwarts,  for 10 points, name this president who disappointed Conkling by signing the Pendleton Civil Service Act after the assassination of his predecessor James Garfield.'
p6657
aS'This person rose to the position of engineer-in-chief after serving as an aide to Edwin D. Morgan in Morgans successful run for governor.'
p6658
aS'As a lawyer, he was lead counsel for the plaintiff in a case against the Third Avenue Railroad, on behalf of a woman who had been denied a seat because she was black, Elizabeth Jennings Graham.'
p6659
aS"He restructured much of Buchanan's Morrill Tariff with a tariff act labeled the Mongrel, and accepted a spot on his ticket after the refusal of Levi Morton."
p6660
aS'He gained the support of the Stalwarts, who hoped that this Roscoe Conkling protg would champion the spoils system.'
p6661
aS'Replaced on the ticket by James_G._Blaine, for 10 points, name this president who presided over the Pendleton Act after Charles Guiteau shot James Garfield.'
p6662
aS'This man managed to sign the Shufelt Treaty with the Joseon Dynasty of Korea.'
p6663
aS'This man appointed Samuel Blatchford to the Supreme Court, and he also signed the anti-polygamy Edmunds act and an act that excluded paupers and criminals from immigration.'
p6664
aS"This man's vetoes included the Rivers and Harbors Act, and signed a document later extended by the Geary Act which called for a 10-year moratorium on immigration from a certain country."
p6665
aS"In addition to the Chinese_Exclusion_Act, he is most famous for a bill which he signed despite being a longtime member of Roscoe Conkling's Stalwart faction."
p6666
aS'Assuming the Presidency due to the assassin C harles Guiteau, for 10 points, name this president who ended the spoils system with the Pendelton Civil Service Reform Act, successor to James Garfield.'
p6667
aS"this man's administration, the Shufeldt Treaty with Korea was signed."
p6668
aS'This president signed the Edmunds Act, which prevented polygamists from holding office.'
p6669
aS'Another piece of legislation enacted during his administration saw certain Asian immigrants denied citizenship via the Chinese_Exclusion_Act.'
p6670
aS'This president upset his old mentor, Roscoe Conkling and his Stalwarts, by signing the Pendleton Civil Service Reform Act, a piece of legislation prompted by the assassination of his predecessor by Charles Guiteau.'
p6671
aS'For 10 points, name this twenty-first President of the United_States who succeeded James Garfield.'
p6672
aS"[AR] Deng Wenyi's biography of this man suggests that he was responsible for assassinating the leader of the Restoration Society, Tao Chengzhang, inside Guangci Hospital on the orders of Chen Qimei."
p6673
aS'He returned to China after hearing of the Wuchang Uprising after his time at Zhenwu Military Academy in Japan.'
p6674
aS'After the death of the leader of the organization, this man is most associated with, he engaged in a noted polemic with his eventually ostracized rival Wang Jingwei, who established Japanese collaborationist government at Nanjing.'
p6675
aS'He met with Churchill and Roosevelt in 1943, and helped to draft the Cairo Declaration.'
p6676
aS'Earlier, after encircling the Communists at Jiangxi he allowed Mao_Zedong to escape via the Long March to Shaanxi.'
p6677
aS'Eventually forced to escape to Taiwan in 1949 by the Communists, for 10 points, name this General of the Republic of China who took over control of the Kuomintang after the death of Sun Yat-Sen in 1925.'
p6678
aS"Dennis Kearny, as leader of a party named for one established by Robert Owen in 1829, pressed for passage of this act, though ironically his donut stand and the entire town of Mooneyville were destroyed two years after this act's passage."
p6679
aS"Three years after this act's successful passage, Isaiah Washington and fifteen others were arrested for their parts in the Rock Springs Massacre."
p6680
aS'In a case later cited in Afroyim v. Rusk and Plyler v. Doe, the court ruled that this act did not apply to a certain cook returning from a trip, despite the dissents of Chief Justice Fuller and Harlan.'
p6681
aS"Criticized by George Frisbee Hoar, it was renewed by the Geary Act and repealed by the Magnuson Act, and encouraged by the Workingman's Party and the Supreme Order of Caucasians."
p6682
aS'FTP, name this act signed by Chester_A._Arthur into law which sought to keep a certain ethnic group out of America.'
p6683
aS"A major influence on this bill was the book Other People's Money, and How the Bankers Use It."
p6684
aS'Components of this bill were later expanded by the Kefauver Act and the (*) Robinson-Patman Act.'
p6685
aS'Natural competitors were prohibited from divvying up sales territories under this law, which regulated conglomerate mergers for the first time and was signed by Wilson.'
p6686
aS'For 10 points name this 1914 piece of antitrust regulation.'
p6687
aS'A case involving an amendment to this piece of legislation was brought a party who believed its patent on a salt-measuring machine was infringed upon, and led to the creation of the "Morton Salt rule.'
p6688
aS'" Another act that modified it mandated the used of a "Notification and Report Form" for certain types of interactions and was called the Hart-Scott-Rodino Act.'
p6689
aS'Able to target certain legal acts in their incipiency, Section 7 of this act amended by Robinson-Patman act was originally targeted at holding companies and tests the legality of mergers.'
p6690
aS'Notable for having more teeth than its predecessor, for 10 points, identify this 1914 antitrust act.'
p6691
aS'A member of the Alcmaeonid family he was born under a family curse incited by his great-grandfather.'
p6692
aS'Peisistratus exiled him and his family, but he returned twenty years later, and during the reign of Hippias convinced the Delphic oracle to tell Sparta to help overthrow the tyranny.'
p6693
aS'Gaining power in 510, he broke the traditional aristocracy, instituting a system of the ten tribes of Attica.. FTP,  identify this Athenian tyrant who created the council of 500 in order to favor equal rights for all citizens.'
p6694
aS"Belonging to the Alcmaeonid family, this man's great-grandfather had brought about a public curse on the family by executing the followers of the would-be tyrant Cylon in 632 BCE."
p6695
aS'The son of Megacles, he restructured the four ancient tribes into ten, and organized the boule to consist of 500 members.'
p6696
aS'He was chief archon of Athens from 525-524 BCE following the death of the Peisistratus, after which his power briefly declined until 508 BCE.'
p6697
aS'FTP, name this Athenian statesman who allied himself with the Assembly against the nobles in 508 BCE, thus imposing democratic reform.'
p6698
aS"This man's grandfather of the same name was the ruler of Sicyon and fought in the first Sacred War."
p6699
aS'His most important rival had him expelled with the help of Cleomenes I of Sparta, but this person was recalled after that rival, Isagoras, tried to dissolve the main governmental institutions of Athens.'
p6700
aS'He increased the size of the Boule to five hundred and the number of tribes from four to ten.'
p6701
aS'Little is known about his life after the introduction of his reforms, which he called the isonomia, and it has been theorized that his seeking aid from the Persians let him to be ostracized, a practice that he likely created.'
p6702
aS"For 10 points, name this reformer who overthrew Pisistratus's son Hippias and established the deme system in Athens. "
p6703
aS'One leader of this name ruled about twenty six hundred years before the War in Iraq, renamed the Dorian tribes of his city Swine-men, Pig-men and Ass-men, and held a competition over the hand of his daughter Agariste.'
p6704
aS'The more famous ruler of this name was opposed by Cleomenes I after his rival appealed to Sparta and banished this man on the basis of a curse on his Alcmaeonid line.'
p6705
aS'This son of Megacles who gained fame for overthrowing Hippias was reinstated when Isagoras met popular resistance.'
p6706
aS'He spread the four tribes into ten based on area of residence and expanded the Boule from four hundred to five hundred in a series of reforms he called isonomia.'
p6707
aS'For 10 points name this man known as the "the father of Athenian democracy" and is not Solon or Peisistratos.'
p6708
aS'It decreed that kings should not be anointed on their heads, and that chrism should be reserved for church ceremonies.'
p6709
aS'The distinction betwen regalia, granted through the lance, and spiritualia, received through the ring and staff, was based on an earlier settlement between Paschal II and the English king.'
p6710
aS'At the request of the archbishop of Mainz, its decisions were confirmed by the First Lateran Council the following year.'
p6711
aS'Arguing that the emperor could be present during the election of bishops and abbots, FTP, identify this 1122 agreement between Calixtus II and Holy Roman Emperor Henry V that sought to end the struggle over lay investiture.'
p6712
aS'As a result of this agreement, Mauritius Burdinus was arrested and imprisoned.'
p6713
aS'One man who signed this agreement came to power after the death of Gelasius II, and the text of this agreement was preserved by Ekkehard of Aura.'
p6714
aS'Burgundy and Italy were excepted from one provision of this agreement.'
p6715
aS'This agreement distinguished between the lance and the ring, which symbolized two different kinds of power that would be officially granted by two different sides to this agreement.'
p6716
aS'It was confirmed a year later at the First Lateran Council.'
p6717
aS'For ten points, name this agreement between Pope Calixtus II and Henry V of the Holy Roman Empire, which ended the investiture controversy.'
p6718
aS"This man's partisan, Gebhard of Salzburg, was successfully kept away from a meeting targeting this man by his long-time foe, Hugo Candidus."
p6719
aS'He was elevated to his highest office after a mixed crowd of clergy and laymen began angrily demanding his election during the funeral service of his predecessor, Alexander II.'
p6720
aS"This man's most notable efforts were validated in the century after his death through the First Lateran Council and the Concordat_of_Worms thanks to the work of Callixtus II."
p6721
aS'The Synod of Worms condemned this man, whose response led to the appointment of Guibert of Ravenna as Antipope Clement III.'
p6722
aS'Clerical marriage and simony were targeted by this Pope, whose most notable opponent made a long walk to Canossa and groveled in the snow after his excommunication.'
p6723
aS'For 10 points, name this Pope who feuded with Henry IV during the Investiture Controversy, the seventh Pontiff to bear his name.'
p6724
aS'Bishop Mkrtich Khrimian was invited to this meeting to represent the interests of the Armenian people.'
p6725
aS'Jovan Ristic was forced to resign after returning from this meeting with insufficient amounts of new land, a fate also shared by Count Lodovico of Corti.'
p6726
aS'France was represented by William Henry Waddington, while another great power sent Count Julius Andrassy the Elder.'
p6727
aS'The Principality of Moldavia was forced to give up Bessarabia in a partial reversal of the Treaty of Paris, one of the few victories for Prince Gorchakov at a meeting that led to the end of the Dreikaiserbund.'
p6728
aS'For ten points, name this international congress that followed the Battle of Pleva, where Bismarck led the re-negotiation of the Treaty of San Stefano between Russia and the Ottoman_Empire in 1877.'
p6729
aS'British conquest in Ceylon and Mauritius was recognized as a result of it.'
p6730
aS'One representative was so hard of hearing that he needed the exchanges shouted into his years, and another would commit suicide seven years later for fear of having his homosexuality exposed.'
p6731
aS'Prince Hardenberg represented Prussia and Viscount Castlereagh represented Britain, but it was Alexander I who suggested a Holy Alliance.'
p6732
aS'Talleyrand allowed for French borders to be returned to those of 1792 in, FTP, what meeting called by Metternich in 1815'
p6733
aS'The nations involved in it had allied immediately before it through the Treaty of Chaumont, and one of the figures involved in it continued the reforms of Karl vom Stein.'
p6734
aS'Due to disagreement over Italys settlement, Spain refused to sign the Final Act of it, and Switzerland was granted a new constitution.'
p6735
aS'Swedish Pomerania was given to Prussia, and a loose German confederation was established, much to the delight of Klemens von Metternich.'
p6736
aS'FTP, identify this 1815 meeting that took place in Austria.'
p6737
aS'The signing of the Treaty of Chaumont preceded this event, whose namesake final act was not signed by Spain in protest against the Italian settlement.'
p6738
aS'Among the provisions agreed to here was the restoration of the Papal States and the cession of the Palatinate of the Rhine to Bavaria.'
p6739
aS'Originally, Joachim Murat was allowed to remain king of Naples by the terms established here, and participants at this event included Prince von Hardenburg, Viscount Castlereagh, and Count Nesselrode.'
p6740
aS'In addition to giving the Duchy of Warsaw to Russia, it resulted in the formation of the German Confederation and the Concert of Europe.'
p6741
aS'Taking place after the defeat of Napoleon Bonaparte, this is, FTP, which 1814-15 conference chaired by Klemens von Metternich'
p6742
aS'The last incarnation of this group was curbed by Indiana governor Oliver Morton.'
p6743
aS"This group manifested itself in John Hunt Morgan's raid into Kentucky, Indiana, and Ohio, but garnered little support."
p6744
aS"This organization's last leader was Clement Vallandigham when it was known as the Order of the Sons of Liberty, prior to which it was called the Order of American Knights."
p6745
aS'It was founded under its original name in Cincinnati in 1854 by George Bickley, who also named its members Copperheads.'
p6746
aS'FTP, identify this secret order of Southern sympathizers in the North during the Civil War.'
p6747
aS'One member of this group, Nelson Wells, shot at Oliver Sallee in what some accounts claim instigated the Charleston Riot.'
p6748
aS'Another member of this group plotted to seize the arsenal in Indianapolis and overthrow the Indiana state government; that plot led to David Davis writing an opinion that martial law has no jurisdiction in areas with functional civil courts in an ex Parte case involving another member.'
p6749
aS'Those members were Harrison Dodd and Lambert Milligan.'
p6750
aS'Another member of this group ran for governor of Ohio while hiding in Canada after being convicted of treason and having his sentence commuted to banishment to the Confederacy.'
p6751
aS'For 10 points, Clement Vallandigham was an outspoken member of what group of Democrats that opposed the Civil War'
p6752
aS'It was precipitated by the taking of Tulaghi and the movement of a second force towards Louisiade.'
p6753
aS'"Scratch one flattop!'
p6754
aS'" became one of the most famous radio calls of World_War_II after this battle, when it was uttered upon the sinking of the Shoho.'
p6755
aS'The destruction of the Sims, heavy damage to the Yorktown, and the sinking of the Lexington meant a tactical victory for the Japanese; but the halt of the advance on Port Moresby made it a strategic victory for the U.S.'
p6756
aS'Notable for ending Japanese expansion southward and for being fought entirely by aircraft, FTP, name this naval battle of May 7 and 8, 1942.'
p6757
aS'John Craces Task Force 44 was assigned to block the main path of invasion during this battle.'
p6758
aS'At the beginning, the Zuikaku disappeared into a squall, although it later assisted another ship to retreat.'
p6759
aS'The Shoho was sunk and the Shokaku forced to retire, though it would be sunk a month later.'
p6760
aS'The defensive forces, led by Frank Fletcher, rallied successfully around the Yorktown after the loss of the Lexington, and were able to defend Port Moresby, and therefore New Guinea, from a Japanese invasion.'
p6761
aS'For ten points, identify this 1942 aerial and naval engagement between the United_States and Japan fought one month before Midway, a victory for the Allies in its namesake body of water.'
p6762
aS'After it, the goals of Operation Mo were attempted through the Kokoda Track campaign and the Battle of Milne Bay.'
p6763
aS'Just prior to it, one side, eying potential bases on Gavutu and Tanambogo, invaded and occupied Tulagi, which would be the first target attacked.'
p6764
aS'Early victims among Admiral Fletchers forces included the oil tanker USS Neosho and its destroyer escort, the USS Sims, while Admiral Takagi lost the mini carrier Shoho.'
p6765
aS'Severe damage was done to the larger carrier Shokaku, and the USS Lexington exploded.'
p6766
aS'Still, Port Moorsby was saved from invasion, even though neither naval force saw the other.'
p6767
aS'For ten points, name this first aircraft carrier battle of World War Two, named for the body of water in which it was fought.'
p6768
aS'The war named for this place was ended when Clazomenae and Cyprus were transferred to Persia through the Peace of Antalcidas, which was put forth by Artaxerxes II.'
p6769
aS"A league named for this place was brought back into existence by Demetrius Poliorcetes, but it didn't have anything to do following the battle of Ipsus."
p6770
aS'This city joined the Achaean Confederation after being captured by Aratus in 243 BC, and was destroyed by Lucius Mummius in 146 to teach the Greeks a lesson.'
p6771
aS'Its early rulers include Cypselus and Periander, though it is better known for the action it took against Megara which set off the Peloponnesian War.'
p6772
aS'FTP, name this city on the isthmus joining the Peloponnesus and central Greece, whose citizens were the lucky recipients of a couple of epistles from Saint Paul.'
p6773
aS'The technique of black-figure vase painting originated in this polis, and an account of Polybius tells of how Lucius Mummius sacked this city in 146 BCE.'
p6774
aS'The early history of this polis saw the rise to power of a tyrant named Cypselus, who expelled its ruling aristocratic clan, the Bacchiadae.'
p6775
aS'During the early 4th century BCE, this city led a coalition in a namesake war against Sparta which saw a victory at Cnidus and a loss at Coronea, and this city feuded with Athens after the city of Megara became an Athenian ally.'
p6776
aS'According to Herodotus, this city provided 40 ships at the Battle_of_Salamis, the second most after Athens.'
p6777
aS"After Philip II of Macedon's victory at Chaeronea, he organized the Hellenic League, which met at this city and was sometimes known by its name, and colonists from this city settled the island of Ortygia, founding Syracuse."
p6778
aS'For ten points, identify this Greek city located on a namesake Peloponnesian isthmus, which gives its name to an ornate order of columns.'
p6779
aS'Prior to this event the so-called "Brigandage at Ephesus" saw Dioscorus of Alexandria force the reversal of Flavian\'s decision that Eutyches [YOO-tuh-keez] was a heretic, and Dioscorus did not allow representatives of Pope Leo to read his written opinion.'
p6780
aS'That work was the basis of deliberations that began shortly after the death of Emperor Theodosius II and the accession of Marcian.'
p6781
aS'It accepted as canonical both the Tome and the Two Letters of Cyril, the latter of which refuted the Nestorian heresy.'
p6782
aS'The current orthodox doctrine that the Second Person of the Trinity has two natures was determined at, FTP, what council that took place in 451 near Constantinople and condemned the Monophysite heresy'
p6783
aS'The Acta of this event were kept by Julian of Cos; a copy known as the versio antiqua claims that its six hundred thirty delegates met twenty-one times in the church of St. Euphemia, Martyr.'
p6784
aS'Secondarily declaring patriarchates for Jerusalem and Constantinople, it was convoked to resolve issues stemming from the so-called Latrocinium four years before, at which Eutyches was pardoned by Dioscorus; this synod did so by confirming the so-called Tome.'
p6785
aS'Convoked after the death of Theodocius II by Marsian, this council confirmed the creeds of Constantinople and Nicea at the behest of Leo I to end the Monophysite heresy.'
p6786
aS'For ten points, name the Fourth Ecumenical Council held in 451 in its namesake city, which is in present-day northern Turkey.'
p6787
aS'Minor doctrinal proclamations from this event include declaring that there could be only one metropolitan bishop per see, as well as demanding that needy persons be provided letters of recommendation.'
p6788
aS"The Pope's representatives to this event included Julian and Lucentius."
p6789
aS'(*) Eusebius presented a formal accusation at this event, which also saw Theodoric of Cyprus denounce a friend in order to retain his bishropric, and those accused were thought to have believed that Christ existed in only one body.'
p6790
aS'Paschasinus was entrusted with presiding over this council in the absence of the reigning Pope, Leo I.'
p6791
aS'Held in Bithynia in Anatolia, FTP, identify this ecumenical council which promulgated doctrine against the Monophysite heresy and that of Eutyches, the fourth of its kind'
p6792
aS'The last speaker during its final session was John of Sebaste.'
p6793
aS'The second session began with an argument between Cecropius, who wanted an immediate decision, and Florentius, who pleaded for time to resolve the central issue.'
p6794
aS'Among those present on behalf of one of the major parties were the priests Basil and Boniface, the latter of whom presided over much of it.'
p6795
aS'The decisions it reached included forbidding simony, elopement, and marriage for monks and nuns.'
p6796
aS'It opened with Paschanisus denying a seat to Dioscorus, who would be exiled as a result, and it concluded with the affirmation of 27 cannons.'
p6797
aS'It was called by Emperor Marcian, who was amenable to disputing the decisions of the so-called Robber Synod two years prior.'
p6798
aS'FTP, that affirmation of the "tome" of Leo I declaring both Christ\'s divine and human natures took place at what fourth ecumenical council held in 451'
p6799
aS'This gathering commissioned a revised catechism written by St. Carlo Borromeo.'
p6800
aS"It defined ordination as imparting a sacramental mark on a person's soul, and its twenty-second session affirmed that the Mass was a representation, not a repetition, of Christ's sacrifice."
p6801
aS'This council fixed the number of sacraments at seven, established a distinction between fides nuda and fides caritate formata, and was reassembled by Marcellus II after being moved to Bologna.'
p6802
aS"First convoked by Paul III, it appointed a commission to develop an index of prohibited books, and condemned Luther's doctrine of justification by faith."
p6803
aS'For 10 points, name this ecumenical council held in three periods between 1545 and 1563, which sparked the Counter-Reformation, and took place in a city in Northern Italy.'
p6804
aS'Girolama Seripando was the representative of the Augustinian order at this meeting, where Marcello Cervini served as the secretary.'
p6805
aS'The Peace of Crespy was key in securing this meeting, which saw controversy over the phrase "church universal.'
p6806
aS'" It abandoned the task of updating a document was later updated by Leo XIII and abolished Paul VI, the List of (*) Prohibited Books, and saw early debate centering around the Smalcald Articles.'
p6807
aS'It declared that good works were necessary for Justification, rather than mere faith alone, and confirmed clerical celibacy and the veneration of relics.'
p6808
aS'The seven sacraments and the Nicene Creed were discussed at length at this council, which lent its name to the Tridentine Mass.'
p6809
aS'Called by Paul III and ended by Pius IV, FTP, identify this 16th century church council which responded to Martin Luther and promoted the Counter-Reformation.'
p6810
aS'Stanislaus Hosius was instrumental in reopening this meeting, and Girolamo Seripando\'s "double justice" theory was refuted by Diego Laynez during it.'
p6811
aS'Hubert Jedin provides the most complete history of this meeting, whose namesake catechism was written by Saint Carlo Borromeo.'
p6812
aS'This meeting defined transubstantiation, and it appointed a commission to create a list of prohibited books.'
p6813
aS"Three of this meeting's sessions were held in Bologna, and Palestrina's Pope Marcellus Mass was supposedly composed to dissuade participants in it from banning polyphonic music."
p6814
aS'This meeting set the number of sacraments at seven, and it condemned the doctrine of justification by faith alone put forth by Martin Luther.'
p6815
aS'Convened by Pope Paul III, for 10 points, name this ecumenical council held between 1545 and 1563 which began the Counter Reformation.'
p6816
aS"For a period of eight months, this man fled to Hispania and was housed in a cave on the property of Vibius Pacacius, and he would emerge after Cinna's death and help to end Sulla's second Civil War by commanding troops at Colline Gate."
p6817
aS'Later meeting his downfall by clinging to his "testudo" formation, this man had earlier had his leadership reaffirmed at a conference at Luca.'
p6818
aS'This politician had success in the Third Servile War, including a defeat of Spartacus, but his downfall came after his crossing of the Euphrates to seize Parthia, leading to his defeat at the Battle of Carrhae.'
p6819
aS'FTP, name this Roman politician best remembered for his alliance with Pompey and Julius_Caesar in the First Triumvirate.'
p6820
aS'This man achieved a major military success when he victoriously led the ring wing at the battle of the Colline Gate.'
p6821
aS'Such a success came after he had spent years in exile, including time spent hiding in a cave in Spain after his family ran afoul of the Marians.'
p6822
aS"According to Plutarch, after this man's death, an actor sang lines from the Bacchae while displaying this man's severed head."
p6823
aS'While he earlier rose to prominence under Sulla, he would become better known for his service in the Third (*) Servile War, which saw him defeating the armies of Spartacus.'
p6824
aS'He died at Carrhae at the hands of the Parthians after forming an alliance in 60 B. C. For 10 points, name this man who joined Pompey and Caesar in the First Triumvirate.'
p6825
aS'It began with the Red Stick faction attacking near Lake Tensaw in the Fort Mims Massacre.'
p6826
aS'It ended with the Treaty of Fort Jackson.'
p6827
aS"In between, a visit to the South by Tecumseh led to the war's major military engagement, the battle of Horseshoe Bend."
p6828
aS'FTP, name this war fought against some Native American allies of Great Britain during the War_of_1812, which resulted in the cession of land in Alabama and Georgia.'
p6829
aS'The winning side lost only 50 men compared to 1,200 casualties for the losers, whose commander escaped but had a 30,000-pound bounty placed on his head.'
p6830
aS'Based on intelligence from Lord George Murray, the eventual winners took up a position where the opposition was restricted by flanking dykes and then butchered by 20 minutes of canon fire.'
p6831
aS'It began soon after one army had reached Derby with about 5,000 men, who were intent on taking London and placing James the Eighth on the English throne.'
p6832
aS'On this site in Inverness-shire forces under the duke of Cumberland smashed Highlanders led by Prince Charles Edward Stuart, aka Bonny Prince Charlie.'
p6833
aS'FTP, name this battle that decisively ended the Jacobite Rebellion begun the year before, in 1745.'
p6834
aS'One side in this battle featured several units that had been in French service, such as the John Drummond-commanded Royal cossois, while the other had been augmented a few months before by a force of five thousand Hessians led by Prince Frederick.'
p6835
aS"One side's commander attempted a sneak attack in the night but only made it a few miles from the River Nairn an hour before daybreak."
p6836
aS"It resulted in the discontinuation of a common wood and leather shield called the targe, which had been essential to the Highland charge, rendered ineffective by new bayonet techniques, which aided in Murray's rout at the hands of Cumberland."
p6837
aS'For 10 points, identify this battle, which ended the Second Jacobite Rebellion with the defeat of Bonnie Prince Charlie. '
p6838
aS'Its hegemony began when its first great king seized control of Allada and the coastal town of Wydah.'
p6839
aS'Its last king, Behanzin, tried to reestablish dominance, but following the defeat of the Tukolors, the French destroyed this empire and exiled its royalty to Martinique.'
p6840
aS'King Gezo had revived it earlier when it had been eclipsed briefly by the Oyo, but it was Agaja and his fearful Amazons that first brought it prominence.'
p6841
aS'FTP, identify this dominant slave trading empire of 19th-century West Africa, which took its name from its capital of Abomey.'
p6842
aS'This kingdom began as the Aja people moved north from Allada and settled among the Fon, eventually conquering them.'
p6843
aS'From their capital of Agbone, their first king Wegbala established a centralized state.'
p6844
aS'Under King Agaja, it conquered Allada and started a profitable slave trade with the Europeans, obtaining rifles to continue their wars of expansion.'
p6845
aS'However, they were unable to conquer Oyo, and the kingdom was finally captured by France in 1894.'
p6846
aS'For ten points, name this West African kingdom is located in and once gave its name to present day Benin.'
p6847
aS'Its penultimate ruler took a name meaning "the cultivated field is difficult to move," while its last ruler was known as the "shark who made the ocean waters tremble.'
p6848
aS'"  That penultimate ruler, Gll, was defeated by the Abeokuta, as was his predecessor Gezu.'
p6849
aS'A puppet named Goutchilli was installed as its ruler after the overthrow of its last ruler, Behanzin, who was defeated in an 1892 battle by the army of Alfred-Amde Dodds.'
p6850
aS'Originally part of Allada, it was made independent by Wegbaja in the 17th century.'
p6851
aS'A major player in the slave trade, its power depended upon a permanent army which included a group of the king\'s wives known to Europeans as the "Amazons.'
p6852
aS'"  FTP, name this African state of the Fon people, which occupied modern-day Benin.'
p6853
aS'This member of Les Groupe des Griots was among the few leaders to recognize the Biafra region of Nigeria as an independent state, and he was excommunicated from the Catholic Church for expelling most of his countrys foreign bishops.'
p6854
aS"He served various posts under President Estim, and then helped overthrow that man's overthrower, Paul Magloire."
p6855
aS'While in power, he relied on the support of his brutal private army, the Tontons Macoutes.'
p6856
aS'For 10 points, which leader of Haiti from 1957-71 was succeeded by his similarly nicknamed son Jean-Claude'
p6857
aS"During John F. Kennedy's assassination, a man who had social relationships with both Kennedy and Lee Harvey Oswalkd, George de Mohrenschildt, was allegedly on a CIA mission to overthrow this man, which was aborted due to the change of President."
p6858
aS'Shortly after this man took power, a middle-class exodus from his country created the "Boeing people.'
p6859
aS'" Before coming to power, this man led the opposition to the Paul Magloire regime following the overthrow of this man\'s patron Dumarsais Estim.'
p6860
aS'This former administrator of a yaws eradication campaign was a follower of Lorimer Denis and thus joined the mystic Groupe des Griots.'
p6861
aS'While in power, one of his most notorious associates was Clment Barbot, who organized the secret police known as the "Boogeymen" or Tontons Macoutes.'
p6862
aS'For 10 points, name this dictator who handed off power to his son Jean-Claude upon his death and was a Haitian despot nicknamed for his medical degree.'
p6863
aS'These events occur because of PGO spikes and facilitate "reverse learning" according to a model of Crick and Mitchison.'
p6864
aS'Hobson and McCarley stated that these events attempt to make sense of random activity in their formulation of the activation-synthesis theory.'
p6865
aS'The symbolic meanings of these occurrences are called latent content and are covered up by the manifest content.'
p6866
aS'One psychologist argued that these experiences satisfy the otherwise unacceptable feelings of the unconscious in his wish-fulfillment theory.'
p6867
aS'For 10 points, name these events which are the subject of an "interpretation" in a book by Sigmund Freud and occur most vividly during REM sleep.'
p6868
aS"The aristocratic Fourteen Families survived the crash of this country's indigo industry by slavedriving their way into coffee-producing wealth, while its natoional tradition venerates the Pipil warriors who repelled Pedro de Alvorado."
p6869
aS'Occult enthusiast Maximiliano Hernandez Martinez responded to Farabundo Marti\'s 1932 peasant uprising in this country by initiating a brutally systematic mass murder of its citizens known as "the slaughter, or la matanza.'
p6870
aS"Roberto D'Aubuisson, the founder of this country's ARENA party, was revealed to be incurably genocidal and implicated in the deaths of Rutilio Grande and Archbishop Oscar Romero."
p6871
aS'Tensions over the border near the Gulf of Fonseca were ignited by a 1970 FIFA qualifying match, leading this country and Honduras to fight the soccer war.'
p6872
aS'For 10 points, name this Central American country with capital at San Salvador.'
p6873
aS'An uprising in this nation was lead by Farabundio Marti and dubbed La Matanza, and was put down by Maximiliano Hernandez Martinez.'
p6874
aS'Their civil war saw the massacre of Catholic missionaries at El Mozote, and was ended by the Chapultepec Accords (*) in 1992.'
p6875
aS'The FMLN party has recently won an election in this nation, which was previously led by the ARENA party.'
p6876
aS'Manuel Jose Arce lead a conglomerate of this nation, Honduras, and Nicaragua.'
p6877
aS'For 10 points, name this nation with capital at San Salvador.'
p6878
aS'His early theory of evolution led to Galen labeling him the founder of Italian medicine.'
p6879
aS'A native of Acragas, he had been expelled from the Pythagorean order for "stealing discourses.'
p6880
aS'"  Of his original written works the poem Katharmoi is one of only two extant.'
p6881
aS'In his philosophy he proposed cycles of Love and Strife that would join and separate the natural makeup of the world.'
p6882
aS'FTP, name this Greek philosopher, who might have thrown himself into Mt.'
p6883
aS'Etna and believed that matter was made up of fire, water, earth, and air.'
p6884
aS'One early chieftain from this modern-day nation was killed in the Battle of St. Matthews day, and one commander from this nation, Lembitu of Lehola, was killed by the Sword Brethren during a crusade.'
p6885
aS"The Danes conquered this nation after the Battle of Lyndanisse, but were later expelled during the St. George's Night Uprising."
p6886
aS'More recently, this nation gained independence as a result of the Tartu Peace treaty in one conflict.'
p6887
aS'The Vaps Movement sought to combat the influence of communism here, but was overthrown, leading to this nations\' "Era of Silence".'
p6888
aS'The Forest Brothers in this nation resisted Soviet occupation, and it was attacked by the Germans in Operation Albion in World_War_I.'
p6889
aS'This nation was ceded to Germany in the Treaty_of_Brest-Litovsk, and is currently lead by Toomas Hendrik Ilves.'
p6890
aS'Also the site of several Battles of Narva, FTP, name this nation, the northernmost of the Baltic countries with capital at Talinn.'
p6891
aS'One force failed to arrive at this event because it was held up in the Baro Gorge.'
p6892
aS'That force was led by Christian de Bonchamps.'
p6893
aS'Gabriel Hanotaux had ordered Jean-Baptiste Marchand to march to this event, though those orders were rescinded by Theophile Delcasse, who became foreign minister during this event.'
p6894
aS'Another force arrived at this event after winning the Battle of Omdurman and was led by Herbert Kichener.'
p6895
aS'For 10 points, name this 1898 incident that saw heightened tensions between the French and British over colonial claims on the namesake Sudanese town.'
p6896
aS'The beginnings of this event were inspired by a lecture by the hydrologist Victor Prompt and the original plan was to send Parfait-Louis Monteil.'
p6897
aS'After this event, the ambassador Paul Cambon signed an addition to Article IV of the Niger Convention the location was renamed Kodok, and a resolution was made through negotiations between Lord Salisbury and Delcasse.'
p6898
aS'It began when Gabriel Hanotaux ordered a group of one hundred fifty sharpshooters under the future General Charles Mangin and Major Jean-Baptiste Marchand to march two thousand miles to this location, arriving there on July 10, about two months before the arrival of men under Lord Kitchener.'
p6899
aS'FTP, identify this crisis named for the Nile outpost at which it occurred; a dispute that nearly led to war between France and Britain.'
p6900
aS'One force involved in this event dismantled and carried the Faidherbe to its location.'
p6901
aS'That force had little luck recruiting local Shilluks, and was not reinforced by a group led by Christian de Bonchamps.'
p6902
aS'Resolved by a 1904 entente signed by Theodore Delcasse, it was caused by Gabriel Hanotaux ordering a force to march from Gabon to the namesake town, now called Kodok.'
p6903
aS'The other side in this event was led in part by Horace Smith-Dorrien had previously won a victory at Omdurman.'
p6904
aS'For 10 points, name this 1898 incident from the Scramble for Africa which was resolved by negotiations between Marchand and Kitchener and took place at a namesake Sudanese town.'
p6905
aS"His first battle was against the Cherokee in 1759, and when the Revolutionary War broke out he was a member of his home state's Provincial Congress and commissioned as captain."
p6906
aS"After his most noteworthy battle manuever at Parker's Ferry in August, 1781, he was appointed brigadier general and after the war served in the South Carolina senate from 1782 to 1790."
p6907
aS'FTP name this Revolutionary War hero, who earned his nickname from the terrain he hid in before rescuing Americans surrounded by the British, that nickname being the "Swamp Fox.'
p6908
aS'"'
aS'His first military experience had come fighting against the Cherokee, but his best-known exploits began after the surrender of General Benjamin Lincoln.'
p6909
aS"Congress officially thanked him for rescuing soldiers trapped at Parker's Ferry, which was a similar deed to his rescue of Nathaniel Greene at Eutaw Springs."
p6910
aS'Following the Revolutionary War, he parlayed his fame into a seat in the South Carolina Senate for eight years.'
p6911
aS'FTP, name this American military leader, whose guerilla tactics earned him the nickname "Swamp Fox.'
p6912
aS'"'
aS'His military career began in 1761 with a successful attack against the Cherokee.'
p6913
aS'During the American Revolution, he went on to capture the British fort at Charleston as the captain of a newly organized militia, after which he rose to lieutenant colonel.'
p6914
aS'He later fought with Nathanael Greene at the 1781 Battle of Eutaw Springs, forcing the Brits to retreat to North_Carolina.'
p6915
aS'However, he is best known for his military actions taken after the British recapture of Charleston by Tarleton, who fought a guerilla war with this man in the marshes.'
p6916
aS'FTP, identify this U.S. soldier nicknamed the "Swamp Fox.'
p6917
aS'"'
aS'He began his military career in 1761 by fighting the Cherokee.'
p6918
aS'Later, in the American Revolution, he joined with General Nathaniel Greene and defeated the British at Eutaw Springs in 1781, forcing them into North_Carolina.'
p6919
aS'When the British had captured Charleston in 1780, this man stayed in South Carolina, organizing a guerilla force to fight back.'
p6920
aS'FTP identify this patriot, who earned his nickname Swamp Fox for his guerilla tactics.'
p6921
aS'This man founded the satirical The Fly, and he published works under the pseudonyms Bhima and Arjuna on the subject of Spiritism, while he first ran for office thanks to the spirit of his dead brother Raul.'
p6922
aS'His creation of "The House of the World Worker" influenced his nation\'s labour movement, and this man had to deal with revolts by former generals Pascual Orozco and Bernardo Reyes.'
p6923
aS"He commuted the sentence of Pancho Villa, and Henry Lane Wilson aided the siege of The Citadel during the Ten Tragic Days, resulting in this man's capture and shooting."
p6924
aS'He also issued a document voicing his opposition to Porfirio_Diaz, which began the Mexican revolution.'
p6925
aS'For 10 points, name this issuer of the Plan of San Luis Potosi, President of Mexico from 1911 to 1913.'
p6926
aS'This man claimed to commune with a number of spirits, including his deceased brother Raul and a much more militant spirit named Jose, who pushed this man to commit his most famous act.'
p6927
aS'This man founded the Benito_Juarez Democratic Club.'
p6928
aS'Emiliano Zapata broke publically with this man over the issue of land reform, openly denouncing him in the Plan of Ayala, though this man had earlier issued his Plan of San Luis Potosi, calling for a democratic revolution in his country.'
p6929
aS"This man's Vice President was Pino Suarez, and he was overthrown and assassinated in a coup engineered by Victoriano Huerta known as the Ten Tragic Days."
p6930
aS'For ten points, name this man, the President of Mexico who was responsible for the overthrow of Porfirio_Diaz.  '
p6931
aS'He had given significant financial backing to the Regeneration group before founding the Anti-Reelectionist party.'
p6932
aS'The faction that brought him down signed the "Pact of the Embassy" in the office of Henry Lane Wilson, the U. S. Ambassador.'
p6933
aS'Because he was unable to immediately return land to dispossessed Indians, Emiliano (*) Zapata revolted against this president.'
p6934
aS'The author of "La sucesion presidencial en 1910," he was hailed as an "apostle of democracy," and championed the principle of "effective suffrage, no reelection" in his Plan of San Luis Potosi.'
p6935
aS'Killed while being transferred to prison, his ouster was engineered by Victoriano Huerta.'
p6936
aS'FTP, identify this Mexican leader who led the ouster of Porfirio_Diaz.'
p6937
aS"This man's doctor, Claude Gubler, published the book Le Grand Secret, which showed that this man had been hiding reports of cancer for over a decade."
p6938
aS"This man gave the famed La Baule speech, in which he criticized his nation's intervention in its former colonies."
p6939
aS"He attempted to nationalize his country's banks four months after his election to his highest post, part of his 110 Propositions."
p6940
aS'(*) Jacques Chirac served as this man\'s third Prime Minister from 1986 to 1988, during "cohabitation," as Chirac opposed this man\'s Socialist party.'
p6941
aS'For 10 points, name this man who served as President of France from 1981 to 1995.'
p6942
aS'This politician sought to end the torture implemented by Jacque Soustelle and as head of his party he succeeded the namesake of a plan to create a massive all-European army, Rene Pleven.'
p6943
aS'This figurehead of the 110 Propositions had earlier severed as Interior Minister under Mendes-France.'
p6944
aS"He granted Joan Alanis's request for a constitution and had a highly publicized (*) affair with Anna Pingeot, producing his daughter Mazarine."
p6945
aS'This man spared Antoine Guadino and Alain Mayot during the Urba Affair and dissolved the Cour-de-surete and removed the death penalty via the Badinter Act.'
p6946
aS"FTP, identify this habitual parliament-dissolver, the longest-serving President of France's Fifth Republic and a notable socialist."
p6947
aS"Stuntish acts during this man's term included a walking tour of Sarajevo during the Yugoslavian war and inviting every Nobel laureate to a conference on world problems."
p6948
aS'He forced a runoff in the 1965 presidential election, and later this man dismissed hardliner (*) Pierre Mauroy and appointed the technocrat Laurent Fabius in an attempt to save the economy.'
p6949
aS'His party\'s loss of control of parliament in the late 1980s led to his "cohabitation" with Jacques Chirac.'
p6950
aS'For 10 points name this Socialist President of France.'
p6951
aS'This man was accused of faking an assassination attempt in which he dodged a bullet by diving behind a hedge.'
p6952
aS'That incident was known as the "Observatory Affair.'
p6953
aS'" During his presidency, this man passed the Badinter Act to abolish the death penalty, and one of his defense ministers resigned after this man ordered the attack on Greenpeace\'s Rainbow Warrior ship.'
p6954
aS'Prime ministers under him included Pierre Mauroy and Edouard Balladur, who served under the second "cohabitation".'
p6955
aS"The first of those was brought about by his party's loss of control of parliament and so part of his reign featured joint rule with the RPR party of Chirac."
p6956
aS'For 10 points, name this French president from 1981 to 1995, noted for being the only Socialist to hold that position.'
p6957
aS'A rejected version of its charter forbade lawyers, doctors, and preachers from serving in the legislature.'
p6958
aS'The Treaty of Hopewell voided its attempt in the Treaty of Dumpling Creek to define one of its borders at the Little River.'
p6959
aS'Eventually, forces led by John Tipton triumphed over the government of John Sevier, who had tried to colonize Muscle Shoals.'
p6960
aS'This entity was inspired by North_Carolinas withdrawn attempt to give part of its land to the US government, and lasted from 1784 to 1788.'
p6961
aS'For 10 points, name this abortive U.S. state, named for a Founding Father, whose land was incorporated into the new state of Tennessee.'
p6962
aS'Following a treaty with the young chieftain Ancoo, this polity negotiated the treaty of Coyatee with Old Tassel and gave the Cherokees part of its territory in the Treaty of Hopewell.'
p6963
aS'Later on, settlers from this area killed leaders such as Old Tassel and Abram at Overhills Towns, and their attempted settlement of Muscle Shoals was foiled by Dragging Canoe.'
p6964
aS'Centered around the town of Jonesborough, its leaders included superior court judge David Campbell, Senate speaker Landon Carter, and House speaker William Cage.'
p6965
aS'Founded by members of the Wautaga movement, its downfall came after John Tipton defeated a band of men from this region on his farm under the command of its first governor, John Sevier.'
p6966
aS'Not recognized by neighboring North_Carolina and only existing for four years, FTP, identify this state which was never admitted into the Union, but instead was included in the new state of Tennessee.'
p6967
aS'Ten years after resigning from the Senate, when none of the party leaders could get a majority at the Democratic convention because of factional rivalries, this man emerged as the compromise candidate.'
p6968
aS'This almost unknown candidate swept the country in the elections and vainly tried to preserve the peace by nominating a diverse cabinet, including both Caleb Cushing and Jefferson_Davis.'
p6969
aS'FTP, name this US President, who approved the Gadsden purchase and ineptly handled the Kansas-Nebraska affair.'
p6970
aS"He was the only president who, after declaring his intent to run, failed to receive his party's nomination for a second term."
p6971
aS'William L. Marcy served as his secretary of state and engineered one of the few successes of his term, the Treaty of Kanagawa.'
p6972
aS'After defeating his former commander, Winfield_Scott, he and his running mate, William Rufus King, took office.'
p6973
aS'FTP, name this president whose tenure saw the Gadsen Purchase and the Kansas Nebraska Act between the years of 1853 and 1857.'
p6974
aS'convention that nominated this president was presided over by an aged Romulus Saunders, and this president appointed Benjamin Hallett to the position of U. S. Attorney as a reward for convention favors.'
p6975
aS"Other political appointments of this man include Joseph Campbell as Postmaster General and John Archibald Campbell for the Supreme Court, this president's only court appointment."
p6976
aS'His Secretary of State selection appeased the Albany Regency; he chose William Marcy, who helped negotiate the Gadsden Purchase with the approval of this president.'
p6977
aS'He governed without a vice-president after the death of William R. King.'
p6978
aS'During his term, the Ostend_Manifesto was drafted and the Kansas-Nebraska_Act passed.'
p6979
aS'For 10 points, name this fourteenth president elected in 1852 between Millard Fillmore and James Buchanan.'
p6980
aS"This man's government withdrew recognition from a government that would be defeated at the Second Battle of Rivas by Costa Ricans and mercenaries supported by Cornelius Vanderbilt."
p6981
aS"Deliberations held in Belgium would prove embarrassing to him, and this man's Secretary of War would go on to serve in a higher office for another country."
p6982
aS"One piece of legislation that he signed was designed to open up land for a continental railroad, but the aftermath of the signing saw Preston Brooks' caning of Charles Sumner as well as the Pottawatomie Massacre."
p6983
aS'Who is this man, who appointed Jefferson_Davis to his cabinet, and, for 10 points, presided over the drafting of a document stating plans to annex Cuba, the Ostend_Manifesto, signed the Kansas-Nebraska_Act and lost the 1856 Democratic nomination to James Buchanan'
p6984
aS'The first part of this event was calmed by the Peace of Rueil, but the machinations of Cardinal de Retz and the arrest of the Prince of (*) Cond led it to erupt again.'
p6985
aS'First instigated by the Parlement of Paris, it was directed at the influence of Anne of Austria and Cardinal_Mazarin.'
p6986
aS"For 10 points name this series of revolts, named for a sling, that occurred at the start of Louis XIV's reign."
p6987
aS'This event led to a sermon given by John Allen at the Second Baptist Church in Boston that became popular pamphlet material.'
p6988
aS'A man named John Brown was accused of being partly responsible for this action in an 1839 memoir by the last survivor of this incident, Ephraim Bowen.'
p6989
aS'This was sparked when incensed townsfolk gathered at Sabins tavern upon the arrival of Captain Lindsey and the Hannah and Namquid Point.'
p6990
aS'A restaurant owner named Joseph Bucklin shot Captain Dudingston during this event, after which Abraham Whipple led a bunch of arsonists towards a schooner.'
p6991
aS'For 10 points, name this event in which some Rhode Islanders burned a vessel sent to enforce the Stamp Act.'
p6992
aS'[AR] In 1842, he was appointed a second lieutenant in Corps of Topographical Engineers and he designed a number of lighthouses in the Florida Keys.'
p6993
aS'After serving in the Mexican-American War under Zachary Taylor at the Battle of Monterrey, he was promoted to brigadier general at the start of the Civil War under the recommendation of Pennsylvania Governor Andrew Curtin.'
p6994
aS"Born in Cadiz, as a result of his distinguished performances at South Mountain and Fredericksburg, where he temporarily broke through Stonewall Jackson's line, he was thrust into his most important role by Lincoln after Joseph Hooker's defeat at Chancellorsville."
p6995
aS'For 10 points, name this Union General best known for his key victory as head of the Army of the Potomac against General Lee in the Battle_of_Gettysburg.'
p6996
aS'During Reconstruction, he deposed corrupt Georgia governor Charles Jenkins and garnered a reputation for just administration as commander of the 3rd Military District.'
p6997
aS'During the reshuffling of the Union army in the wake of the Fredericksburg fiasco, this man became commander of the V Corps.'
p6998
aS'The namesake of an army fort mere spitting distance from this tournament, in Laurel, Maryland, this man replaced Joseph Hooker at the head of the Army of the Potomac.'
p6999
aS'In his greatest success, he arranged his army in the form of a fishhook extending to Culps Hill after joining up with Abner Doubledays troops at Cemetery Ridge, and his forces successfully staved off Picketts Charge.'
p7000
aS'For 10 points, name this commander who thus defeated Lee at Gettysburg.'
p7001
aS'After Emile Cottin (Uh MEAL Cot ANNE) failed in his assassination attempt on him, this man asked for leniency for the young anarchist, recommending eight years in prison and "intensive training in a shooting gallery.'
p7002
aS'" The leader of the extreme left in the Chamber of Deputies, he was a friend, and then adversary of Boulanger (Boo lahn JHAY), and lobbied against the Dreyfus affair, publishing Zola\'s "J\'Accuse" in his journal "L\'Aurore" (Lau ROAR).'
p7003
aS'FTP, name this man who presided at the Paris Peace Conference in 1919, known as "The Tiger.'
p7004
aS'"'
aS'This author of In the Evening of My Thought went on a pro-internationalism speech tour of the U.S. at age 80.'
p7005
aS'He was the co founder of a group called Act As You Think and later such (*) newspapers as Morning and Work.'
p7006
aS"His Justice was the organ of the Radical Party, but it was Aurora where this man published Emile Zola's J'Accuse."
p7007
aS'For 10 points name this future French prime minister who negotiated at Versailles.'
p7008
aS'He was present at the death of Monet and wrote a biography of the painter, while Toulouse-Lautrec illustrated his history of the Jews, At the Foot of Mount Sinai.'
p7009
aS'As a Radical deputy, he was accused of being in league with Panama intriguer Cornlius Herz and fought a duel with Paul Droulde.'
p7010
aS'He later shifted right and urged readiness for war in his newspapers The Free Man and Man in Chains, which led Poincare to name him premier.'
p7011
aS'Another paper he edited was LAurore, which published Emile Zolas JAccuse during the Dreyfus affair.'
p7012
aS'For 10 points, name this man known as the Tiger, who led France through the end of World_War_I and at Versailles'
p7013
aS'Among his chief works was the apology for Christianity, "Compendium revelationum," which was later placed on the Index.'
p7014
aS'This man came to power as head of the party known as the "Weepers," for their complaints about the lack of morality in their time.'
p7015
aS'His followers lit two major "bonfires of the vanities," the second of which followed his conviction for heresy.'
p7016
aS'Welcoming Charles VIII into his city, he hoped for French reform of what he believed to be the corrupt court of Pope Alexander VI.'
p7017
aS'FTP, name this figure who was hanged and burned in 1498, the Dominican friar that ruled Florence after the exile of the Medici.'
p7018
aS'The government of his enemies, the Arrabbiati, began his downfall by inciting riots on Ascension Day.'
p7019
aS'This Ferraran composed the poem "On the Decline of the Church" and preached from the  pulpit of San Marco, becoming vicar-general there.'
p7020
aS'He prophesied the coming of an avenger in the French King Charles VIII, who served only to create a power vacuum that this man could fill, attacking Pope Alexander VI after the expulsion of Piero de Medici.'
p7021
aS'Machiavelli considered him the greatest contemporary example of an "unarmed prophet," who, unlike Moses or Romulus, would be unseated as soon as the people stopped following him.'
p7022
aS'In 1498 he was hanged and his body burned in the Piazza della Signoria which had been a focal point for the Bonfires of the Vanities that he conducted.'
p7023
aS'FTP, name this demagogue, a Dominican ruler of Florence.'
p7024
aS'This man was said to have rejected the offer of a red hat, and opted for a hat of blood instead.'
p7025
aS'Some of his disciples agreed to submit to an ordeal by fire but rain prevented that, angering the populace.'
p7026
aS'He increased his authority by predicting the invasion of Charles VIII, and the Arrabbiati formed in opposition to him.'
p7027
aS'He made homosexuality a capital offense, but after Pope Alexander VI ordered his arrest he met his end in the Piazza della Signoria.'
p7028
aS'FTP, name this Dominican priest and enemy of the Medici who conducted the 1497 Bonfire of the Vanities and transformed Florence into a Christian republic.'
p7029
aS'This man wrote poetry like the poem "On the Decline of the Church".'
p7030
aS'This man was taken into custody along with Fra Domenico da Pescia and Fra Silvestro, and this man wrote the meditations Tristitia obsedit me and Infelix Ego.'
p7031
aS'This man believed that King Charles VIII of France would prove to be an agent of the Last Days.'
p7032
aS'One of this mans first acts as leader was to make sodomy a capital offense, and while this man was giving a speech on Acension Day, citizens of his city rioted.'
p7033
aS'Picco della Mirandola requested that this man return to Florence, which he did, and he ran the Church of San Marco.'
p7034
aS'For ten points, identify this Dominican Friar, an enemy of Alexander VI who enjoyed burning books and art in events like his Bonfire of the Vanities.'
p7035
aS'As a youth, this man nearly gave in to his passions with his neighbor, a Strozzi exile.'
p7036
aS'A sermon at Faenza reaffirmed his faith, and upon leaving his hometown he began to recite the prayer "Lord!'
p7037
aS'Teach me the way my soul should walk" daily.'
p7038
aS'He levied a tax known as "la decima" and wrote the tract "Contempt of the World" while studying at the University of Ferrara.'
p7039
aS"This author of The Triumph of the Cross took advantage of the period following Charles VIII's invasion to gain authority by ousting the Medicis."
p7040
aS'Opposed by the Arrabbiati, he was excommunicated by Alexander VI, potentially for an action he committed against what he called "immoral art".'
p7041
aS'For 10 points, name this Dominican friar who, in 1497, ordered a burning of various books and art in the Bonfire of the Vanities.'
p7042
aS'A rebellion by the "Yellow Turbans" so weakened this government that a poet would come to write: "The great city of the west sinks into chaos.'
p7043
aS'Tigers, and wolves, the ravagers have arrived.'
p7044
aS'I leave our house.'
p7045
aS'No living souls; only whitened bones strew the plain.'
p7046
aS'"  This was a long fall for the dynasty that brought us the crossbow and paper.'
p7047
aS'Founded by Liu Bang and named after a river, it lasted from 206 BC to 220 AD  For 10 points, name this Chinese dynasty.'
p7048
aS'To set its goals, this meeting appointed a five-member committee, which included Nathan Dane and Chauncey Goodrich.'
p7049
aS'Theodore Lyman wrote a short account of this meeting, which proposed a series of amendments, including one preventing presidents from being elected from the same state in successive terms.'
p7050
aS"Its secretary was Timothy Dwight, and it was contemporaneous with Governor Caleb Strong's secret peace mission."
p7051
aS'George Cabot presided over this meeting, which was instigated by discontent with the Non-Intercourse Act and the War_of_1812.'
p7052
aS"For 10 points, name this 1814-1815 convention which ruined the Federalist Party, and discussed New England's secession from the United_States."
p7053
aS"Meetings at this event were convened by prayers of Reverend Strong, and this event was satirized by a William Charles cartoon called Leap No Leap in which one of its leaders was jumping into a king's lap."
p7054
aS'Some attendees of this event were referred to by the term blue lights.'
p7055
aS'Theodore Dwight published a History of this event, while Harrison Gray Otis published Letters in Defense of it.'
p7056
aS'George Cabot served as its president and was a part of its dominant faction, the Essex Junto.'
p7057
aS'This conference sought to amend the Constitution to limit presidents to one term and abolish the three-fifths clause.'
p7058
aS'It was ultimately rendered ineffective by the signing of the Treaty_of_Ghent.'
p7059
aS'For 10 points, name this meeting of Federalists who opposed the War_of_1812, which took place in Connecticut.'
p7060
aS'With the assistence of his chief minister, the Duc de Sully, he lowered taxes on peasantry, promoted economic recovery, and instituted a tax on the Paulette.'
p7061
aS'Victor at Ivry and Arquet, he was excluded from succession by the Treaty of Nemours, but won a great victory at Coutras.'
p7062
aS'His excommunication was lifted by Clement VIII, but that pope later claimed to be crucified when this monarch promulgated the Edict_of_Nantes.'
p7063
aS'For 10 points, name this French king, the first Bourbon who admitted that "Paris is worth a mass" when he converted following the War of the Three Henrys.'
p7064
aS'This ruler established a code which mandated that pavilions be owned by only one family and ordered the execution of the Duke of Biron partially for conspiring with Savoy, which was forced to surrender Bresse to him by the Treaty of Lyons.'
p7065
aS'His other less known diplomacy includes sending the Duke of Mercoeur to sign the Peace of Vervins.'
p7066
aS'His mistresses included Gabrielle dEstre, and he won major military victories at Arques and Ivry.'
p7067
aS'His main advisor Maximilien de Bethune, the Duke of Sully, reformed the paulette and he was succeeded by his son by Marie de Medici, Louis XIII.'
p7068
aS'FTP, name this French king who declared that Paris was worth a mass and signed the Edict_of_Nantes as the first Bourbon.'
p7069
aS'One king of this name was opposed by the Malcontents, and was later assassinated by the friar Jacques Clement.'
p7070
aS'That king with this name became the first elected king of Poland-Lithuania.'
p7071
aS"After the wedding of one man of this name, a massacre of (*) Huguenots took place on St. Bartholomew's Day."
p7072
aS'A Duke of Guise with this name led the Catholic League in the final of the Wars of Religion that was fought between three men of this name.'
p7073
aS'One man of this name declared issued the Edict_of_Nantes and declared that "Paris is worth a mass."'
p7074
aS'For 10 points, give this name of a king of France who was the 4th of his name, and was from Navarre.'
p7075
aS'He was first elected to the Senate in 1936, but resigned several years later to fight in World_War_II; in 1946, he made a comeback by unseating Senator David Walsh.'
p7076
aS'He nominated Dwight Eisenhower for president in 1952 and became chairman of his campaign, but was unseated nonetheless by John F. Kennedy.'
p7077
aS"He spent the bulk of the next ten years as UN ambassador and ambassador to South Vietnam, and was Richard_Nixon's running-mate in 1960."
p7078
aS'FTP, name this Massachusetts politician, the grandson and namesake of another senator.'
p7079
aS'His memoir The Stream Has Many Eyes was written during his seven-year term as special envoy to the Vatican.'
p7080
aS"He won the 1964 New Hampshire Republican primary as a write-in candidate, twelve years after serving as Eisenhower's campaign manager, resulting in his appointment as representative to the United Nations."
p7081
aS'A two-term senator from Massachusetts, he later replaced Maxwell Taylor as ambassador to South Vietnam, and his notes to the State Department formed the bulk of the Pentagon Papers.'
p7082
aS"FTP, name this man who was also Richard_Nixon's running mate in 1960."
p7083
aS'Early in life, this man wrote a book entitled The Cult of Weakness, in which he warned against the U. S. becoming an unprepared nation.'
p7084
aS'He won his first term in the U. S. Senate by beating Governor James Curley, while his time in a more famous position saw him respond to Cable 243.'
p7085
aS'In his two terms in that position, he succeeded Frederick Nolting and Maxwell Taylor respectively.'
p7086
aS'This author of the memoir The Stream Has Many Eyes also served a seven year term as special envoy to the Holy See.'
p7087
aS'His son lost his Senate seat to Ted Kennedy, ending Republican dominance of that seat.'
p7088
aS'This man is best remembered for his controversial time as ambassador to South Vietnam.'
p7089
aS"For ten points, name this man who ran for vice president with Richard_Nixon in 1960, and had a same-named grandfather who opposed Woodrow_Wilson's view of the League of Nations."
p7090
aS'This politician espoused Social Darwinism in The Cult of Weakness.'
p7091
aS'This politician was appointed as the fifth US Ambassador to West Germany and had worked with Paul van Zeeland as the first Director-General of the Atlantic Institute.'
p7092
aS'This politician also escorted Nikita_Khrushchev while serving as the third US Ambassador to the UN.'
p7093
aS'This politician sent Cable 243 in response to the Xa Loi Pagoda raids while serving as the sixth US Ambassador to South Vietnam.'
p7094
aS'In a 1936 Senate election, this politician defeated Governor James Michael Curley but this senator would later be defeated by (*) John F. Kennedy in the 1952 senate election in Massachusetts.'
p7095
aS"He was again defeated by JFK in the 1960 presidential election as Richard_Nixon's running mate."
p7096
aS'For 10 points, name this grandson of a former Massachusetts Senator who had opposed the League of Nations.'
p7097
aS'political figure succeeded George C. McGhee as ambassador to West Germany in 1967 and received his final diplomatic appointment as special envoy to the Vatican in 1970.'
p7098
aS'He defeated Governor James Michael Curley in his first election bid to the U. S. Senate, but resigned from his seat in 1944 in order to fight in the Second World War.'
p7099
aS'While serving as ambassador to the United Nations in the Eisenhower administration, he personally guided Nikita_Khrushchev on tour of America.'
p7100
aS'His experiences as a Lyndon Johnson appointee, meanwhile, are detailed in his memoir The Stream Has Many Eyes.'
p7101
aS'In addition to serving as the ambassador to South Vietnam from 1965-1967, this politician lost an important race in which his opponent used "damned tea parties" to defeat him.'
p7102
aS'For 10 points, name this man who lost a Senate seat to JFK, the running-mate of Richard_Nixon in the 1960 presidential election whose grandfather of the same name was also a Massachusetts senator.'
p7103
aS'This king unsuccessfully tried to make his bastard son Morgan the Bishop of Durham and appointed William Marshal as tutor for another son.'
p7104
aS"An army led by this king's advisor Ranulf of Glanvill won the Battle of Alnwick, which led to the Treaty of Falaise with William the Lion."
p7105
aS"This man's foreign policy was greatly aided by the papal bull Laudabiliter issued by Adrian IV, which addressed Ireland."
p7106
aS'This initiator of the Assizes of Northampton also seized the Duchy of Northumbria from Malcom IV of Scotland.'
p7107
aS"This contemporary of Louis VII of France became heir to the throne under the Treaty of Winchester, signed by his mother and the previous king, and a struggle over this king's Constitutions of Clarendon led to the death of Thomas a Becket."
p7108
aS'For ten points, name this successor of Stephen of Blois and first Plantagenet King of England, the father of Richard the Lion-Heart.'
p7109
aS"This man's younger brother was made Abbot of Glastonbury and Bishop of Winchester, becoming the wealthiest churchman in the country, while this man himself encountered trouble during the first years of his rule in a period known as the Anarchy."
p7110
aS"Having been imprisoned for some time in Bristol for rashly accepting battle at Lincoln, he was exchanged for Robert of Gloucester, who had been captured after this man's wife, Matilda of Boulogne, advanced toward London."
p7111
aS"However, Matilda's son would later return to England, and, following a military draw at Wallingford, the Treaty of Westminster gave this man's second son all of his baronial lands, while recognizing that ruler of Aquitaine as his heir."
p7112
aS'Succeeding Henry I, this is, FTP, which English monarch, the last of the House of Normandy'
p7113
aS'During the battle of Lincoln, this man was captured by William de Cahaigne and afterwards imprisoned on the orders of his cousin.'
p7114
aS'After the death of his son Eustace, this man signed the treaty of Wallingford which would settle his succession once and for all.'
p7115
aS"His claim to power was made possible by his brother Theobald's lack of interest, and got Innocent II's papal blessing."
p7116
aS"His wife, Matilda of Boulogne, was an important ally, and she managed to have him released by exchanging him for Robert, Earl of Gloucester, his cousin's most prominent general."
p7117
aS'His mother, Adela, was a daughter of William_the_Conqueror, which gave him a claim on the throne.'
p7118
aS'He further claimed that Henry I had appointed him as successor on his deathbed, with led to struggle with the Empress Matilda, known as the Anarchy.'
p7119
aS'FTP, who was this last Norman king of England, predecessor of Henry II'
p7120
aS'This man was captured by a knight named William de Cahagnes after his battle-axe and sword shattered on the battlefield, but was released after his brother Henry successfully defended Winchester.'
p7121
aS'He fell out of favor with Pope Innocent II after alienating Roger, bishop of Salisbury and entering into an unpopular treaty with Geoffrey of Anjou.'
p7122
aS"After this man's son Eustace died, the issue of succession was decided by the Treaty of Wallingford, which made Henry of Anjou heir."
p7123
aS'FTP name this English King who fought the battle of Lincoln against the forces of Robert of Gloucester and his own cousin Matilda, the only British King from the house of Blois.'
p7124
aS'He was the architect of the Pact of Espino Negro which ended the civil war between Diaz and Moncada in Guatemala and soon after was appointed governor-general of the Philippines, a post he held until 1929.'
p7125
aS'He authored "The Decision to use the Atomic Bomb," the first written defense of that action.'
p7126
aS'Much earlier he had headed the U.S. delegations to the Geneva Disarmament Conference and the London Naval Conference and, in opposition to the Japanese invasion of Manchuria, put forth his namesake doctrine.'
p7127
aS'FTP identify this secretary of state for Hoover and secretary of war for FDR and Truman.'
p7128
aS'This man negotiated a namesake peace agreement with the general Jos Mara Moncada; it is often referred to as the Pact of Espino Negro.'
p7129
aS'The author of Democracy and Nationalism in Europe, he collaborated with McGeorge Bundy on the memoir On Active Service in Peace and War.'
p7130
aS"He negotiated the above treaty after he'd been sent to Nicaragua by Coolidge, and then in 1927 he became governor-general of the Philippines."
p7131
aS"His first cabinet post was in 1911 as Taft's Secretary of War, a position he'd hold again from 1940-45, when he had a significant impact over the Manhattan Project."
p7132
aS"But, it was during his time as Secretary of State for Hoover that he issued a proclamation in response to Japan's invasion of Manchuria."
p7133
aS'FTP, name this statesman whose doctrine says that the US will not recognize territorial changes achieved by force.'
p7134
aS'He met General Jose Moncada on May 4 1927 in Tipitapa, securing the continued presidency of Adolfo Diaz and encouraging further American involvement in Nicaragua.'
p7135
aS'He earned the support of Manuel Quezon in order to draft a new corporation law while he served as governor general of the Philippines until 1929.'
p7136
aS'He succeeded Elihu Root as Secretary of War under Taft, and served again in that position under Truman and FDR.'
p7137
aS"Responding to Japan's invasion to Manchuria, he enunciated a policy stating that the US would not recognize territorial changes brought about by aggression."
p7138
aS'For 10 points name this man who created his namesake "doctrine" as Secretary of State for Herbert_Hoover.'
p7139
aS'Like the Egyptians, these ancient people are divided into Old and New Kingdoms.'
p7140
aS'Calling themselves Nesilim, their Old Kingdom was founded by their leader Labarna around 1680 BCE, though his kingdom was later extended by Mursili I, who conquered Halab and raided Bablyon, and Telipinu, who issued a law code.'
p7141
aS'Famous New Kingdom rulers included Suppiluliuma and Hattusilish III.'
p7142
aS'Perhaps their most famous victory in battle came under the king Muwatalli in 1274 BCE.'
p7143
aS'FTP, identify this people who fought the Egyptians to a draw at the Battle of Kadesh.'
p7144
aS'Originally based on the city of Nesa, its first known king was Labarna.'
p7145
aS'The edict of Telepinu laid down rules of succession for its later period, which were violated when Urhi-Teshub was deposed, and its successor states continued its use of Luwian hieroglyphics into the first millennium.'
p7146
aS'Its king Suppiluliuma I attempted to marry his son to the widow of Tutankhamun, while its archives at Bogazkoy include a cuneiform copy of treaty with another Pharaoh.'
p7147
aS'Led by Muwatali I at the battle of Kadesh, For 10 points, identify this ancient empire based on the city of Hattusa.'
p7148
aS'One king of this polity subjugated the Arzawa kingdom, and under Tudhaliya I it managed to expand into Luwian territory.'
p7149
aS'This empire fell after an invasion by the Kaskas and Bryges, and one document written by this empire states that its subject made his enemies into the frontier of the sea during his conquests.'
p7150
aS'Its early rulers took the title Labarna, and another ruler of this polity defeated the Mitanni kingdom and annexed large parts of Syria, Suppiluliuma I.'
p7151
aS'Another one of its rulers fought in the largest chariot battle in history against Ramses II; that ruler was Muwatallis II, who achieved a victory at Kadesh.'
p7152
aS'For 10 points, name this Indo-European empire found in Anatolia with capital at Hattusa.'
p7153
aS'One of these was defeated at the Battle of Welfesholz by his eventual successor, who established the short-lived Supplinburger dynasty.'
p7154
aS'One of then nicknamed "the Saint" is buried next to Pope Clement II.'
p7155
aS'Another one of these defeated Berengar of Ivrea, who had attempted to kidnap his daughter, and won a crushing victory against invading barbarians at the Battle of Lechfeld.'
p7156
aS'One of them hired alchemists John Dee and Edward Kelley to help him find the Philosophers Stone, but was unsucessful.'
p7157
aS'Another holder of this post, which was disestablished by the Treaty of Pressburg, was elected King of Poland in 1575, but was defeated by Stefan Bathory before he could reign.'
p7158
aS"That man's father, before holding this post, had been elected King of Bohemia and Hungary in 1526."
p7159
aS"That man's brother defeated John Frederick of Saxony and Philip of Hesse at the Battle of Mulberg, crushing the Schmalkaldic League."
p7160
aS'For ten points, name this position, first given on Christmas Day to Charlemagne.'
p7161
aS'Much of our knowledge of him comes from a history of his reign written in heroic verse by a nun, Hrotswitha of Gandersheim.'
p7162
aS'He first gained fame when he marched to Italy to assist Adelaide, the widowed queen of Lombardy, against Berengar II.'
p7163
aS'He then had to return to his homeland to crush a rebellion led by his son Liudolf.'
p7164
aS'Four years after becoming ruler of northern Italy, he halted the Magyars westward expansion with a crushing defeat of them at Lech River in 955.'
p7165
aS"When chosen king, he selected Aachen as the site of his coronation as a symbol of continuing Charlemagne's tradition."
p7166
aS'FTP, who was this first official Holy Roman Emperor'
p7167
aS'The future Byzantine Emporer Romanus II was at one time betrothed to his niece Hedwig, and his son married Theophano, who was either the daughter of the same Romanus II or the niece of John Tzimices.'
p7168
aS'The son of Henry I, Duke of Saxony, he defeated the Magyars at the Battle of Lech in 955 and was crowned Holy Roman Emperor in 962.'
p7169
aS'For ten points, name this founder of the dynasty that bears his name.'
p7170
aS"He took Conrad, the young king of Arles, under his protection, and eventually married Conrad's sister Adelheid to get a claim to the Italian throne."
p7171
aS'After suppressing a revolt led by his son Liudolf, he defeated the Magyars at Lechfeld, went to pick up the Italian crown after Pope John XII asked him for protection, and married his son to Theophano, the daughter of the Greek emperor.'
p7172
aS'FTP, name this ruler, whose brother Bruno was Archbishop of Cologne and the leader of a German cultural revival, who was the eldest son of Henry the Fowler, ruled as Saxon emperor from 936 to 973, and was nicknamed "the great.'
p7173
aS'"'
aS'His father enlarged his kingdom at the expense of the Wendish chiefdoms, and built a line of forts that allowed this prince to win his most famous battle.'
p7174
aS'Taking advantage of internal rivalries among the Lombards, he launched an invasion of Northern Italy to free the Lombard Queen Adelaide, whom he later married, claiming parts of Northern Italy as a dowry.'
p7175
aS'Invading again in 960 at the behest of a besieged Pope John XII, the Pope rewarded him by crowning him emperor.'
p7176
aS'FTP, name this Saxon king who repulsed a 955 Magyar invasion at the battle of Lechfeld, the first Holy Roman Emperor.'
p7177
aS'After defeating a revolt led by Conrad the Red, this ruler allied the crown with the Catholic Church, greatly increasing royal power.'
p7178
aS'He married Edith and Adelaide, whom he rescued from a marriage with Berengar II, and had three children, one of whom reigned after him.'
p7179
aS'This king also defeated the Magyars in the Lechfeld in 955.'
p7180
aS'FTP, identify this son of Henry the Fowler crowned emperor in 962 by John XII, often considered the first Holy Roman Emperor.'
p7181
aS'Following the Battle of Bovino, this man used the promise of a husband for Theophano to free Pandulf from the hold of John I Tzimisces.'
p7182
aS'He won the Battle of Andernach to defeat one of many insurrections led against him by people named Eberhard, a feat accomplished shortly after he dispatched the pretender Thankmar.'
p7183
aS'He would later rely on the support of diplomats dispatched by prince Geza of Hungary while using anti-Magyar propaganda to outmaneuver Conrad the Red and his own son, Liudof, who had allied with the Archbishop of Mainz and forced this ruler to call the Diet of Auerstadt.'
p7184
aS'His use of the advocatus and proprietary churches to reorganize the clergy allowed him to hold power over Swabia, Franconia, and Lorraine, and later extend his rule into Italy.'
p7185
aS'FTP, identify this German king and son of Henry the Fowler, sometimes considered the first Holy Roman Emperor.'
p7186
aS'Eberhard of Franconia attempted to depose this man and replace him with Thankmar (tahnk-mahr), but this man defeated Eberhard and his allies at the battle of Andernach.'
p7187
aS'He also invaded Italy after his son and brother attempted to do so, and he married the woman who was held captive by Berengar, Adelaide.'
p7188
aS'He divested Liudolf and Conrad the Red of their titles at the Diet of Auerstadt.'
p7189
aS'He established his capital at Magdeburg, though he is better known for defeating the Magyars at the Battle of Lechfeld.'
p7190
aS'For 10 points, identify this son of Henry the Fowler, who was crowned Holy Roman Emperor in 962.'
p7191
aS'This ruler was crowned by Hildebert of Mainz, while Bruno of Cologne was a brother of this man who became Duke of Lorraine.'
p7192
aS'In one of his early wars, this man defeated Eberhard of Bavaria.'
p7193
aS'This man won the Battle of Rechnitz near modern day Mecklenburg.'
p7194
aS"This man invaded Italy after the villainous Berengar of Ivrea kidnapped this man's wife, Adelaide."
p7195
aS'In his most famous battle, which took place near Augsburg, this king laid low the forces of Grand Prince Taksony and drove a certain barbarian tribe back to Pannonia.'
p7196
aS'For ten points, name this victor at the Battle of Lechfeld and son of Henry the Fowler, a German prince who became the first leader of the Holy Roman Empire.'
p7197
aS'He battled the pope over the deposition of Archbishop Arnulf of Reims.'
p7198
aS'During an argument with the Count of Auvergne, he asked Who made you count to which the other replied, Who made you king His grandson Robert founded a cadet line of his dynasty in Burgundy, and he crowned his son king nine years before his death, possibly to insure continuity should he die campaigning against the Moors in Spain.'
p7199
aS'Succeeded by his son Robert II, he allied with Otto II and Otto III to dominate the last Carolingian kings.'
p7200
aS'FTP, name this first king of a namesake dynasty in France which lasted from 987 to 1328.'
p7201
aS'This mans father was condemned at the Council of Ingelheim for seizing the fortress of Laon through extortion.'
p7202
aS'The Council of Mousson was part of this mans dispute with Pope John XV over the right of Arnulf to be Archbishop of Reims.'
p7203
aS'In coming to power, this ruler was assisted by the previous kings chancellor, Adalberon, as well as by Gerbert of Aurillac, the future Pope Sylvester II.'
p7204
aS'This father of Robert II and descendant of Robert the Strong was crowned at Noyon, but it was at the Council of Senlis that he won his position by a vote of the nobles.'
p7205
aS'For ten points, name this man who replaced the last Carolingian in 987 and founded his own namesake dynasty of French Kings.'
p7206
aS'Their capital was at Avaris, and their last great king was Apopis I.'
p7207
aS'The 3rd century B.C.'
p7208
aS'historian Manetho gave this group the name we know them by, which means "shepherds," but they were hardly peaceful, conquering Kush and most of the northern Nile delta.'
p7209
aS'They fell to Theban revolutionaries.'
p7210
aS'FTP, name these expert archers and charioteers who conquered Egypt.'
p7211
aS'Their major defeat came at the hands of Seqenere III, though their capital survived for another 70 years.'
p7212
aS'The only detailed account of this people comes from Josephus, who used Manetho as his source.'
p7213
aS'Their consolidation of power began with the establishment of Avaris and the introduction of such items as the compound bow and horse-drawn chariot.'
p7214
aS'With a name meaning "Shepherd Kings," they revered the god Seth and ruled for roughly 200 years.'
p7215
aS'FTP, name this Semitic people that invaded Egypt in the 18th-century BC.'
p7216
aS'A scribe of these people, Ahmes, was responsible for the creation of what is now known as the Rhind Papyrus.'
p7217
aS'One ruler of this empire, King Apepi, ruled for at least forty years and went by the epithet of Aauserra.'
p7218
aS'A Semitic people, much of what we know of them comes from Tell el-Daba and they were given a name which likely means rulers of foreign lands.'
p7219
aS'They introduced the composite bow and chariot after their invasion, and ruled from the capital of Avaris, but were finally expelled by Ahmose I around 1540 BCE, which led to the establishment of the 18th Dynasty.'
p7220
aS'FTP, name these people who ruled northern Egypt during the Second Intermediate Period.'
p7221
aS'It was ended by the forces of Charles II of Navarre at Clermont-en-Beauvaisis, but began following the Battle of Poitiers when the countryside was ransacked by bands of British mercenaries whose actions were ignored by the French nobles.'
p7222
aS"This oversight, coupled with the Dauphin's demand that his subjects rebuild the fortifications of their lords, fueled an uprising of Parisians under Etienne Marcel and country-folk under Guillaume Carle who began at Compiegne and spent two moths attacking castles and massacring the nobles."
p7223
aS'FTP, name this insurgency that primarily took place in 1358 and whose name comes from a French pejorative for "peasant.'
p7224
aS'"'
aS'A work subtitled The Lady and the Page by George Payne Rainsford James is a historical romance set during this rebellion.'
p7225
aS'It was directly sparked by a request for the populace to fortify castles at their own expense, and one exploit in this rebellion saw the Englishman Captal de Buch help save some 300 women trapped in a marketplace.'
p7226
aS'The mayor of Meaux (+) was put to death for allowing the rebels to let that happen, putting the life of the Duchess of Orleans at risk.'
p7227
aS'Some 3000 of its participants were killed by the King of Navarre, (*) Charles the Bad, while one of its leaders was decapitated after agreeing to peace negotiations, Etienne Marcel.'
p7228
aS'Chronicled by Jean Froissart, FTP, identify this peasant uprising following the capture of King John the Good at the Battle of Poitiers in the Hundred Years War, named for an insulting nickname given to French peasants.'
p7229
aS'knights returning from Lithuanian crusades, Gaston Phebus and Captal de Buchand, inflicted a decisive defeat on this movement by relieving the siege of Meaux where a number of notable ladies were hiding.'
p7230
aS'Amiens and Rouen were two sites that received speedy royal pardons after it concluded, thanks in part to their loyalty to the Navarre family.'
p7231
aS'A one-sided battle at Mello crushed its organized military wing after its main leader, Guillame Cale, was murdered at a parlay with Charles the Bad and the Mayor of Paris, Etienne Marcel, was killed for lending tacit support to it.'
p7232
aS'This uprising was prompted by higher taxes levied on the lower estates to help pay for the ransom of John the Good.'
p7233
aS'For 10 points, identify this 1358 peasant rebellion in France termed after a generic name given to French peasants.'
p7234
aS'The recent appearance of a memoir by Graham Bower, who participated in this event, has provided new details.'
p7235
aS'Many of those involved had been members of the "Reform Committee" and their leaders included Raleigh Grey and John Jays Hammond.'
p7236
aS'One consequence of it was the declaration of the Chimurenga campaign by the Shona.'
p7237
aS'Much of the fighting took place at Doornkop where Commander Piet Cronje ultimately convinced its participants to surrender.'
p7238
aS'After the uitlander support failed to materialize and his force was defeated, its namesake leader was replaced at his post by Alfred Milner and sent to Holloway jail.'
p7239
aS'FTP, name this event in which more than 600 men attempted to oust President Kruger in the Transvaal.'
p7240
aS'John Hammand was sentenced to death for it, while Graham Bowers was demoted to a job in Mauritius.'
p7241
aS'Hercules Robinsin, the Lord Rosmead, was forced to resign.'
p7242
aS'In its aftermath, lack of police power led to the first Chimurenga, an uprising of the Showa and Ndebele proples.'
p7243
aS'Organized at Pitsami with the help of Raleigh Grey, it was motivated by recent discoveries at Witwatersrand.'
p7244
aS'It fought an unsuccessful battle against a small force led by Piet Cronje at Krugersdrop, resulting in a congratulatory letter to their target from the German Kaiser, but not the uitlander uprising they had hoped for.'
p7245
aS'For ten points, name this attempt by the British to take over the Transvaal.'
p7246
aS'One reaction to this event was allegedly the subject of a harsh debate between Admiral Hollmann and Chlodowig Hohenlohe.'
p7247
aS'Charles Leonard and Lionel Phillips signed a document contributing to this event that rails against the dangers to "our race" posed by a "foreign corporation" and claims to have gathered 40,000 signatures, labeling it an "official report" of the Reform committee.'
p7248
aS'This event contributed to the end of an agreement negotiated by a former administrator of Hong Kong, Hercules Robinson, who had succeeded Henry Loch despite being 71 before earning the ire of Joseph Chamberlain over the fallout from this event.'
p7249
aS'That agreement, the London Convention, predated a revelation that prompted the Raleigh Grey to organize a group initially based out of (*) Pitsani in the lead-up to this event, which marked the high point of the Drifts Crisis.'
p7250
aS"The man most associated with this event had previously served as administrator of Mashonaland and Matabeleland, and drew from the latter's police force after gold was discovered at Witwatersrand to constitute the perpetrating force of this event."
p7251
aS'Defeated by Piet Cronje, this action prompted a document praising the "energetic" self-defense efforts of the defenders to be sent by Kaiser Wilhelm II, the Kruger Telegram.'
p7252
aS"FTP, name this attempt by British Uitlanders backed by Cecil Rhodes to take over the Transvaal in the namesake commander's military action."
p7253
aS"The weakness of the army after this event provoked an uprising led by a man who promised that his enemy's bullets would change to water and their cannon shells would become eggs, Mlimo."
p7254
aS'Graham John Bower wrote the Secret History of this event, which was a reaction to the closing of all river fords known as the Drifts Crisis.'
p7255
aS'Governor-General Hercules Robinson was contacted by Joseph Chamberlain during this event because the latter feared that the timing of it would ruin him as Colonial Secretary.'
p7256
aS'This invasion began at Pitsani, but only four days later the attackers surrendered at Doornkoop to Piet Cronje.'
p7257
aS'This invasion hinged on an uprising by ill-treated expatriate workers known as Uitlanders which never happened, and in response to this Kaiser Wilhelm II sent a congratulatory telegram to Paul Kruger.'
p7258
aS'For 10 points, name this 1895 British raid on Transvaal which helped start the Second_Boer_War in South_Africa.'
p7259
aS'A namesake war in this place was sparked by the rebellion of Prince Diponegoro and very early on, power was consolidated here under the Sailendra kingdom.'
p7260
aS'A number of kings of this place are chronicled in the Pararaton manuscript, which begins with the ascension of Ken Arok of the Singhasari Kingdom.'
p7261
aS'It runs through the so-called "Golden Age" here, under prime minister Gajah Mada and king Hayam Wuruk of the Majapahit kingdom.'
p7262
aS'The kingdom of Mataram was the last independent one in this place, whose history was written by the man who gained fame for founding Singapore, Stamford Raffles.'
p7263
aS'Early on, it saw the construction of the Prambanan complex by king Daksa as well as Borobodur, while the city of Batavia was later founded by the Dutch East India Company.'
p7264
aS'FTP, name this Indonesian island with a center at Jakarta.'
p7265
aS'Alexander_Hamilton supported it in his "Camillus" papers, and it was eventually agreed to after Article XII, which related to trade in the West Indies, was suspended.'
p7266
aS'It agreed to refer pre-war debts to a joint commission, which eventually determined that the U.S. owed $2,664,000, and gave the U.S. most-favored-nation trading status.'
p7267
aS'FTP, identify this treaty, which was signed on November 19, 1794, by the Chief Justice who had been named special ambassador to Great Britain.'
p7268
aS'Only Jacob Read supported both this document and the nomination to Chief Justice of one of its most outspoken proponents, John Rutledge.'
p7269
aS'It was supported under the pseudonym of Camillus by Alexander_Hamilton, while Fisher Ames gave a speech in favor of it as a Congressman from Massachusetts.'
p7270
aS'Granting free passage between the US and Canada to all those half Native American or more, it set the Saint Croix river as the northeastern boundary of the United_States.'
p7271
aS'Enraging the nascent Republican party, this is, for 10 points, which agreement between the United_States and Great Britain, settling conflicts that had arisen after the Treaty of Paris, which takes its most common name from its major negotiator, the first chief justice of the Supreme Court '
p7272
aS'The New York Minerva, a Federalist paper, published Jefferson\'s politically damaging "Mazzei Letter," which was written in response to this; while it also prompted attacks from Benjamin_Franklin Bache in his Republican Philadelphia Aurora against Washington.'
p7273
aS'The Directory interpreted it as an alliance against France, but it resulted in but one gain, namely the British evacuation of forts in the northwest.'
p7274
aS'Moreover, it failed to address such concerns as impressment and the opening of British ports to American trade.'
p7275
aS'FTP, name this agreement which avoided war with Britain in 1795 and which was named for its chief U.S. negotiator, the then Chief Justice of the Supreme Court.'
p7276
aS'Its namesake later commented that he could have traveled the length of the country by the light of bonfires burning his effigy.'
p7277
aS'It called for arbitration committees to set damages for the blockade of the West Indies, established the rule of 1756, and prohibited the use of American ports to supply pirates.'
p7278
aS'Britain also agreed to remove remaining forts in American territory and recognize free navigation on the Mississippi.'
p7279
aS'For 10 points, issues remaining from the Treaty of Paris were clarified in what 1794 treaty, negotiated for the U.S. by the least prolific author of the Federalist Papers and first chief justice of the Supreme Court'
p7280
aS'He was practically unknown until the age of forty, when, in 1722, he published his Treatise on Harmony.'
p7281
aS'This made him known as a philosopher, but his patron La Popelinire (poh-plan-ee-AIR) helped him succeed as a popular opera composer, with the production in the 1730s of such works as Hippolyte et Aricie (ee-poh-LEET ay ah-ree-SEE), Dardanus, Les Indes gallantes (lay zand gah-LANT), and his masterpiece Castor et Pollux.'
p7282
aS"FTP, name 18th-century France's foremost musician, whose nephew appears in a 1762 dialogue by Denis Diderot (dee-duh-ROH)."
p7283
aS'As an attorney, this man defended William Brass from rape charges, and later served in a cabinet post under William Henry Draper.'
p7284
aS"His first term in his most famous office saw the assassination of Thomas D'arcy McGee, while he would later return to that office with a protectionist economic program called the National Policy."
p7285
aS'This politician, who refused to pardon Louis_Riel, also formed a coalition government with George Brown, a leader of the rival Clear Grits faction, while later the Pacific Railway scandal forced this man to resign as prime minister.'
p7286
aS"Succeeded in office by Alexander Mackenzie, this is, FTP, which politician who acquired Rupert's Land and the North-Western Territory as the first prime minister of Canada  "
p7287
aS'His time in office saw the promotion of a protectionist policy that was known as the "National Plan," it also saw corruption, as the Pacific Railroad scandal broke in 1873, forcing him to resign for five years.'
p7288
aS'As a lawyer early in his career, he had earned the esteem of many for his defense of American raiders in the Rebellions of 1837.'
p7289
aS"Elected alderman of the city of Kingston, the following year he and political allies like Etienne Cartier and George Brown accepted the Conservative party's nomination for a seat on the Legislative Assembly."
p7290
aS'Finally in 1857 he gained the highest office in the land.'
p7291
aS'For ten points, name this politician who, following the Act of Dominion, became the first Prime Minister of Canada.'
p7292
aS'His first administration saw the addition of three provinces and the planning of a railway spanning the entire country, which would be constructed and completed during his later terms.'
p7293
aS'Three years before he ascended to his most prominent position, in an effort to break the perpetual deadlock of the provincial government, he and George Cartier joined forces with George (*) Brown of the Liberal party to form the Grand Coalition.'
p7294
aS'At the 1864 Charlottetown Conference, he advocated unification of the Province of Canada with the three maritime provinces, leading to the foundation of the Dominion of Canada.'
p7295
aS'Serving from 1867-1873 and again from 1878 until his death, for 10 points, name this first Prime Minister of Canada.'
p7296
aS'In one office, this man used public money to fund the defense of John Anderson, an escaped slave fighting extradition to Missouri.'
p7297
aS'This ally of Allan MacNab was accused by Lucius Seth Huntington of improper dealings with Hugh Allen.'
p7298
aS'This proponent of the National Policy first gained fame as an attorney by defending Nils von Schoultz and Hunter Patriots captured at the Battle of the Windmill, and he later drafted the Seventy Two Resolutions.'
p7299
aS'He was forced to resign in the Pacific Scandal, but not before he effected the British North America Act.'
p7300
aS'For ten points, name this Scottish-born Conservative, the first Prime Minister of Canada.'
p7301
aS'This man authored a novel about the fictional professor Montgomery Marvin in his The Tenured Professor, while he lamented that the public did not decide what products were made in a work about innocence fraud.'
p7302
aS'He recalls working for Adlai E. Stevenson in Name-Dropping: From FDR On, and he claims that poor corporate infrastructure and foreign trade imbalances helped cause the Great Depression in The Great Crash, 1929.'
p7303
aS'American Capitalism is the part of a series whose other works describe the state of the country as controlled by the largest companies and coined the phrase "conventional wisdom" in describing income imbalances in the United_States.'
p7304
aS'FTP, name this Canadian-American economist who authored The New Industrial State and The Affluent Society.'
p7305
aS'Late in his reign, this emperor constructed a secret central police force headed by Count Pergen, who also designed the education system under him.'
p7306
aS'Around the same time, in a very sickly condition, this emperor commanded an army that famously confused the word Halt!'
p7307
aS'for Allah!'
p7308
aS'on the eve of battle, resulting in his infantry attacking his cavalry, firing shots in a drunken stupor.'
p7309
aS'His first wife Isabella of Parma died of smallpox long before that blunder in the Battle of Karansebes.'
p7310
aS'His quarrels with Pope Pius VI originated when he attempted to dissolve all contemplative monasteries in his kingdom, though hes better known for issuing the Patent of Religious Toleration and edicts on freedom of the press.'
p7311
aS'For 10 points, name this emperor who also abolished serfdom after succeeding Maria_Theresa as Holy Roman Emperor.'
p7312
aS"This ruler put down a peasant revolt known as Horea's Rebellion."
p7313
aS"This man's aggressive foreign policy led to the formation of the Furstenbund, or League of Princes, which sought to prevent this man from annexing Bavaria."
p7314
aS"This man's war against the Turks resulted in the disastrous Battle of Karansebes, in which parts of his army attacked (*) each other resulting in self-inflicted defeat."
p7315
aS"This man's domestic policy included standardizing German as the official language, taxing aristocrats, secularizing church land, and abolishing serfdom, though many of his laws did not survive his ten year reign, which began in 1780."
p7316
aS'For ten points, name this son and successor of Maria_Theresa, a Holy Roman Emperor noted for his Enlightened Absolutism.'
p7317
aS'monarch attempted to abolish a Barrier Treaty that restricted the shipping privileges of his Flemish subjects.'
p7318
aS'Using the alias of Count Falkenstein, he visited Marie Antoinette, where he predicted the situation in France to be tumultuous.'
p7319
aS'He provoked the formation of the Furstenbund when he attempted to gain control of Bavaria, while his clerical reforms invoked the wrath of Pius VI.'
p7320
aS'Because of his unsuccessful marriages to Isabella of Parma and Maria Josepha of Bavaria, he was succeeded by his brother Leopold II after his death.'
p7321
aS'During his last year, sickness caused much of his power to be in the hands of Kaunitz.'
p7322
aS'His alliance with Russia against the Ottomans culminated in a humiliating retreat at the Battle of Karansebes.'
p7323
aS'For 10 points, name this man known for his abolition of serfdom, an enlightened ruler and son of Maria_Theresa.'
p7324
aS'This ruler sought to gain territory via a secret agreement with Charles Theodore, and this ruler also abolished the death penalty.'
p7325
aS"This ruler's finance minister Karl von Zinzendorf attempted to implement policies with physiocratic tendencies."
p7326
aS"This ruler sent generals Lacy and Laudon on a series of tactical maneuvers in one conflict that saw little actual fighting, the War of Bavarian Succession, and, in response to the peasants' revolt of Horea, abolished serfdom."
p7327
aS'This ruler issued the Patent of Tolerance and argued with Pius VI over the dissolution of monasteries.'
p7328
aS'For 10 points, identify this Hapsburg monarch succeeded by Leopold, an enlightened despot who rose to power following the death of his co-ruler Maria Teresa.'
p7329
aS'He stepped down as president of his country in 1985, but continued as head of the ruling party until 1990.'
p7330
aS'His government emphasized a form of rural socialism known as ujamaa, and, in 1978, troops under his leadership entered Uganda, deposing Idi_Amin.'
p7331
aS'After his retirement he remained active in African politics, and was known throughout the continent as Mwalimu, Swahili for teacher.'
p7332
aS'FTP, identify this first president of Tanzania, who died in October, 1999.'
p7333
aS'He handpicked his two successors, Ali Hassan Mwinyi and Benjamin Mkapa, and remained chairman of his political party, the Chama Cha Mapinduzi, for five years after his formal retirement.'
p7334
aS'Originally a teacher, he turned to politics exclusively after being told by the colonial authorities that he could do one or the other.'
p7335
aS'A pan-Africanist, he provided homes to Mozambiques FRELIMO and South_Africas ANC.'
p7336
aS'His stay at Edinburgh University and exposure to Fabian ideas may have influenced the program announced in the Arusha declaration setting forth his program of ujamaa socialism.'
p7337
aS'FTP, name this leader who unified Zanzibar with Tanganyika to form Tanzania.'
p7338
aS'Dogen and Eisi established differing schools of Buddhism during this period of time.'
p7339
aS'The Shikken received power in this period, and regional governments were established at Tokuso and Rensho.'
p7340
aS'Hojo Yoshitogi and Go-Toba clashed in a civil war called the Jokyu War, and problems occurred during this period with a Mongol invasion of Japan, although the Japanese were successful in repulsing it.'
p7341
aS'This period of time ended when Ashikaga turned on the ruling family and assisted Go-Dai-Go in his attempt to break his exile and reclaim the throne of the Southern Court.'
p7342
aS'For ten points, identify this period of Japanese history which was begun by Minamoto Yoritomo, which preceded the Kemmu Restoration and the Ashikaga Period and succeeded the Heian.'
p7343
aS'The ruling family during this period had a family crest of three fish scales in a Triforce-like formation and set up a secret police known as the Rokuhara Tandai.'
p7344
aS'The Joei code was promulgated during its reign.'
p7345
aS'Before a major battle one leader of this polity meditated to find the source of cowardice in himself, and one conflict during it occurred when the cloistered emperor Go-Toba attempted to take the throne.'
p7346
aS'Besides the Jokyu disturbance, this polity saw the rise of Nichiren buddhism and an invasion that was supposedly repelled by the kamikaze winds.'
p7347
aS'Started in the wake of a massive conflict between the Taira and Minamoto and ruled by the Hojo clan, for 10 points, name this polity that began afer the Genpei War, the first shogunate of Japan.'
p7348
aS'Historian Frank Hodder argued that this legislation was heavily influenced by railroad statesmen.'
p7349
aS'It was attacked for overriding the Northwest Ordinance in a speech given in Peoria, Illinois.'
p7350
aS'The Free Soil party allied with the northern Democrats to form the GOP after this legislation was enacted, which effectively repealed the Missouri Compromise and the Compromise_of_1850.'
p7351
aS'For 10 points, identify this legislation that allowed its namesake states to decide whether or not to allow slavery within their borders.'
p7352
aS'Frank Hodder proposed that the man who initiated this legislation was motivated by the prospect of organizing support for a transcontinental railroad that began in his home state.'
p7353
aS'This legislation was opposed by Theodore Parker in a speech in which he cautioned that "Spain.'
p7354
aS'.'
aS'.'
aS'stands there a perpetual warning for all of us," while Charles Sumner\'s notable "landmark" speech was delivered in opposition to this act.'
p7355
aS'Josiah Miller and R. G. Elliott organized the Sandbank Convention as a consequence of the passage of this act, which also stimulated the activity of the Emigrant Aid Company.'
p7356
aS'Among the fallouts from this bill were repeated conflicts with "border ruffians" who sought to influence decisions in the territories addressed by this bill, as well as multiple candidate constitutions, including a pro-slavery one drawn up on Lecompton, in one territory.'
p7357
aS'Introduced by Stephen Douglas, for ten points, identify this 1854 act which repealed the Missouri Compromise and established the principle of popular sovereignty in its namesake western states.'
p7358
aS'The pamphlet "The Appeal of the Independent Democrats in Congress to the People of the United_States," signed by Salmon P. Chase and Charles Sumner, among others, was published in opposition of this legislation.'
p7359
aS'That document laid the groundwork for a meeting a month later in Ripon, Wisconsin, at which a new party formed in response to this bill, a revised version of which split the proposed territory at the 37th parallel, putting its southern part inside limits open to slavery according to the Missouri Compromise.'
p7360
aS'Much responsible for the creation of the Republican Party, FTP name this 1854 act of Congress creating two new territories, both of which are now states.'
p7361
aS'This conflict included an action called Pierces Fight, which was followed by some torturing at a site that became known as Nine Mens Misery.'
p7362
aS'Benjamin Church led successful raids during this conflict, which was partially sparked by the policies of Governor Josiah Winslow.'
p7363
aS'Fighting during this conflict occurred at Hadley as well as at Turners Falls on the Connecticut River, and one leader during it was Canonchet.'
p7364
aS'A turning point in this conflict occurred with the Great Swamp Fight, after which the Narragansett were forced to withdraw.'
p7365
aS'This conflict occurred after the death of Massasoit, and it featured an uprising of the Wampanoag under Metacomet.'
p7366
aS'For 10 points, name this 1675 Native American uprising that takes its name from Metacomets popular title among the colonists.'
p7367
aS'This war ended when one side had to return to its traditional homeland to plant crops for the upcoming summer.'
p7368
aS'This war saw the infamous Fort Fire incident in which many Narragansett men, women and children died trapped in a burning fort.'
p7369
aS'After that incident the war shifted towards the Northwest, closer to settlements such as Natick and Deerfield.'
p7370
aS'Mary Rowlandson was captured in her town of Lacanster, leading to her to write a narrative of her time with the Wampanoags.'
p7371
aS'FTP name this 1675-1676 war fought between Native Americans and New England colonists, named for an Indian chief named after a Macedonian king.'
p7372
aS'In one incident in this conflict, a group of men led by Michael Pierce were ambushed, an event that became known as "Nine Men\'s Misery.'
p7373
aS'" Early battles were fought at Mendon and Middleborough, and an attack at Hadley gave rise to a legend about the "Angel of Hadley.'
p7374
aS'" Forces led by Josiah Winslow led one side to a key victory in the Great Swamp Fight.'
p7375
aS"The key event that started the conflict was the murder of the Christian convert John Sassomon, and forces led by Benjamin Church captured the other side's leader who had succeeded his brother Wamsutta."
p7376
aS'FTP, name this war between colonists and the Wampanoag Indians, a 1675-1676 conflict named after a Native American also known as Metacomet.'
p7377
aS'This battle was precipitated by the threat to destroy settlements in eastern Tennessee and western North_Carolina unless the population submitted to royal authority.'
p7378
aS'The settlers decided not to wait for Major Ferguson to bring the war to them and sent a force of frontiersmen to look for him.'
p7379
aS'They found him and 900 Loyalists at this site encamped on a plateau that seemed to provide an excellent defensive position.'
p7380
aS'But the slopes leading up to the plateau were strewn with trees and boulders that provided the colonials with effective cover when they began their attack during the afternoon.'
p7381
aS'FTP identify this Revolutionary War battle fought on Oct. 7, 1780, in north-central South Carolina, which helped turn the tide of the war in the South.'
p7382
aS"The losing side's approach to this battle was hampered by the skirmish at Musgrove's Mills."
p7383
aS'Following a trip to Camden to confer with his superior, one commander issued a proclamation at Gilbert Town, threatening his opponents that he would "hang their leaders and lay their country waste with fire and sword.'
p7384
aS'" Rather than intimidating them, this statement induced the men of Wilkes and Surry counties to raise a volunteer force led by Isaac Shelby and John Sevier.'
p7385
aS'Shouting cries of "Tarleton\'s Quarter" the colonials stormed up the slope and inflicted some three hundred casualties, including the inventor of a new rifle, British Major Patrick Ferguson.'
p7386
aS'FTP, name this victory for the "over mountain men" over a force of British loyalists, fought on October 7th, 1780.'
p7387
aS'An eyewitness account of this battle was written by militiaman Benjamin Sharp.'
p7388
aS'The losing commander sent a message to the opposition saying that he would hang their leaders, and lay their country waste with fire and sword.'
p7389
aS'That message was received by Isaac Shelby and he began a march which was joined by the 350 men of Joseph Winston and Benjamin Cleveland; they decided to place William Campbell in command until a superior officer arrived on their way to Gilbert Town.'
p7390
aS'The disorderly nature of their command order has led this contest to be known as the Battle of the Colonels, as it witnessed a ragtag band of Appalachian men dominate loyalist forces under Patrick Ferguson.'
p7391
aS'FTP, name this 1780 battle named for a peak near the North_Carolina-South Carolina border.'
p7392
aS'Nine of the prisoners from this battle were hanged by an illegitimate court martial that was subsequently disbanded by Isaac Shelby.'
p7393
aS'Those hangings and near-starvation conditions on a march to Camp Salem motivated the escape of almost all of the prisoners.'
p7394
aS'One force at this clash had recently been victorious at Musgrove Mill, having formed to avenge the Waxhaws Massacre.'
p7395
aS'That group under William Campbell joined groups under Benjamin Cleveland, John Sevier and five other colonels to comprise the winning side at this battle, which surrounded an opposing militia from lower ground on three sides.'
p7396
aS'For 10 points, name this battle of the American Revolution in which a Loyalist militia under Major Patrick Ferguson was annihilated on a North_Carolina hill.'
p7397
aS"In one novel, this man's daughter is taught Bible stories and is horrified by the notion of beauty being a sin."
p7398
aS'This spurious father of Golden Bells appears in another work, where he is told of the infinite ways in which wood can be made into a chessboard after hearing of communication with strings in Ersilia, the size-changing Olinda, and Thekla, which is always being built.'
p7399
aS'In a poem, this man orders the building of a "miracle of rare device" near a place "where Alph, the sacred river ran.'
p7400
aS'" For 10 points, name this ruler who appears in Italo Calvino\'s Invisible Cities, in a namesake opium-induced Samuel Taylor Coleridge poem, and in Donn Byrne\'s novel Messer Marco Polo.'
p7401
aS'His first political efforts involved him working with George Padmore to organize a 1945 meeting in Manchester.'
p7402
aS'This man was part of a group with J.'
p7403
aS'B. Danquah, although Danquah would later end up running against him in elections and being thrown in prison by him for dissent.'
p7404
aS"This man formed the Convention People's Party in 1949, after splitting from Danquah's United Gold Coast Convention, although his actions in making it the sole party in his home country would lead to his downfall."
p7405
aS'After dubbing himself "the Redeemer", he was overthrown in a military coup while on a state visit to China in 1966.'
p7406
aS'For 10 points, who was this man, co-organizer of the Fifth Pan-African Congress and the first president of Ghana'
p7407
aS"Isolation from the surrounding region occurred during the Yoldia Sea brackish stage and this body of water's initial formation occurred during the Younger Dryas stadial at the end of the Weichsel glaciation."
p7408
aS'A song title by the Dutch death-metal band Hail of Bullets suggests a massacre occurred at this place.'
p7409
aS'According to the provisions set out by the Treaty of Tartu neither party could have warships above a certain tonnage on this body of water, and a common grave between the two signatories lies in Rahmaa Island located here.'
p7410
aS'The (*) Road of Life was a supply transport across this body of water and provided relief during the Siege of Leningrad, and major tributaries of this body of water include the Volkhov and Svir Rivers and its primary outflow is the Neva.'
p7411
aS'Located east of the Karelian Isthmus in Northwestern Russia, for 10 points, name this largest freshwater lake in Europe.'
p7412
aS'This politician ran for office on his Sixty Days of Decision promise.'
p7413
aS'His criticism of American foreign policy caused the American president to tell him you pissed on my rug.'
p7414
aS'This man signed the Auto-Pact with the United_States and unified the Air Force, Army, and Navy into the Canadian Armed Forces.'
p7415
aS'This man led his party in defeating John Diefenbakers Progressive Conservatives and as Prime Minister.'
p7416
aS'He won the Great Flag Debate and introduced universal health care.'
p7417
aS'While serving in the cabinet of St. Laurent, this man helped mediate the Suez crisis, for which he won the 1957 Nobel Peace Prize.'
p7418
aS'For 10 points, name this Liberal Prime Minister of Canada from 1963 to 1968 who also introduced the Maple Leaf flag.'
p7419
aS'He campaigned on the one hundred days of decision plan, which was derailed by his weak finance minister, Walter Gordon.'
p7420
aS'George Grants Lament for a Nation attacked this mans administration for allowing the testing of foreign cruise missiles, after his opposition to nuclear weapons helped him win election over John Diefenbaker.'
p7421
aS'Earlier, in the cabinet of Louis Saint Laurent, this mans role in mediating the Suez_Crisis won him a Nobel Peace Prize.'
p7422
aS'For 10 points, name this Liberal Party member who oversaw the adoption of an official flag and national anthem as prime minister of Canada from 1963 to 1968.'
p7423
aS"This former Public Archives researcher's first government post was as first secretary in the Department of External Affairs, and he drew heat for a high-tariff budget planned by his finance minster, Walter Gordon."
p7424
aS'He was the senior adviser for his country at the Dumbarton Oaks and San_Francisco Conferences, and his government saw the creation of a new national flag.'
p7425
aS"His role in resolving the Suez_Crisis as Foreign Minister propeled him into fame and helped him succeed John Diefenbaker as his nation's leader."
p7426
aS'For 10 points, name this man who served as Prime Minister of Canada from 1963 to 1968 and was succeeded by Pierre Trudeau.'
p7427
aS'With Duncan McArthur, this politician negotiated the transfer of the Ohio Valley to the American government by way of the Treaty of Fort Meigs.'
p7428
aS'He outlined his support for the annexation of Texas in the Hannegan Letter, and was succeeded in one of his most famous posts by Thomas Fitzgerald.'
p7429
aS'He wrote a pamphlet attacking European search and seizure of slaves during his time as minister of France.'
p7430
aS'He ran for president with William Orlando Butler and later succeeded William Marcy as secretary of state for James Buchanan in 1860.'
p7431
aS'He organized the Black Hawk War and the Seminole Wars as Secretary of War from 1831 to 1836 for Jackson.'
p7432
aS'FTP, name this longtime Michigan senator and staunch supporter of Popular Sovereignty.'
p7433
aS'This man resigned from his position where he directed the operations of the Black Hawk wars in order to become "Envoy Extraordinaire and Minister Plenipotentiary to France.'
p7434
aS'" In 1849, he was elected to fill his own vacancy in the senate, and he resigned as ambassador to France in the wake of the Webster-Ashburton treaty, after writing the pamphlet "An Examination of the Questions now in Discussion between the American and British Government Concerning the Right of Search" in response to the Quintuple treaty negotiations between Austria, Russia, France, Britain, and Prussia to suppress the slave trade.'
p7435
aS'This man lost support in his bid for the presidency due to the defection of the barnburners, and he claimed in the "Nicholson letter" that states should decide for themselves whether to allow slavery.'
p7436
aS'An opponent of the Wilmot_Proviso, for 10 points, name this senator from Michigan who was an early proponent of Popular Sovereignty.'
p7437
aS'According to the chronicler, Hocsem of Liege, they originated in Germany in the late 13th century.'
p7438
aS'Their name is either a reference to a method of singing or is derived from the Latin for "tare", and it appears in such contemporary dramas as The Plowman\'s Tale and Pierce, the Plowman\'s Crede.'
p7439
aS'The title was most famously ascribed by the Oxford professor Henry Crumpe, who applied it to Nicolas Hereford and several knights associated with John of Gaunt; while John Oldcastle was probably the most famous adherent at a later date.'
p7440
aS'FTP, name this itinerant, anti-clerical European religious movement, today generally associated with the followers of John Wycliffe.'
p7441
aS'This group followed the ideas collected in the Twelve Conclusions, and the first man to suffer martyrdom for membership in this group was William Sawtrey.'
p7442
aS'This group was persecuted by William Courtenay and Thomas Arundel and commissioned John Purvey and Nicholas of Hereford to translate the Bible.'
p7443
aS'They launched a short-lived open rebellion after William Fisher helped organize them at St. Giles Fields, which would have been led by a man who inspired the depiction of Falstaff, John Oldcastle.'
p7444
aS'Opponents of transubstantiation doctrine and Papal supremacy, their name comes from a Dutch word which refers to those who cover their true theological beliefs by mumbling.'
p7445
aS'For 10 points, name this group of people who anticipated Protestantism around 1400 in England, inspired by the ideas of John Wycliffe.'
p7446
aS'Because of his part in the execution of Thomas Scott he was prevented from taking his seat in the House of Commons and eventually forced into exile.'
p7447
aS'On his return to the country, he was put on trial following the fall of Batoche, and a jury entirely consisting of English-speaking Protestants found him guilty of treason.'
p7448
aS'Born in the Red River settlement, he headed the provisional government that negotiated the Manitoba Act.'
p7449
aS'FTP, name this leader of the Mtis who was in charge during the 1885 rebellion against the Canadian government.'
p7450
aS'This man established a council called the Exovedate and called for the surrender of officer LNF Crozier.'
p7451
aS'Found guilty and sentenced to death by Judge Hugh Richardson, this man spent time in Montana before being summoned by Honore Jackson and allying with Big Bear.'
p7452
aS"This man's military general Gabriel Dumont was victorious at the Battle of Duck Lake, and he was forced into capture following defeat at the Battle of Batoche."
p7453
aS"Earlier, this man defeated a group led by John Christian Schultz, John Stoughton Dennis, and Charles Mair prior to seizing Fort Garry, and outrage over this man's murder of Thomas Scott caused him to flee from the expedition of Garnet Wolseley."
p7454
aS'Responsible for the issuance of the Manitoba Act, FTP, identify this leader of the North-West Rebellion and the Red River Rebellion, a leader of the Metis who was executed by the Canadian government in 1885.'
p7455
aS'Sources on this event include a journal by Joseph Hargrave and Alexander Begg, as well as the "Eight Letters" to the "Honorable Joseph Howe in Reply to an Official Pamphlet," in which Howe is accused of being its chief instigator.'
p7456
aS'A nationalist group led by the doctor John Christian Schultz created the impetus for this event, despite the attempts of Adams Archibald to put forth a conciliatory plan.'
p7457
aS"One of that group's members, Thomas Scott, was executed on trumped-up treason charges and violence continued until a supposed peace expedition under Garnet Wolseley was dispatched to Fort Garry."
p7458
aS"Also sparked by appointment of William McDougall as governor of Rupert's Land, its leader would reprise his role fifteen years later in the Northwest Rebellion."
p7459
aS'For 10 points, name this rebellion led by Louis_Riel and named for a region in Manitoba.'
p7460
aS'On one occasion this ruler pardoned a murderer in return for the murderer participating as a guinea pig in an operation to remove gallbladder stones.'
p7461
aS"This ruler, upon hearing of his father's severe illness, raced to Rheims to have himself crowned king first instead of his brother and nemesis Charles the Duke of Berry."
p7462
aS"His loveless marriage at the age of 13 to Margaret, daughter of James I of Scotland, did not help relations with this man's father, with deteriorated to the point that he participated in the Praguerie Rebellion against his father, only to see it fail and be exiled to the province of Dauphine."
p7463
aS'He intervened in the War of the Roses by pressuring the Earl of Warwick to oppose Edward IV, only for the plan to backfire and Edward to invade France, while this monarch bribed Edward off with the Treaty of Picquigny.'
p7464
aS'Known for his political machinations and complicated webs of alliances, this is FTP what ruler, son of Charles VII and King of France from 1461 to 1483 with an arachnid-sounding nickname.  '
p7465
aS'He fought against the Swiss at the Birse, and stayed at the castle of Genappe during his time as a refugee in Burgundy.'
p7466
aS'At the age of 27, he married his second wife, Charlotte of Savoy, when she was eight.'
p7467
aS'His eldest daughter was Anne of Beaujeu, who later served as regent for his only surviving son.'
p7468
aS'His brother Charles, Duke of Berry, was a constant thorn in his side, and he worked to curtail the powers of the nobility, going so far as to execute the Duke of Nemours.'
p7469
aS'Interested in what passed for science, he surrounded himself with astrologers and once pardoned a man who agreed to be a guinea pig for a gallstone operation.'
p7470
aS'A determined opponent of Charles the Bold and son of Charles VII, FTP, name this 15th-century king of France, known as the Universal Spider.'
p7471
aS"This man was in constant revolt against his father, having joined the Praguerie and conspired against his father's mistress Agnes Sorel."
p7472
aS"His own closest advisors included his former barber, Olivier Le Daim, Cardinal Balue and Tristan L'Hermite."
p7473
aS'He had no shortage of enemies even in his own country, as the comte de Dunois, the duke of Alencon, and Francis II, duke of Brittany, were at constant war with him and even pooled their resources with his greatest rival in a group called the League of the Public Weal.'
p7474
aS'Abroad, he tolerated the presence of the exiled Henry VI and allied with him against Edward IV in the Wars_of_the_Roses.'
p7475
aS'FTP, name this son of Charles VII, the king of France from 1461 to 1483, whose frequent machinations earned him the nickname The Spider'
p7476
aS'In 1443, he forced the English to lift their siege of Dieppe, and one of his first acts as king was to imprison the ministers Pierre de Breze and Antoine de Chabannes.'
p7477
aS'He was installed as ruler of the Dauphine after he was pardoned by his father for his part in the Praguerie, but after being summoned by his father in 1456, he fled to the court of Phillip the Good in the Netherlands.'
p7478
aS'During his reign, he fought a group of malcontents known as the League of the Public Weal, and he had a long feud with Charles the Bold.'
p7479
aS'The was the son of Charles VII by Mary of Anjou, and reigning from 1461 through 1483, FTP, identify this Spider King of France.'
p7480
aS'An inscription on the James Farley post office in Manhattan credits this king with creating the French royal post office.'
p7481
aS'As a prince, this man attempted to overthrow his father in a revolt called the "Praguerie".'
p7482
aS'As king, this man negotiated the Treaty of Picquigny, by which the last English forces from the Hundred Years War left France.'
p7483
aS'This king was opposed by the (*) League of the Public Weal.'
p7484
aS"This king's greatest rival died at the Battle of Nancy; that rival was the Duke of Burgundy, Charles the Bold."
p7485
aS'For ten points, name this French monarch whose shrewd diplomacy earned him the nickname "Spider King.'
p7486
aS'"'
aS'man renamed Arras Franchise to promote the wool industry, but failed, though he had earlier succeeded in starting the Lyons silk industry.'
p7487
aS'Ruling from the Loire valley, especially Tours, he was once held captive at Peronne by his worst enemy and forced to repent for supposedly sponsoring an insurrection at Liege.'
p7488
aS'This man signed the Treaty of Conflans to end the Siege of Paris.'
p7489
aS'This man lost at the Battle of Montlhery despite his enemy routing because Charles, Count of Maine was a coward.'
p7490
aS'This great friend of Francisco Sforza and the Chronicler Philip Commynes and enemy of Francis II of Brittany destroyed the feudal aristocracy.'
p7491
aS'He preferred peace over war as seen by the Treaty of Picquiney, paying off the English under Edward IV.'
p7492
aS"He fought against the League of the Public Weal, and had earlier fled to Philip the Good's court from his father Charles VII."
p7493
aS"But Philip's son, who died at Nancy, proved to be his most persistent foe."
p7494
aS'For 10 points, name this enemy of Charles the Bold, a French king known for his plotting.'
p7495
aS'This ruler retreated among his own troops after an attack by Marcus Valerius in a battle where he shared command with Octavius Mamilius and engaged Aulus Postumius Albus early on.'
p7496
aS"He then married his son off to Mamilius's daughter, which occurred after this ruler erected a temple of Jupiter on the Capitoline and levelled the Tarpeian Rock."
p7497
aS'In one episode, his son Sextus conquered the city of Gabii after witnessing this man cutting off poppy heads in his garden, and this victor of the Battle of Lake Regillus ordered the construction of the Cloaca Maxima bought the remaining three of nine Sibylline books.'
p7498
aS"This ruler's siege of Ardea, the capital of the Rutuli, was complicated by his son's rape of the daughter of Junius Brutus, Lucrteia, which occurred before he failed to come back to power despite Lars Porsenna's backing."
p7499
aS'For 10 points, name this seventh Etruscan king of Rome.'
p7500
aS'When this man tricked everyone into thinking he wanted to kill his family, his son was able to pretend to defect to the neighboring town of Gabii, leading to its annexation.'
p7501
aS'Ill omens stopped this man from closing a temple to the god Terminus, but he closed many other temples to build his major construction project, paid for by the capture of Suessa Pometia from the Volscians.'
p7502
aS'This man allied with Octavius Mamilius of Tusculum and later with Lars Porsenna of Clusium, and his accomplishments include clearing Capitoline Hill to build the Temple of Jupiter.'
p7503
aS'Two of his sons were sent to visit an oracle, after which their servant touched the ground with his lips to fulfill a prophecy about kissing your mother.'
p7504
aS'For ten points, name this King of Rome overthrown by Lucius Junius Brutus after his son raped Lucretia.'
p7505
aS'He is said to have purchased three prophetic books from the Cumaean Sibyl and to have deposited them in the temple of Jupiter begun by his father.'
p7506
aS"His nephew Lucius Junius Brutus and his friend Lucius Tarquinius Collatinus led a revolt against him after his son, Sextus, supposedly raped Collatinus' wife Lucretia."
p7507
aS'The son of Tarquinius Priscus and the son-in-law of Servius Tullius, FTP, identify this man overthrown in 509 BCE, the seventh and last king of Rome.'
p7508
aS'These people were defeated at the battle of Third Battle of Homs, after winning the first two battles of that same name.'
p7509
aS'Tamerlane became hostile to Barkuk, the founder of one branch of this dynasty.'
p7510
aS'Tuman Bey, the last sultan of this dynasty, suffered a stunning defeat at the battle of Ridyana.'
p7511
aS'Earlier, they ended the expansion at the Ilkhanate when Kitquba was defeated at the Battle of Ayn Jalut by Baybars.'
p7512
aS'In 1811, Muhammad Ali invited a few hundred of them to his court for a celebration but ambushed and slaughtered them on the way to his palace.'
p7513
aS'They overthrew their Ayuubid masters after Aybak was killed and Qutuz took power, establishing the Bahri dynasty.'
p7514
aS'For ten points, name this military caste of Islamic slaves who ruled Egypt from 1250 to 1517.'
p7515
aS'One of these succeeded Turanshah after their successful military action forced the French to leave and netted them a substantial ransom.'
p7516
aS'Aybak, however, was soon killed and succeeded by another of his kind, who defied Hulagu Khan and defeated the Mongol army at Ain Jalut.'
p7517
aS'Another razed Antioch and fought Edward I of England.'
p7518
aS'The average lifespan of such rulers was about seven years, and in India, they formed the first dynasty of the Delhi Sultanate.'
p7519
aS'From 1747 to 1831, they ruled Iraq, though in the country they would be mainly associated with, all were killed or dispersed in 1811 by Muhammed Ali.'
p7520
aS'Some of them served as foreigners in Napoleons Guard, still carrying their scimitars and riding their horses.'
p7521
aS'That service harked back to their very beginning, when they were prized for having no link to any established power structure.'
p7522
aS'FTP, name these Islamic slave soldiers who originally came from the Caucasus.'
p7523
aS'One of their rulers, Koshkadam, got into a dispute with their northern neighbor over the succession to the throne of Karaman, resulting in an invasion which Kait Bey had to repel in order to save the Burji dynasty, while their earlier Bahri dynasty had been victorious at the Battle of Homs against their eastern neighbor.'
p7524
aS'Another ruler, Kansuh, was defeated at the climactic battle of al-Riddaneah, where their power was broken forever.'
p7525
aS'They first came to power under Qutuz, but he was displaced by the man who had defeated the Seventh Crusade and won the Battle of Ayn Jault against Hulagu Khan, Sultan Baybars.'
p7526
aS'For ten points, name this group of Turkish slaves who became rulers of Egypt.'
p7527
aS'The opinion of Elkins v. U.S. is quoted in its majority opinion, which also noted that the standard set in Weeks v. U.S. did not hinder the activities of the FBI not deterred the administration of criminal justice.'
p7528
aS"Justice Harlan's dissent saw no reason for the Court to rule any differently than it did in Wolf v. Colorado."
p7529
aS'Miller v. California also played a role as "obscene" material had been forcefully seized from a Cleveland apartment, forming the basis of, for 10 points, what Supreme Court case, which saw the establishment of the exclusionary rule to state law enforcement'
p7530
aS'One concurring justice in this case draws on Rochin v. United_States and his previous dissent in Adamson v. California, while the majority opinion often cites the cases of Boyd v. United_States and Weeks v. United_States as historical precedents on the central constitutional issue.'
p7531
aS'Dissenters included Justices Whittaker and Frankfurter who joined with Harlan in lambasting the court for forgetting its sense of judicial restraint in overruling Wolf v. Colorado.'
p7532
aS'The wake of this decision produced a doctrine known as the "fruit of the poisonous tree.'
p7533
aS'" FTP, name this 1961 Supreme Court decision in which seizure of lascivious material in a Cleveland woman\'s apartment was deemed unconstitutional.'
p7534
aS'majority opinion in this case notes that California\'s continual invocation of worthless remedies is "buttressed by the experience of other States.'
p7535
aS'" The dissent alludes to "untoward practical ramifications" that would be had regarding the in forma pauperis cases that relied on the legal procedure invalidated by this case.'
p7536
aS'The dissent also mentions that an inability to recognize the weight carried by stare decisis made it seem like the Court "reached out" to overturn (*) Wolf v. Colorado.'
p7537
aS'This case saw Justice Clark note that "Nothing can destroy a government more quickly than its failure to observe its own laws.'
p7538
aS'" The Boyd and Weeks decisions provided precedents for this case, which exemplified the "fruit of the poisonous tree" doctrine with regards to a trunk of pornographic materials.'
p7539
aS'For 10 points, identify this case which ruled that the exclusionary rule made evidence taken by the Cleveland police inadmissible in court.'
p7540
aS'The French army reached a point about 2  miles from Alessandria.'
p7541
aS'Rather than wait to be attacked, General Michael von Melas lashed out at the French army.'
p7542
aS'Taking the French by surprise, the attacking army inflicted heavy casualties and forced a hasty retreat.'
p7543
aS'Von Melas then turned command over to a subordinate and retired to Alessandria.'
p7544
aS'However, the slow pursuit allowed the French to regroup and they counterattacked with ferocity and routed the attacking army.'
p7545
aS'FTP, name this 1800 battle between the forces of Napoleon and the Austrians.'
p7546
aS'With an army of 30,000 men and 100 guns, Baron Michael von Melas, almost decisively surprised the enemy at this site.'
p7547
aS'However, a counterattack by General de Veygoux [vay-GOO] was able to rout Melas, who suffered almost twice as many casualties as the French.'
p7548
aS'It began poorly for the French, when they scattered their army, which had just moved from Dijon through the Great St. Bernard Pass in the Alps.'
p7549
aS'However, the Austrian attack just north of Genoa was not quick enough and the French successfully reinforced.'
p7550
aS'FTP, identify this June 14, 1800 victory by Napoleon named for the north Italian village where it was won.'
p7551
aS"At the start of this battle, an advance guard approached a brook near Ceriolo Castle under the command of Andreas O'Reilly."
p7552
aS"Across the Fontanone was Gaspard Gardanne, who eventually gave way and forced the ultimate victors of this battle to retreat to San Giuliano, where Franz Lattermann's grenadiers fell to Kellermann's calvary and allowed Anton Zach to be captured."
p7553
aS'Earlier, Zach had been given overall command after Michael von Melas was wounded here and delegated what seemed to have been a complete victory.'
p7554
aS'Also killed in the battle was Louis Desaix, who had led the counterattack.'
p7555
aS'An early success for the French First Consul, FTP, name this victory of Napoleon in 1800 over the Austrians near Piedmont which drove them out of Northern Italy.'
p7556
aS'Named for the day on which it occurred, this event was justified through religious tensions in France in August of 1572, and caused further years of strife.'
p7557
aS'However, there was tremendous political intrigue involved in the events leading up to it.'
p7558
aS'A failed assassination attempt, caused Catherine de Medicis to order the slaying of Huguenot leadership in fear that they were pressuring Charles IX to fight a war against the Spanish in the low countries.'
p7559
aS'For 10 points, what was this event spurred by the murder of Admiral Coligny on August 24th'
p7560
aS'The king was almost convinced to aid the Dutch in their rebellion against rival Spain.'
p7561
aS'The Queen Mother saw France in no position to intervene.'
p7562
aS'So she came up with a plan.'
p7563
aS"She invited dozens of nobles to her niece's wedding, and pressured her son, Charles IX, to get rid of them all."
p7564
aS'De Coligny, Henri de Navarre, and hundreds of Protestant nobles and peasants were butchered in chaos which would spread throughout France and effectively diminish the strength of the French Reformation.'
p7565
aS'For ten points, give the name this outburst of violence.'
p7566
aS'One group formed the Politiques movement in the aftermath of this event, and Francis Walsingham barely escaped from the backlash of this event.'
p7567
aS'It began when the ringing of a bell of the Church of St-Germain LAuxerrois, and occurred shortly after the First Peace of St. Germain.'
p7568
aS'It was sparked by an assassination attempt on Gaspard de Coligny, who was recently reinstated as a royal advisor, and by the marriage of Henry III and Marguerite of Valois.'
p7569
aS'Engineered largely by Catherine de Medici and the Guise family to end the influence of a certain group on royal policy, FTP, name this 1572 massacre of Hugenots in France.'
p7570
aS'He appointed Kengo Wa Dondo to serve as prime minister late in his time in power, after Kengo served under him as first state commissioner.'
p7571
aS'Earlier, he had conducted a notorious show trial which ended with the executions of Jrome Anany and Andr Mahamba, as well as former prime minister Evariste Kimba.'
p7572
aS"Kimba had been an associate of this man's chief rival, whom this man deposed from the presidency in 1965."
p7573
aS'After ousting Joseph Kasavubu, this man ruled until being ousted in 1997 by Tutsi rebels, after which Laurent Kabila became president of his country.'
p7574
aS'FTP, name this African strongman who was a long-time president of Zaire.'
p7575
aS"Mark Pieth, a criminologist from Basel University, was a legal advocate of keeping this ruler's assets frozen indefinitely, although less than a month ago, the Swiss Federal Criminal Court ruled in favor of releasing his stolen fortune to his heirs."
p7576
aS'"Michael Michael" was an ambassador to this man\'s country from a nation this leader paid to train his Kamanyola brigade and to secure Kenneth Bialkin as his U. S. representative.'
p7577
aS"Although he is not Salvador_Allende, he attempted to rejuvenate the economy by nationalizing his country's copper mines, and this ruler took power during a struggle between his predecessor, who had taken over with a revolt of the Force Publique, and that predecessor's premier Moise Tshombe."
p7578
aS'Forced to abdicate in 1997 in the midst of a revolt led by Laurent Kabila, this leader overthrew Joseph Kasavubu in 1965, who himself had succeeded Patrice_Lumumba.'
p7579
aS'FTP, name this longtime dictator of the current Democratic Republic of the Congo.'
p7580
aS'This figure states, "Who cares to praise his enemy" in Ovid\'s Metamorphoses and Homer refers to him as the "Gerenian horseman.'
p7581
aS'" This man states, "I seek no other vengeance than to ignore Heracles\' mighty deeds" as Heracles killed his father Neleus as well as his brothers and sisters.'
p7582
aS'Like many others, he was an Argonaut and participated in the Calydonian Boar hunt, but was better known for his role in the Trojan War, during which he led the Pylian troops and carried a solid gold shield.'
p7583
aS'His son Antilochus is later killed by Memnon, and this man attempts to reconcile Agamemnon and Achilles.'
p7584
aS'In the Odyssey, Telemachus is advised by Athena to visit this man after visiting Menelaus and Helen of Troy, who tells him of the fate of various Achaean leaders.'
p7585
aS'For 10 points, name this king of a place often called "sandy," Pylos, who during the Trojan War, was too old to fight.'
p7586
aS'Working from a family base in the Owari province, he gradually gained control the region and occupied in 1568 the capital of Kyoto; five years later he drove out the last of the Ashikaga shoguns.'
p7587
aS'FTP identify this warlord, assassinated in 1582 before realizing his ambition of uniting all of Japan.'
p7588
aS"As a child, this man was tutored by Hirate Masahide, who committed suicide after being shamed by this man's bad behavior."
p7589
aS"This commander defeated the Azai and Asakura clans at the Battle of Anegawa, while after this man's death, his opponents were defeated at the Battle of Yamazaki."
p7590
aS'This man destroyed a superior force from the rival Imagawa faction at the Battle of Okehazama.'
p7591
aS'Akechi Mitsuhide betrayed this ruler at Honno-Ji, thereby causing him to commit suicide.'
p7592
aS'For 10 points, name this first unifier of Japan, later succeeded by such leaders as Tokugawa.'
p7593
aS"It was written in response to Peter Soule's failure to obtain its goal peaceably."
p7594
aS'Secretary of State William Marcy instructed James Buchanan and John Mason to meet with Soule to discuss the situation.'
p7595
aS'The three met in Belgium and produced the proposal.'
p7596
aS'It was leaked, however, and the Republicans used it to attack the South since it sought to increase the amount of U.S. slave territory.'
p7597
aS'FTP, name this document, which demanded that the United_States take Cuba by force.'
p7598
aS'English journalist Archibald Forbes coined the term for one of the structures that became significant during its rule.'
p7599
aS'Perhaps its most unusual demand was the closure of all pawn shops in the surrounding area.'
p7600
aS'In its aftermath, 7,000 of its staunchest supporters were exiled to New Caledonia.'
p7601
aS'A month earlier, actions came to a head when 147 of the involved combatants were shot in front of the "Wall of the Federalists," and the death toll escalated until the period from May 21 to 27 was known simply as the "Bloody Week.'
p7602
aS'"  It started with the National Guard\'s refusal to give up a canon and within eight days Louis-Auguste Blanqui was elected president.'
p7603
aS'In power for approximately two months in the spring of 1871, FTP, name this socialist government that controlled the French capital.'
p7604
aS"One opponent of this polity was depicted riding on the back of a snail while fighting against it, and Elizabeth Demetrief created a Woman's Union for the Care of the Injured during its reign."
p7605
aS'This polity attempted to exchange Georges Darboy for one of its important figures, and Generals Thomas and Lecompte were shot during its reign.'
p7606
aS'This polity saw the abolition of night work for bakers and the postponement of local debts.'
p7607
aS'Its leaders were later exiled to New Caledonia, and it was opposed by a figure who was later replaced by Patrice MacMahon, Adolphe Thiers.'
p7608
aS'Lead by the imprisoned Louis Blanqui and ending in the "Bloody Week", for 10 points, name this government that lasted about two months, a socialist polity headquartered in France\'s capital.'
p7609
aS'The end of this event became known as "the Bloody Week.'
p7610
aS'" During this event, Generals Lecomte and Thomas were executed after attempting to prevent artillery from being stockpiled on top of Montmartre Hill.'
p7611
aS'Leaders of this event took Bishop Goerge Darboy hostage and attempted to exchange him for Louis Blanqui.'
p7612
aS'During this event, the Vendome Column was destroyed and military power was placed in the hands of General Jaroslaw Dabrowski.'
p7613
aS'Eventually put down by the nationalist government of Adolphe Thiers, for 10 points name this socialist government in France formed after the Franco-Prussian_War, which briefly ruled out of the capital in 1871.'
p7614
aS'While working in Kindu-Port-Empain, he became the leader of the club of evolues.'
p7615
aS'Later, after being released from prison for embezzling from the post office, he founded the MNC, the first nationwide political party in his country.'
p7616
aS'After forming a government, he was immediately forced to deal with the Katangan rebels under Moise Tshombe and later forced to deal with the rebelling army leader, Colonel Joseph Mobutu.'
p7617
aS'However, his biggest rival was President Joseph Kasavubu, whose forces orchestrated his murder in January 1961.'
p7618
aS'FTP, name this African nationalist, the first prime minister of the Democratic Republic of the Congo.'
p7619
aS'He worked as a postal clerk in the colonial government in Stanleyville for eleven years and was invited to make a study tour of Belgium.'
p7620
aS"Inspired by Nkruma, he called for pan-Africanism and an end to tribal conflicts, and he was invited to form his nation's first independent government in 1960."
p7621
aS'Following the secession of the Katanga province, he was dismissed from his post and released to the Katanga forces to be killed.'
p7622
aS'FTP, name this first prime minister of the Democratic Republic of the Congo, feared to be a Marxist and rumored to have been the subject of assassination plots by the CIA.'
p7623
aS'Before his career in politics, this man was a manager of the Polar Bear brewery.'
p7624
aS"Arrested for embezzlement from the post office following a study trip sponsored by the Minister of Colonies, he founded the MNC, his country's first nationwide political party, and a university in Russia that Carlos the Jackal attended was named for him."
p7625
aS"Sidney Gottlieb claims that he was instructed to poison this man's toothbrush by the CIA, but the assassination attempt failed."
p7626
aS"With his aides Mpolo and Okito, he was murdered by Tshombe's men in Katanga after fleeing from the repressive government of president Joseph Kasavubu."
p7627
aS'FTP, identify this man who opposed Mobutu_Sese_Seko and the rule of the Belgians; a Marxist who was the first elected prime minister of Zaire.'
p7628
aS'Early in his career, this man became head of the Cercles of Stanleyville, and distributed literature for the Liberal Party of his country.'
p7629
aS'His movement would later break into two factions, one headed by this man, and another headed by Albert Kalonji.'
p7630
aS'His time in office saw the rise of secessionist movement under Moise Tshombe of the CONAKAT party, leading to UN intervention.'
p7631
aS'After his removal from office, his successor sent him to Katanga province, where he was tortured and executed by those same rebels.'
p7632
aS'FTP, name this leader of the MNC who was overthrown by a CIA-backed coup lead by Joseph Mobutu, the first prime minister of the Congo.'
p7633
aS"He married off his son to his gay lover's beautiful daughter Myrrhina, and Myrrhina's brother became the first man ever to be ostracised."
p7634
aS'He schemed to return himself from exile by hiring a tall woman to pretend to be Athena.'
p7635
aS'While he was traveling in disguise, he heard a farmer complaining about his taxes and was so impressed that he gave the farmer a tax exemption for life.'
p7636
aS"Although he married Megacles's daughter, he wanted his sons from his first marriage to succeed him, and needed the help of Lygdamis of Naxos to return a third time to his most famous post."
p7637
aS'For 10 points, name this eromenos of Solon, father of Hipparchus and Hippias, and Athenian tyrant.'
p7638
aS'While returning from exile, this man was accompanied by a tall woman whom the public thought was the goddess Athena, and during his return from Eretria this man surprised an Athenian army at Pallene.'
p7639
aS'This man supported Miltiades colonization of Cheronesus and captured Naxos and Sigeum, and established the pottery town of Cerameicus.'
p7640
aS'This man responded to the population of the Pedieis and Paralioi of Lycurgus and Megacles by creating the people of the hill, the Hyperakrioi faction.'
p7641
aS'Exiled twice during his rule, events during his reign included the beginning of coinage in the region and the establishing of the Panathenaea, and his sons Hippias and Hipparchus were very unpopular, the latters assassination by Harmodius and Aristogiton leading to the reforms of Cleisthenes.'
p7642
aS'For 10 points, identify this uniter of Attica, a tyrant who ruled Athens for much of the mid-6th century until his death in 527 B.C.'
p7643
aS'This historical event is addressed in William Calverly\'s "A Dyalogue bitwene the playntife and the Defendaunt," and the most definitive study of it was written by Ruth and Madeleine Dobbs.'
p7644
aS'Although the leaders of this rebellion tried to suppress a second uprising at Beverley led by Francis Bigod, they were still held responsible, and many, including Robert Aske, were executed.'
p7645
aS"The Doncaster and Pontefract articles cite enclosure of pasture land as one of the rebels' grievances, but more direct causes of it include the issuance of the Ten Articles, the Statute of Uses, and the closure of Louth Abbey and other places during the dissolution of the monasteries."
p7646
aS'FTP, name this uprising in 1536 against the reformation of the Church of England by Henry VIII, which was given its name to evoke a religious quest.'
p7647
aS'Lord Darcy was executed on suspicion of sympathizing with this movement, which was put down by Thomas Howard, the Duke of Norfolk.'
p7648
aS'Starting in Louth, this uprising was led by (*) Robert Aske from Yorkshire, and it targeted not only religious change but also enclosure.'
p7649
aS"For 10 points name this 1536 peasant action against England's Reformation, a challenge to the rule of Henry VIII."
p7650
aS'This battle was preceded by a letter from Robert Orme to its winning commander, giving him the green light to take necessary action.'
p7651
aS'The losing side failed to cover guns during a heavy rainfall, rendering them useless and allowing Major Kilpatrick to take the elevated water ponds from which French-commanded artillery were firing.'
p7652
aS'The winning commander enlisted the help of an Armenian merchant and William Watts, a chief at a nearby factory.'
p7653
aS'An early turning point came when a cannonball killed artillery commander Mir Madan, prior to the defection of Mir Jafar.'
p7654
aS'Three thousand British troops defeated 50,000 in the force of Siraj-ud-dauluh in this engagement, which followed the Black Hole of Calcutta.'
p7655
aS'FTP, name this victory for the British East India Company, led by Robert Clive.'
p7656
aS'A small French army fought for the losing side of this battle under a man named Sinfray.'
p7657
aS'The main tactic of this battle was probably conveyed by an Armenian merchant named Khwaja Petruse to William Watts.'
p7658
aS"The losing side had two-thirds of its army sit around and watch on the first day of this battle, when, around noon, a rain storm struck which damaged the losing side's gunpowder, as they were too inexperienced to cover it."
p7659
aS'This battle was a result of the breakdown of the Alinagar Treaty, signed four months earlier.'
p7660
aS'The English camp was set up near the namesake mango grove on the River Bhagarathi, and during it, Mir Jafar defected, sealing the fate of Siraj-ud-doula, the Nawab of Bengal.'
p7661
aS'Taking place a year after the capture of Fort William, which included the Black Hole of Calcutta, for 10 points, name this battle in which Robert Clive led the British East India Company to victory, leading to the annexation of Bengal.'
p7662
aS'Robert Orme wrote that the victorious general at this battle voted against action at a June 21 council of war, but after meditating in a grove for an hour returned and called for battle the next day.'
p7663
aS"The losing leader at this battle had been beset by intrigues led by Ghaseti Begum, who had desired her nephew Shawkat Jang to have his title, and Begum had enlisted the merchant Umichand and banker Jagat Sheth to bribe one of the losing leader's generals, a payment transacted in that general's woman's quarters."
p7664
aS"The victorious general's attack violated the Alinagar Treaty, so named for the new designation of Fort William, where it was signed after the losing leader at this battle took Calcutta."
p7665
aS'The battle itself turned when a cannon blast killed General Mir Mardan and Mir Jafar, having been bribed, would not support the Nawab Siraj ad-Daula.'
p7666
aS'For 10 points, name this 1757 battle won by forces of the British East India Company led by Robert Clive.'
p7667
aS'It attracted notice following a shooting by Johnnie Edgecombe, a Jamaican jazz musician who had earlier been involved in a knife fight with Aloysius Gordon.'
p7668
aS'It was called to national attention by George Wigg, who slipped a mention of it into a debate about a homosexual clerk named William Vassall.'
p7669
aS'Nicknamed "Bowtie" by the FBI, it was investigated by Alfred Denning.'
p7670
aS'After it became public, osteopath Stephen Ward decided to commit suicide rather than face charges of living on "immoral earnings" for introducing the teenage lover of Eugene Ivanov to the incident\'s namesake, a man who was replaced in the cabinet by James Ramsden.'
p7671
aS"FTP, name this scandal that involved a romantic liaison with Christine Keeler and brought down Harold MacMillan's Secretary of War."
p7672
aS'[AR] The chair utilized in the iconic photograph, taken by Lewis Morley, that fueled this incident was an imitation Arne Jacobsen model 3107 and was not taken during a modeling session, as the Sunday Mirror had indicated.'
p7673
aS'Further exacerbated by the fact that the figure in the photograph had also been involved with Yevgeny Ivanov, a Soviet Intelligence Officer, it prompted national security concerns and coupled with the adulterous nature of the affair it became a national scandal.'
p7674
aS'Lying to the House of Commons about his relationship with Christine Keeler and occurring during the Harold MacMillan administration, for 10 points, name this 1963 political scandal involving the Secretary of State for War in the United Kingdom.'
p7675
aS'George Wigg was responsible for revealing it, and it led to the suicide of Dr. Stephen Ward.'
p7676
aS'Alledgedly triggered during a party at the house of Viscount Astor, it is often mentioned as a major factor behind the election loss of Alec Douglas-Home.'
p7677
aS'Alfred Denning led the official investigation into it, and it saw Yevgueni Ivanov being recalled in the aftermath.'
p7678
aS"The then cabinet secretary, Sir Norman Brook, supposedly ended it based on MI5 evidence that Christine Keeler's association with Ivanov led to a potential intelligence threat, as Ivanov was using Keeler to get access to government secrets."
p7679
aS"Revealed in 1963 and a major thrill for the tabloids, FTP, what is this British political affair, named after Harold MacMillan's Secretary of State for War"
p7680
aS'During an epidemic in China, the traveling magician Chang Chueh reportedly healed many by giving them water over which he had said an incantation.'
p7681
aS'The fame he earned by his remedy earned him hundreds of followers, and he decided to exploit his success by promising them immortality through potions, and by starting a revolt against the corrupt eunuchs who controlled the government.'
p7682
aS'This was the beginning, FTP, of which twenty-year rebellion against the Han_dynasty, named for the distinctive, colorful headgear worn by the insurgents'
p7683
aS'Their suppression helped to elevate Ts\'ao Ts\'ao to supreme leadership in the North Its leader declared that the time of the "blue heaven" was over and took advantage of a widespread pestilence to spread his messianic version of Taoism.'
p7684
aS'Under Chang Chueh the rebels massacred the eunuchs and threatened the stability of the Han_dynasty.'
p7685
aS'FTP identify this movement which embraced the "earth element" symbolized by the colored head dresses sported by its adherents.'
p7686
aS'The government it targeted had to divide its forces between it, raids by the Xiongnu, and tribal horsemen in Korea.'
p7687
aS'Its target was the capital of Luoyang, and its participants believed that they were going to succeed the "fire" element epitomized by the government.'
p7688
aS'Beginning in the provinces of Shandong and Henan, most of the people who fought on the losing side of it had no weapons, but it served as the catalyst for the fall of the Han_dynasty.'
p7689
aS'Led by Zhang Jue [zhoo-AY], a Taoist faith healer, for ten points, name this rebellion, put down by Cao_Cao and was named for the headwear the rebels wore.'
p7690
aS'Participants in this event opposed the corrupt "Ten Regular Attendants.'
p7691
aS'" He Jin led the military opposition to this event, while forces under Bo Cai were put down by Zhu Jun and Huangfu Song.'
p7692
aS'Participants in this event believed that "the Blue Sky" had perished and venerated the god Huang-lo, who had given its leader a sacred book.'
p7693
aS"That leader's brothers Bao and Liang helped him lead this rebellion, which, like the earlier Five Pecks of Rice revolt, was put down by the Han general Cao_Cao."
p7694
aS'For 10 points, name this Zhang Jiao-led uprising against the Han Dynasy whose followers practiced the Way of Great Peace and were named after a colorful piece of headware.'
p7695
aS'This rulers reign saw the establishment of the Council of the North, as well as the College of Arms.'
p7696
aS'Some believe that this ruler had killed his wife, Anne Neville, who bore him a son who would die at Middleham shortly after being made Prince of Wales.'
p7697
aS'He would have Lord Hastings, who had earlier warned him about a threat to his regency, beheaded for allegedly plotting to kill his brothers son, Edward V. However, he had fought bravely at the Battles of Barnet and Tewkesbury for Edward IV, and after the latters death, he ruled for two years before his death with the conclusion of the Wars_of_the_Roses would signal the end of the Plantagenet dynasty.'
p7698
aS'The last ruler of the House of York, this is, FTP, which English king who met his end at the Battle_of_Bosworth_Field'
p7699
aS'This justice wrote the majority opinion in a case ruling that states cannot issue writs of habeas corpus directed at federal prisoners in Ableman v. Booth.'
p7700
aS'This justice declared that states cannot institute an immigration tax in the Passenger Cases, and ruled against the Fugitive Slave Law in Prigg v. Pennsylvania.'
p7701
aS'Hilariously, his opinion on whether Kentucky or Ohio law held for traveling (*) slaves in Strader v. Graham was rendered moot when everyone in question escaped to Canada.'
p7702
aS"This man's court made perhaps the only legal invocation of Pinckney's treaty in a Joseph Story opinion in a case argued by John_Quincy_Adams, and he declared that the president and congress must enforce the Guarantee Clause in Luther v. Borden, a case sparked by Dorr's Rebellion."
p7703
aS"One major decision by this justice declared that the construction of a certain edifice did not violate the constitution's ban on ex post facto laws."
p7704
aS'FTP, identify this chief justice who presided over Charles River Bridge as well as the racist classic, Dred Scott v. Sanford.'
p7705
aS"He was born in Maryland in 1777 and married Francis Scott Key's sister in 1806."
p7706
aS"He was appointed Andrew_Jackson's second attorney general in 1831, but when Jackson attempted to make him secretary of the treasury in 1833, he became the first presidential cabinet nominee to be rejected by the Senate."
p7707
aS"Three years later, despite the opposition of Henry_Clay, John Calhoun, and Daniel_Webster, he was accepted by Congress as John Marshall's successor on the Supreme Court."
p7708
aS'FTP, name this controversial chief justice most remembered for writing the majority opinion in the 1857 Dred Scott decision.'
p7709
aS'He took Hersilia as his wife.'
p7710
aS'Along with his brother, he was raised by Acca Larentia, the wife of a shepherd who found him in the wild.'
p7711
aS'Later deified as the god Quirinus, this man killed Amelius, the brother of his grandfather, after rescuing his kidnapped brother.'
p7712
aS'The son of a Vestal Virgin who was visited by Mars, this man was found by the shepherd Faustulus, after being raised by a she-wolf.'
p7713
aS'During a quarrel regarding the height of his wall near the Palatine Hill, he slew his brother Remus.'
p7714
aS'FTP, identify this legendary founder of Rome.'
p7715
aS'Its initial leaders included Nicholas Bayley and John Blaxland, and it involved a dispute over whether a judge, Richard Atkins, should be replaced in favor of a more capable man.'
p7716
aS'Major George Johnston supported the case of one of its leaders, the man who introduced sheep-grazing to his country.'
p7717
aS'That man was described as "Arch-Fiend" John Macarthur in a letter sent to Viscount Castlereagh.'
p7718
aS'The affair was finally squashed with the arrival of Lachlan Macquarie, about two years after the Government House was stormed on the historic night of January 26 by the New South Wales Corps.'
p7719
aS'FTP, name this 1808 insurrection against governor William Bligh in Australia, which was ostensibly sparked by the prohibition of a tasty alcoholic beverage as currency.'
p7720
aS'The main target of this event was involved in a controversial dispute over the control of a ship called the Porpoise and he had the former captain court marshaled, and that same man disrupted the barter economy in the region where it occurred by giving out free food to people who had been hurt by a recent flood.'
p7721
aS'He was later found and captured by the people involved in this event, led by Major George Johnston, while he was cowering under his bed supposedly looking for missing papers, and a picture depicting his capture is considered the first political cartoon in the country in which it took place.'
p7722
aS"That governor, who had earlier been overthrown in the Bounty Mutiny, Robert Bligh, brought enmity upon himself after receiving a letter from Castlereagh suggesting that he stop the trade of this event's namesake product."
p7723
aS"His replacement, William Paterson, returned to Sydney to take up Bligh's former post."
p7724
aS'For 10 points, name this 1808 uprising in Australia over a certain kind of alcohol.'
p7725
aS'Prior to this event, the HMS Porpoise was boarded and its captain, Joseph Short, was court-martialed and his land grants revoked, an act committed by the successor of Philip King.'
p7726
aS'Events leading to it included the firing of the magistrate Thomas Jamieson and the surgeon DArcy Wentworth by a protg of Joseph Banks.'
p7727
aS'One incident during this event involved the judges Richard Atkins and Anthony Kemp threatening to imprison each other for contempt during the trial of John McArthur.'
p7728
aS'Resulting in the succession of Governor Lachlan Macquarie and led by Lieutenant Governor George Johnston, it saw settlers along the Hawkesbury River rise up against a man who had previously been deposed by Fletcher Christian.'
p7729
aS'For ten points, name this 1808 rebellion in New South Wales, named for Governor Blighs attempt to regulate the namesake drink.'
p7730
aS'After this event, Charles Grimes was appointed Judge-Advocate.'
p7731
aS"Incidents that helped to incite this event included the dismissal of magistrate Thomas Jamison and Judge-Advocate Richard Atkins' coerced order to forfeit a shipping bond after the escape of a convict."
p7732
aS"When the target of the order disregarded it, George Johnson disobeyed a request to aid in the target's arrest, instead leading a group of men to Government House to overthrow the order's issuer."
p7733
aS'This event occurred after the attempted arrest of John Macarthur, and it was ended by the 1809 arrival of Lachlan Macquarie.'
p7734
aS'For 10 points, identify this event, which saw William Bligh deposed by the New South Wales Corps, an 1808 uprising in Australia named for an alcoholic beverage.'
p7735
aS"In Sir Walter Scott's novel The Talisman, he is depicted as a learned and generous ruler, chivalrous and gallant toward his enemies, and courteous and civilized toward the inhabitants of Jerusalem during the capture of that city."
p7736
aS'The founder of the Ayyubid dynasty, he ended the 88-year occupation of Jerusalem by the Franks.'
p7737
aS'FTP, who is this famous 12th century Muslim sultan and hero that stalemated the Christian counterattack of the Third_Crusade'
p7738
aS"In one of this ruler's most important victories, his calvary were able to stop an army before they reached Tiberias and then proceeded to rout them."
p7739
aS"He also found success at the Battle of Jacob's Ford where he overran a garrison, and later he laid siege to Kerak while Humphrey IV of Toron was getting married."
p7740
aS'Although he was able to capture sites like Sidon and Nabulus with relative ease, he failed to successfully capture the garrison at Tyre.'
p7741
aS'After a campaign that saw his defeat at battles like Arsuf, this ruler signed the 1192 Treaty of Ramla with perhaps his most famous rival, a treaty which kept his control over Jerusalem but also allowed safe passage for Christian Pilgrims.'
p7742
aS'Founder of the Ayyubid Dynasty and fond of giving enemy leaders ice water, FTP, identify this chivalrous twelfth century sultan of Egypt and Syria who fought against Richard I and the 3rd Crusade.'
p7743
aS'Maimonides may have served as this mans physician, and one story claims that this man was unable to afford a funeral because of excessive charitable giving.'
p7744
aS'He lost nine tenths of his army at the battle of Montgisard, and was on his way to fight his nominal overlord, the son of Imad Zengi, when the latter died.'
p7745
aS'This signer of the treaty of Arsuf unsuccessfully besieged Tyre twice and was defeated at Arsuf by Richard I, but personally executed Raynald de Chatillon after his most famous victory.'
p7746
aS'The Founder of the Ayyubid Caliphate, FTP identify this victor of the battle of Hattin, who reconquered Jerusalem and became famous in the west for his chivalry.'
p7747
aS'Baha ad-Din wrote the Rare and Excellent History of this ruler, who rose to prominence following a power struggle between Amalric I, Shawar and Shirkuh.'
p7748
aS'This ruler took the lands of As-Salih Ismail after the death of the Zengid ruler Nur ad-Din, and he twice failed to take Krak des Chevaliers.'
p7749
aS"A small force under King Baldwin IV managed to kill ninety percent of this man's army at the Battle of Montgisard, and he signed the Treaty of Ramla which gave his enemies a strip of land from Jaffa to Tyre."
p7750
aS'Following the Siege of Tiberias, this ruler defeated the exhausted, thirsty forces of Raymond III of Tripoli and captured Guy of Lusignan at the Battle of Hattin.'
p7751
aS'This ruler abolished the Ismaili Fatimid Caliphate and founded the Ayyubid Dynasty in its place.'
p7752
aS'For 10 points, name this opponent of Richard the Lionheart whose 1187 capture of Jerusalem sparked the Third_Crusade.'
p7753
aS'Late in this career, this politician was caricatured as an Egyptian sarcophagus in Thomas Nast cartoons.'
p7754
aS'He was nicknamed "the usufruct" for his previous career as a lawyer specializing in railroad mergers.'
p7755
aS'This man was linked to William T. Pelton, his nephew, via the (*) "Cipher Dispatches", which suggested that this man was involved in an attempt to bribe members of the electoral college.'
p7756
aS'This Presidential candidate was supported by Henry Watterson, a Louisville newspaper editor who threatened to organize an army to march on Washington.'
p7757
aS'This man broke up the Canal Ring but rose to fame for his opposition to Boss Tweed.'
p7758
aS'For ten points, name this Democrat and New York Governor who lost the election of 1876 to Rutherford Hayes.'
p7759
aS'As a lawyer, he became famous for his defense of Azariah Flagg in a vote fraud case, and rich through his representation of railroad interests.'
p7760
aS'As a governor, he smashed the "Canal Ring," just as he helped smash the "Tweed Ring" as Democratic state chairman.'
p7761
aS'For 10 points, name this man, who became governor of New York in 1875, and would have become President in 1877 if it were not for that pesky Electoral College.'
p7762
aS'A 22q11 deletion or DISC1 disruption can predispose individuals to this disorder, which was once called dementia praecox.'
p7763
aS'Those affected lack smooth pursuit and exhibit poor mental flexibility to shifting patterns on the Wisconsin Card Sorting Test.'
p7764
aS'It\'s not autism, but the "refrigerator mother" is a debunked theory of its occurrence.'
p7765
aS'Haldol, Thorazine, and clozapine are commonly used to treat this disorder, which can manifest negative symptoms, such as flat affect and waxy flexibility, and positive symptoms, such as delusions and hallucinations.'
p7766
aS'For 10 points, name this disorder with catatonic and paranoid types, which misleadingly means "split mind" in Greek.'
p7767
aS'Idris Bitlisi mobilized the Kurds under this mans rule, and he appointed Al Asraf Bey to govern another conquered territory.'
p7768
aS'He ordered the deaths of the Turkish Kizilbash in order to hurt a Safavid rival, whom he would eventually defeat after taking Amid uncontested.'
p7769
aS'He achieved victories in the Battles of Radinayah and Marj Dabiq, and after he defeated Shah Ismail in the Battle of Chaldiran, he conquered the Mamluks.'
p7770
aS'For 10 points, name this Ottoman emperor, the son of Bayezid II who added Syria and Egypt to the empire and fathered Suleiman_the_Magnificent.'
p7771
aS'The last ruler of this polity died when his heart disappeared after a mysterious huckster advertised cheap, stemless cabbages, according to the novel Fengshen Yanyi.'
p7772
aS'One of its capitals was at Zhengzhou, while its last capital was located at Yinxu, near modern Anyang.'
p7773
aS'One ruler of this dynasty, Di Xin, immolated himself and his palace after the disastrous defeat at Muye.'
p7774
aS'A later prince of this dynasty, Jizi, founded a kingdom in Korea, while other descendants of its rulers continued to rule the state of Song, based around its first capital.'
p7775
aS'Seeing the prominence of a supreme god known as Di, it is known for elaborate bronze working, and its history is largely based on numerous oracle bones.'
p7776
aS'Finally overthrown by the emperor Wu, and beginning when Tang deposed Jie, the last emperor of the Xia dynasty, for 10 points, identify this Chinese dynasty, which proceeded the Zhou.'
p7777
aS'A political party named for this was able to get two governors elected in Nevada in the early 20th century.'
p7778
aS'William Hope Harvey\'s pamphlet Coin\'s Financial School argued against the "Crime of \'73" named for an act that led to sharp decline in the price of this; that decrease led to the passage of the Bland-Allison Act, which ordered purchase of this substance by the US Treasury.'
p7779
aS'That act was superseded by 1890 legislation named for an Ohio senator that increased government purchases of this, but didn\'t provide for its "free coinage." FTP a "purchase act" named for John Sherman called for US support of what precious metal'
p7780
aS'Admirals in the service of this man included Dragut and Khair ad Din, the latter of which was victorious at the Battle of Preveza, giving this ruler mastery over the eastern Mediterranean.'
p7781
aS'On his eastern borders,he fought a war sparked by the treachery of the Governor of Bitlis, eventually defeating Shah Tahmasp I and taking control of Baghdad.'
p7782
aS'On his western borders, he supported the pretender John Zapolya as the successor to Louis II, whom this mans armies had killed.'
p7783
aS'At home, he employed the architect Sinan and instituted land reforms which earned him the nickname of Kanuni  the lawgiver.'
p7784
aS'For ten points, name this Ottoman Sultan better known as The Magnificent.'
p7785
aS'Rustem and Sokollu were sent by this man to recover regions lost after a defeat at Erzerum by this leader, who abandoned all claim to Tabriz and Erivan as part of a peace signed with Tahmasp at Amasia.'
p7786
aS'After the death of his wife Roxelana, this ruler had his son Mustafa executed prior to his death during the siege of Szigetvar.'
p7787
aS'This ruler expelled the Knights Hospitalers from Rhodes after conquering Belgrade, although the same group would defeat him at Malta later on.'
p7788
aS'Often called "kanuni", this ruler failed to capture Vienna, which this son of Selim the Grim attempted soon after defeating the Louis II-led Hungarians in the 1526 Battle of Mohacs.'
p7789
aS'FTP, name this ruler of the Ottoman empire, often known as "the Magnificent".'
p7790
aS"This ruler's physician Moses Hamon got him to denounce blood libels against Jews, and he had his concubine Mahidevran or Gulbahar banished for beating his wife."
p7791
aS'This ruler died of natural causes during the Siege of Szigetvar, at which a tiny Croatian force under Nikola Zrinski delayed his army of 100,000 for over a month.'
p7792
aS"This ruler's Code of the Rayas lifted many of his subjects from serfdom, and together with his Grand Mufti Ebussuud he brought Qanun closer to Sharia."
p7793
aS"At the Battle of Preveza, Hayreddin Barbarossa won a victory which secured this man's domination of the eastern Mediterranean, and he appointed John Zapolya King of Hungary after the death of Louis II at the Battle of Mohacs."
p7794
aS'The husband of Roxelana, for 10 points, name this son of Selim the Grim, an Ottoman Sultan of the sixteenth century known as "the magnificent".'
p7795
aS'The real causes of this war lay in contested border areas, uneven trade regulations, and population pressures between its two participants.'
p7796
aS"Lyndon Johnson arranged a trade between the nations of a squatter named Martinez Argueta, who had been sentenced to twenty years in prison for illegal entry into one country for sixty of the other's captured soldiers."
p7797
aS'Tension continued, however, and on July 14, 1969, hostilities began between El_Salvador and Honduras.'
p7798
aS'FTP, identify this "sporting" war, which broke out after a World Cup match.'
p7799
aS'This conflict saw the last combat between fighter planes with piston engines fought and resulted in electoral success for the PCN, or National Conciliation Party.'
p7800
aS'It was provoked by the eviction of squatting peasants who, it was feared, would return to their homeland and foment rebellion against rich landowners there.'
p7801
aS'Lasting six days in July of 1969, it ended with a cease-fire brokered by the Organization of American States.'
p7802
aS'For ten points, identify this war between Honduras and El_Salvador given its name because it occurred soon after a series of FIFA qualifying matches.'
p7803
aS'In the leadup to this conflict, one side failed to renew the Bilateral Treaty on Immigration, in no small part due to anger over the increased presence of one sides shoemakers in the others capital city.'
p7804
aS'The National Conciliation Party won a victory in elections following this conflict after Fidel Sanchez Hernandez apologized for his role in it.'
p7805
aS'The creation of FENAGH spurred on one side of this conflict, which saw one sides leader Oswaldo Lopez Arellano provided weapons by Anastacio Somoza.'
p7806
aS'This conflict saw the last battle between propeller planes, and it was spurred when a political party was created by the United Fruit Company.'
p7807
aS'Also known as the hundred-hour war, for 10 points, name this Central American conflict that saw rioting at subsequent sporting matches between Honduras and El_Salvador.'
p7808
aS'This war began with an offense ordered by Fidel Sanchez Hernandez, who objected to policies supported by the pro-business organization FENAGH.'
p7809
aS'Prior to this war, President Lopez Arellano had passed land reform laws that targeted squatters.'
p7810
aS'Causes of this war include a dispute over territory along the Gulf of Fonseca and illegal immigration of peasants, and this war famously saw the last use of (*) propeller driven aircraft by both sides.'
p7811
aS'For ten points, name this 1969 war between Honduras and El_Salvador, named because it took place during World Cup qualifiers.'
p7812
aS'Philip Kearny became the first American to receive the Legion of Honor due to his participation in this battle, where he served with the Imperial Guards.'
p7813
aS'On one side, an army corps under Lajos Benedek became separated from the main body, but successfully held their ground at Pozzolengo.'
p7814
aS'That main body, which suffered the opposite fate, had previously been under the command of Count Gyulai, but he had been replaced by his empires head of state, much as the French forces were led by Napoleon_III.'
p7815
aS'Resulting in the Peace of Villafranca and the transfer of Lombardy to Sardinia, this is, for ten points, what battle between Austria and a nascent Italy, where the carnage was so great it inspired the foundation of the Red Cross.'
p7816
aS'Feldzeugmeister Ferenc Graf Gyulai erred in this battle by not moving quickly enough to destroy one force before their allies arrived.'
p7817
aS'Another commander in this battle stationed his troops around Voghera and Pontecurone, and Count Stadion was able to push his opponents back past the cavalry at Casteggio .'
p7818
aS'Philip Kearny won the Legion of Honor at this battle, becoming the first American to do so.'
p7819
aS'This battle, which took place just south of Lake Galda, resulted in the Armistice of Villafranca shortly thereafter, which gave one party the Lombardy, but refused it Venetia.'
p7820
aS'Victor Emmanuel commanded one force here, which was allied with one under Napoleon_III, and which fought against one under Franz Joseph.'
p7821
aS'For ten points, identify this victory of the Franco-Sicilian alliance over Austria, which ended the Second War of Italian Independence.'
p7822
aS'A battle for control of it occurred at Anfao, and the general Yaya manipulated a crucial succession.'
p7823
aS'Originating in the Dendi region, it was destroyed at Tonbidi by Ahmad al-Mansur of Morocco in 1591, and its 1464 ascendancy saw victories over the Mossi, Dogon, Fulani, and Tuaregs.'
p7824
aS'It became the first West African Empire to institute a civil bureaucracy.'
p7825
aS'Ruling from Gao, FTP, name this empire whose rulers included Muhammad Askia and Sunni Ali, located in what is now Nigeria.'
p7826
aS"Among the administration of this polity was the hi' koi, who controlled the fleet and home affairs."
p7827
aS'Local positions included the kurmina fari, the governor of one of two major provinces, while the central governmetn appointed special ministers called korei farma to oversee white minorities.'
p7828
aS'One of its rulers, refusing to convert to Islam, was overthrown by a man sometimes called Sylla, who expanded the empire as far Dendi and Yatenga.'
p7829
aS'Rulers of this empire like Ishak I and Dawud succeeded Askiya Muhammad.'
p7830
aS'Its best-known ruler took the title of daali, conquered the city of Djenne, and expelled the Tuareg peoples.'
p7831
aS'For 10 points, identify this African empire with capital at Gao, which supplanted the Mali empire and was most famously led by Sonni Ali. '
p7832
aS'Senator Daniel_Webster lost most of his fortune as a result of this law.'
p7833
aS'Among secondary effects caused by this law included the withdrawal of much of European money from America, and crop failures exacerbated the negative effects.'
p7834
aS'It was advocated by Levi Woodbury, who continued as Martin_Van_Burens Treasury Secretary.'
p7835
aS'This law caused a credit crunch which probably led to the Crisis of 1837; by a joint resolution of Congress, this law was repealed on May 21, 1838.'
p7836
aS'For ten points, identify this executive order by Andrew_Jackson, which prohibited the use of most paper moneey in paying for public land.'
p7837
aS'After the 202nd Paratroop division crossed the Mitla pass during this event, Gur\'s commandos sought refuge at the "Saucer" before a proper raid on a set of positions known as the "Hedgehog" could commence.'
p7838
aS'One part of this event included a military operation codenamed Musketeer, which saw the Newfoundland sink the corvette Damietta and the Ibrahim Al-Awal captured.'
p7839
aS'Indirect factors that precipitated this event included the dismissal of Sir John Glubb from head of the Jordanian army, as well as the signing of an agreement between Turkey and Iraq that created the predecessor organization to CENTO signed in Baghdad.'
p7840
aS'As a result of this event, Eisenhower instructed Humphrey to prepare the sale of British Sterling Bonds and PM Eden burned all of the British copies of the proceedings of a meeting to plan this event, which were conducted in a Paris suburb, called the Protocol of Sevres.'
p7841
aS"Initiated under Operation Kadesh by Israel, and though it was less polarizing for Mollet's cabinet it eventually led to Eden's resignation."
p7842
aS"Finally ended by a U. S. -led UN Resolution for a cease fire, for 10 points, name this crisis prompted by Gamal_Abdel_Nasser's nationalization of the eponymous waterway."
p7843
aS'To create the illusion that he had double the number of men he actually did, he had his forces march out twice successively during the August 1812 Siege of Detroit, in which he commanded alongside Isaac Brock.'
p7844
aS'His attempt to seek out allies in the South led to a civil war among the Creeks, and, in his absence, his younger brother failed to stop William Henry Harrisons forces at the Battle of Tippecanoe.'
p7845
aS'The Battle_of_the_Thames was, for 10 points, the site of the death of what Shawnee chief'
p7846
aS'His father was killed during Lord Dunmores War, and his boyhood home was destroyed in the Battle of Piqua.'
p7847
aS'His collaborators included Isaac Brock, a brother with whom he captured a fort commanded by William Hull, and Henry Proctor.'
p7848
aS'After adopting the economic theories of Joseph Brant, he broke with Black Hoof and decribed the abdication of land claims.'
p7849
aS'Henry Proctor failed to show up to his final battle near Chatham, where he was killed, possibly by Richard Mentor Johnson, after rising to prominence as the brother of Tenskwatawa, a prophet.'
p7850
aS'For 10 points, name this Indian leader, the loser at the Battle_of_the_Thames and the Battle of Tippecanoe.'
p7851
aS'This man and Galusha Grow spearheaded tax reforms during his time as chairman of the Ways and Means committee.'
p7852
aS'Known as the "old Commoner," he was born with a club-foot, a trait which may have influenced his desire to become a lawyer.'
p7853
aS'His defense of the suspects in the "Christiana Riot" and his willingness to help fugitive slaves made him many enemies, and Lee was unable to prevent his men from destroying this man\'s ironworks near Chambersburg.'
p7854
aS'He would later gain his revenge by promulgating the "conquered provinces" policy that came to dominate early Reconstruction efforts.'
p7855
aS"However, this man is best known for being the most vocal supporter of Andrew Johnson's impeachment."
p7856
aS'FTP, name this politician from Pennsylvania, a leader of the Radical faction of the Republican party during the Civil War.'
p7857
aS'This man defended the participants in the Christiana Riot, in addition to supporting the Morrill Tariff.'
p7858
aS'A member of the Appropriations Committee, this man was succeed in his district by Henry Muhlenberg.'
p7859
aS'This man preceded Justin Morrill as Chairman of the House Ways and Means Committee.'
p7860
aS'His iron works were destroyed by Robert_E._Lees troops, and this supporter of the Confiscation Act called for total war against the south and opposed the Crittenden Compromise.'
p7861
aS'This man, who introduced the impeachment proceedings against Andrew Johnson, drafted the Reconstruction Act and the Fourteenth Amendment.'
p7862
aS'For ten points, identify this member of the Radical Republicans, who was a representative from Pennsylvania.'
p7863
aS"Early in this man's career, he represented slaves in the case of the Christiana Riot, and as a result of his policies, this man's ironworks were burnt down."
p7864
aS'This man was once of four to vote against the Crittenden-Johnson Resolution, and he once stated that certain states should be treated as "conquered provinces.'
p7865
aS'" This figure served as the chairman of the House Ways and Means Committee, and with John Bingham he introduced a resolution to impeach president Andrew Johnson.'
p7866
aS'His stance in favor of racial equality led him to be known as "The Great Commoner.'
p7867
aS'" For 10 points, identify this congressman from Pennsylvania who, along with Charles Sumner, led the Radical Republicans during Reconstruction.'
p7868
aS'It was somewhat overlooked in its time due the naval Battle of Beachy Head, which occurred at the same time.'
p7869
aS'A large amount of troops here were separated from each other by a deep ravine near Roughgrange, a landform that neither side knew existed.'
p7870
aS'That mistake cost the losing side its cannons.'
p7871
aS'The actual fighting broke out at Oldbridge, where George Walker and the second-in-command of the winning side, the Duke of Shomberg, were killed.'
p7872
aS"The Dutch Blue Guard managed to force its way across this battle's namesake feature."
p7873
aS'The winning side had the help of infantry from the region of Ulster known as Inniskillingers, while much of the losing army in this battle had been raised by Richard Talbot, First Earl of Tyrconnel in an attempt to reclaim the landholdings lost by Catholics in Ireland during the event which this battle prevented from being reversed, the Glorious Revolution.'
p7874
aS'For 10 points, name this 1690 battle that took place in Ireland, in which William_III_of_England crushed the former James II near the namesake river. '
p7875
aS'The leader of one of the armies involved in this clash suffered a flesh wound while conducting reconnaissance outside his headquarters at Tallyallen.'
p7876
aS'Count Meinhard Schomberg successfully forded the river at Slane in the face of harassment by Sir Neil ONeill, but a wide ravine prevented him from engaging the Jacobite left wing at Roughgrange.'
p7877
aS'The Jacobite right was overwhelmed by Dutch Blue Guards at Donore, forcing James II to retreat to Duleek.'
p7878
aS'For 10 points, thus ended what 1690 Irish battle that saw the Glorious Revolution cemented as William of Orange secured his claim to the English throne over James'
p7879
aS"Shortly before this battle, the losing side exchanged Lord Mountcashel's brigade for a group of regulars led by protg of Turenne, the Duke of Lauzun."
p7880
aS'The winning side feigned a cavalry advance towards Slane, allowing them to take Oldbridge.'
p7881
aS'Pursuit of the losing army stopped at the Bridge of Duleek after the decisive charge of Meinhardt Schomberg and the Blue Guards cleared the field.'
p7882
aS'Followed by the Battle of Aughrim and fought near Drogheda, losing commanders at this battle included Richard Talbott and a man who fled the battlefield and earned the nickname Shitty James.'
p7883
aS'For ten points, name this defeat for James II in Ireland.'
p7884
aS'One cause of this battle was the two day respite allowed in the blockade on Presque Island harbor.'
p7885
aS"It was followed by the Battle of Longwoods, and one side was short both guns because they had previously been removed from Fort Amherstburg to be mounted on Commander Barclay's ships."
p7886
aS"When Procter's cannon failed to fire, many of his men fled to Burlington, leaving most of his men under Colonel Warburton to face American commanders like Isaac Shelby, Duncan McArthur, and Lewis_Cass."
p7887
aS'Precipitated when Oliver Hazard Perry blockaded Detroit, it is named for an Ontario river.'
p7888
aS'For 10 points, name this victory for William Henry Harrison in the War_of_1812, during which Tecumseh was killed.'
p7889
aS'He began the tradition of the Delian League, a sort of Greek mafia, by demanding tribute of the Argives in return for protection.'
p7890
aS"Playing a major role in Herodotus' Histories, he flaunted conventional strategy by informing the Persians of the Greek fleet's position, thus bringing the cumbersome Persian navy into an area where only Greek ships could maneuver."
p7891
aS'FTP name this Greek general who engineered the defeat of Xerxes at Salamis.'
p7892
aS"[AR] During the Persian threat, Adimantus the Cornithian chastised this man for having no country and demanded his silence during a meeting prior to this general's greatest victory."
p7893
aS'He had one rival Epicydes bought off to insure that he would command.'
p7894
aS'Previously, he had his chief rival ostracized in 483 BC, and upon becoming Archon Eponymus, he persuaded others to use the gains from the silver mines at Laurium to increase military projects.'
p7895
aS'In that victory, he served along with the Spartan Eurybiades.'
p7896
aS'Eventually, ostracized himself he eventually found asylum with Artaxerxes in Magnesia.'
p7897
aS'Ambitious, it was said that the trophies of Miltiades would not let him sleep.'
p7898
aS'Using his newly built navy to fight the inconclusive battle of Artemisium, For 10 points, name this Athenian General victor at Salamis.'
p7899
aS'The protagonist of this novel declares his "natural antipathy" toward washes, which his wife "makes" for their daughters.'
p7900
aS"One character's love interest saves her after she falls from her horse into a stream and later saves her sister from her marriage to Mr. Williams."
p7901
aS'In this novel, plans to frolic with city ladies are foiled when an informant spoils the good name of the central family, leading them to order Mr. Burchell to leave.'
p7902
aS'One of the two weddings that end this novel involves George and Arabella Wilmot, and the other involves Sophia and Sir William Thornhill.'
p7903
aS"Featuring the evil Squire Thornhill's attempts to ruin the Primrose family, for 10 points, name this novel about a family that has their fortune restored, written by Oliver Goldsmith."
p7904
aS'In Connected, Christakis and Fowler claimed that influence spreads over this many degrees in social networks.'
p7905
aS'In Toward Social Renewal, Rudolf Steiner promoted the increased interdependence of this many societal realms, and his educational theory posited this many stages of childhood development.'
p7906
aS"John Carroll's theory of cognitive ability has this many strata."
p7907
aS'Georges (*) Dumezil divided Proto-Indo-European society into this many classes based on their functions.'
p7908
aS"Max Weber's theory of social stratification posits this many factors."
p7909
aS"Though there are six stages in Kohlberg's model of moral development, they are grouped into this many levels."
p7910
aS'For 10 points, Auguste Comte divided societies into how many stages'
p7911
aS'The first treaty of this name returned the cities of Cambrai, Aire, and Saint-Omer to Spain, and ended the War_of_Devolution.'
p7912
aS'The second one returned the Duchy of Modena and the Republic of Genoa to their pre-war status, gave Silesia and Glatz to Prussia, and renewed Great Britains right to send an annual vessel to the Spanish colonies, which had been guaranteed by Spain in the earlier Treaty_of_Utrecht.'
p7913
aS'The French populace began declaring things to be as stupid as the peace due to resentment at this treatys return of their gains in the Netherlands.'
p7914
aS'Confirming the pragmatic sanction, and generally returning things to the way they were before the war, FTP, name this 1748 treaty signed in Aachen that ended the War of Austrian Succession.'
p7915
aS'The talks that led to the signing of this treaty were immediately preceded by negotiations at Breda, brokered by the Dutch, who were still formally neutral, and by a meeting between Count Puisieulx and Lord Sandwich at Lige.'
p7916
aS'Negotiations were further influenced by the fall of Maastricht during the talks.'
p7917
aS'A notable article of this treaty returned the privileges of the Annual Ship and the asiento to Britain for a poorly specified amount of time.'
p7918
aS'In addition, the treaty awarded Parma, Piacenza, and Guastalla to Don Felipe, a move that annoyed the Piedmontese who had tried to gain those areas during the war.'
p7919
aS'The only other territorial concession that was made was the confirmation of the acquisition by Prussia of Glatz and Silesia during the earlier Treaty of Dresden.'
p7920
aS'For ten points, name this October 1848 peace treaty that ended the War_of_the_Austrian_Succession.'
p7921
aS'One group in this event decided against naming Bathurst head of their commission as they felt it did not need a ranking minister, while members of the other commission included Jonathan Russell and James A. Bayard.'
p7922
aS'One side originally demanded that the other stop dry fishing on Canadian coasts, but it was only after Thomas Macdonough\'s victory at Plattsburgh which forced that side to relent from demanding the creation of a buffer state for its "Indian allies.'
p7923
aS'" Allowing for the establishment of commissions to determine the boundary from the Lake of the Woods to the St. Croix River, it resulted in all territory taken by the British and Americans to be returned to their owners before the war.'
p7924
aS'The Battle of New Orleans took place after the signing of, FTP, which treaty which ended the War_of_1812'
p7925
aS'Francis I of France rejected it, demanding that the participants show him the will of Adam to support their claims.'
p7926
aS'Altered by the Treaty of San Ildefonso, this agreement revised the papal bull "Inter Caetera," which might have threatened the West African possessions of King John II.'
p7927
aS'Instead, the new line drawn 370 leagues west of the Cape Verdes gave John a claim to the discoveries of Pedro Alvares Cabral.'
p7928
aS'For 10 points, this 1494 treaty that divided the New World between Spain and Portugal.'
p7929
aS'One of its provisions called for a joint expedition between the signatory parties to begin within ten months; that expedition never occurred.'
p7930
aS"A dispute resulting from Ferdinand Magellan's discovery of the Moluccas was resolved when an eastern counterpart to this agreement was established by the Treaty of Saragossa."
p7931
aS'Refining a declaration made by (*) Pope Alexander VI that benefited his home country of Spain, it moved the original line westward to three hundred seventy leagues west of the Cape Verde Islands, placing the area that would become the coast of Brazil under Portuguese rule.'
p7932
aS'For 10 points, identify this 1494 agreement that divided the colonial claims of Spain and Portugal.'
p7933
aS"The gift of an elephant prompted Leo X to issue Praecelsae devotionis, which partially abrogated it in favor of an earlier papal declaration, Nicholas V's Romanus pontifex."
p7934
aS'An abortive conference was held on a bridge between the cities of Elvas and Badajoz to amend this document, which was based, in part on the earlier papal bull Inter Caetera.'
p7935
aS'This document was extended by the Treaty of Zaragoza, which was prompted by the need to establish an eastern equivalent to this agreement.'
p7936
aS'A distance of three-hundred seventy leagues west of Fogo, one of the Cape Verde Islands was established for a line of demarcation between the competing claims of two colonial powers.'
p7937
aS'For 10 points, name this 1494 treaty which divided the New World between Portugal and Spain.'
p7938
aS'One court case dealing with this treaty, R v Symonds, found that it was still binding on the signatories.'
p7939
aS'The second article of this document grants one nation exclusive control over Lands and Estates Forests Fisheries and other properties of the other signatory power, while the term rangatiratanga has caused interpretational problems for this treaty.'
p7940
aS'Eruera Maihi Patuone was important in supporting the other side in this treaty, but was opposed by Te Kemara, while Governor Hobson was dispatched from Britain to sign this treaty for the other side.'
p7941
aS'For ten points, identify this treaty between the British monarchy and various representatives of Maori tribesmen, which established New_Zealand.'
p7942
aS'In January 1862 two men were released from prison by order of Secretary of State Seward.'
p7943
aS'One, John Slidell, was accredited to France, while the other, James Mason, was a representative of Great Britain.'
p7944
aS'They were taken prisoner in the first place because they were known commissioners of the Confederacy.'
p7945
aS'For ten points, Union Captain Charles Wilkes of the ship San Jacinto captured Mason and Slidell from what British mail steamer, causing a rift in American and British relations'
p7946
aS'In Boston, a jeweled sword was presented to the commanding officer of the U.S.'
p7947
aS'Exploring Expedition for services in this event, in which that man was congratulated for "twisting the lion\'s tail.'
p7948
aS'" The search of the Powhatan took place before this event, which also involved Eustis and Macfarland and occurred as Richard Williams\'s men were headed for Saint Thomas.'
p7949
aS'In the wake of this incident, Lord Lyons was appeased thanks to the decision of William Seward, who defended the actions of Captain Charles Wilkes on the San Jacinto, yet released the prisoners in question.'
p7950
aS'For 10 points, name this 1861 diplomatic crisis sparked by the capture of James Mason and John Slidell, two Confederate envoys, from the namesake British ship. '
p7951
aS'George Bigelow praised its instigator at an honorary dinner organized by John A. Andrew to celebrate this event.'
p7952
aS'It was precipitated by George Trenholms agreement to pay $10,000 to rent the Theodora, and James Moir refused D. M. Fairfaxs request for a full search.'
p7953
aS'The HMS Rinaldo transported its central participants to St. Thomas after Lord Lyons received an official apology from William Seward, and it was instigated when Charles Wilkes had the USS San Jacinto fire on the eponymous vessel.'
p7954
aS'FTP, name this 1861 incident in which Confederate officials James Mason and John Slidell were forcibly removed from the namesake British mail ship.'
p7955
aS'Fighting at this battle along Assunpink Creek saw the Knyphausen regiment surrounded, while the two major avenues in the town where this battle took place were King and Queen Streets.'
p7956
aS'One commander in this battle wasnt awoken until the other side had captured an important redoubt; his name was Johann Rall.'
p7957
aS'The highly trained professional soldiers on one side were hung over from Christmas partying and thus ineffectual.'
p7958
aS'For 10 points, name this Revolutionary War battle that saw Washington cross the Delaware and kick some drunken Hessian ass.'
p7959
aS"John Honeyman's reconnaissance mission was vital to the success of the victors in this battle, in which the losing commander had denied to his superior the need for building a redoubt."
p7960
aS"The attackers' southern column was led by John Sullivan, while Nathanael Green advanced from the north, and a third division that was to attack from the west never made it to the battle."
p7961
aS'American forces suffered minimal casualties, while capturing over 900 Hessians.'
p7962
aS'For ten points, name this December 26, 1776 American Revolution battle in which George_Washington coordinated a surprise attack by crossing the Delaware.'
p7963
aS'Prebattle intelligence had been gathered by the spy John Honeyman.'
p7964
aS'The attacking army divided into north and south forces in order to march down both King and Queen Street.'
p7965
aS'A defending vanguard at Pennington under the command of Lieutenant Widerhold was forced to retreat, but the rush of forces to their aid only made it easier for the attackers under John Sullivan to block escape via the Assunpink Bridge, which would lead to the annihilation of the appropriately named Lossberg regiment and the death of their commander, Johann Rall, while James_Monroe was shot in the shoulder.'
p7966
aS'Fought on the day after Christmas, for ten points name this George_Washington victory in New Jersey, on the other side of the Delaware River.'
p7967
aS'One section of this battle focused on trying a small ride called the Dead Man.'
p7968
aS'One side was supplied by what came to be known as the Sacred Road.'
p7969
aS'The original commander for one side in this battle, Emile Driant, was killed in the initial stages, and his replacement, Fernand de Langle de Cary, was removed after abandoning the Woevre plain.'
p7970
aS'Near the end of this battle, Charles Mangin recaptured the forts Douaumont and Vaux.'
p7971
aS'Robert Nivelle took control of one side during this battle after the promotion of another man, the latter of whom is often credited with Nivelles quote of They shall not pass.'
p7972
aS'This battle occurring on the Meuse rive in France made the name of Philippe Ptain.'
p7973
aS'For 10 points, name this extremely bloody battle of World_War_I.'
p7974
aS'The altarpiece of the Abbey Church in Klosterneuburg, Austria, and the Shrine of the Three Kings in the Cologne Cathedral are two famous works by Nicholas of this location.'
p7975
aS'With Metz and Toul, this location formed the Three Bishoprics, and during the War of the First Coalition, this town fell on September 2nd, 1792 to the Prussians, just weeks before their loss at Valmy.'
p7976
aS'A treaty was signed at this location following a defeat for Lothair I at Fontenoy in 841, while a battle that took place at this location on the Meuse River began in February of 1916 and made a hero of Henri Petain.'
p7977
aS"For ten points, identify this French town, which served as the site of the 843 treaty that divided Charlemagne's empire, as well as one of the bloodiest battles of World_War_I which resulted in roughly 400,000 casualties for both sides."
p7978
aS'In 1442, he and his brother Radu were sent as hostages to the Sultan of the Ottoman_Empire.'
p7979
aS"The Ottomans under Murad II would put him on his father's throne but it wasn't until 1456 when he finally succeeded in overthrowing his cousin and rival Vladislav II."
p7980
aS'One story goes that his subjects were so afraid of him that they did not disturb a cup of solid gold reserved for thirsty travelers in the Square of Targoiste.'
p7981
aS'His subjects were right to be intimidated, as he had many boyars slaughtered using his preferred method, impalement.'
p7982
aS"For 10 points name this Prince of Wallachia believed to have inspired Bram Stoker's Dracula."
p7983
aS"This man's head was preserved in honey and oil after his death in battle, and his cousin Stephen III replaced this man's elder brother with."
p7984
aS'Basarab Laiota.'
p7985
aS'He fled his homeland after Bogdan II of a neighboring region was murdered, and as a child he was sent to Adrianople as appeasement.'
p7986
aS"His older brother was blinded with iron forks and killed at Tirgoviste, and this ruler's wife threw herself into the Arges River."
p7987
aS'He launched the "Night Attack" to stave off Sultan Mehmed II, but he was soon imprisoned by Matthias Corvinus after the defection ofhis brother Radu the Handsome.'
p7988
aS"For ten points, identify this voivode of Wallachia who got his epithet for his cruel methods of execution and provided the inspiration for Bram Stoker's Dracula."
p7989
aS'One of these phenomena almost caused the destruction of the Aeta people and Clark Air Base, while a recent one in the United_States was classified as Pelean.'
p7990
aS'Lake Toba was formed by one of these actions and tuya form when this action occurs beneath a glacier.'
p7991
aS'In February 2001, the most severe recorded instance of this action in the solar system took place on [*] Io.'
p7992
aS'These actions produce tephra, which can be classified as blocks, bombs, or lapilli, and they can form calderas and pyroclastic flows.'
p7993
aS'For 10 points, name these lava-spewing actions performed by explosive mountains like Vesuvius and Mt.'
p7994
aS'St. Helens, one of which caused the burial of Pompeii.'
p7995
aS'After persuading the emperor to marry his daughter, he took the title Duke of AnHan.'
p7996
aS'He was made regent during the reign of Ru-zi by his aunt, the widow of Emperor Yuan-di.'
p7997
aS'He attempt to gain support from the peasants, unsuccessfully, by establishing a number of land redistribution and loan repayment reforms.'
p7998
aS'Claiming intellectual legitimacy for his reforms from some supposedly recently discovered texts of Confucius that were destroyed.'
p7999
aS'he came to power during the rule of Ping-Di.'
p8000
aS'His short lived Xin Dynasty, founded in 9 CE, was then toppled by the Red Eyebrows.'
p8001
aS'For 10 points; name this usurper, an official who interrupted the Western Han_Dynasty.'
p8002
aS'This figure was given an albino chicken that he used to gain the title Duke of Anhan, and in the century following his death treasure hunters roamed the countryside seeking the ample rewards for locating various fragments of his corpse.'
p8003
aS"Chunyu Zhang was murdered by Emperor Cheng as a result of this man's actions, and one rebellion against him was led by Wang Kuang and Wang Feng, who were part of the Lulin Mountain group."
p8004
aS'This man instituted an agricultural approach named for the character it resembled, the well-field system, and made sweeping and violently unpopular changes to geographical names.'
p8005
aS'A sloth tax for unused land prompted the revolt of Mother Lu against this ruler, who served as a regent for the infant Ping and appointed Ruzi as his successor.'
p8006
aS'Seizing power from the Liu family and ousted in the Red Eyebrow revolt, for 10 points, identify this man who established the Xin dynasty after briefly usurping the throne of Han China.'
p8007
aS'According to the traditions of Brabant and Hainaut, females of a first marriage took precedence over males of a second with regard to property inheritance.'
p8008
aS'Therefore, Louis XIV insisted that his wife Maria_Theresa should inherit the Spanish Netherlands from her father Philp IV.'
p8009
aS'As such, he sent Marshal de Turenne to conquer Flanders in 1667.'
p8010
aS'England, the Dutch Republic, and Sweden formed the Triple Alliance to oppose him; eventually peace was reached at Aix-la-Chapelle in 1668.'
p8011
aS'FTP, identify this war dealing with inheritance.'
p8012
aS'It was waged on the pretext of a Brabantian law that provided for the transfer of property to the children born of the first marriage of the deceased.'
p8013
aS'Thus, it was hoped that the instigator of this war would receive the Spanish Netherlands instead of the future Charles II of Spain.'
p8014
aS"Also known as the Queen's War, this conflict saw the invasion of Franche-Comt by French armies under de Turenne and saw the United Provinces, England, and Sweden form the Triple Alliance."
p8015
aS'Ended by the Treaty of Aix-la-Chapelle, FTP, identify this 1667-8 war fought by Louis XIV on behalf of his wife Marie Thrse.'
p8016
aS'This wars major engagement was the month-long Siege of Lille.'
p8017
aS'It was ended due to the diplomatic intervention of the Triple Alliance that included the defending power as well as England and the Netherlands.'
p8018
aS'This war saw the first major victory for the fortification engineer Sebastien Vauban, and much of this conflict was fought over the Duchy of Brabant.'
p8019
aS'It was sparked when Spain proved unable to pay the dowry of Maria_Theresa as required by the Peace of the Pyrenees, and France sought other compensation.'
p8020
aS'For ten points, name this war in which Louis XIV invaded the Spanish Netherlands, named for a concept from property law.'
p8021
aS'At the end of this war, the duchies of Lorraine and Bar were taken away from France for a generation and the displaced duke of Lorraine was given the duchy of Tuscany after the death of its last Medici ruler.'
p8022
aS'Sardinia entered in hopes of dislodging the Austrians from Lombardy, but it was Spanish entry that caused the defeat of Anna of Russia, Holy Roman Emperor Charles VI, and their candidate.'
p8023
aS'It began upon the death of Augustus II and escalated after the fall of Danzig, which forced the flight of Stanislaus I.  FTP, name this war that ended with the Treaty of Vienna in 1738, a conflict over ascension to an Eastern European throne.'
p8024
aS'This conflict saw the death of Florimund de Mercy fighting against the Marshals de Broglie and Coigny at San Pietro.'
p8025
aS'Reinforcements under Charles Emmanuel III of Sardinia participated in the late Battle of Guastalla.'
p8026
aS'After the issuance of a manifesto at Konigsberg, Adam Tarlo formed a confederation to oppose the army of Peter Lacy.'
p8027
aS'Meanwhile, the fleet of Luis de Cordova was successful at the key Battle of Bitonto in another theater.'
p8028
aS'It was ended by the Treaty of Vienna, which made Francis Stephen the Grand Duke of Tuscany after the last Medici ruler, and most importantly recognized the rule of Augustus III over the claim of Stanislaw who had fled to France at its beginning.'
p8029
aS'FTP, name this 1733-1738 conflict, a certain war of succession fought when Russia attempted to set up a ruler in the namesake country.'
p8030
aS"In the run-up to this conflict, three rulers signed Lowenwolde's treaty, an agreement to back Emmanuel of Portugal."
p8031
aS'One front saw the sieges of Kehl and Philipsburg and the aborted siege to Mainz.'
p8032
aS'On another front, Bonnie Prince Charlie had his first-ever experience of combat when he witnessed the siege of Gaita.'
p8033
aS'On that front, an impasse over the use of forces to secure Milan led an angry Charles Emmanuel of Savoy to refuse to lend his siege weapons to the assault on Mantua.'
p8034
aS'Don Carlos of Parma lost his lands but gained the throne of the Kingdom of the Two Sicilies in this conflict, while France gained Lorraine in exchange for recognising the pragmatic sanction and Augustus of Saxony won the central office.'
p8035
aS"For 10 points, name this war in which France and Spain used Stanislaw Lesczyinski's cause as an excuse to fight Austrian power after Augustus III became king of the namesake country."
p8036
aS"Don Carlos's victory at Bitonto in this war led to him becoming Charles III of Sicily."
p8037
aS"France's first ally in this war was the kingdom of Sardinia & Savoy, which helped besiege Mantua."
p8038
aS'The person who led the Confederation of Dzikw had previously held the job in question under Swedish domination and was the father-in-law of Louis XV.'
p8039
aS'Perhaps the most important result of the two peaces of Vienna, which ended this war, was the laying of seeds for a similar war a year later as France guaranteed the Pragmatic Sanction.'
p8040
aS'For 10 points, name this conflict in which Frederick Augustus of Saxony and Stanislaw Leszczynski vied for a European crown.'
p8041
aS'Its namesake was elected after a resignation by Simon Cameron.'
p8042
aS'William Yancey\'s development of the "Alabama Platform" was formed in response to this amendment, which was ratified twice in the house, but the senate refused to impose its restrictions on President Polk\'s Army appropriation bill for lands acquired from Mexico, which would have barred slavery in the new territory.'
p8043
aS'FTP identify this congressional proposal of August 8, 1846, named after a senator from Pennsylvania.'
p8044
aS"Lawmakers like Timothy Pilsbury and Thomas_Jefferson Rusk promulgated the Kaufman Doctrine in response to this legislation's widest interpretation by Preston King."
p8045
aS'Its author circulated it with instructions that the first person to catch the eye of speaker John W. Davis should introduce it, which a member of the Committee of Seven accomplished.'
p8046
aS'The reading of its first draft, which was written by Jacob Brinkerhoff, led to the formulation of the Alabama Platform of William Yancey, while those in favor of it included John P. Hale, who organized the Free Soil Party around its chief stipulation.'
p8047
aS'FTP, name this amendment named for a Pennsylvania legislator which would have barred slavery from territories won by the United_States in the recent Mexican War.'
p8048
aS'Preston Kings interpretation of this piece of legislation lead to the creation of the Kaufman doctrine, while Jacob Brinkerhoff devised an earlier version of this legislation, which William Wick attempted to amend.'
p8049
aS'It prompted William Yancey to create the Alabama Doctrine.'
p8050
aS'It was originally attached as a rider to a two-million dollar appropriations bill, and John Hales support of this legislation lead to the creation of the free soil party.'
p8051
aS'FTP, name this piece of legislation that sought to exclude slavery form territories acquired in the Mexican-American War.'
p8052
aS'Jacob Brinkerhoff drafted it on behalf of its namesake, who was later apppointed to the Senate when Simon Cameron was made Secretary of War.'
p8053
aS'William Yancey reacted to it by putting forth the Alabama Platform, which was later adopted by John C. Breckenridges campaign.'
p8054
aS'It was twice rejected by the Senate, after passing the House attached to Preston Kings appropriations bill and to a bill funding the negotiation of the Treaty of Guadalupe Hidalgo, in 1846 and 1847.'
p8055
aS'For 10 points, name this rider introduced by a Pennsylvania congressman, which proposed to ban slavery in territory gained from the Mexican War.'
p8056
aS'The man who introduced this would eventually switch his party affiliation, becoming the first Republican candidate for governor of his state and being appointed to a judgeship by Abraham_Lincoln.'
p8057
aS'He was chosen to introduce this rider on an appropriations bill by a group including Hannibal Hamlin, the Barnburner Democrats, because of his support for actions of the Polk administration.'
p8058
aS'In response to this, William Wick of Indiana introduced a proposal to extend the Missouri Compromise to the Pacific, which narrowly passed.'
p8059
aS'For 10 points, name this legislation that would have prevented slavery from extending to territory newly acquired from Mexico, introduced by a Democratic congressman from Pennsylvania in 1846'
p8060
aS'It featured Ni Zan and Huang Gongweng, who were masters of the wenrenhua style and are known as two of its "Four Masters.'
p8061
aS'"  During it, a kind of white porcelain coated with a blue glaze known as "shu fu" was first made.'
p8062
aS"The great dramatist Kuan Han-ch'ing wrote The Injustice Suffered by Tou-o during it, though this period is best known in literature for some works attributed to Lo Kuan-chung, such as The Subjugation of the Evil Phantoms and The Water Margin."
p8063
aS'A visit to its court by Oderic of Pordenone resulted in sorghum being introduced to China.'
p8064
aS'A law code known as the Yassa was instituted by this dynasty, which ruled from a capital at Dadu.'
p8065
aS'After a succession of 10 rulers over 98 years, the dynasty fell in the wake of the revolt of the Red Turbans and was supplanted by the future Hongwu emperor and his Ming dynasty.'
p8066
aS'FTP, name this dynasty of China that was founded by Kublai_Khan.'
p8067
aS'This Dynastys name was taken from a passage of the I Ching, meaning Original Heaven, and during its reign China saw the increased use of the vernacular written Chinese.'
p8068
aS'Zhu Yuanzhang expelled the last of its ten emperors from the capital Dadu, and the dynasty also saw the first connection of the Grand Canal to Beijing.'
p8069
aS'Though the founder captured Korea, (*) he was repulsed in his territorial ambitions with three failed invasions of Vietnam and two failed invasions of Japan.'
p8070
aS'FTP  name this dynasty Marco Polo visited, whose most famous leader was Kublai_Khan.'
p8071
aS"Events that took place during this dynasty's rule included the reinstatement of civil service exams, which were based on Neo-Confucianism, and a literacy test for Buddhists who wanted military exemptions, which led to the recording of koans."
p8072
aS'Artists during this period placed emphasis on personal expression through the concept of literati painting, and san-chu, or nondramatic songs, became more popular.'
p8073
aS'The Grand Canal was rebuilt during this period, and a new capital was established at Khanbaliq.'
p8074
aS'One of the catalysts of its downfall was the lack of natives in government positions, and its overthrow was led by Chu.'
p8075
aS'The shortest of the major dynasties, for ten points, name this dynasty that ruled China from 1279 to 1368 and was succeeded by the Ming.'
p8076
aS'During this dynasty\'s rule, a monk devised his namesake script, or "square writing", and he and his uncle Sakya Pandita became spiritual advisors to its first ruler.'
p8077
aS"One ruler of this dynasty abolished the jarghuchi system of judges and had been mentored by Li Meng, while another ruler was visited by Odoric of Pordenone and came to power when Grand Censor Tegshi killed the chancellor Baiju and emperor Shidhibala at the coup d'etat at Nanpo."
p8078
aS'Shidhibala had earlier been forced to dismiss the councillor Temuder, and its general Zhong Hongfan quashed its predecessor at the Battle of (*) Yamen.'
p8079
aS'It was founded by a man who defeated Ariq Boke after campaigning against the Song.'
p8080
aS'For 10 points, name this Mongol Chinese dynasty, founded by Khubilai Khan.'
p8081
aS'One commander in this battle kept back his third infantry line to prevent his center from being pinned, having seen the results of his enemys victory at Ilipa.'
p8082
aS'One side placed his troops in three lines, with his hastati in front of his principes and triarii, instead of the normal checkerboard fashion.'
p8083
aS'The cavalry under Syphax were on the left flank of one commander, who had been ordered home after a loss at Utica.'
p8084
aS'Preceded by a battle at the Great Plains, this battle resulted in a decisive Roman victory over the numerous forces and elephants of the Carthaginians.'
p8085
aS'FTP, name this 202 B.C.'
p8086
aS'battle which ended the Second Punic War as Scipio Africanus defeated Hannibal.'
p8087
aS'After landing at Lemta, one participant in this battle marched his forces to Hadrumentum, from which those forces then moved to the site of this engagement.'
p8088
aS'Prior to this engagement, one side had broken out of Castra Cornelia, to which it had been forced to retire from the siege of Utica, and destroyed the camp of Syphax.'
p8089
aS'The actions of Laelius were crucial to the outcome of this battle, in which the victor deployed his maniples in columns with the hastati in front of the principes and triarii.'
p8090
aS'This battle took place five years after one victorious general at this battle had won the Battle of the Metaurus River, while Massinissa was recognized as the king of Numidia in the aftermath of this battle, which earned the victor his title of "Africanus.'
p8091
aS'" For ten points, identify this 202 B. C. engagement which saw Scipio\'s victory over Hannibal.'
p8092
aS'Heinrich von Treitschke called it "a glorious beginning to a glorious history," a view criticized by William Henderson.'
p8093
aS"Its greatest advocate was imprisoned in Wurtemberg in 1822 and deported to America for supporting the idea, which was inspired by Napoleon's Continental System."
p8094
aS'Karl Bruck advocated the entry of Austria, but this plan was halted by the minister of commerce, Delbruck.'
p8095
aS'Founded through the efforts of Friedrich List, it was dissolved during the Seven Weeks War, but was reformed in 1867 with the state veto power removed by Bismarck.'
p8096
aS'FTP, name this economic association founded in 1834 among the German states, whose name is German for customs union.'
p8097
aS"Marschall exported mineral water to France in order to circumvent this polity's tariffs."
p8098
aS"This organization's founder explained his views Outlines of American Political Economy, as well as the more famous The National System of Political Economy."
p8099
aS'Treitschke claims that it was here that "public opinion won its first well-deserved victory," and this polity\'s Heppenheim program unsuccessfully called for a parliament.'
p8100
aS'Karl Buck advocated expanding it to include neighboring states, but Rudolf Delbruck insisted on the exclusion of Austria to protect its industry.'
p8101
aS'and in its second incarnation no single state possessed veto power.'
p8102
aS'Founded by Friedrich List and later reformed after the Austro-Prussian war, FTP, name this German customs union founded in 1834.'
p8103
aS'Some 20th century scholars who have studied this entity include W.O.'
p8104
aS'Henderson, who wrote about its impact on the politics of its southern members.'
p8105
aS'The Heppenheim Program sought to create a new legislative body to govern it, and it was also studied by Helmut Bohme.'
p8106
aS'Karl Bruck attempted to expand the borders of it to include Hungary and its neighbors, but this was prevented by the stalling tactics of Rudolf Delbruck.'
p8107
aS'It was inspired by the work of Friedrich List, who believed it represented the third and last of his stages of development, the unity of agriculture and manufacture.'
p8108
aS'Used to promote the kleindeutsche policy, weaken Austria, and promote the leadership of Prussia, FTE name this 1834 customs union in Germany.'
p8109
aS'One person who advocated this idea was thrown in jail in Nuremberg, and Hans Delbruck prevented the entry of a prospective member.'
p8110
aS'A topic of discussion at the Convention of Gastein, this idea was popularized by the author of The National System of Political Economy, Friedrich List, and a rival organization was created in the Steuerver until its absorption through a series of treaties in 1834.'
p8111
aS'First implemented by Prussia, which created a North German version of it, this organization created a uniform tariff against all non-members, and later absorbed Alsace-Lorraine in 1872 and the Hanseatic Cities in 1888.'
p8112
aS'For ten points, identify this German economic organization which excluded Austria and knocked down internal trade barriers, whose name comes from the German for "customs union".'
p8113
a.